[outbrain-logo.png] Privacy Center

   Error

Contracts

     * Privacy Policy
     * Cookies

   [English (United States)  ]

          Privacy Policy
          Cookie Table

Privacy Policy

Version 2.3

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   Last Updated May 24, 2018
   Outbrain is committed to protecting your personal data. This privacy
   policy (“Privacy Policy ”) governs Outbrain’s use of data collected by
   us, including any and all personal data. Personal data is information
   that relates to you and may identify you as an individual. We use your
   personal data in line with all applicable laws. To ensure compliance
   and to align with Outbrain’s values around Trust & Transparency, we
   have a team of privacy champions responsible for continuously
   implementing our global privacy program.
   + EXPAND ALL
   – COLLAPSE ALL
   1. Who we are, What we do, How you can contact Outbrain, our DPO or the
   relevant authorities
   +
   Who we are:
   Outbrain means Outbrain Inc., a Delaware, USA corporation with
   headquarters in New York; and its affiliated subsidiaries
   (collectively, “Outbrain,” or “we“, “us“, “our“). We operate out of 12
   global offices and we partner with publishers and marketers across the
   globe.
   What we do:
   Outbrain’s mission is to serve interesting recommendations to its Users
   based on their interests. To achieve our mission we enter into
   agreements with:
     * online publishers and partners who want to recommend relevant
       content to their readers (this is Outbrain Engage); and
     * advertisers who want readers to view their content (this is
       Outbrain Amplify).

   How to contact us:
   We regularly review our compliance with this Privacy Policy. Questions,
   comments and requests regarding this Privacy Policy are welcomed and
   should be addressed to PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com or by mail to
   Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011,
   Attn: Privacy Questions.
   If Outbrain does not satisfactorily answers your questions or concerns,
   you may also contact the following for advice, support or complaints:
     * Outbrain’s external Data Protection Officer (“DPO”): ePrivacy GmbH,
       represented by Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. ePrivacy GmbH can be
       reached directly at privacy@eprivacy.eu ; and/or
     * the Information Commissioner’s Officer, which is Outbrain’s lead
       supervisory service within the European Territories.

   Self-Regulatory Bodies
   Outbrain adheres to the Self-Regulatory Principles set forth by the
   Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) and the European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). We are members in good standing of the
   Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), an association dedicated to
   responsible data collection and its use for digital advertising. We
   adhere to the NAI Code of Conduct for Web and Mobile. Outbrain also
   adheres to the Interactive Advertising Bureau’s (IAB) Self-Regulatory
   Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising, and the IAB Europe OBA
   Framework.
   2. Outbrain User Types (including Opt Out Options)
   +
   Much of this Privacy Policy is divided into sections based on the way
   you may interact with Outbrain. Please determine what user type you
   are. For each user type we’ve explained what information we collect and
   why, what cookies and other similar technologies we use, how we share
   such information, and your rights.
   Site Visitors: You are a Site Visitor when you visit and interact with
   our web sites, web pages, interactive features, blogs and their
   respective contents at Outbrain.com (or any derivation, such as
   Outbrain.co.uk; Outbrain.fr; outbrain.de etc.) and MyOutbrain.com (“Our
   Sites“). See more here.
   (a) What information we collect and why
   We want to understand what services on Our Sites interest you and we
   want to remind you about the services we offer when you are not on Our
   Sites. To do this, we collect the following information from you: (i)
   IP address; (ii) User Agent data: device type (e.g., iPhone), browser
   type (e.g., Chrome), operating system (e.g., iOS); (iii) the pages
   visited on Our Site (e.g., the Outbrain “About” page); (iv) the time of
   visit (and corresponding timezone); and (v) referring URLs and other
   information normally transmitted in HTTP requests (e.g., this
   information tells us how you arrived on Our Sites).
   (b) What cookies and other similar technologies we use
   Please see this Cookie Table under “Site Visitors” for a detailed list
   of the cookies (and their corresponding retention periods) we use when
   you visit Our Sites.
   (c) How we may share information
     * Sharing Information we learn about you on Our Sites.

   In general, we do not share personal data about you with third parties
   for third party marketing or advertising purposes. However, we use
   various third parties (each listed on this Cookie Table) to help us
   market or advertise to you. For example, some of the cookies we use on
   Our Sites belong to third parties that will help Outbrain market or
   advertise to you. We require that these third parties and companies
   agree to keep all information shared with them confidential and to use
   the information only to perform their obligations to us. We do this by
   entering into agreements with all third parties who process personal
   data on our behalf to ensure that they process your personal data in
   accordance with our strict instructions and all applicable data
   protection laws. If you post on our blog, your comment and information
   will be publicly available. Please contact support@outbrain.com to
   remove your comment.
     * Using Third Party Services on Our Sites.

   Our Sites contain links to other websites that we do not own or
   operate. We do not control, recommend or endorse the content, products,
   services, privacy policies or practices of these third party websites.
   For example, on Our Sites you will notice clickable icons which take
   you to the Outbrain Facebook page or the Outbrain LinkedIn page. If you
   choose to click on these links, you should know that Facebook and
   Linkedin may send their own cookies to your device and they may
   independently collect personal data. It is therefore important that you
   read the Facebook and/or LinkedIn privacy policies.
     * Also see the Sharing section of this Privacy Policy.

   (d) Your rights
   The Terms of Use on Our Site govern the use of Our Site and also apply
   to you. You can stop using Our Site at any time. If you do, you may
   also want to remove any cookies that we have placed on any device used
   to access Our Site. If during your use of Our Sites you provided your
   email address, any email you receive from Outbrain includes an
   “unsubscribe” option.
   For European Territory Visitors, Outbrain has implemented a consent
   management platform (powered by One Trust) on Our Sites that provide
   visitors the opportunity to consent, or not consent, to cookies and
   similar tracking technologies on Our Sites. Upon accessing Our Sites,
   you will see a banner on the bottom of the page with information about
   the cookies we use. You may click the banner to reject any cookies that
   are not strictly necessary. Pressing “accept” on the banner or
   scrolling/clicking on Our Sites is an indication of your acceptance.
   Accordingly, Outbrain’s lawful basis for processing personal data on
   Our Sites is consent. You may withdraw your consent at any time here.
   Users: You are an User when you visit a page of a website or
   application of one of Outbrain’s partners where the Outbrain widget is
   installed (“Partner Sites”). For example, if you visit
   https://news.sky.com/uk, www.spiegel.de or www.cnn.com, the Outbrain
   widget is implemented on those websites. You know you are engaging with
   an Outbrain widget when you see text referencing Outbrain (e.g.,
   “Recommended by Outbrain”, “by Outbrain” near recommendations). If you
   click on the hyperlinked reference to Outbrain you will see a detailed
   notice that enables you to navigate to Outbrain’s Interest Portal,
   which provides a general visualization of the types of Outbrain data
   categories that may be used to make its recommendations. It also gives
   you the ablity to opt out of personalized recommendations. See more
   here.
   Example of an Outbrain Widget.
   Outbrain Example Recommendations
   (a) What information we collect and why
   We use UUIDs, IP Address and other Usage Information so that we can
   serve interesting recommendations. Outbrain’s recommendations may be
   paid for by an advertiser linking you to a new website or they may be
   organic such that the link is to another page on the same publisher’s
   website.
     * UUID.

   When as a User you first visit a Partner Site (e.g., CNN.com), Outbrain
   drops a cookie on your device in order to generate a UUID (a Unique
   User Identifier). We catalog and analyze the content you consume across
   Partner Sites. Our recommendations are based on: (i) browsing history;
   (ii) similar browsing patterns of other Users; (ii) recommendations
   that are generally popular with Outbrain’s audience at this time; (iv)
   some randomness, and (v) targeting requirements that may be provided or
   requested by our Amplify clients. As an example, Outbrain may know that
   UUID 123 (which could be you on your iPhone X on the Guardian using
   Chrome as your browser) likes to read about far away holiday
   destinations and that people who like to read about far away holiday
   destinations also like to read about exotic food.
   The UUID is a sequence of numbers and/or letters. This UUID attaches
   itself to your device and varies depending on which browser you use. In
   other words, Outbrain records a different UUID depending on which
   device and/or which browser you use when accessing the Partner Sites.
   For example, this means that you will have one UUID when you visit a
   Partner Site from your mobile phone using the browser Safari, and a
   different UUID when you visit a Partner Site from your iPad using the
   browser Safari. Outbrain will combine and consolidate a UUID from a
   mobile device (handheld or tablet) from a browser that then accesses an
   application (or vice versa) from the that same device.
   Assigning a UUID allows Outbrain to associate the page views visited
   and clicks on Outbrain’s recommendations from such UUID – all with the
   goal of providing interesting recommendations.
     * IP Address and Other Usage Information.

   We collect a UUID as explained above, we also collect the following
   information from you: (i) IP address; (ii) User Agent data: device type
   (e.g., iphone) , browser type (e.g., chrome), operating system e.g
   iOS); (iii) the pages visited; (iv) the time of visit; and (v)
   referring URLs and other information normally transmitted in HTTP
   requests .
   The above statistical information provides us with information about
   how many Users visited a specific page on our Partner Sites on which
   the Outbrain widget is installed, how long each User stayed on that
   page, the type of content on that page they clicked on and how they
   generally engaged with that page. This information is only personal
   data when it is associated to a UUID.
   (b) What cookies and other similar technologies we use
   Please see this Cookie Table under “Users” for a detailed list of the
   first party cookies we use when you interact with Partner Sites where
   the Outbrain technology is implemented.
   If you click on a link to one of our recommendations, the Amplify
   advertiser sponsoring the recommendation may place cookies on your
   device through redirects prior to arriving on the destination page of
   the recommendations or upon reaching the destination page. In such
   cases you will be subject to that advertiser’s privacy policy.
   In addition to Outbrain’s visible widget on Partner Sites, certain
   Outbrain advertisers may implement the Outbrain pixel on their
   websites. The Outbrain pixel determines whether the user reaching the
   page where the pixel is installed has an Outbrain UUID. If there is a
   UUID associated with such end user, Outbrain allows advertisers to
   retarget those UUIDs and/or provides advertisers with the total number
   of UUIDs that reached such page. If there was no Outbrain UUID on the
   page, the Outbrain pixel does not collect any information about the
   user.
   We encourage advertisers to disclose use of the Outbrain pixel on their
   own websites. Outbrain does not combine pixel information with a UUID’s
   profile.
   Data points such as page views and clicks are connected to a particular
   UUID are retained for 13 months. For example, if UUID 123 read an
   article on December 31, 2017, on February 1, 2018 that article will no
   longer be part of UUID 123’s profile.
   (c) How we may share information
   Outbrain does not share User profiles with any third parties. However,
   we may share the UUID with certain partners for the purpose of cookie
   syncing, or based on technical requirements. Also see the Sharing
   section of this Privacy Policy.
   (d) Your rights
     * Outbrain Opt Out.

   You may opt out of Outbrain’s personalized recommendations at any time.
   Please see Outbrain’s Interest Profile for a general visualization the
   data Outbrain knows about you and may use to make its recommendations.
   The Interest Profile also gives you the ability to opt out of
   personalized recommendations. Note that opting out of browsers is
   through the Outbrain Interest Profile , but opting out of personalized
   recommendations in applications is through the settings on your device
   (examples of steps are in the Interest Profile ).
   IMPORTANT – even though you have opted out of Outbrain:
     * You will still see Outbrain recommendations. Opting out of Outbrain
       personalization tracking does not mean you will no longer receive
       recommendations from Outbrain. Instead, it means that Outbrain’s
       recommendations will not be personalized. The recommendations will
       still use information about the document you are viewing (i.e.,
       contextual information) to provide you recommendations on that
       page.
     * The opt out is cookie based and device/browser specific. If you
       browse the web from several devices and/or browsers, you will need
       to opt out from each device and/or browser to ensure that we
       prevent personalization tracking on all of them. For the same
       reason, if you buy a new device, change browsers or delete (or
       clear) the opt out cookie, you will need to opt-out again. Opting
       out of personalization tracking is not the same as blocking
       cookies.
     * To ensure deletion of the profile tied to your UUID, do not opt in
       to Outbrain for at least 21 days. Your opt out from Outbrain’s
       personalized recommendations is effective immediately. However, if
       your browser permits local storage and you opt into Outbrain’s
       personalized recommendations within 21 days of your opt out, it is
       possible your prior profile will be reconnected to your UUID. If
       you do not opt in within 21 days, your profile will be deleted and
       cannot be recovered.
     * As with most opt out cookies, the Outbrain browser opt out relies
       upon a cookie. The opt-out cookie is intended to be persistent to
       honor the user’s preferences. However, the "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention" feature in iOS11 may impact the persistence of cookies
       across websites post a 24 hour window. We suggest using another
       browser or considering blocking all 3rd party cookies from the
       browser so that you are "opted out" without needing to rely on any
       company's actual opt out methodology.

     * Additional Opt-Out Options.

   You may also opt out of receiving personalized ads served by us or
   other advertising companies through industry powered tools such as the
   NAI or the various DAA-based pages (DAA,
   http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC, www.youradchoices.ca/choices ,
   and/or EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu) . Visiting the NAI, DAA, DAAC, or
   EDAA consumer choice pages allows you to opt out of all some or all of
   the participating members’ services. Like Outbrain’s opt out, these opt
   outs do not mean you will no longer receive any advertising – the
   advertisements will just not be tailored to you. You may continue to
   receive advertisements, for example, based on the particular website
   that you are viewing (i.e., contextually based ads). Also, if your
   browsers are configured to reject cookies when you visit the DAA, DAAC
   or EDAA consumer choice pages, your opt out may not be effective.
   • Lawful Basis. Outbrain’s lawful basis for processing a User’s
   personal data is based on the lawful basis determined by each of our
   Partner Sites. Each Partner Site will rely on consent or legitimate
   interest. Please consult the applicable Partner Sites’ privacy policy
   for more information about their lawful basis. If a Partner is relying
   on consent, Outbrain will not drop a cookie on you if you have not
   provided consent on such Partner Site.
   Business Partners: You are a Business Partner when you register (or
   email with Outbrain) on behalf of the company you work for to use the
   Outbrain Amplify or Outbrain Engage Services. See more here.
   (a) What information we collect and why
   You may provide certain personal data (such as email address) when you
   sign up for the Amplify or Engage services or otherwise communicate or
   interact with us. If you apply to become a Business Partner, we may
   request additional information from you via advertiser application
   forms, insertion orders and other forms. We automatically collect
   information about your username’s actions in the Outbrain dashboard. As
   an example, as an Amplify Business Partner if you change the
   cost-per-click for one your campaigns, Outbrain’s audit trail will have
   a record of all those actions.
   We collect and process the personal data above in order to perform our
   obligations under our agreement as a Business Partner (or prospective
   Business Partner) with you including to:
     * respond to your questions and requests;
     * to provide you with access to certain functions and features of our
       Amplify or Engage services (e.g., to provide and maintain your
       dashboard account);
     * verify your identity;
     * communicate with you about your account, our products, and
       available promotions relevant to your use of the Amplify or Engage
       service.

   (b) What cookies and other similar technologies we use
   Please see this Cookie Table under “Business Partners” for a detailed
   list of the cookies (and their corresponding retention periods) we use
   with Business Partners.
   (c) How we may share information with anyone
   We may disclose certain Business Partner information to vendors,
   contractors, or others who assist Outbrain in delivering the services
   (e.g., credit card processing). Also see the Sharing section of this
   Privacy Policy.
   (d) Your rights
   If as a Business Partner you wish to verify, correct, update or request
   the deactivation of your information, you may go the to the Outbrain
   dashboard edit your profile preferences or contact us at
   support@outbrain.com. If you are receiving Outbrain emails, you may
   “unsubscribe” using a link in the email. Note unsubscribing shall not
   opt you out notifications critical to providing the Amplify or Engage
   services (e.g., email invoices).
   Outbrain’s lawful basis for processing personal data of Business
   Partners is legitimate interest.
   3. How We Keep Information Safe, Transfers Outside the EEA, Sharing and
   Retention
   +
   Security
   Outbrain has a dedicated security team. We maintain tight controls over
   the personal data we collect, retaining it in firewalled and secured
   databases with strictly limited and controlled access rights, to ensure
   it is secure. Please see our security standards for more information.
   Business Partners have access to certain password-protected features of
   the Amplify or Engage service. They are responsible for keeping this
   password confidential. Please remember that unfortunately, the
   transmission of information via the internet is not completely secure.
   A common Internet scam is known as "spoofing" or "phishing." This
   occurs when you receive an email from what appears to be a legitimate
   source requesting personal data from you. Please be aware that we will
   not send you any emails requesting you to verify credit card, bank
   information, or any other personal data. If you ever receive an email
   that appears to be from us requesting such information from you, do not
   respond to it, and do not click on any links appearing in the email.
   Instead, please forward the email to us at legal@outbrain.com, as we
   will investigate instances of possible Internet fraud.
   Data Transfers Outside the EU/EEA
   When we transfer personal data from the European Economic Area to other
   countries in which applicable laws do not offer the same level of data
   privacy protection as in the European Territories, we take measures to
   provide an appropriate level of data privacy protection. In other
   words, your rights and protections remain with your data. For example,
   we use approved contractual clauses and other measures designed to
   ensure that the recipients of your personal data protect it.
   Sharing
   In addition to the description of how we may disclose your personal
   data for each user type, we may also disclose personal data as follows:
     * Within the family of companies controlled by Outbrain for internal
       reasons, primarily for business and operational purposes;
     * If we go through a business transition, such as a merger,
       acquisition by another company, or sale of all or a portion of our
       assets, your personal data will likely be among the assets
       transferred;
     * When legally required to do so (e.g., to cooperate with law
       enforcement investigations or other legal proceedings); and/or
     * To respond to a genuine emergency.

   In addition, we combine your personal data with those of other users in
   order to share trend information and aggregate user statistics with
   third parties, always in aggregated and anonymized form.
   Data Retention
   The retention period for each of the cookies Outbrain uses (whether its
   own or on our behalf by third parties) is stated on the Cookie Table.
   Outbrain also maintains a Data Retention Policy that details the
   retention period for personal data based on our analysis of how long
   the specific data is reasonably required for legal or business
   purposes. When we no longer need personal data, we securely delete or
   destroy it. Aggregated data, which cannot identify a device/browser (or
   individual) and is used for purposes of reporting and analysis, is
   maintained for as long as commercially necessary.
   4. Children
   +
   None of our services are directed to children under 16. We do not
   knowingly collect personal data from anyone under 16 years of age. If
   we determine upon collection that a Site Visitor, a User or a Business
   Partner is under 16, we will not use or maintain his/her personal data.
   If we become aware that we have unknowingly collected personal data
   from a child under the age of 16, we will make reasonable efforts to
   delete such information from our records. If you’re a kid, please go
   play in the yard, don’t use or interact with Outbrain!
   5. European Territory Citizens
   +
   In compliance with European privacy laws, in particular the European
   General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), Outbrain provides specific
   additional rights for citizens of the European Territories such as the
   right to access, rectification, right to object, to complaint, erasure
   and blockage. More specifically:
     * the right to request information about whether and which personal
       data is processed by us, and the right to demand that personal data
       is rectified or amended.
     * under certain circumstances, the right to request that personal
       data should be deleted.
     * under certain circumstances, the right to demand that the
       processing of personal data should be restricted.
     * withdraw your consent to the processing and use of your data
       completely or partially at any time with future application.
     * have the right to obtain your personal data in a common, structured
       and mechanically readable format.
     * contact our data protection officer if there are any questions,
       comments, complaints or requests in connection with our statement
       on data protection and the processing of your personal data.
     * the right to complain to the responsible supervisory authority if
       believed that the processing of your personal data is in violation
       of the legislation.

   In addition to the above, we reference certain rights for European
   Territory citizens throughout this Privacy Policy. Pursuant to the
   GDPR, citizens from "European Territories" mean the European Economic
   Area (EEA) and Switzerland. For the purpose of this Privacy Policy, the
   term "European Territories" shall continue to include the United
   Kingdom, even after the United Kingdom leaves the European Economic
   Area following Brexit.
   Please email PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com with any questions about
   exercising any of the above rights.
   6. California Privacy Rights
   +
   Under California Civil Code sections 1798.83-1798.84, California
   residents are entitled to ask us for a notice describing what
   categories of personal information we share with third parties or
   corporate affiliates for those third parties or corporate affiliates'
   direct marketing purposes. That notice will identify the categories of
   information shared and will include a list of the third parties and
   affiliates with which it was shared, along with their names and
   addresses. If you are a California resident and would like a copy of
   this notice, please submit a written request to
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com or send to the following address:
   Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011.
   Please allow 30 days for a response.
   7. “Do Not Track” Disclosure
   +
   Some browsers transmit Do Not Track (DNT) signals to websites. Because
   there is no common understanding of how to interpret the DNT signal,
   Outbrain does not currently alter, change, or respond to DNT requests
   or signals from these browsers. We will continue to monitor industry
   activity in this area and reassess our DNT practices as necessary. In
   the meantime, you can use the range of other tools we provide to
   control data collection and use, including the ability to opt out of
   receiving personalized recommendations in the Users section.
   8. How This Privacy Policy May Change
   +
   We may change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will place a
   prominent notice that will be visible to you as a Site Visitor or
   Business Partner, but we do not have a means of advising Users of an
   update. You should check back here periodically to see if the Privacy
   Policy has been updated. We will always show the date of the latest
   modification of the Privacy Policy at the top of the page so you can
   tell when it was last revised.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Letzte Aktualisierung: 23. Mai 2018
   Outbrain ist dem Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten verpflichtet.
   Diese Datenschutzbestimmungen („Datenschutzbestimmungen“) gelten für
   die Verwendung durch Outbrain der von uns erfassten Daten,
   einschließlich aller personenbezogenen Daten, durch Outbrain.
   Personenbezogene Daten sind Informationen, die sich auf Sie beziehen
   und Sie persönlich identifizieren können. Wir verwenden Ihre
   personenbezogenen Daten entsprechend den geltenden Gesetzen. Im Sinne
   der Compliance und der Übereinstimmung mit Outbrains Werten rund um
   Vertrauen und Transparenz verfügt Outbrain über ein Team von
   Datenschutz-Champions, die für die kontinuierliche Umsetzung unseres
   weltweit gültigen Maßnahmenkatalogs zum Datenschutz verantwortlich
   sind.

                                                          + ALLE ERWEITERN

                                                 – ALLEX ZUSAMMENBRECHEN

   1. Wer wir sind, Was wir tun, Wie Sie Outbrain kontaktieren können,
   unser Datenschutzbeauftragter oder die zuständigen Behörden

                                      +

   Wer wir sind:
   Outbrain bedeutet Outbrain Inc., ein Unternehmen nach dem Recht von
   Delaware, USA, mit Hauptsitz in New York, und dessen verbundene
   Tochterunternehmen (zusammen bezeichnet als: „Outbrain“ oder „wir“,
   „uns“, „unser“). Wir haben Niederlassungen in zwölf Ländern weltweit
   und arbeiten mit Publishern und Vermarktern auf der ganzen Welt
   zusammen.
   Was wir tun:
   Outbrains Mission ist es, für Nutzer relevante Empfehlungen anhand
   ihrer Interessen bereitzustellen. Zu diesem Zweck schließen wir
   Vereinbarungen mit:
     * Online-Publishern und Partnern, die ihren Lesern relevanten Content
       empfehlen wollen (dabei handelt es sich um Outbrain Engage); und

     * Werbetreibenden, die erreichen wollen, dass Leser ihren Content
       ansehen (hierbei handelt es sich um Outbrain Amplify).

   Wie Sie Kontakt mit uns aufnehmen:
   Unsere Compliance bezüglich dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen überprüfen
   wir regelmäßig. Wir freuen uns über Ihre Fragen, Anmerkungen und
   Anfragen zu diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen. Richten Sie diese bitte an
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oder auf postalischem Weg an Outbrain
   Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, Attn: Privacy
   Questions / Datenschutzanfrage.
   Sollte Outbrain Ihre Fragen oder Anliegen nicht zu Ihrer Zufriedenheit
   beantworten, können Sie sich auch an folgende Ansprechpartner wenden,
   um Rat oder Unterstützung zu erhalten bzw. Beschwerden vorzubringen:
     * Outbrains externen Datenschutzbeauftragten: ePrivacy GmbH,
       vertreten durch Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. Die ePrivacy GmbH können
       Sie direkt erreichen unter privacy@eprivacy.eu und/oder
     * den Information Commissioner’s Officer, die für Outbrain zuständige
       federführende Aufsichtsbehörde in den europäischen Ländern.

   Selbstkontrollgremien
   Outbrain befolgt die im Rahmen der Selbstverpflichtung formulierten
   Grundsätze der Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) und der European
   Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Wir sind
   vollberechtigte Mitglieder der Network Advertising Initiative (NAI),
   eines Verbands, der sich der verantwortungsvollen Erfassung von Daten
   und deren Verwendung in der Digitalwerbung verpflichtet hat. Wir
   befolgen die Verhaltensregeln der NAI für Web- und Mobilwerbung.
   Outbrain befolgt ebenfalls die im Rahmen der Selbstverpflichtung
   formulierten Grundsätze für die verhaltensgesteuerte Online-Werbung des
   Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) sowie die Rahmenbedingungen für
   die verhaltensgesteuerte Online-Werbung des IAB Europe.
   2. Outbrain-Nutzertypen (inklusive Deaktivierung/Opt-Out)

                                      +

   Ein Großteil dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen ist in einzelne Abschnitte
   unterteilt, die sich daran orientieren, wie Sie mit Outbrain
   interagieren. Bitte entscheiden Sie, welcher Nutzertyp Sie sind.
   Entsprechend den einzelnen Nutzertypen erläutern wir, welche
   Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun, welche Cookies und
   andere vergleichbare Technologien wir nutzen, wie wir diese
   Informationen weitergeben und über welche Rechte Sie verfügen.
   Websitebesucher: Sie sind ein Websitebesucher, wenn Sie unsere
   Websites, Internetseiten, interaktiven Funktionen, Blogs und deren
   jeweiligen Content auf Outbrain.com (oder einer darauf basierenden
   Ableitung wie Outbrain.co.uk, Outbrain.fr, Outbrain.de usw.) und
   MyOutbrain.com („unsere Websites“) besuchen und mit diesen
   interagieren. Sehen Sie hier mehr.
   (a) Welche Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun
   Wir möchten wissen, welche Dienstleistungen auf unseren Websites Sie
   interessieren, und Sie an die von uns angebotenen Services erinnern,
   wenn Sie nicht auf unseren Websites sind. Zu diesem Zweck erfassen wird
   folgende Informationen von Ihnen: (i) IP-Adresse; (ii)
   User-Agent-Daten: Gerätetyp (z.B. iPhone), Browsertyp (z.B. Chrome),
   Betriebssystem (z.B. iOS); (iii) die auf unserer Website besuchten
   Seiten (z.B. die Seite „Über Outbrain“); (iv) den Zeitpunkt des Besuchs
   (und die entsprechende Zeitzone); und (v) die verweisenden URLs und
   andere normalerweise bei HTTP-Anfragen übertragenen Informationen (z.B.
   wissen wir durch diese Information, wie Sie auf unsere Websites gelangt
   sind).
   (b) Cookies und andere vergleichbare Technologien, die wir nutzen
   In der Cookie-Tabelle unter „Site Visitors (Websitebesucher)“ erhalten
   Sie eine detaillierte Liste der Cookies (und ihrer jeweiligen
   Speicherfristen), die wir bei Ihrem Besuch unserer Websites verwenden.
   (c) So geben wir unter Umständen Informationen weiter
     * Weitergabe von Informationen, die wir auf unseren Websites von
       Ihnen erhalten.

   Im Allgemeinen geben wir keine personenbezogenen Daten über Sie an
   Dritte für deren Marketing- oder Werbezwecke weiter. Wir nutzen jedoch
   verschiedene Dritte (jeweils in der Cookie-Tabelle aufgeführt) zur
   Unterstützung unserer Marketing- oder Werbetätigkeit Ihnen gegenüber.
   So gehören einige der Cookies, die wir auf unseren Websites verwenden,
   Dritten, die Outbrain bei unserer Marketing- oder Werbetätigkeit Ihnen
   gegenüber unterstützen. Wir verlangen, dass diese Dritten und externen
   Unternehmen einwilligen, sämtliche an sie weitergegebenen Informationen
   vertraulich zu behandeln und nur zur Erfüllung ihrer Pflichten uns
   gegenüber zu verwenden. Zu diesem Zweck schließen wir Vereinbarungen
   mit allen Dritten, die für uns personenbezogene Daten verarbeiten,
   damit gewährleistet ist, dass sie Ihre personenbezogenen Daten in
   Übereinstimmung mit unseren strengen Anweisungen und allen geltenden
   Datenschutzgesetzen verarbeiten. Wenn Sie einen Post auf unserem Blog
   hinterlassen, sind Ihr Kommentar und Ihre Informationen öffentlich
   zugänglich. Bitte wenden Sie sich an support@outbrain.com, um Ihren
   Kommentar zu entfernen.
     * Verwendung von Dienstleistungen Dritter auf unseren Websites.

   Unsere Websites enthalten Links zu anderen Websites, die uns nicht
   gehören und die wir nicht betreiben. Wir kontrollieren, empfehlen oder
   billigen den Content, die Produkte, Dienstleistungen,
   Datenschutzbestimmungen oder -maßnahmen dieser Websites Dritter nicht.
   Auf unseren Websites sehen Sie beispielsweise anklickbare Symbole, über
   die Sie auf die Facebook-Seite von Outbrain oder die LinkedIn-Seite von
   Outbrain gelangen. Sofern Sie entscheiden, diese Links anzuklicken,
   sollten Sie sich dessen bewusst sein, dass Facebook und LinkedIn unter
   Umständen ihre eigenen Cookies auf Ihr Gerät senden und unabhängig
   personenbezogene Daten erfassen. Daher ist es wichtig, dass Sie die
   Datenschutzbestimmungen von Facebook und/oder LinkedIn lesen.
     * Beachten Sie auch den Abschnitt dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen über
       die Weitergabe von Daten.

   (d) Ihre Rechte
   Die Nutzungsbedingungen auf unserer Website regeln die Nutzung unserer
   Website und gelten auch für Sie. Sie können die Nutzung unserer Website
   jederzeit beenden. In diesem Fall können Sie auch die Cookies
   entfernen, die wir auf jedem für den Zugriff auf unsere Website
   verwendeten Gerät gesetzt haben. Falls Sie während Ihrer Nutzung
   unserer Websites Ihre E-Mail-Adresse übermitteln, enthält jede E-Mail,
   die Sie von Outbrain erhalten, eine Option zum Abbestellen des
   E-Mail-Empfangs.
   Für Besucher aus dem europäischen Gebiet hat Outbrain auf unseren
   Websites eine Plattform für das Zustimmungs-Management eingerichtet
   (betrieben durch One Trust), über die Nutzer die Möglichkeit haben,
   ihre Zustimmung zu Cookies und vergleichbaren Trackingtechnologien auf
   unseren Websites zu geben oder zu verweigern. Wenn Sie auf unsere
   Website zugreifen, sehen Sie einen Banner am unteren Ende der Seite,
   das Informationen über die Cookies, die wir einsetzen, enthält. Sie
   können auf das Banner klicken und sämtliche Cookies verweigern, die
   nicht absolut notwendig sind. Der Klick auf "Akzeptieren"/"Accept" auf
   dem Banner oder das Scrollen/Klicken auf unseren Seiten ist ein Zeichen
   Ihres Einverständnisses. Entsprechend basiert Outbrains Rechtmäßigkeit
   der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten auf unseren Websites auf
   Zustimmung. Sie können Ihre Zustimmung jederzeit widerrufen.
   Nutzer: Sie sind ein Nutzer, wenn Sie eine Seite einer Website oder
   Anwendung eines Partners von Outbrain besuchen, auf der das
   Outbrain-Widget installiert ist („Partner-Websites“). Falls Sie
   beispielsweise die Seiten https://news.sky.com/uk, www.spiegel.de oder
   www.cnn.com besuchen, wird das Outbrain-Widget in diese Websites
   eingebunden. Dass Sie mit einem Outbrain-Widget verbunden sind,
   erkennen Sie an dem Text, der auf Outbrain verweist (z.B. „Empfohlen
   von Outbrain“, „von Outbrain“ neben den Empfehlungen). Wenn Sie auf die
   Verlinkung zu Outbrain klicken, sehen Sie einen detaillierten Hinweis ,
   der Ihnen erlaubt, zum Interessenprofil von Outbrain zu navigieren, wo
   Sie eine allgemeine Darstellung der Arten von Datenkategorien finden,
   die Outbrain für die Abgabe seiner Empfehlungen verwendet. Sie haben an
   dieser Stelle auch die Möglichkeit, personalisierte Empfehlungen zu
   deaktivieren. Sehen Sie hier mehr.
   Beispiel eines Outbrain-Widgets
   Outbrain Example Recommendations
   (a) Welche Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun
   Wir verwenden UUIDs, IP-Adressen und andere Nutzungsdaten, damit wir
   Ihnen interessante Empfehlungen unterbreiten können. Outbrains
   Empfehlungen werden unter Umständen von einem Werbetreibenden bezahlt,
   der Sie auf eine neue Website leitet, oder es handelt sich um eigene
   Empfehlungen des Publishers, sodass der Link auf eine andere Seite
   desselben Publishers führt.
     * UUID.

   Wenn Sie als Nutzer erstmalig eine Partner-Website (z.B. CNN.com)
   besuchen, setzt Outbrain zur Erzeugung einer eindeutigen Nutzerkennung,
   UUID (Unique User Identifier), ein Cookie auf Ihrem Gerät. Wir
   katalogisieren und analysieren den Content, den Sie auf
   Partner-Websites konsumieren. Unsere Empfehlungen basieren auf: (i) dem
   Browserverlauf; (ii) ähnlichen Surfmustern anderer Nutzer; (ii)
   Empfehlungen, die bei Outbrains Adressaten zur gegebenen Zeit beliebt
   sind; (iv) einem gewissen Maß an Zufälligkeit und (v)
   Zielanforderungen, die durch unsere Amplify-Kunden bereitgestellt oder
   von ihnen verlangt werden. Beispielsweise weiß Outbrain, dass UUID 123
   (wobei es sich um Sie handeln kann, während Sie mit Ihrem iPhone X und
   dem Chrome-Browser auf der Spiegel-Website surfen) gern Texte über
   ferne Reiseziele liest und dass Personen, die gern von fernen
   Reisezielen lesen, sich auch für Artikel über exotisches Essen
   interessieren.
   Die UUID stellt eine Abfolge von Ziffern und/oder Buchstaben dar. Diese
   UUID ist an Ihr Gerät gebunden und variiert je nach verwendetem
   Browser. Mit anderen Worten: Outbrain erfasst verschiedene UUIDs
   abhängig davon, welches Gerät und/oder welchen Browser Sie für den
   Zugriff auf die Websites des Partners verwenden. Dies bedeutet
   beispielsweise, dass Sie eine UUID haben, wenn Sie eine Partner-Website
   von Ihrem Mobiltelefon aus mit dem Safari-Browser besuchen, und eine
   andere UUID, wenn Sie eine Partner-Website von Ihrem iPad aus mit dem
   Safari-Browser besuchen. Outbrain kombiniert und konsolidiert eine UUID
   von einem Mobilgerät (Handgerät oder Tablet) von einem Browser, der
   dann von demselben Gerät auf eine Anwendung (oder umgekehrt) zugreift.
   Durch die Zuweisung einer UUID kann Outbrain die besuchten Seiten und
   die Klicks auf Outbrains Empfehlungen von dieser UUID kombinieren, was
   alles dem Ziel dient, interessante Empfehlungen bereitzustellen.
     * IP-Adressen und andere Nutzungsdaten.

   Wir erfassen eine UUID wie oben erläutert, und wir erfassen auch die
   folgenden Daten: (i) IP-Adresse (wird nach Industriestandards
   anonymisiert); (ii) User-Agent-Daten: Gerätetyp (z.B. iPhone),
   Browsertyp (z.B. Chrome), Betriebssystem, z.B. iOS); (iii) die
   besuchten Seiten; (iv) den Zeitpunkt des Besuchs und (v) die
   verweisenden URLs und andere normalerweise bei HTTP-Anfragen
   übertragenen Informationen.
   Durch die oben genannten statistischen Daten erhalten wir Informationen
   darüber, wie viele Nutzer eine bestimmte Seite auf unseren
   Partner-Websites, auf denen das Outbrain-Widget installiert ist,
   besucht haben, wie lange jeder Nutzer auf der Seite blieb, die Art des
   Contents auf der Seite, die er angeklickt hat, und wie der Nutzer sich
   auf der Seite allgemein verhalten hat. Diese Informationen sind nur
   dann personenbezogene Daten, wenn sie mit einer UUID verbunden sind.
   (b) Cookies und andere vergleichbare Technologien, die wir nutzen
   Diese Cookie-Tabelle enthält unter „Nutzer“ eine detaillierte Liste der
   Erstanbieter-Cookies, die wir bei Ihrer Interaktion mit
   Partner-Websites, auf denen die Outbrain-Technologie implementiert ist,
   verwenden.
   Wenn Sie auf einen Link zu einer unserer Empfehlungen klicken, setzt
   der Amplify-Werbetreibende, der die Empfehlung finanziert, unter
   Umständen durch Weiterleitungen vor der Ankunft auf der Zielseite der
   Empfehlungen oder bei Erreichen der Zielseite Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät.
   In diesen Fällen gelten für Sie die Datenschutzbestimmungen des
   Werbetreibenden.
   Zusätzlich zu Outbrains sichtbarem Widget auf Partner-Websites
   implementieren bestimmte Outbrain-Werbetreibende gegebenenfalls das
   Outbrain-Pixel auf ihren Websites. Das Outbrain-Pixel ermittelt, ob der
   Nutzer, der auf die Seite mit dem installierten Pixel gelangt, über
   eine Outbrain-UUID verfügt. Falls es eine mit diesem Endnutzer
   verbundene UUID gibt, kann Outbrain den Werbetreibenden erlauben, diese
   UUIDs erneut anzusprechen, und/oder den Werbetreibenden die Gesamtzahl
   der UUIDs, die diese Seite erreicht haben, übermitteln. Sofern es auf
   der Seite keine Outbrain-UUID gab, erfasst das Outbrain-Pixel keine
   Daten über den Nutzer.
   Wir legen Werbetreibenden nahe, die Verwendung des Outbrain-Pixels auf
   ihren eigenen Websites offenzulegen. Outbrain kombiniert keine
   Pixelinformationen mit dem Profil einer UUID.
   Datenpunkte wie Seitenaufrufe und Klicks sind mit einer bestimmten UUID
   verbunden und werden 13 Monate lang gespeichert. Falls beispielsweise
   UUID 123 am 31. Dezember 2017 einen Artikel gelesen hat, ist dieser
   Artikel am 1. Februar 2018 nicht mehr Teil des Profils von UUID 123.
   (c) So geben wir unter Umständen Informationen weiter
   Outbrain leitet keine Nutzerprofile an Dritte weiter. Wir geben jedoch
   unter Umständen die UUID an bestimmte Partner zum Zweck der
   Cookie-Synchronisierung oder aufgrund technischer Anforderungen weiter.
   Beachten Sie bitte auch den Abschnitt dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen
   über die Weitergabe von Daten.
   (d) Ihre Rechte
     * Outbrain-Deaktivierung/Opt-Out. Sie können Outbrains
       personalisierte Empfehlungen jederzeit deaktivieren. In Outbrains
       Interessenprofil finden Sie eine allgemeine Darstellung, welche
       Ihrer Daten Outbrain kennt und gegebenenfalls für Empfehlungen
       nutzt. Über das Interessenprofil haben Sie auch die Möglichkeit,
       personalisierte Empfehlungen zu deaktivieren (Sie können ein
       solches Opt-Out auch hier vornehmen). Bitte beachten Sie, dass die
       Deaktivierung von Browsern über Outbrains Interessenprofil
       stattfindet, die Deaktivierung von personalisierten Empfehlungen in
       Anwendungen jedoch über die Einstellungen in Ihrem Gerät (Beispiele
       für die Schritte erhalten Sie im Interessenprofil).

   WICHTIG – obwohl Sie Outbrain deaktiviert haben:
     * Sie sehen weiterhin Outbrains Empfehlungen. Die Deaktivierung von
       Outbrains Personalisierungsverfolgung bedeutet nicht, dass Sie
       keine weiteren Empfehlungen von Outbrain erhalten. Stattdessen
       bedeutet es, dass Outbrains Empfehlungen nicht mehr personalisiert
       sind. Die Empfehlungen nutzen nach wie vor Informationen über das
       von Ihnen betrachtete Dokument (z.B. Kontextinformationen), um
       Ihnen auf dieser Seite Empfehlungen zu unterbreiten.

     * Die Deaktivierung basiert auf Cookies und ist spezifisch für das
       Gerät/den Browser. Sofern Sie im Web von verschiedenen Geräten
       und/oder Browsern aus surfen, müssen Sie eine Deaktivierung von
       jedem Gerät und/oder Browser aus vornehmen, damit dafür gesorgt
       ist, dass wir auf allen die Personalisierungsverfolgung verhindern.
       Aus demselben Grund müssen Sie, wenn Sie ein neues Gerät kaufen,
       den Browser wechseln oder das Deaktivierungs-Cookie löschen, eine
       erneute Deaktivierung vornehmen. Die Deaktivierung der
       Personalisierungsverfolgung ist nicht dasselbe wie die Blockierung
       von Cookies.

     * Um die Löschung des mit Ihrer UUID verbundenen Profils
       sicherzustellen, sollten Sie Outbrain über mindestens 21 Tage nicht
       aktivieren. Ihre Deaktivierung der personalisierten Empfehlungen
       durch Outbrain ist sofort wirksam. Falls Ihr Browser jedoch die
       lokale Speicherung zulässt und Sie innerhalb von 21 Tagen nach
       Ihrer Deaktivierung Outbrains personalisierte Empfehlungen
       aktivieren, wird Ihr vorheriges Profil möglicherweise wieder mit
       Ihrer UUID verbunden. Sofern Sie nicht innerhalb von 21 Tagen eine
       neue Aktivierung vornehmen, wird Ihr Profil gelöscht und kann nicht
       wiederhergestellt werden.

     * Wie bei den meisten Opt-Outs basiert auch der Outbrain
       Browser-Opt-Out auf einem Cookie. Das Cookie ist dazu bestimmt,
       bestehen zu bleiben, damit die Präferenz des Nutzers durchgesetzt
       werden kann. Allerdings kann die „Intelligent Tracking Prevention“
       (das Verhindern von Aufzeichnungen) für Safari in iOS 11 das
       Fortbestehen von Cookies über ein 24-Stunden-Zeitfenster hinaus
       beeinträchtigen. Wir empfehlen die Nutzung eines anderen Browsers
       oder das Blockieren aller 3rd-Party-Cookies in dem Browser, sodass
       Ihr Opt-Out-Wunsch berücksichtigt wird, ohne dass Sie sich auf die
       Opt-Out-Methodik eines einzelnen Unternehmens verlassen müssen.

     * Zusätzliche Deaktivierungsoptionen. Sie können auch den Erhalt
       personalisierter Werbung durch uns oder andere Werbeunternehmen
       über branchenbetriebene Tools deaktivieren, beispielsweise NAI oder
       die verschiedenen DAA-basierten Seiten (DAA,
       http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices, und/oder EDAA
       www.youronlinechoices.eu). Durch den Besuch der Seiten für
       Verbraucherwahlmöglichkeiten NAI, DAA, DAAC oder EDAA können Sie
       einige oder alle Leistungen der teilnehmenden Mitglieder
       deaktivieren. Wie auch die Deaktivierung von Outbrain bedeuten auch
       diese Deaktivierungen nicht, dass Sie gar keine Werbung mehr
       erhalten, sondern lediglich, dass die Werbung nicht mehr auf Sie
       zugeschnitten ist. Möglicherweise erhalten Sie weiterhin Werbung,
       beispielsweise anhand der speziellen Website, die Sie betrachten
       (d. h. kontextbasierte Werbung). Falls durch die Einstellungen
       Ihrer Browser zudem Cookies abgewiesen werden, wenn Sie die
       Verbraucherseiten DAA, DAAC oder EDAA besuchen, ist Ihre
       Deaktivierung unter Umständen nicht wirksam.
     * Rechtsgrundlage. Outbrains Rechtmäßigkeit der Verarbeitung
       personenbezogener Daten eines Nutzers gründet auf der durch unsere
       Partner-Websites festgelegten Rechtmäßigkeit. Jeder Partner-Website
       liegt Zustimmung oder berechtigtes Interesse zugrunde. Bitte lesen
       Sie die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen der Partner-Websites, um
       weitere Informationen über deren Rechtmäßigkeit zu erhalten. Falls
       bei einem Partner eine Zustimmung erforderlich ist, setzt Outbrain
       kein Cookie bei Ihnen, wenn Sie der Partner-Website keine
       Zustimmung erteilt haben.

   Geschäftspartner: Sie sind ein Geschäftspartner, wenn Sie sich im Namen
   des Unternehmens, für das Sie arbeiten, registrieren (oder Outbrain per
   E-Mail kontaktieren), um die Dienstleistungen Outbrain Amplify oder
   Outbrain Engage zu nutzen. Sehen Sie hier mehr.
   (a) Welche Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun
   Womöglich übermitteln Sie bestimmte personenbezogene Daten (wie die
   E-Mail-Adresse), wenn Sie sich für die Amplify- oder
   Engage-Dienstleistungen registrieren oder anderweitig mit uns
   kommunizieren oder interagieren. Wenn Sie sich bei uns als
   Geschäftspartner bewerben, benötigen wir gegebenenfalls weitere Daten
   von Ihnen über Anmeldebögen für Werbetreibende, Werbeaufträge und
   andere Formulare. Wir erfassen automatisch Informationen über die
   Aktivitäten Ihres Nutzernamens im Outbrain-Dashboard. Wenn Sie
   beispielsweise als Amplify-Geschäftspartner die Kosten pro Klick für
   eine Ihrer Kampagnen ändern, findet sich im Audit Trail von Outbrain
   eine Aufzeichnung all dieser Maßnahmen.
   Wir erfassen und verarbeiten die oben genannten personenbezogenen
   Daten, um unsere Verpflichtungen aus unserem Vertrag mit Ihnen als
   Geschäftspartner (oder zukünftiger Geschäftspartner) zu erfüllen, unter
   anderem:
     * Beantwortung Ihrer Fragen und Anforderungen;

     * Gewährung Ihres Zugriffs auf bestimmte Funktionen und Eigenschaften
       der Amplify- und Engage-Dienstleistungen (z.B. Bereitstellung und
       Pflege Ihres Dashboard-Kontos);

     * Verifizierung Ihrer Identität;

     * Kommunikation mit Ihnen über Ihr Konto, unsere Produkte und die für
       Ihre Nutzung der Amplify- oder Engage-Dienstleistung relevanten
       Werbeaktionen.

   (b) Cookies und andere vergleichbare Technologien, die wir nutzen
   In der Cookie-Tabelle unter „Geschäftspartner“ erhalten Sie eine
   detaillierte Liste der Cookies (und ihrer jeweiligen Speicherfristen),
   die wir für Geschäftspartner verwenden.
   (c) So geben wir unter Umständen Informationen weiter
   Wir legen bestimmte Informationen über Geschäftspartner gegenüber
   Anbietern, Auftragnehmern oder anderen offen, die Outbrain bei der
   Erbringung der Dienstleistungen unterstützen (z.B.
   Kreditkartenabwicklung). Beachten Sie bitte auch den Abschnitt dieser
   Datenschutzbestimmungen über die Weitergabe von Daten.
   (d) Ihre Rechte
   Sofern Sie als Geschäftspartner Ihre Daten verifizieren, berichtigen,
   aktualisieren oder deren Deaktivierung veranlassen möchten, können Sie
   Ihre Profileinstellungen im Outbrain-Dashboard editieren oder uns unter
   support@outbrain.com kontaktieren. Falls Sie von Outbrain E-Mails
   erhalten, können Sie den Empfang über einen Link in der E-Mail
   abbestellen. Bitte beachten Sie, dass Sie durch das Abbestellen nicht
   den Erhalt von Benachrichtigungen deaktivieren, die kritisch für die
   Erbringung der Amplify- oder Engage-Dienstleistungen sind (z.B.
   E-Mail-Rechnungen).
   Outbrains Rechtmäßigkeit der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten von
   Geschäftspartnern gründet in berechtigtem Interesse.
   3. Datensicherheit, Übertragungen außerhalb des EWR, Weitergabe und
   Speicherfristen

                                      +

   Sicherheit
   Outbrain verfügt über ein dezidiertes Sicherheitsteam. Wir führen eine
   strenge Kontrolle der durch uns erfassten Daten durch und speichern
   diese in durch Firewalls geschützten und sicheren Datenbanken mit
   streng begrenzten und kontrollierten Zugriffsrechten, damit deren
   Sicherheit gewährleistet ist. Weitere Informationen können Sie unseren
   Sicherheitsstandards entnehmen.
   Geschäftspartner haben Zugang zu bestimmten passwortgeschützten
   Funktionen der Dienstleistungen Amplify oder Engage. Sie sind für die
   Geheimhaltung dieses Passworts verantwortlich. Bitte denken Sie daran,
   dass die Informationsübertragung über das Internet leider nicht
   vollständig sicher ist. Ein häufig vorkommender Internetbetrug wird als
   „Spoofing“ oder „Phishing“ bezeichnet. Dabei erhalten Sie eine E-Mail,
   die von einer vertrauenswürdigen Quelle zu stammen scheint und in der
   Ihre personenbezogenen Daten erfragt werden. Bitte beachten Sie, dass
   wir Ihnen keine E-Mails senden, in denen wir Sie um die Überprüfung
   Ihrer Kreditkarten- oder Bankdaten oder anderer personenbezogener Daten
   bitten. Sollten Sie jemals eine E-Mail erhalten, die den Anschein
   erweckt, von uns zu sein, und in der derartige Daten von Ihnen
   angefordert werden, antworten Sie nicht darauf und klicken Sie auch auf
   keine Links in dieser E-Mail. Leiten Sie stattdessen diese E-Mail an
   uns unter legal@outbrain.com weiter, da wir Fälle möglichen
   Internetbetrugs untersuchen.
   Datenübertragungen außerhalb der EU/des EWR
   Wenn wir personenbezogene Daten aus dem Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum in
   andere Länder übertragen, deren geltende Gesetze nicht über dasselbe
   Datenschutzniveau wie in den europäischen Gebieten verfügen, sorgen wir
   durch eigene Maßnahmen für ein geeignetes Datenschutzniveau. Für Ihre
   Daten gelten somit weiterhin Ihre Rechte und Ihr Datenschutz.
   Beispielsweise verwenden wir anerkannte Vertragsklauseln und weitere
   Maßnahmen, durch die für den Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten durch
   die Empfänger gesorgt ist.
   Weitergabe von Daten
   Zusätzlich zu der beschriebenen Offenlegung Ihrer personenbezogenen
   Daten der einzelnen Nutzerarten legen wir personenbezogene Daten unter
   Umständen wie folgt offen:
     * Innerhalb der durch Outbrain kontrollierten Unternehmensgruppe aus
       internen Gründen, vorrangig für geschäftliche und betriebliche
       Zwecke;

     * Bei einem Geschäftsübergang, wie einer Fusion, dem Erwerb durch ein
       anderes Unternehmen oder dem teilweisen oder vollständigen Verkauf
       unserer Vermögenswerte, gehören Ihre personenbezogenen Daten
       wahrscheinlich zu den übertragenen Vermögenswerten;

     * Bei entsprechenden rechtlichen Anforderungen (z.B. zur
       Unterstützung strafrechtlicher Ermittlungen oder anderer
       Rechtsverfahren); und/oder

     * Als Reaktion auf einen echten Notfall.

   Außerdem kombinieren wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten mit denen anderer
   Nutzer, um Trendinformationen weiterzugeben und Nutzerstatistiken mit
   Dritten zu verbinden, jedoch stets in zusammengefasster und
   anonymisierter Form.
   Datenspeicherung
   Die Speicherfrist für jedes durch Outbrain verwendete Cookie (gleich ob
   unser eigenes oder für uns durch Dritte) ist in der Cookie-Tabelle
   genannt.
   Outbrain verfügt zudem über eine Richtlinie zur Datenspeicherung, in
   der die Speicherfrist für personenbezogene Daten aufgeführt ist, die
   auf unserer Analyse basiert, welche Speicherfrist für bestimmte Daten
   aus rechtlichen oder geschäftlichen Gründen angemessen ist. Wenn wir
   personenbezogene Daten nicht mehr benötigen, löschen oder vernichten
   wir diese auf sichere Weise. Zusammengefasste Daten, durch die kein
   Gerät/Browser (oder keine Person) identifiziert werden kann und die für
   die Berichterstattung und Analyse benötigt werden, behalten wir so
   lange, wie dies wirtschaftlich nötig ist.
   4. Kinder

                                      +

   Keine unserer Dienstleistungen richtet sich an Kinder unter 16 Jahren.
   Wir erfassen wissentlich keine personenbezogenen Daten von Personen
   unter 16 Jahren. Stellen wir bei der Datenerfassung fest, dass ein
   Websitebesucher, ein Nutzer oder ein Geschäftspartner unter 16 ist,
   verwenden oder behalten wir seine/ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht.
   Wenn wir davon Kenntnis erlangen, dass wir unwissentlich
   personenbezogene Daten von einem Kind im Alter von unter 16 erfasst
   haben, ergreifen wir angemessene Anstrengungen zur Löschung dieser
   Daten aus unseren Verzeichnissen. Wenn du ein Kind bist, nutze Outbrain
   nicht, verlasse diese Seite und geh lieber spielen!
   5. Bürger des europäischen Gebiets

                                      +

   In Übereinstimmung mit europäischen Datenschutzgesetzen, insbesondere
   der europäischen Datenschutz-Grundverordnung (DSGVO), gewährt Outbrain
   Bürgern der europäischen Gebiete bestimmte zusätzliche Rechte wie das
   Recht auf Zugriff, Berichtigung, Einspruch, Beschwerde, Löschung und
   Blockierung. Insbesondere:
     * das Recht auf Auskunft darüber, ob und welche personenbezogenen
       Daten von uns verarbeitet werden, sowie das Recht, die Berichtigung
       oder Änderung personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen.
     * unter bestimmten Umständen das Recht, die Löschung
       personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen.
     * unter bestimmten Umständen das Recht, die Einschränkung der
       Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen.
     * den jederzeitigen vollständigen oder teilweisen Widerruf Ihrer
       Zustimmung zur Verarbeitung und Nutzung Ihrer Daten mit zukünftiger
       Gültigkeit.
     * das Recht auf Erhalt Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten in einem
       üblichen, strukturierten und mechanisch lesbaren Format.
     * Kontaktaufnahme mit Ihrem Datenschutzbeauftragten bei Fragen,
       Anmerkungen, Beschwerden oder Anfragen im Zusammenhang mit unserer
       Datenschutzerklärung und der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen
       Daten.
     * das Recht auf Beschwerde bei der zuständigen Aufsichtsbehörde,
       falls Sie der Auffassung sind, dass die Verarbeitung Ihrer
       personenbezogenen Daten gesetzeswidrig ist.

   Neben dem oben Genannten weisen wir in diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen
   auf bestimmte Rechte für Bürger des europäischen Gebiets hin. Laut der
   DSGVO bezeichnet die Formulierung „Bürger aus europäischen Gebieten“
   den Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum (EWR) und die Schweiz. Im Sinne dieser
   Datenschutzbestimmungen umfasst der Begriff „europäische Gebiete“
   weiterhin das Vereinigte Königreich, auch nachdem dieses den
   Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum im Anschluss an den Austritt (Brexit)
   verlässt.
   Bitte senden Sie eine Nachricht an PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com, wenn
   Sie Fragen zur Ausübung dieser Rechte haben.
   6. Datenschutzrechte in Kalifornien

                                      +

   Laut dem California Civil Code, Abschnitte 1798.83-1798.84, sind
   Einwohner Kaliforniens berechtigt, von uns darüber Auskunft zu
   erhalten, welche Kategorien personenbezogener Daten wir an Dritte oder
   verbundene Unternehmen für diese Dritten oder für direkte
   Marketingzwecke verbundener Unternehmen weiterleiten. In dieser
   Auskunft werden die Kategorien der weitergeleiteten Daten
   identifiziert, einschließlich einer Liste der Dritten und verbundenen
   Unternehmen, an die die Daten weitergeleitet wurden, und deren Namen
   und Adressen. Falls Sie Ihren Wohnsitz in Kalifornien unterhalten und
   Sie diese Auskunft einholen möchten, senden Sie bitte eine schriftliche
   Anforderung an PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oder an die folgende
   Anschrift: Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY
   10011. Sie erhalten eine Antwort innerhalb von 30 Tagen.
   7. „Do Not Track“-Angabe

                                      +

   Einige Browser senden an Websites „Do Not Track (DNT)“-Signale, mit
   denen der Website mitgeteilt wird, dass die Aktivitäten des Nutzers
   nicht verfolgt werden sollen. Es besteht jedoch kein allgemeingültiges
   Verständnis darüber, wie DNT-Signale zu interpretieren sind, und daher
   findet durch Outbrain derzeit keine Modifizierung, Änderung oder
   Reaktion auf die DNT-Anforderungen oder -Signale von diesen Browsern
   statt. Wir beobachten weiterhin die Branchenaktivitäten in diesem
   Bereich und bewerten unsere DNT-Verfahren bei Bedarf neu.
   Zwischenzeitlich können Sie eine Reihe anderer durch uns
   bereitgestellter Tools zur Kontrolle der Datenerfassung und -nutzung
   einsetzen, unter anderem die Möglichkeit, im Nutzerbereich den Erhalt
   personalisierter Empfehlungen zu deaktivieren.
   8. Mögliche Änderungen dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen

                                      +

   Wir ändern diese Datenschutzbestimmungen zu gegebener Zeit. Darüber
   informieren wir durch einen deutlichen Hinweis, der für Sie als
   Websitebesucher oder Geschäftspartner erkennbar ist. Wir haben jedoch
   keine Möglichkeit, Nutzern gegenüber eine Aktualisierung anzukündigen.
   Sie sollten diesen Bereich regelmäßig daraufhin überprüfen, ob die
   Datenschutzbestimmungen aktualisiert worden sind. Wir zeigen stets das
   Datum der letzten Änderung der Datenschutzbestimmungen oben auf der
   Seite an, damit Sie wissen, wann diese zuletzt überarbeitet wurden.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                Última actualización: 23 de mayo de 2018

   Outbrain se compromete a proteger tus datos personales. Esta Política
   de privacidad («Política de privacidad») rige el uso por parte de
   Outbrain de los datos recopilados por nosotros, incluyendo todos y cada
   uno de los datos personales. Los datos personales son información que
   se relaciona contigo y que puede identificarte como individuo.
   Utilizamos tus datos personales de conformidad con todas las leyes
   aplicables. Para garantizar el cumplimiento y estar en sintonía con los
   valores de Outbrain en materia de confianza y transparencia, contamos
   con un equipo de defensores de la privacidad responsables de la
   implementación continua de nuestro programa de privacidad global.

                                                           + EXPANDIR TODO

   1. Quiénes somos, qué hacemos, cómo ponerse en contacto con Outbrain,
   nuestro RPD o las autoridades competentes

                                      +

   Quiénes somos:
   Outbrain significa Outbrain Inc, una sociedad de Delaware (EE.UU.) con
   sede en Nueva York y sus filiales (colectivamente, «Outbrain», o
   «nosotros», «nos», «nuestro»). Operamos desde 12 oficinas globales y
   colaboramos con editores y vendedores de todo el mundo.
   Qué hacemos:
   La misión de Outbrain es facilitar recomendaciones interesantes a sus
   usuarios basadas en sus intereses. Para lograr nuestra misión firmamos
   acuerdos con:
     * editores y socios en línea que desean recomendar contenido
       relevante a sus lectores (Outbrain Engage), y
     * anunciantes que quieren que los lectores vean su contenido
       (Outbrain Amplify).

   Cómo ponerse en contacto con nosotros:
   Revisamos regularmente nuestro cumplimiento de la presente Política de
   privacidad. Las preguntas, comentarios y solicitudes relacionadas con
   esta Política de privacidad son bienvenidas y deben dirigirse a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com o por correo postal a Outbrain Inc. 39
   West 13th Street, 3rd floor, Nueva York, NY 10011, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Si Outbrain no responde satisfactoriamente a tus preguntas o
   inquietudes, también puede ponerte en contacto con las siguientes
   personas para obtener asesoramiento, apoyo o realizar reclamaciones:
     * El Responsable de Protección de Datos externo de Outbrain («RPD»):
       ePrivacy GmbH, representada por D. Christoph Bauer. Se puede
       contactar con ePrivacy GmbH directamente en privacy@eprivacy.eu.
     * El Information Commissioner’s Officer, que es el principal servicio
       de supervisión de Outbrain en Europa.

   Órganos de autorregulación
   Outbrain se adhiere a los principios de autorregulación establecidos
   por la Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) y la European Interactive
   Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Somos miembros activos de la
   Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), una asociación dedicada a la
   recopilación responsable de datos y su uso para la publicidad digital.
   Nos adherimos al Código de conducta de NAI para sitios web y móviles.
   Outbrain también se adhiere a los Principios de autorregulación de la
   Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) para la Publicidad conductual en
   línea y al Marco OBA de IAB de Europa.
   2. Tipos de usuarios de Outbrain (incluyendo la gestión del Opt Out)

                                      +

   Gran parte de esta Política de privacidad está dividida en apartados en
   función de la manera en que puedes interactuar con Outbrain. Por favor,
   determina qué tipo de usuario eres. Para cada tipo de usuario hemos
   explicado qué información recopilamos y por qué, qué cookies y otras
   tecnologías similares utilizamos, cómo compartimos dicha información y
   sus derechos.
   Visitantes del sitio: Eres un Visitante del Sitio cuando visitas e
   interactúas con nuestros sitios, páginas web, funciones interactivas,
   blogs y tus respectivos contenidos en Outbrain.com (o cualquier
   derivación, como Outbrain.co.uk, Outbrain.fr, Outbrain.de, etc.) y
   MyOutbrain.com («Nuestros sitios»). Ver más aquí.
   (a) Qué información recopilamos y por qué
   Queremos entender qué servicios te interesan de Nuestros sitios y
   queremos recordarte los servicios que ofrecemos cuando no estés
   visitando Nuestros sitios. Para ello, recopilamos la siguiente
   información sobre ti: (i) dirección IP, (ii) datos del Agente usuario:
   tipo de dispositivo (por ejemplo, iPhone), tipo de navegador (por
   ejemplo, Chrome), sistema operativo (por ejemplo, iOS), (iii) las
   páginas visitadas en Nuestro sitios (por ejemplo, la página «Acerca de»
   de Outbrain), (iv) la hora de la visita (y la zona horaria
   correspondiente) y (v) las URL de referencia y otra información que
   normalmente se transmite en las solicitudes HTTP (por ejemplo, esta
   información nos dice cómo llegaste a Nuestros sitios).
   (b) Qué cookies y otras tecnologías similares utilizamos
   Consulta esta Tabla de cookies en «Visitantes del sitio» para obtener
   una lista detallada de las cookies (y sus correspondientes períodos de
   retención) que utilizamos cuando visitas Nuestros sitios web.
   (c) Cómo podemos intercambiar información
     * Intercambio de información sobre ti en Nuestros sitios.

   En general, no compartimos tus datos personales con terceros para fines
   de marketing o publicidad. Sin embargo, utilizamos varios terceros
   (cada uno de los cuales aparece en esta Tabla de cookies) para
   ayudarnos a vender o a enviarte publicidad. Por ejemplo, algunas de las
   cookies que utilizamos en Nuestros sitios pertenecen a terceros que
   ayudarán a Outbrain a vender o a enviarte publicidad. Exigimos que
   estos terceros y empresas se comprometan a mantener toda la información
   compartida con ellos de manera confidencial y a utilizar la información
   sólo para cumplir con sus obligaciones para con nosotros. Lo anterior
   se logra mediante acuerdos con todos los terceros que tratan datos
   personales en nuestro nombre para asegurarnos de que tratan tus datos
   personales de conformidad con nuestras estrictas instrucciones y todas
   las leyes de protección de datos aplicables. Si realizas una
   publicación en nuestro blog, tu comentario e información estarán
   disponibles públicamente. Póngate en contacto con support@outbrain.com
   para eliminar tu comentario.
     * Uso de servicios de terceros en Nuestros sitios.

   Nuestros sitios contienen enlaces a otras webs que no operamos ni son
   de nuestra propiedad. No controlamos, recomendamos ni respaldamos el
   contenido, los productos, los servicios, las políticas ni las prácticas
   de privacidad de estas webs de terceros. Por ejemplo, en Nuestros
   sitios encontrará iconos en los que podrá hacer clic y que te llevarán
   a la página de Facebook de Outbrain o a la página de LinkedIn de
   Outbrain. Si decides hacer clic en estos enlaces, debes saber que
   Facebook y LinkedIn podrán enviar sus propias cookies a tu dispositivo
   y que podrán recopilar datos personales de forma independiente. Por lo
   tanto, es importante que leas las políticas de privacidad de Facebook o
   LinkedIn.
     * Consulta también el apartado Intercambio de esta Política de
       privacidad.

   (d) Tus derechos
   Los Términos de uso en Nuestro site rigen el uso de Nuestro site y
   también se aplican a ti. Puedes dejar de usar Nuestro site en cualquier
   momento. Si lo haces, es posible que también desees eliminar las
   cookies que hayamos colocado en cualquier dispositivo utilizado para
   acceder a Nuestro site. Si durante tu uso de Nuestros site proporcionas
   tu dirección de correo electrónico, cualquier correo electrónico que
   recibas de Outbrain incluirá la opción «darse de baja».
   Para los usarios del territorio europeo, Outbrain ha implementado una
   plataforma de administración de consentimiento en nuestro site (con la
   tecnología de One Trust), que brinda al usuario la oportunidad de dar
   su aprobación, o no, a cookies y tecnologías de seguimiento similares
   en nuestros sites. Al acceder a nuestros sites, verás un banner en la
   parte inferior de la página con información sobre las cookies que
   utilizamos. Puedes hacer clic en el banner para rechazar cualquier
   cookie que no sea estrictamente necesaria. Aceptar en el banner o hacer
   scrolling/clic en nuestros sites se interpreta como una indicación de
   aceptación. En consecuencia, la base legal de Outbrain para procesar
   datos personales en nuestros sites es el consentimiento. El usuario
   puede retirar su consentimiento en cualquier momento aquí.
   Usuarios: Eres un Usuario cuando visitas una página de un site o
   aplicación de uno de los socios de Outbrain donde esté instalado el
   complemento (widget) de Outbrain («Sitios asociados»). Por ejemplo, si
   visitas https://news.sky.com/uk o www.elpais.com se implementará el
   complemento Outbrain en esas webs. Sabrás que estás interactuando con
   un complemento de Outbrain cuando veas un texto que haga referencia a
   Outbrain (por ejemplo, «Recomendado por Outbrain», «por Outbrain» cerca
   de las recomendaciones). Si hace clic en la referencia con hipervínculo
   a Outbrain, verás un aviso detallado que te permitirá navegar hasta el
   Perfil de intereses de Outbrain, que proporciona una visualización
   general de los tipos de categorías de datos de Outbrain que se pueden
   utilizar para hacer tus recomendaciones. También te ofrece la
   posibilidad de inhabilitar las recomendaciones personalizadas. Ver más
   aquí.
   Ejemplo de un complemento Outbrain
   [rydw687kQ.png]
   (a) Qué información recopilamos y por qué
   Utilizamos identificadores únicos de usuario (UUID, por sus siglas en
   inglés), direcciones IP y otra información de uso para poder ofrecer
   recomendaciones interesantes. Las recomendaciones de Outbrain podrán
   ser pagadas por un anunciante que las vincule a un nuevo sitio web o
   podrán ser orgánicas de tal manera que el enlace sea a otra página en
   el mismo sitio web del editor.
     * UUID.

   Cuando como Usuario visita por primera vez un Sitio asociado (por
   ejemplo, CNN.com), Outbrain introducirá una cookie en tu dispositivo
   para generar un UUID. Catalogamos y analizamos el contenido que
   consumas en los Sitios asociados. Nuestras recomendaciones se basan en:
   (i) el historial de navegación, (ii) los patrones de navegación
   similares de otros Usuarios, (ii) las recomendaciones que son
   generalmente populares entre la audiencia de Outbrain en ese momento,
   (iv) cierta aleatoriedad y (v) los requisitos de orientación que puedan
   ser proporcionados o solicitados por nuestros clientes de Amplify. Como
   ejemplo, Outbrain puede saber que a UUID 123 (que podrías ser tú en su
   iPhone X en el periódico The Guardian usando Chrome como tu navegador)
   le gusta leer sobre destinos vacacionales lejanos y que a la gente que
   le gusta leer sobre destinos vacacionales lejanos también le gusta leer
   sobre comida exótica.
   El UUID es una secuencia de números o letras. Este UUID se vincula tu
   dispositivo y varía dependiendo del navegador que utilices. En otras
   palabras, Outbrain registra un UUID diferente dependiendo del
   dispositivo o navegador que utilices para acceder a los Sitios
   asociados. Por ejemplo, esto significa que tendrás un UUID cuando
   visites un Sitio asociado desde tu teléfono móvil usando el navegador
   Safari y un UUID diferente cuando visites un Sitio asociado desde tu
   iPad usando el navegador Safari. Outbrain combinará y unificará el UUID
   de un dispositivo móvil (portátil o tableta) y el del navegador que
   acceda posteriormente a una aplicación (o viceversa) desde el mismo
   dispositivo.
   Asignar un UUID permite a Outbrain asociar las páginas visitadas y los
   clics realizados en las recomendaciones de Outbrain desde dicho UUID,
   todo ello con el objetivo de proporcionar recomendaciones interesantes.
     * Dirección IP y otra información de uso.

   Recopilamos UUID como se explicó anteriormente y también recopilamos la
   siguiente información sobre ti: (i) dirección IP (y luego anonimizado
   en base a los estándares de la industria); (ii) datos del Agente
   usuario: tipo de dispositivo (por ejemplo, Iphone), tipo de navegador
   (por ejemplo, Chrome), sistema operativo (por ejemplo, iOS), (iii) las
   páginas visitadas, (iv) el momento de la visita y (v) las URL de
   referencia y otra información que normalmente se transmite en las
   solicitudes HTTP.
   La información estadística anterior nos proporciona información sobre
   cuántos Usuarios visitaron una página específica de nuestros Sitios
   asociados en los que está instalado el complemento de Outbrain, cuánto
   tiempo permaneció cada Usuario en esa página, el tipo de contenido en
   esa página sobre el que hicieron clic y cómo interactuaron en general
   con esa página. Esta información sólo son datos personales cuando están
   asociados a un UUID.
   (b) Qué cookies y otras tecnologías similares utilizamos
   Por favor, consulta esta Tabla de cookies en el apartado «Usuarios»
   para obtener una lista detallada de las primeras cookies que utilizamos
   cuando interactúas con Sitios asociados en los que se implementa la
   tecnología de Outbrain.
   Si haces clic en un enlace a una de nuestras recomendaciones, el
   anunciante de Amplify que patrocina la recomendación puede colocar
   cookies en tu dispositivo a través de redirecciones antes de llegar a
   la página de destino de las recomendaciones o al llegar a la página de
   destino. En tales casos, estarás sujeto a la Política de privacidad de
   ese anunciante.
   Además del complemento visible de Outbrain en los Sitios asociados,
   algunos anunciantes de Outbrain podrán implementar el píxel de Outbrain
   en sus sitios web. El píxel de Outbrain determina si el usuario que
   llega a la página donde está instalado el píxel tiene un UUID de
   Outbrain. Si existe un UUID asociado con dicho usuario final, Outbrain
   permitirá a los anunciantes reorientar esos UUID o proporcionará a los
   anunciantes el número total de UUID que llegaron a dicha página. Si no
   había ningún UUID de Outbrain en la página, el píxel de Outbrain no
   recopilará ninguna información sobre el usuario.
   Animamos a los anunciantes a informar sobre el uso del píxel de
   Outbrain en sus propios sitios web. Outbrain no combina información de
   píxeles con el perfil de un UUID.
   Los puntos de datos como las páginas vistas y los clics están
   conectados a un UUID en particular y se retienen durante 13 meses. Por
   ejemplo, si UUID 123 leyó un artículo el 31 de diciembre de 2017, el 1
   de febrero de 2018 ese artículo ya no formará parte del perfil de UUID
   123.
   (c) Cómo podemos intercambiar información
   Outbrain no comparte perfiles de usuario con terceros. Sin embargo, es
   posible que compartamos el UUID con determinados socios con el fin de
   sincronizar las cookies o en función de los requisitos técnicos.
   Consulta también el apartado «Intercambio» de la presente Política de
   privacidad.
   (d) Tus derechos
     * Inhabilitación voluntaria de Outbrain

   Podrás inhabilitar las recomendaciones personalizadas de Outbrain en
   cualquier momento. Por favor, consulta el Perfil de intereses de
   Outbrain para una visualización general de los datos que Outbrain
   conoce sobre ti y que puede utilizar para hacer sus recomendaciones. El
   Perfil de intereses también te ofrece la posibilidad de inhabilitar las
   recomendaciones personalizadas (puedes también hacer opt-out aquí). Ten
   en cuenta que la inhabilitación de los navegadores se realiza a través
   del Perfil de intereses de Outbrain, pero que la inhabilitación de las
   recomendaciones personalizadas en las aplicaciones se realiza a través
   de la configuración de tu dispositivo (hay ejemplos de los pasos a
   seguir en el Perfil de intereses).
   IMPORTANTE – a pesar de que hayas inhabilitado el seguimiento
   personalizado de Outbrain,
     * seguirás viendo las recomendaciones de Outbrain. Inhabilitar el
       seguimiento personalizado de Outbrain no significa que vayas a
       dejar de recibir recomendaciones de Outbrain. Por el contrario,
       significa que las recomendaciones de Outbrain no serán
       personalizadas. Las recomendaciones seguirán utilizando información
       sobre el documento que estás consultando (es decir, información
       contextual) para proporcionarte recomendaciones en esa página.

     * La inhabilitación voluntaria está basada en las cookies y es
       específica del dispositivo/navegador. Si navegas por la página web
       desde varios dispositivos o navegadores, deberás inhabilitar cada
       dispositivo o navegador para asegurarte de que no realizamos el
       seguimiento personalizado en ninguno ellos. Por la misma razón, si
       compras un dispositivo nuevo, cambias de navegador o borra (o
       limpia) la cookie de inhabilitación tendrás que inhabilitarla de
       nuevo. Inhabilitar el seguimiento personalizado no es lo mismo que
       bloquear las cookies.

     * Para garantizar la eliminación del perfil vinculado a su UUID, no
       habilites Outbrain durante al menos 21 días. Tu inhabilitación de
       las recomendaciones personalizadas de Outbrain será efectiva de
       manera inmediata. Sin embargo, si tu navegador permite el
       almacenamiento local y habilitas las recomendaciones personalizadas
       de Outbrain dentro de los 21 días siguientes a tu inhabilitación,
       es posible que tu perfil anterior se vincule de nuevo a su UUID. Si
       no habilitas Outbrain en un plazo de 21 días, se eliminará tu
       perfil y no podrás recuperarse.

     * Al igual que con la mayoría de los opt-out, también la opción de
       opt-out del navegador de Outbrain se basa en una cookie. La cookie
       de opt-out voluntaria persiste para cumplir con las preferencias
       del usuario. Sin embargo, la función de "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention " en iOS11 puede afectar la persistencia de las cookies
       en los sitios web después de una ventana de 24 horas. Sugerimos
       usar otro navegador o considerar bloquear todas las cookies de
       terceros desde el navegador para que se efectúe el“opt-out" sin
       tener que depender de la metodología de exclusión voluntaria de
       ninguna empresa.

     * Opciones adicionales de inhabilitación voluntaria. También podrás
       inhabilitar los anuncios personalizados que te ofrecemos nosotros u
       otras compañías de publicidad a través de herramientas impulsadas
       por la industria, como la NAI o las diversas páginas basadas en la
       DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices ; o EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
       Visitar las páginas de elección del consumidor de la NAI, DAA, DAAC
       o EDAA te permitirá inhabilitar todos o algunos de los servicios de
       los miembros participantes. Al igual que la inhabilitación de
       Outbrain, estas inhabilitaciones no significan que ya no recibirás
       ninguna publicidad, sino que los anuncios simplemente no serán
       personalizados. Podrás continuar recibiendo anuncios, por ejemplo,
       basados en el sitio web en particular que estás viendo (es decir,
       anuncios basados en el contexto). Además, si tus navegadores están
       configurados para rechazar las cookies cuando visitas las páginas
       de elección del consumidor de la DAA, DAAC o EDAA, es posible que
       no se lleve a cabo la inhabilitación.

     * Base legal. La base legal de Outbrain para el tratamiento de los
       datos personales de un Usuario reside en la base legal determinada
       para cada uno de nuestros Sitios asociados. Cada Sitio asociado se
       basará en el consentimiento o interés legítimo. Consulta la
       Política de privacidad de los Sitios asociados para obtener más
       información sobre su base legal. Si un socio se basa en el
       consentimiento, Outbrain no introducirá ninguna cookie si tu no has
       proporcionado el consentimiento en dicho Sitio asociado.

   Socios comerciales: te conviertes en Socio comercial cuando te
   registras (o envías un correo electrónico a Outbrain) en nombre de la
   compañía para la que trabajas para utilizar los Servicios Outbrain
   Amplify o Outbrain Engage. Ver más aquí.
   (a) Qué información recopilamos y por qué
   Puede que proporciones ciertos datos personales (como la dirección de
   correo electrónico) cuando te suscribas a los servicios de Amplify o
   Engage o alternativamente cuando te pongas en contacto o interactúes
   con nosotros. Si solicitas convertirte en Socio comercial, es posible
   que te solicitemos información adicional a través de formularios de
   solicitud de anunciantes, órdenes de inserción y otros formularios.
   Recopilamos automáticamente información acerca de las acciones de tu
   nombre de usuario en el panel de control de Outbrain. Por ejemplo, como
   un Socio comercial de Amplify, si cambias el coste por clic para una de
   tus campañas, el registro de auditoría de Outbrain tendrá un registro
   de todas esas acciones.
     * Recopilamos y tratamos los datos personales anteriores con el fin
       de cumplir nuestras obligaciones en virtud de nuestro acuerdo como
       Socio comercial (o posible Socio comercial) con usted, incluido
       para:

     * responder a tus preguntas y solicitudes;

     * proporcionarte acceso a ciertas funciones y características de
       nuestros servicios Amplify o Engage (por ejemplo, para proporcionar
       y mantener tu cuenta del panel de control);

     * verificar tu identidad;

     * informarte sobre tu cuenta, nuestros productos y promociones
       disponibles que puedan ser relevantes para tu uso del servicio
       Amplify o Engage.

   (b) Qué cookies y otras tecnologías similares utilizamos
   Consulta esta Tabla de cookies en el apartado «Socios comerciales» para
   obtener una lista detallada de las cookies (y sus correspondientes
   períodos de retención) que empleamos con los Socios comerciales.
   (c) Cómo podemos compartir información con cualquier persona
   Podemos revelar cierta información de los Socios comerciales a
   proveedores, contratistas u otros que ayuden a Outbrain a prestar los
   servicios (por ejemplo, procesamiento de tarjetas de crédito). Consulta
   también el apartado Intercambio de esta Política de privacidad.
   (d) Tus derechos
   Si como Socio comercial deseas verificar, corregir, actualizar o
   solicitar la desactivación de tu información, puedes ir al panel de
   control de Outbrain para editar tus preferencias de perfil o ponerte en
   contacto con nosotros en support@outbrain.com. Si estás recibiendo
   correos electrónicos de Outbrain, puedes «darte de baja» haciendo uso
   del enlace en el correo electrónico. Ten en cuenta que la cancelación
   de la suscripción no inhabilitará las notificaciones que sean críticas
   para proporcionar los servicios de Amplify o Engage (por ejemplo,
   facturas por correo electrónico).
   La base legal de Outbrain para tratar los datos personales de los
   Socios comerciales es el interés legítimo.
   3. Cómo protegemos la información, las transmisiones fuera del EEE, el
   intercambio y la retención

                                      +

   Seguridad
   Outbrain tiene un equipo de seguridad específico. Mantenemos un
   estricto control de los datos que recopilamos y los retenemos en bases
   de datos seguras y protegidas por cortafuegos con derechos de acceso
   estrictamente limitados y controlados, para garantizar su seguridad.
   Consulta nuestras normas de seguridad para obtener más información.
   Los socios comerciales tienen acceso a determinadas funciones
   protegidas por contraseña del servicio Amplify o Engage. Ellos son
   responsables de mantener la confidencialidad de la contraseña. Por
   favor, recuerda que, lamentablemente, la transmisión de información a
   través de Internet no es completamente segura. El «spoofing» o
   «phishing» son algunas de las estafas más comunes en Internet. Esto se
   produce cuando recibes un correo electrónico que parece proceder de una
   fuente legítima que te solicita datos personales. Ten en cuenta que no
   te enviaremos ningún correo electrónico solicitándote que verifiques la
   información de tu tarjeta de crédito, bancaria o cualquier otro dato
   personal. Si alguna vez recibes un correo electrónico que parece ser de
   nuestra parte solicitándote dicha información, no respondas a él y no
   haga clic en ninguno de los enlaces que aparecen en el correo
   electrónico. En su lugar, reenvíenos el correo electrónico a
   legal@outbrain.com, ya que investigaremos casos de posible fraude en
   Internet.
   Transferencias de datos fuera de la UE/EEE
   Cuando transferimos datos personales desde el Espacio Económico Europeo
   a otros países en los que las leyes aplicables no ofrecen el mismo
   nivel de protección de la privacidad de los datos que en el territorio
   europeo, adoptamos medidas para proporcionar un nivel adecuado de
   protección de los datos. En otras palabras, tus derechos y niveles de
   protección se mantienen con tus datos. Por ejemplo, utilizamos
   cláusulas contractuales aprobadas y otras medidas diseñadas para
   asegurar que los destinatarios de tus datos personales los protejan.
   Intercambio
   Además de la descripción de cómo podemos revelar tus datos personales
   en función de cada tipo de usuario, también podemos revelar datos
   personales de la siguiente manera:
     * Dentro de la familia de empresas controladas por Outbrain por
       razones internas, principalmente con fines comerciales y
       operativos.

     * Si pasamos por una transición de negocios, como una fusión,
       adquisición por otra compañía o venta de todos o parte de nuestros
       activos, es probable que tus datos personales se encuentren entre
       los activos transferidos.

     * Cuando la ley así lo requiera (por ejemplo, para cooperar con
       investigaciones de las fuerzas del orden u otros procedimientos
       legales).

     * Para responder a una verdadera emergencia.

   Además, combinamos tus datos personales con los de otros usuarios para
   compartir información de tendencias y agregar estadísticas de usuarios
   con terceros, siempre de forma agregada y anónima.
   Retención de datos
   El período de retención para cada una de las cookies que utiliza
   Outbrain (ya sea por su cuenta o en nuestro nombre por parte de
   terceros) se indica en la Tabla de cookies.
   Outbrain también mantiene una Política de Retención de Datos que
   detalla el período de retención de datos personales sobre la base de
   nuestro análisis sobre cuánto tiempo es necesario retener
   razonablemente los datos específicos para fines legales o comerciales.
   Cuando ya no necesitamos datos personales, los borraremos o
   destruiremos de forma segura. Los datos agregados, que no puedan
   identificar un dispositivo/navegador (o a una persona) y se utilicen
   con fines de información y análisis, se mantendrán durante el tiempo
   que sea necesario desde el punto de vista comercial.
   4. Niños

                                      +

   Ninguno de nuestros servicios está dirigido a niños menores de 16 años.
   No recopilamos de manera consciente datos personales de ninguna persona
   menor de 16 años de edad. Si en el momento de la recopilación
   determinamos que un Visitante del sitio, un Usuario o un Socio
   comercial es menor de 16 años, no utilizaremos ni mantendremos tus
   datos personales. Si tenemos constancia de que sin saberlo hemos
   recopilado datos personales de un menor de 16 años, haremos todos los
   esfuerzos razonables para eliminar dicha información de nuestros
   registros. ¡Si eres un niño, ve a jugar al patio, no uses ni
   interactúes con Outbrain!
   5. Ciudadanos del territorio europeo

                                      +

   En cumplimiento de la legislación europea en materia de privacidad, en
   particular el Reglamento General de Protección de Datos de la Unión
   Europea (RGPD), Outbrain proporciona derechos adicionales específicos a
   los ciudadanos del territorio europeo, tales como el derecho de acceso,
   rectificación, oposición, reclamación, supresión y bloqueo. En
   concreto:
     * El derecho a solicitar información sobre si nosotros tratamos tus
       datos personales y, en caso afirmativo, qué datos personales son
       tratados, y el derecho a exigir que los datos personales sean
       rectificados o modificados.
     * En determinadas circunstancias, el derecho a solicitar la supresión
       de los datos personales.
     * En determinadas circunstancias, el derecho a exigir que se
       restrinja el tratamiento de datos personales.
     * El derecho a retirar tu consentimiento para el tratamiento y uso de
       sus datos total o parcialmente en cualquier momento a través de una
       solicitud en el futuro.
     * El derecho a obtener tus datos personales en un formato común,
       estructurado y legible mecánicamente.
     * El derecho a ponerte en contacto con nuestro responsable de
       protección de datos si tienes alguna pregunta, comentario,
       reclamación o solicitud en relación con nuestra declaración sobre
       la protección de datos y el tratamiento de tus datos personales.
     * El derecho a presentar una reclamación ante la autoridad
       supervisora responsable si crees que el tratamiento de tus datos
       personales infringe la legislación.

   Envía un correo electrónico a privacyquestions@outbrain.com con
   cualquier pregunta sobre el ejercicio de cualquiera de los derechos
   anteriores.
   Además de lo anterior, hacemos referencia a ciertos derechos de los
   ciudadanos del territorio europeo a través de la presente Política de
   Privacidad. De conformidad con el RGPD, por ciudadanos del «territorio
   europeo» se entenderán los ciudadanos del Espacio Económico Europeo
   (EEE) y Suiza. A los efectos de la presente Política de privacidad, el
   término «territorio europeo» seguirá incluyendo al Reino Unido, incluso
   después de que el Reino Unido abandone el Espacio Económico Europeo
   tras el Brexit.
   6. Derechos de Privacidad de California

                                      +

   En virtud de los artículos 1798.83-1798.84 del Código Civil de
   California, los residentes de California tienen derecho a solicitarnos
   un aviso que describa las categorías de información personal que
   compartimos con terceros o filiales corporativas para los propósitos de
   marketing directo de dichos terceros o filiales corporativas. Ese aviso
   identificará las categorías de información compartida e incluirá una
   lista de los terceros y filiales con los que se compartió, junto con
   tus nombres y direcciones. Si eres residente de California y deseas una
   copia de este aviso, por favor envía una solicitud por escrito a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com o envíala a la siguiente dirección:
   Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, Nueva York, NY 10011.
   Por favor, espera 30 días para recibir una respuesta.
   7. Declaración de «no rastreo» (Do Not Track)

                                      +

   Algunos navegadores transmiten señales de «no rastreo» (DNT, por sus
   siglas en inglés) a webs. Debido a que no existe una idea común de cómo
   interpretar la señal DNT, Outbrain no altera, cambia ni responde
   actualmente a las peticiones o señales DNT de estos navegadores.
   Seguiremos supervisando la actividad del sector en esta área y
   volveremos a evaluar nuestras prácticas de DNT según sea necesario.
   Mientras tanto, puedes utilizar el resto de las herramientas que
   ofrecemos para controlar la recopilación y el uso de datos, incluida la
   posibilidad de inhabilitar las recomendaciones personalizadas en el
   apartado «Usuarios».
   8. Cómo puede cambiar esta Política de privacidad

                                      +

   Podemos cambiar esta Política de privacidad cada cierto tiempo.
   Colocaremos un aviso que podrás ver claramente como Visitante del Sitio
   o Socio comercial, pero no disponemos de ningún medio para avisar a los
   Usuarios de las actualizaciones. Deberás comprobar, periódicamente, si
   se ha actualizado la Política de privacidad. Siempre mostraremos la
   fecha de la última modificación de la Política de privacidad en la
   parte superior de la página para que puedas saber cuándo se revisó por
   última vez.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                      Dernière mise à jour : 23 mai 2018

   Outbrain s’engage à protéger vos données personnelles. Cette politique
   de confidentialité (la « Politique de confidentialité ») régit
   l’utilisation des données collectées par Outbrain, notamment les
   données personnelles, quelles qu’elles soient. Par données
   personnelles, nous entendons les informations qui vous concernent et
   permettent éventuellement de vous identifier. Nous utilisons vos
   données personnelles conformément aux lois en vigueur. Afin de garantir
   la conformité et de nous aligner sur les valeurs d’Outbrain en matière
   de confiance et de transparence, nous disposons d’une équipe de «
   privacy champions » chargée de mettre en œuvre en continu notre
   programme mondial de respect de la vie privée.

                                                        + DÉVELOPPER TOUT

   1. Qui sommes-nous, que faisons-nous, comment contacter Outbrain, notre
   DPO ou les autorités compétentes

                                      +

   Qui sommes-nous ?
   Outbrain fait référence à Outbrain Inc., une société du Delaware
   (États-Unis) dont le siège se trouve à New York, et à ses succursales
   affiliées (collectivement désignées par les termes « Outbrain », ou «
   nous », « notre », « nos »). Nous exerçons nos activités à partir de 12
   bureaux internationaux et travaillons en partenariat avec des éditeurs
   et des annonceurs dans le monde entier.
   Que faisons-nous ?
   La mission d’Outbrain est de proposer des recommandations intéressantes
   et pertinentes aux utilisateurs en fonction de leurs centres d’intérêt.
   Pour remplir cette mission, nous concluons des accords avec :
     * des éditeurs en ligne et des partenaires qui souhaitent recommander
       des contenus pertinents à leurs utilisateurs (il s’agit d’Outbrain
       Engage) ; et

     * des annonceurs qui souhaitent que les utilisateurs visualisent
       leurs contenus (il s’agit d’Outbrain Amplify).

   Comment nous contacter ?
   Les questions, commentaires et demandes concernant cette Politique de
   confidentialité sont les bienvenus. Ils doivent être adressés à
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou par courrier à Outbrain Inc., 39 West
   13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, USA, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Si Outbrain ne répond pas de manière satisfaisante à vos questions ou
   inquiétudes, vous pouvez également contacter, pour des conseils, une
   assistance ou des réclamations :
     * le DPO ou délégué à la protection des données externe d’Outbrain :
       ePrivacy GmbH, représenté par Christoph Bauer. ePrivacy GmbH peut
       être contacté directement à l’adresse suivante privacy@eprivacy.eu
       ; et/ou
     * l’Information Commissioner’s Officer, le service de supervision
       principal d’Outbrain pour les pays européens.

   Les organismes d’autorégulation
   Outbrain adhère aux principes d’autorégulation définis par la Digital
   Advertising Alliance (DAA) et l’European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Nous sommes membres de plein droit de la
   Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), une association dédiée à une
   collecte et une utilisation responsable des données à des fins de
   publicité numérique. Nous adhérons au code de bonne conduite de la NAI
   pour le Web et les appareils mobiles. Outbrain adhère également aux
   principes d’autorégulation de l’Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB)
   pour la publicité comportementale en ligne et à l’OBA Framework de
   l’IAB Europe.
   2. Types d’utilisateurs Outbrain (et gestion d'exclusion "opt-out")

                                      +

   La majeure partie de cette Politique de confidentialité est divisée en
   sections basées sur la manière dont vous interagissez avec Outbrain.
   Veuillez déterminer quel type d’utilisateur vous êtes. Pour chaque type
   d’utilisateur, nous détaillons quelles informations nous collectons et
   pourquoi, quels témoins de connexion ou « cookies » et autres
   technologies similaires nous utilisons, comment nous partageons ces
   informations, et vos droits.
   Visiteurs du site: Vous êtes un Visiteur du site quand vous consultez
   et interagissez avec nos sites et pages Web, nos fonctionnalités
   interactives, nos blogs et leurs contenus sur Outbrain.com (ou tout
   autre site dérivé comme Outbrain.co.uk ; Outbrain.fr ; outbrain.de
   etc.) et MyOutbrain.com (« Nos Sites »). Voir plus ici.
   (a) Quelles informations collectons-nous et pourquoi ?
   Nous souhaitons comprendre quels services sur nos Sites vous
   intéressent et vous rappeler les services que nous proposons quand vous
   n’êtes pas sur nos Sites. Pour ce faire, nous collectons auprès de vous
   les informations suivantes : (i) l’adresse IP; (ii) les données agent
   utilisateur : le type d’appareil (ex : iPhone), le type de navigateur
   (ex : Chrome), le système d’exploitation (ex : iOS) ; (iii) les pages
   visitées sur notre Site (ex : la page « À propos » d’Outbrain ») ; (iv)
   l’heure de visite (et le fuseau horaire correspondant) ; et (v) les URL
   correspondantes et autres informations normalement transmises dans les
   requêtes HTTP (par exemple ces informations nous indiquent comment vous
   êtes arrivé sur nos Sites).
   (b) Quels cookies et autres technologies similaires utilisons-nous ?
   Veuillez consulter la Table des cookies sous « Visiteurs du site » pour
   une liste détaillée des cookies (et leurs durées de conservation
   associées) que nous utilisons quand vous visitez nos Sites.
   (c) Comment sommes-nous susceptibles de partager les informations ?
     * Le partage des informations que nous obtenons sur vous sur nos
       Sites.

   De manière générale, nous ne partageons pas les données personnelles
   vous concernant avec des tiers à des fins de marketing ou de publicité.
   Toutefois, nous faisons appel à divers tiers (chacun d’entre eux étant
   listé dans la Table de cookies) pour nous aider dans nos démarches
   commerciales et publicitaires envers vous. Certains des cookies que
   nous utilisons sur nos Sites appartiennent ainsi à des tiers qui
   aideront Outbrain à vous proposer des services ou des publicités. Nous
   demandons à ces tiers et entreprises d’accepter de préserver la
   confidentialité de toutes les informations que nous partageons avec eux
   et de ne les utiliser que pour remplir leurs obligations envers nous.
   Pour ce faire, nous concluons des accords avec tous les tiers qui
   traitent les données personnelles en notre nom afin de garantir qu’ils
   le font en conformité avec nos instructions rigoureuses et toutes les
   lois de protection des données applicables. Si vous publiez un post sur
   notre blog, vos commentaires et informations seront disponibles
   publiquement. Veuillez contacter support@outbrain.com pour supprimer
   vos commentaires.
     * Utilisation de services de tiers sur nos Sites.

   Nos Sites contiennent des liens vers d’autres sites Web dont nous ne
   sommes ni propriétaires, ni opérateurs. Nous ne contrôlons, ne
   recommandons et ne cautionnons pas le contenu, les produits, les
   services, les politiques de confidentialité ou les pratiques de ces
   sites Web tiers. Vous noterez par exemple sur nos Sites la présence
   d’icônes que vous pouvez cliquer pour accéder à la page Facebook ou
   LinkedIn d’Outbrain. Si vous choisissez de cliquer sur ces liens, vous
   devez savoir que Facebook et LinkedIn peuvent déposer leurs propres
   cookies sur votre appareil et collecter indépendamment des données
   personnelles. Il est donc important que vous lisiez les politiques de
   confidentialité de Facebook et/ou de LinkedIn.
     * Veuillez aussi consulter la section Partage de la présente
       Politique de confidentialité.

   (d) Vos droits
   Les Conditions d’utilisation sur notre Site régissent l’utilisation de
   notre Site et s’appliquent également à vous. Vous pouvez cesser
   d’utiliser notre Site à tout moment. Dans ce cas, vous souhaiterez
   peut-être aussi supprimer tout cookie placé sur les appareils, quels
   qu’ils soient, utilisés pour accéder à notre Site. Si, en cours
   d’utilisation de nos Sites vous avez fourni une adresse e-mail, chaque
   e-mail que vous recevez de la part d’Outbrain comporte une option de
   désabonnement (« unsubscribe »).
   Pour les visiteurs provenant des pays Européens, Outbrain a installé
   sur ses sites une CMP - plateforme de gestion du consentement - opérée
   par One Trust, qui donne aux utilisateurs la possibilité de consentir,
   ou non, à la dépose de cookies et autres technologies de ciblage. En
   accédant à nos sites, vous verrez une bannière située en bas de page
   donnant des informations sur les cookies que nous utilisons. Vous
   pouvez cliquer sur cette bannière pour supprimer les cookies, à
   l’exception de ceux strictement nécessaires. Le fait de cliquer sur
   “Accept” dans la bannière, de poursuivre votre navigation ou de cliquer
   dans un lien sur nos sites est une indication de votre consentement.
   Utilisateurs: Vous êtes un Utilisateur si vous visitez la page d’un
   site ou une application d’un des partenaires d’Outbrain sur laquelle
   est installée le widget Outbrain (les « Sites de partenaires »). Si
   vous vous rendez par exemple sur https://news.sky.com/uk,
   www.spiegel.de ou www.cnn.com, le widget Outbrain est installé sur ces
   sites Web. Les mentions référençant Outbrain (ex : « Recommandé par
   Outbrain », « by Outbrain » à côté des recommandations) vous indiquent
   la présence d’un widget Outbrain. Si vous cliquez sur le lien de la
   référence Outbrain, vous visualiserez une notification détaillée qui
   vous permettra de vous rendre sur le Portail des Centres d’Intérêt
   Outbrain, qui vous donne une vision globale des types de catégories de
   données que nous pouvons utiliser pour faire les recommandations. Ce
   portail vous donne également la possibilité d’opter pour une demande
   d’exclusion des recommandations personnalisées (« opt-out »). Voir plus
   ici.
   Exemple de widget Outbrain
   [SJ4v1w7y7.png]
   (a) Quelles informations collectons-nous et pourquoi ?
   Nous utilisons les UUID, l’adresse IP et autres informations d’usage
   afin de proposer des recommandations intéressantes aux utilisateurs.
   Les recommandations d’Outbrain peuvent être payées par un annonceur
   pour vous mettre en relation avec un nouveau site Web. Elles peuvent
   également être organiques avec un lien vers une autre page du site Web
   du même éditeur.
     * UUID.

   Quand vous consultez un Site de Partenaire (ex : CNN.com) en tant
   qu’Utilisateur pour la première fois, Outbrain dépose un cookie sur
   votre appareil afin de générer un UUID (identifiant utilisateur
   unique). Nous cataloguons et analysons le contenu que vous parcourez
   sur les Sites de Partenaires. Nos recommandations se basent sur : (i)
   l’historique de navigation ; (ii) les profils de consommation
   similaires d’autres Utilisateurs ; (ii) les recommandations
   généralement populaires auprès des utilisateurs d’Outbrain ; (iv)
   quelques données aléatoires, et (v) les exigences de ciblage
   éventuellement fournies ou demandées par nos clients Amplify. À titre
   d’exemple, Outbrain peut savoir que l’UUID 123 (cela pourrait être vous
   sur votre iPhone X lisant le Guardian en utilisant Chrome comme
   navigateur) aime lire des articles sur les voyages et que les personnes
   qui aiment lire ce type d’article aiment aussi les contenus sur la
   nourriture exotique.
   L’UUID est une séquence de chiffres et/ou de lettres. Cet UUID est
   associé à votre appareil et varie en fonction du navigateur que vous
   utilisez. Autrement dit, Outbrain enregistre un UUID différent selon le
   navigateur et/ou appareil que vous utilisez pour accéder aux Sites de
   Partenaires. Ceci signifie que vous aurez par exemple un UUID quand
   vous consultez un Site de Partenaire depuis votre téléphone portable
   avec le navigateur Safari et un autre UUID pour la consultation d’un
   Site de Partenaire depuis votre iPad avec le navigateur Safari.
   Outbrain va combiner et consolider l’UUID depuis un appareil mobile
   (portatif ou tablette) et un navigateur qui accède ensuite à
   l’application (ou vice versa) à partir du même appareil.
   L’affectation d’un UUID permet à Outbrain d’associer les pages vues et
   les clics sur les recommandations d’Outbrain à partir de cet UUID, avec
   pour objectif de vous proposer des recommandations intéressantes et
   pertinentes en fonction de vos centres d’intérêt.
     * Adresse IP et autres informations d’usage.

   Nous recueillons l’UUID comme expliqué précédemment, nous collectons
   également les informations suivantes : (i) l’adresse IP (puis rendus
   anonymes selon les normes de l'industrie); ; (ii) les données agent
   utilisateur : le type d’appareil (ex : iPhone) ; le type de navigateur
   (ex : Chrome), le système d’exploitation (ex : iOS) ; (iii) les pages
   visitées ; (iv) l’heure de visite ; et (v) les URL correspondantes et
   autres informations normalement transmises dans les requêtes HTTP.
   Les informations statistiques ci-dessus nous donnent des informations
   sur le nombre d’Utilisateurs consultant une page spécifique sur les
   Sites de Partenaires sur lesquels le widget Outbrain est installé, le
   temps que chaque Utilisateur a passé sur cette page, le type de contenu
   sur lequel ils ont cliqué et la manière générale dont ils ont interagi
   avec cette page. Ces informations ne constituent des informations
   personnelles que quand elles sont associées à un UUID.
   (b) Quels cookies et autres technologies similaires utilisons-nous ?
   Veuillez consulter la Table des cookies sous « Utilisateurs » pour une
   liste détaillée des cookies propriétaires que nous utilisons quand vous
   interagissez avec des Sites de Partenaires où la technologie Outbrain
   est mise en œuvre.
   Si vous cliquez sur le lien d’une de nos recommandations, l’annonceur
   Amplify qui sponsorise la recommandation est susceptible de placer des
   cookies sur votre appareil lors de la redirection avant d’arriver sur
   la page de destination ou en atteignant la page de destination. Dans de
   tels cas, vous serez soumis à la politique de confidentialité de
   l’annonceur.
   En complément du widget visible d’Outbrain sur nos Sites de
   Partenaires, certains annonceurs Outbrain peuvent installer le pixel
   Outbrain sur leurs sites Web. Le pixel Outbrain détermine si
   l’utilisateur qui atteint la page où le pixel est installé a un UUID
   Outbrain. S’il existe un UUID associé avec un utilisateur final,
   Outbrain permet aux annonceurs de recibler ces UUID et/ou leur donne le
   nombre total d’UUID ayant atteint cette page. S’il n’existe pas d’UUID
   Outbrain sur la page, le pixel Outbrain ne collecte aucune information
   sur l’utilisateur.
   Nous encourageons les annonceurs à divulguer l’utilisation du pixel
   Outbrain sur leurs propres sites Web. Outbrain ne combine aucune
   information pixel avec le profil d’un UUID.
   Les indicateurs sur la visualisation des pages ou les clics reliés à un
   UUID en particulier sont conservés pour une durée de 13 mois. Par
   exemple, si l’UUID 123 lit un article le 31 décembre 2017, cet article
   ne fera plus partie du profil de l’UUID 123 le 1 ^er février 2018.
   (c) Comment sommes-nous susceptibles de partager les informations ?
   Outbrain ne partage pas de profils d’Utilisateurs avec des tiers, quels
   qu’ils soient. Cependant, nous sommes susceptibles de partager l’UUID
   avec certains partenaires à des fins de synchronisation des cookies ou
   en raison d’exigences techniques. Veuillez également consulter la
   section Partage de la présente Politique de confidentialité.
   (d) Vos droits
   Demande d’exclusion (« opt-out ») d’Outbrain. Vous pouvez demander
   votre exclusion des recommandations personnalisées à tout moment.
   Veuillez consulter également le Profil d’intérêts d’Outbrain pour une
   vue générale des données qu’Outbrain connaît à votre sujet et peut
   utiliser pour faire ses recommandations. Le Profil d’intérêts vous
   donne également la possibilité d’ opter pour une exclusion des
   recommandations personnalisées (vous pouvez également demander une
   exclusion (“opt-out”) en cliquant ici). Veuillez noter que cette
   demande d’exclusion pour les navigateurs se fait par le Profil
   d’intérêts d’Outbrain, mais qu’elle se fait via les paramètres de votre
   appareil pour les applications (vous trouverez des exemples d’étapes à
   suivre dans le Profil d’intérêts).
   REMARQUE IMPORTANTE – même si vous avez opté pour une exclusion
   d’Outbrain,
     * vous continuerez à voir des recommandations Outbrain. Le fait de
       demander votre exclusion du suivi personnalisé d’Outbrain ne
       signifie pas que vous cesserez de recevoir des recommandations
       d’Outbrain. Cela signifie que les recommandations d’Outbrain ne
       seront pas personnalisées. Les recommandations continueront à
       utiliser les informations sur la page que vous êtes en train de
       parcourir (c.-à-d. les informations contextuelles) pour vous
       proposer des recommandations sur cette page.

     * L’exclusion de recommandations personnalisées est fondée sur les
       cookies et spécifique à un appareil/navigateur. Si vous naviguez
       sur Internet depuis plusieurs appareils et/ou navigateurs, vous
       devrez demander l’exclusion pour chaque appareil et/ou navigateur
       pour garantir que nous empêchons un suivi de personnalisation sur
       tous. Pour la même raison, si vous achetez un nouvel appareil,
       changez de navigateurs ou supprimez (ou effacez) le cookie
       d’exclusion, vous devrez procéder de nouveau à votre demande
       d’exclusion. Demander l’exclusion du suivi de personnalisation
       n’est pas la même chose que bloquer les cookies.

     * Pour garantir la suppression du profil lié à votre UUID, ne
       procédez pas à l’opération inverse (demande d’inclusion ou « opt-in
       » d’Outbrain) pendant au moins 21 jours. Votre demande d’exclusion
       des recommandations personnalisées d’Outbrain prend effet
       immédiatement. Cependant, si votre navigateur autorise un stockage
       local, et si vous demandez votre inclusion des recommandations
       personnalisées dans les 21 jours suivant votre demande d’exclusion,
       il est possible que votre profil antérieur soit reconnecté à votre
       UUID. Si vous ne procédez pas à une nouvelle demande d’inclusion
       dans les 21 jours, votre profil sera supprimé et ne pourra pas être
       récupéré.

     * Comme pour la plupart des cookies opt-out, le processus d’opt-out
       Outbrain sur navigateur s'appuie sur un cookie. Le cookie opt-out
       est destiné à être persistant afin d'honorer les préférences de
       l'utilisateur. Cependant, la fonction "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention" pour IPhone de l'iOS11 peut avoir un impact sur la
       persistance des cookies sur les sites Web qui affichent une fenêtre
       de 24 heures. Nous vous suggérons d'utiliser un autre navigateur ou
       d'envisager de bloquer tous les cookies d'une tierce partie du
       navigateur afin que vous soyez « désactivés » sans avoir besoin de
       vous fier à la méthode d'exclusion d’autres entreprises.

     * Options complémentaires d’exclusion. Vous pouvez également demander
       votre exclusion de la réception de publicités personnalisées de
       notre part ou de celle d’autres sociétés publicitaires à l’aide
       d’outils fournis par l’industrie comme la NAI ou des pages basées
       sur la DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices ; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices, et/ou EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
       En vous rendant sur les pages dédiées à la gestion des préférences
       consommateur de la NAI, la DAA, la DACC (Alliance de la publicité
       numérique du Canada) ou de l’EDAA, vous pourrez refuser tout ou
       partie des services de leurs membres. Comme dans le cas de
       l’exclusion pour Outbrain, ces retraits ne signifient pas que vous
       ne recevrez plus aucune publicité, mais les publicités que vous
       recevrez ne seront plus personnalisées. Vous êtes susceptible de
       continuer à recevoir des publicités, par exemple basées sur le site
       Web en particulier que vous êtes en train de consulter (c.-à-d. des
       publicités liées au contexte). Par ailleurs, si vos navigateurs
       sont configurés pour rejeter les cookies quand vous visitez les
       pages du consommateur de la DAA, de la DAAC ou de l’EDAA, votre
       exclusion (ou retrait) peut ne pas être effective.

     * Base juridique. La base juridique d’Outbrain pour le traitement des
       données personnelles d’un Utilisateur se fonde sur la base
       juridique déterminée par chacun des Sites de Partenaires. Chaque
       Site de Partenaire s’appuiera sur le consentement ou l’intérêt
       légitime. Veuillez consulter la politique de confidentialité
       applicable des Sites de Partenaires pour plus d’informations sur
       leurs bases juridiques. Si un Partenaire s’appuie sur le
       consentement, Outbrain ne déposera pas de cookie sur votre appareil
       si vous n’avez pas donné votre consentement sur le Site de
       Partenaire concerné.

   Partenaires commerciaux: Vous êtes un Partenaire commercial si vous
   vous inscrivez (ou échangez des e-mails avec Outbrain) au nom de la
   société dans laquelle vous travaillez pour l’utilisation des services
   Outbrain Amplify ou Outbrain Engage. Voir plus ici.
   (a) Quelles informations collectons-nous et pourquoi ?
   Vous êtes susceptible de fournir certaines données personnelles (par
   exemple une adresse e-mail) quand vous signez pour des services Amplify
   ou Engage, ou communiquez ou interagissez avec nous d’une autre
   manière. Si vous demandez à devenir Partenaire, nous sommes
   susceptibles de vous demander des informations complémentaires sous
   forme de formulaires de candidature annonceur, d’ordres d’insertion ou
   autres. Nous collectons automatiquement les informations sur vos
   actions liées à votre nom d’utilisateur dans le tableau de bord
   Outbrain. Par exemple, si vous changez, en tant que Partenaire Amplify,
   le coût-par-clic d’une de vos campagnes, la piste d’audit d’Outbrain
   gardera un enregistrement de toutes ces actions.
   Nous collectons et traitons les données personnelles ci-dessus afin de
   remplir nos obligations au titre de notre accord avec un Partenaire (ou
   Partenaire potentiel), notamment pour :
     * Répondre à vos questions et demandes.

     * Donner accès à certaines fonctions et fonctionnalités de nos
       services Amplify et Engage (par exemple pour fournir et tenir à
       jour le compte de votre tableau de bord).

     * Vérifier votre identité.

     * Communiquer avec vous sur votre compte, nos produits et les
       promotions disponibles compte tenu de votre utilisation du service
       Amplify ou Engage.

   (b) Quels cookies et autres technologies similaires utilisons-nous ?
   Veuillez consulter la Table des cookies sous « Partenaires commerciaux
   » pour une liste détaillée des cookies (et de leurs périodes de
   conservation associées) que nous utilisons avec les Partenaires.
   (c) Comment sommes-nous susceptibles de partager les informations ?
   Nous sommes susceptibles de divulguer certaines informations de
   Partenaires aux prestataires, sous-traitants ou autres, contribuant à
   la prestation des services Outbrain (ex : traitement des cartes de
   crédit). Veuillez aussi consulter la section Partage de la présente
   Politique de confidentialité.
   (d) Vos droits
   Si, en tant que Partenaire, vous souhaitez vérifier, corriger, mettre à
   jour ou demander la désactivation de vos informations, rendez-vous sur
   le tableau de bord Outbrain pour modifier vos préférences de profil ou
   contactez-nous à l’adresse support@outbrain.com. Si vous recevez des
   e-mails Outbrain, vous pouvez vous « désabonner » en utilisant le lien
   présent dans chaque e-mail. Veuillez noter que le désabonnement ne vous
   exclura pas de recevoir des notifications considérées comme critiques
   dans la fourniture de services Amplify ou Engage (ex : factures par
   e-mail).
   La base juridique du traitement des données personnelles de nos
   Partenaires commerciaux est l’intérêt légitime.
   3. Comment sécurisons-nous les informations ; les transferts en dehors
   de l’EEE ; le partage et les durées de conservation

                                      +

   Sécurité
   Outbrain dispose d’une équipe de sécurité dédiée. Nous mettons en œuvre
   des contrôles stricts sur les données que nous collectons, en les
   conservant dans des bases de données sécurisées et protégées par des
   pare-feu avec des droits d’accès contrôlés et limités afin de garantir
   leur sécurité. Veuillez consulter nos normes de sécurité pour de plus
   amples informations.
   Les Partenaires commerciaux ont un accès protégé par mot de passe à
   certaines fonctionnalités du service Amplify ou Engage. Ils ont la
   responsabilité de préserver la confidentialité de ce mot de passe. Il
   est néanmoins nécessaire de rappeler que la transmission d’informations
   par Internet n’est malheureusement pas complètement sécurisée. Une des
   fraudes classiques sur Internet est connue sous le nom d’usurpation
   d’identité électronique (« spoofing ») ou hameçonnage (« phishing »).
   Ceci se produit quand vous recevez un e-mail d’une source apparemment
   légitime vous demandant de lui fournir des données personnelles. Sachez
   que nous ne vous enverrons aucun e-mail vous demandant de vérifier un
   numéro de carte de crédit, des informations bancaires ou toutes autres
   données personnelles. S’il vous arrivait de recevoir un e-mail
   apparemment de notre part et vous demandant de nous fournir de telles
   informations, n’y répondez pas et ne cliquez sur aucun lien
   apparaissant dans ce message électronique. Veuillez plutôt nous
   transférer l’e-mail à l’adresse legal@outbrain.com, et nous mènerons
   des enquêtes sur d’éventuelles fraudes sur Internet.
   Transferts des données en dehors de l’UE/EEE
   Lorsque nous transférons des données personnelles de l’Espace
   économique européen vers d’autres pays dans lesquels les lois
   applicables n’offrent pas le même niveau de protection de
   confidentialité des données que les pays européens, nous prenons des
   mesures pour fournir un niveau approprié de protection de la
   confidentialité des données. En d’autres termes, vos droits et
   protections perdurent avec vos données. Nous utilisons par exemple des
   clauses contractuelles approuvées et d’autres mesures conçues pour
   garantir que les destinataires de vos données personnelles les
   protègent.
   Partage
   En complément de la description de la manière dont nous sommes
   susceptibles de divulguer vos données personnelles pour chaque type
   d’utilisateur, nous pouvons également divulguer les données
   personnelles comme suit :
     * Au sein de la famille des sociétés contrôlées par Outbrain pour des
       raisons internes, particulièrement pour des objectifs liés aux
       activités et au fonctionnement de l’entreprise ;

     * Si nous faisons face à une évolution de notre entreprise, comme une
       fusion, l’acquisition d’une autre société, ou la vente de tout ou
       partie de nos actifs, vos données personnelles sont susceptibles de
       faire partie des actifs transférés ;

     * En cas d’exigences légales le demandant (par exemple pour coopérer
       dans le cadre d’investigations sur la mise en application de la
       législation ou autres procédures légales) ; et/ou

     * Pour répondre à une urgence qualifiée.

   Par ailleurs, nous combinons vos données personnelles avec celles
   d’autres utilisateurs afin de partager des informations sur les
   tendances et agréger des statistiques d’utilisation avec des tiers,
   toujours sous forme agrégée et anonyme.
   Conservation des données
   La période de conservation pour chacun des cookies qu’Outbrain utilise
   (les siens propres ou au nom de tiers) est définie dans la Table des
   cookies.
   Outbrain tient également à jour une Politique de conservation des
   données qui détaille la période de conservation pour les données
   personnelles sur la base de notre analyse de la durée raisonnable de
   conservation nécessaire de données particulières pour des raisons
   légales ou opérationnelles. Quand nous n’avons plus besoin des données
   personnelles, nous les effaçons ou les supprimons de manière sécurisée.
   Les données agrégées, qui ne permettent pas d’identifier un
   appareil/navigateur (ou un individu) et sont utilisées pour des
   objectifs de reporting et d’analyse, sont conservées aussi longtemps
   que commercialement nécessaire.
   4. Enfants

                                      +

   Aucun de nos services n’est destiné à des enfants de moins de 16 ans.
   Nous ne recueillons pas sciemment de données personnelles auprès
   d’enfants âgés de moins de 16 ans. Si nous réalisons en cours de
   collecte qu’un Visiteur du site, un Utilisateur ou un Partenaire
   commercial a moins de 16 ans, nous n’utiliserons ni ne conserverons ses
   données personnelles. Si nous réalisons que nous avons involontairement
   collecté des données personnelles auprès d’un enfant de moins de 16
   ans, nous prendrons alors les mesures raisonnables pour supprimer ces
   informations de nos registres.
   5. Citoyens européens

                                      +

   Conformément aux lois européennes sur le respect de la vie privée, en
   particulier le Règlement général sur la protection des données (RGPD),
   Outbrain octroie des droits particuliers complémentaires aux citoyens
   des pays européens, comme le droit d’accès aux données, le droit de
   rectification, le droit d’opposition, le droit de porter réclamation,
   le droit à l’effacement et le droit de blocage. Plus spécifiquement :
     * Le droit de demander des informations sur l’utilisation ou non que
       nous faisons de données personnelles, et si oui, lesquelles, et le
       droit de demander la rectification ou la modification de ces
       données personnelles.
     * Dans certaines conditions, le droit de demander la suppression de
       données personnelles.
     * Dans certaines conditions, le droit de demander la limitation du
       traitement des données personnelles.
     * Le droit de retirer votre consentement à l’utilisation et au
       traitement de vos données, intégralement ou partiellement, à tout
       moment, avec effet futur.
     * Le droit d’obtenir vos données personnelles dans un format
       compréhensible, structuré et lisible.
     * La possibilité de contacter le délégué à la protection des données
       (« DPO ») pour toute question, commentaire, réclamation ou demande
       en lien avec notre déclaration sur la protection des données et le
       traitement de vos données personnelles.
     * Le droit de vous plaindre auprès de l’autorité de contrôle si vous
       êtes persuadé que le traitement de vos données personnelles
       constitue une violation de la législation.

   En complément des droits ci-dessus, nous référençons certains droits
   pour les citoyens des pays européens dans cette Politique de
   confidentialité. Conformément au RGPD, nous entendons par citoyens des
   « pays européens » les citoyens de l’Espace économique européen (EEE)
   et de la Suisse. Aux fins de cette Politique de confidentialité, le
   terme « pays européens » continuera d’inclure le Royaume-Uni, même
   après son départ de l’Espace économique européen suite au Brexit.
   Merci d’envoyer un mail à privacyquestions@outbrain.com pour toutes
   questions relatives à l’exercice des droits mentionnés ci-dessus.
   6. Droits au respect de la vie privée en Californie

                                      +

   Conformément au Code civil de Californie, articles 1798.83-1798.84, les
   résidents californiens ont le droit de nous demander une note décrivant
   les catégories d’informations personnelles que nous partageons avec des
   tiers et sociétés affiliées à des fins de marketing direct desdits
   tiers ou sociétés. Cette note indiquera les catégories d’informations
   partagées et inclura la liste des tiers et sociétés affiliées avec
   lesquels nous les partageons, avec leur nom et adresse. Si vous résidez
   en Californie et souhaitez une copie de cette note, veuillez en faire
   la demande par écrit à PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou l’envoyer à
   l’adresse suivante : Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New
   York, NY 10011, USA. Veuillez nous accorder 30 jours pour vous
   répondre.
   7. Dispositions « Do Not Track » (non-traçage)

                                      +

   Certains navigateurs transmettent des signaux refusant le traçage de
   données (« do not track ») aux sites Web. Outbrain ne procède
   actuellement à aucune altération, modification ou réponse aux demandes
   ou signaux de non-traçage de ces navigateurs car il n’existe pas de
   compréhension commune sur la manière d’interpréter les signaux de
   non-traçage. Nous continuerons de suivre l’activité du secteur dans ce
   domaine et réévaluerons nos pratiques de non-traçage si nécessaire. En
   attendant, vous pouvez utiliser la gamme d’autres outils que nous vous
   proposons pour contrôler la collecte et l’utilisation des données,
   notamment la possibilité de demander l’exclusion de la réception de
   recommandations personnalisées (« opt-out ») dans la section
   Utilisateurs.
   8. Les modifications qui pourraient être apportées à cette Politique de
   confidentialité

                                      +

   Nous sommes susceptibles de modifier cette Politique de confidentialité
   de manière ponctuelle. Nous afficherons clairement une notification que
   vous pourrez voir en tant que Visiteur du site ou Partenaire
   commercial, mais nous n’avons pas de moyen d’informer les Utilisateurs
   d’une mise à jour. Nous vous conseillons de régulièrement vérifier ici
   si la Politique de confidentialité a été mise à jour. Nous indiquerons
   toujours la date de dernière modification de la Politique de
   confidentialité en haut de la page afin que vous puissiez savoir quand
   elle a été révisée pour la dernière fois.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                      Ultimo aggiornamento: 23 maggio 2018

   Outbrain si impegna a proteggere i tuoi dati personali. La presente
   politica sulla privacy (“Politica sulla privacy ”) disciplina
   l'utilizzo da parte di Outbrain dei dati raccolti da noi, ivi inclusi
   tutti i dati personali. I dati personali sono informazioni che si
   riferiscono a te e possono identificarti come individuo. Utilizziamo i
   tuoi dati personali in linea con tutte le leggi applicabili. Al fine di
   garantire il rispetto e l'allineamento con i valori di Outbrain in
   materia di fiducia e trasparenza, disponiamo di team di esperti di
   privacy responsabili dell'implementazione continua del nostro programma
   di privacy globale.

                                                           + ESPANDI TUTTO

   1. Chi siamo, Cosa facciamo, Come contattare Outbrain, il nostro RPD o
   le autorità competenti

                                      +

   Chi siamo:
   Outbrain indica Outbrain Inc., un'azienda del Delaware (USA) con sede a
   New York; e le sue partecipate (collettivamente, “Outbrain,” o "noi",
   "ci", "nostro"). Operiamo da 12 uffici a livello globale e collaboriamo
   con editori e operatori di mercato in tutto il mondo.
   Cosa facciamo:
   La mission di Outbrain consiste nel fornire ai suoi utenti contenuti
   interessanti basati sui loro interessi. Per realizzare la nostra
   mission stipuliamo accordi con:
     * editori e partner online che desiderano raccomandare contenuti
       pertinenti ai loro lettori (si tratta del servizio Outbrain
       Engage); e

     * inserzionisti che desiderano che i lettori visualizzino i loro
       contenuti (si tratta del servizio Outbrain Amplify).

   Come contattarci
   Esaminiamo regolarmente il nostro rispetto della presente politica
   sulla privacy. Domande, commenti e richieste riguardanti la presente
   politica sulla privacy sono apprezzati e vanno indirizzati a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oppure all'indirizzo postale: Outbrain
   Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Qualora Outbrain non risponda in maniera soddisfacente alle tue domande
   o preoccupazioni, puoi altresì contattare i seguenti riferimenti per
   informazioni, supporto o reclami:
     * Responsabile esterno della protezione dei dati di Outbrain ("RPD"):
       ePrivacy GmbH, rappresentata dal Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. È
       possibile contattare direttamente ePrivacy GmbH all'indirizzo:
       privacy@eprivacy.eu; e/o
     * l'Information Commissioner’s Officer, che è la principale autorità
       di controllo su Outbrain all'interno dei Territori europei.

   Organismi di autoregolamentazione
   Outbrain aderisce ai principi di autoregolamentazione stabiliti da
   Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) e da European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Siamo soci in regola della Network
   Advertising Initiative (NAI), un'associazione dedicata alla raccolta
   responsabile di dati e al loro utilizzo per la pubblicità digitale.
   Aderiamo al Codice di condotta NAI per il settore Web e Mobile.
   Outbrain aderisce altresì ai principi di autoregolamentazione
   dell'Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) per la pubblicità
   comportamentale online e al framework di IAB Europa per la pubblicità
   comportamentale online.
   2. Tipi di utente Outbrain (compresa la gestione delle opzioni di Opt
   Out)

                                      +

   Gran parte della presente politica sulla privacy è suddivisa in sezioni
   in base al modo in cui è possibile interagire con Outbrain. Ti
   preghiamo di stabilire quale tipo di utente sei, in quanto, per ogni
   tipo di utente abbiamo spiegato quali informazioni raccogliamo e
   perché, quali cookie e altre tecnologie analoghe utilizziamo, come
   condividiamo tali informazioni e i tuoi diritti.
   Visitatori del sito: Sei un visitatore del sito quando visiti e
   interagisci con i nostri siti web, le nostre pagine web, le funzioni
   interattive, i blog e i loro rispettivi contenuti disponibili
   all'indirizzo Outbrain.com (o qualsiasi sua derivazione, come
   Outbrain.co.uk; Outbrain.fr; outbrain.de, ecc.) e MyOutbrain.com (“I
   nostri siti“). Vedi di più qui.
   (a) Quali informazioni raccogliamo e perché
   Desideriamo capire quali servizi sui nostri siti ti interessino e
   desideriamo ricordarti i servizi che offriamo quando non sei sui nostri
   siti. Per fare questo, raccogliamo le seguenti informazioni su di te:
   (i) indirizzo IP; (ii) dati dell'agente utente: tipo di dispositivo (ad
   es. iPhone), tipo di browser (ad es. Chrome), sistema operativo (ad es.
   iOS); (iii) le pagine visitate sul nostro sito (ad es. la pagina "Chi
   siamo" di Outbrain); (iv) l'orario della visita (e il fuso orario
   corrispondente); nonché (v) le URL di riferimento e altre informazioni
   normalmente trasmesse nelle richieste HTTP (ad esempio, queste
   informazioni ci dicono come sei arrivato sui nostri siti).
   (b) Quali cookie e altre tecnologie simili utilizziamo
   Ti rimandiamo a questa Tabella dei cookie alla sezione "Visitatori del
   sito" per un elenco dettagliato dei cookie (e dei relativi periodi di
   conservazione) che utilizziamo quando visiti i nostri siti.
   (c) Come possiamo condividere le informazioni
     * Condivisione delle informazioni che acquisiamo su di te sui nostri
       siti.

   In generale, non condividiamo i tuoi dati personali con terzi per
   finalità di pubblicità o marketing di terzi. Tuttavia, ricorriamo a
   vari terzi (ciascuno elencato nella Tabella dei cookie) affinché ci
   aiutino a svolgere attività di commercializzazione o pubblicità nei
   tuoi confronti. Ad esempio, alcuni dei cookie che utilizziamo sui
   nostri siti appartengono a terzi che aiuteranno Outbrain a svolgere
   attività di commercializzazione o pubblicità nei tuoi confronti.
   Richiediamo a tali parti e società terze di acconsentire a mantenere
   riservate tutte le informazioni condivise con loro e a utilizzare tali
   informazioni esclusivamente per adempiere ai loro obblighi nei nostri
   confronti. Facciamo ciò stipulando accordi con tutti i terzi che
   trattano dati personali per nostro conto in maniera da garantire che
   trattino i tuoi dati personali in conformità con le nostre severe
   istruzioni e tutte le leggi applicabili in materia di protezione dei
   dati. Se pubblichi un post sul nostro blog, i tuoi commenti e le tue
   informazioni saranno disponibili al pubblico. Contatta
   support@outbrain.com per rimuovere il tuo commento.
     * Utilizzo di servizi di terzi sui nostri siti.

   I nostri siti contengono collegamenti ad altri siti web che non sono di
   nostra proprietà o gestiti da noi. Non controlliamo, raccomandiamo o
   approviamo il contenuto, i prodotti, i servizi, le politiche sulla
   privacy o le pratiche di tali siti web di terzi. Ad esempio, sui nostri
   siti noterai icone cliccabili che ti condurranno alla pagina Facebook
   di Outbrain o alla pagina LinkedIn di Outbrain. Se scegli di fare click
   su tali collegamenti, devi sapere che Facebook e LinkedIn potrebbero
   inviare i propri cookie al tuo dispositivo e potrebbero raccogliere
   dati personali in maniera indipendente. Di conseguenza è importante che
   tu legga le politiche sulla privacy di Facebook e/o LinkedIn.
     * Consulta anche la sezione Condivisione della presente politica
       sulla privacy.

   (d) I tuoi diritti
   Le Condizioni d'uso presenti sul nostro sito disciplinano l'uso del
   nostro sito e si applicano anche a te. Puoi smettere di usare il nostro
   sito in qualsiasi momento. Se lo fai, puoi altresì desiderare rimuovere
   tutti i cookie che abbiamo inserito su qualsiasi dispositivo utilizzato
   per accedere al nostro sito. Se durante l'utilizzo dei nostri siti hai
   fornito il tuo indirizzo e-mail, qualsiasi e-mail che ricevi da
   Outbrain include un'opzione di "annullamento dell'iscrizione"
   (unsubscribe).
   Per gli utenti dei Territori europei, Outbrain ha implementato una
   piattaforma di gestione del consenso (gestita da One Trust ) sui nostri
   siti che offre ai visitatori l'opportunità di acconsentire, o meno, a
   cookie e tecnologie di tracciamento simili sui nostri siti. Accedendo
   ai nostri siti, vedrai un banner nella parte inferiore della pagina con
   informazioni sui cookie che utilizziamo. È possibile fare click sul
   banner per rifiutare tutti i cookie che non sono strettamente
   necessari. Premendo "accetta" sul banner o scorrendo / facendo click
   sui nostri siti è un'indicazione della tua accettazione. Di
   conseguenza, la base legale di Outbrain per il trattamento dei dati
   personali sui nostri siti è il consenso. Puoi ritirare il tuo consenso
   in qualsiasi momento cliccando qui.
   Utenti: Sei un utente se visiti una pagina di un sito web o di
   un'applicazione di uno dei partner di Outbrain nelle quali è installato
   il widget Outbrain (“Siti partner”). Ad esempio, se visiti
   https://news.sky.com/uk, www.corriere.it il widget Outbrain è
   implementato su tali siti web. Sai che stai interagendo con un widget
   Outbrain quando vedi del testo che fa riferimento a Outbrain (ad
   esempio "Recommended by Outbrain", "by Outbrain" accanto ai contenuti).
   Se fai click sul riferimento contenente il collegamento ipertestuale a
   Outbrain, visualizzerai una informativa dettagliata che ti consentirà
   di raggiungere il Profilo di interesse di Outbrain, che fornisce una
   visualizzazione generale dei tipi di categorie di dati di Outbrain che
   quest'ultima può utilizzare per formulare le sue raccomandazioni.
   Inoltre, ti dà la possibilità di rinunciare a ricevere contenuti
   personalizzati. Vedi di più qui.
   Esempio di un widget Outbrain
   [S1q4BIXJQ.png]
   (a) Quali informazioni raccogliamo e perché
   Usiamo UUID, indirizzo IP e altre informazioni di utilizzo in maniera
   da poter offrire contenuti interessanti. Le raccomandazioni di Outbrain
   possono essere pagate da un inserzionista che ti collega a un nuovo
   sito web oppure possono essere organiche, nel qual caso il collegamento
   rinvia a un'altra pagina sullo stesso sito web dell'editore.
     * UUID.

   Quando in veste di Utente visiti per la prima volta un Sito partner (ad
   esempio, CNN.com), Outbrain deposita un cookie sul dispositivo al fine
   di generare un UUID (un identificativo utente univoco). Cataloghiamo e
   analizziamo i contenuti che consumi attraverso i Siti partner. Le
   nostre raccomandazioni si basano su: (i) cronologia di navigazione;
   (ii) modelli di navigazione simili di altri Utenti; (ii)
   raccomandazioni di contenuto che sono in genere popolari presso il
   pubblico di Outbrain in quel dato momento; (iv) un pizzico di casualità
   e (v) requisiti di targeting che possono essere forniti o richiesti dai
   nostri clienti Amplify. Ad esempio, Outbrain potrebbe sapere che l'UUID
   123 (che potresti essere tu che sul tuo iPhone X stai visitando il
   Guardian usando Chrome come browser) ama leggere di destinazioni di
   vacanza lontane e che alle persone che amano leggere delle medesime
   destinazioni di vacanza lontane piace leggere di cibi esotici.
   L'UUID è una sequenza di numeri e/o lettere. L'UUID viene associato al
   tuo dispositivo e varia in base al browser che utilizzi. In altre
   parole, Outbrain registra un UUID diverso a seconda del dispositivo e/o
   del browser che utilizzi per accedere ai Siti partner. Ad esempio, ciò
   significa che avrai un UUID quando visiti un Sito partner dal tuo
   telefono cellulare utilizzando Safari come browser e un UUID diverso
   quando visiti un Sito partner dal tuo iPad utilizzando Safari come
   browser. Outbrain combinerà e consoliderà un UUID da un dispositivo
   mobile (palmare o tablet) da un browser che accede quindi a
   un'applicazione (o viceversa) da quel medesimo dispositivo.
   L'assegnazione di un UUID consente a Outbrain di associare le
   visualizzazioni di pagina visitate e i click sulle raccomandazioni di
   Outbrain provenienti da tale UUID, il tutto con l'obiettivo di fornire
   contenuti interessanti.
     * Indirizzo IP e altre informazioni sull'utilizzo.

   Raccogliamo un UUID come spiegato sopra, inoltre raccogliamo le
   seguenti informazioni da te: (i) indirizzo IP (reso anonimo in base
   agli standard di settore) (ii) dati dell'agente utente: tipo di
   dispositivo (ad es. iPhone), tipo di browser (ad es. Chrome), sistema
   operativo (ad es. iOS); (iii) le pagine visitate; (iv) l'orario della
   visita; e (v) gli URL di riferimento e altre informazioni normalmente
   trasmesse nelle richieste HTTP.
   Le suddette informazioni statistiche ci forniscono informazioni su
   quanti Utenti hanno visitato una pagina specifica sui nostri Siti
   partner sui quali è installato il widget Outbrain, per quanto tempo
   ciascun Utente è rimasto su quella pagina, il tipo di contenuto su
   quella pagina sul quale hanno fatto click e, in generale, come hanno
   interagito con tale pagina. Queste informazioni costituiscono dati
   personali soltanto quando sono associati a un UUID.
   (b) Quali cookie e altre tecnologie simili utilizziamo
   Visita questa Tabella dei cookie nella sezione "Utenti" per un elenco
   dettagliato dei cookie proprietari che utilizziamo quando interagisci
   con i Siti partner nei quali è implementata la tecnologia Outbrain.
   Se fai click su un collegamento verso una delle nostre raccomndazioni,
   l'inserzionista Amplify che sponsorizza tale contenuto può installare
   cookie sul tuo dispositivo tramite reindirizzamenti prima che tu giunga
   alla pagina di destinazione della raccomandazione di contenuto o nel
   momento in cui raggiungi la pagina di destinazione. In tali casi sarai
   soggetto alla politica sulla privacy di tale inserzionista.
   Oltre al widget Outbrain visibile su Siti partner, alcuni inserzionisti
   di Outbrain possono implementare il pixel Outbrain sui loro siti web.
   Il pixel Outbrain determina se l'utente che raggiunge la pagina nella
   quale è installato il pixel dispone di un UUID Outbrain. Se esiste un
   UUID associato a tale utente finale, Outbrain consente agli
   inserzionisti di reindirizzare tali UUID e/o fornisce agli
   inserzionisti il numero totale di UUID che hanno raggiunto tale pagina.
   Se nessun UUID Outbrain ha visitato la pagina, il pixel Outbrain non
   raccoglie alcuna informazione sull'utente.
   Invitiamo gli inserzionisti a divulgare l'uso di pixel Outbrain sui
   propri siti web. Outbrain non combina le informazioni ottenute dal
   pixel con il profilo di un UUID.
   I punti dati come le visualizzazioni delle pagine e i click che sono
   collegati a un UUID specifico sono conservati per 13 mesi. Ad esempio,
   se l'UUID 123 legge un articolo il 31 dicembre 2017, il 1° febbraio
   2018 quell'articolo non farà più parte del profilo dell'UUID 123.
   (c) Come possiamo condividere le informazioni
   Outbrain non condivide i profili Utente con terzi. Tuttavia, potremmo
   condividere l'UUID con taluni partner per fini di sincronizzazione dei
   cookie oppure in base a requisiti tecnici. Consulta anche la sezione
   Condivisione della presente politica sulla privacy.
   (d) I tuoi diritti
     * Opt Out di Outbrain. Puoi rinunciare (opt-out) alle raccomandazioni
       di contenuto personalizzate di Outbrain in qualsiasi momento.
       Consulta il Profilo di interesse di Outbrain per una panoramica
       generale dei dati che Outbrain conosce su di te e può utilizzare
       per formulare le sue raccomandazioni. Il Profilo di interesse ti dà
       altresì la possibilità di decidere di rinunciare alle
       raccomandazioni personalizzate (puoi anche effettuare l’opt-out
       cliccando qui). Tieni presente che l'esclusione dei browser avviene
       tramite il Profilo di interesse di Outbrain, ma la rinuncia ai
       contenuti personalizzati nelle applicazioni avviene attraverso le
       impostazioni presenti sul tuo dispositivo (esempi di passaggi sono
       disponibili nel Profilo di interesse).

   IMPORTANTE – anche se hai rinunciato a usufruire di Outbrain:
     * Continuerai a visualizzare le raccomandazioni di Outbrain. La
       disattivazione del tracking per la personalizzazione di Outbrain
       non significa che non riceverai più raccomandazioni di contenuto da
       Outbrain. Piuttosto significa che non saranno personalizzate. Tali
       raccomandazioni continueranno a utilizzare le informazioni relative
       al documento che stai visualizzando (ad esempio informazioni
       contestuali) per fornirti consigli su quella pagina.

     * La rinuncia (opt-out) è basata su cookie ed è specifica del
       dispositivo/browser. Se navighi sul web da dispositivi e/o browser
       diversi, dovrai esprimere la rinuncia da ciascun dispositivo e/o
       browser per assicurarti di impedire il tracking per la
       personalizzazione su ciascuno di loro. Per lo stesso motivo, se
       acquisti un nuovo dispositivo, cambi browser o cancelli (o annulli)
       il cookie di rinuncia, dovrai esprimere nuovamente tale rinuncia.
       Rinunciare al tracking per la personalizzazione non equivale a
       bloccare i cookie.

     * Per garantire la cancellazione del profilo legato al tuo UUID, non
       attivare Outbrain per almeno 21 giorni. La tua rinuncia alle
       raccomandazioni personalizzate di Outbrain è efficace
       immediatamente. Tuttavia, se il tuo browser consente
       l'archiviazione locale e attivi le raccomandazioni di contenuto
       personalizzate di Outbrain entro 21 giorni dalla rinuncia, è
       possibile che il tuo profilo precedente venga riconnesso al tuo
       UUID. Se non effettui l'attivazione entro 21 giorni, il profilo
       verrà eliminato e non potrà essere ripristinato.

     * Come con la maggior parte dei casi di opt-out, anche l’opzione di
       opt-out del browser Outbrain si basa su un cookie. Il cookie di
       opt-out è inteso come persistente per rispettare le preferenze
       dell'utente. Tuttavia, la funzionalità di "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention" in iOS11 potrebbe avere un impatto sulla persistenza
       dei cookie nei siti web nelle 24 ore successive. Ti suggeriamo di
       utilizzare un altro browser o di bloccare tutti i cookie di terze
       parti dal browser in modo da essere "disattivato" senza dover
       ricorrere all'effettiva metodologia di opt-out di qualsiasi
       azienda.

     * Ulteriori opzioni di rinuncia (opt-out). Puoi anche esprimere la
       tua rinuncia a ricevere contenuti personalizzati offerti da noi o
       da altre agenzie pubblicitarie attraverso strumenti messi a
       disposizione dal settore come la NAI o le varie pagine basate su
       DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices, e/o EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
       Visitare le pagine delle scelte dei consumatori di NAI, DAA, DAAC o
       EDAA ti consente di rinunciare a tutti o parte dei servizi dei
       membri partecipanti. Come la funzione di opt out di Outbrain,
       queste rinunce non fanno sì che non riceverai più alcuna
       pubblicità, semplicemente gli annunci pubblicitari non saranno
       personalizzati per te. Puoi continuare a ricevere annunci
       pubblicitari, ad esempio, in base al sito web specifico che stai
       visualizzando (ossia annunci basati sul contesto). Inoltre, se i
       tuoi browser sono configurati per rifiutare i cookie quando visiti
       le pagine delle scelte dei consumatori DAA, DAAC o EDAA, la tua
       rinuncia potrebbe non essere efficace.

     * Base giuridica. La base giuridica di Outbrain per il trattamento
       dei dati personali dell'Utente si fonda sulla base giuridica
       determinata da ciascuno dei nostri Siti partner. Ciascun Sito
       partner si baserà sul consenso o sul legittimo interesse. Consulta
       la politica sulla privacy dei Siti partner per ulteriori
       informazioni sulla loro base giuridica. Se un Partner fa
       affidamento sul consenso, Outbrain non depositerà un cookie sul tuo
       dispositivo se non hai fornito il consenso su tale Sito partner.

   Partner commerciali: Sei un Partner commerciale quando ti registri (o
   invii un'e-mail a Outbrain) per conto dell'azienda per la quale lavori
   per utilizzare i servizi Outbrain Amplify o Outbrain Engage. Vedi di
   più qui.
   (a) Quali informazioni raccogliamo e perché
   Puoi fornire determinati dati personali (quali ad esempio indirizzo
   e-mail) quando ti registri per i servizi Amplify o Engage o altrimenti
   quando comunichi o interagisci con noi. Se presenti domanda per
   diventare un Partner commerciale, potremmo richiederti ulteriori
   informazioni tramite moduli di domanda dell'inserzionista, ordini di
   inserzione e altri moduli. Raccogliamo automaticamente informazioni in
   merito alle azioni del tuo nome utente nella dashboard di Outbrain. Ad
   esempio, in qualità di Partner commerciale Amplify, se modifichi il
   costo per click per una delle tue campagne, la traccia di controllo di
   Outbrain registrerà tutte queste azioni.
   Raccogliamo e trattiamo i dati personali di cui sopra al fine di
   adempiere ai nostri obblighi ai sensi del nostro accordo come Partner
   commerciale (o potenziale Partner commerciale) stipulato con voi, ivi
   incluso per:
     * rispondere alle tue domande e richieste;

     * fornirti accesso a determinate funzioni e caratteristiche dei
       nostri servizi Amplify o Engage (ad esempio per fornirti e
       mantenere il tuo account dashboard);

     * verificare la tua identità;

     * comunicare con te in merito al tuo account, ai nostri prodotti e
       alle promozioni disponibili pertinenti al tuo utilizzo del servizio
       Amplify o Engage.

   (b) Quali cookie e altre tecnologie simili utilizziamo
   Ti rimandiamo a questa Tabella dei cookie nella sezione "Partner
   commerciali" per un elenco dettagliato dei cookie (e dei relativi
   periodi di conservazione) che utilizziamo con i Partner commerciali.
   (c) Come possiamo condividere le informazioni con chiunque
   Potremmo divulgare determinate informazioni dei Business Partner a
   venditori, contraenti o altri soggetti che assistono Outbrain
   nell'erogazione dei servizi (ad es. trattamento delle carte di
   credito). Consulta anche la sezione Condivisione della presente
   politica sulla privacy.
   (d) I tuoi diritti
   Se in veste di Partner commerciale desideri verificare, correggere,
   aggiornare o richiedere la disattivazione delle tue informazioni, puoi
   accedere alla dashboard di Outbrain e modificare le preferenze del tuo
   profilo oppure contattarci all'indirizzo: support@outbrain.com. Se stai
   ricevendo e-mail di Outbrain, puoi "annullare l'iscrizione" a tale
   invio utilizzando un collegamento presente nell'e-mail. Nota:
   l'annullamento dell'iscrizione non comporta la rinuncia a ricevere
   notifiche critiche all'erogazione dei servizi Amplify o Engage (ad es.
   fatture inviate via e-mail).
   La base giuridica di Outbrain per il trattamento dei dati personali dei
   Partner commerciali è il legittimo interesse.
   3. Come manteniamo le informazioni al sicuro, Trasferimenti al di fuori
   del SEE, Condivisione e conservazione

                                      +

   Sicurezza
   Outbrain dispone di un team dedicato per la sicurezza. Manteniamo
   rigorosi controlli sui dati che raccogliamo, conservandoli in database
   protetti e soggetti a firewall con diritti di accesso rigorosamente
   limitati e controllati, per garantirne la sicurezza. Consulta le nostre
   norme sulla sicurezza per maggiori informazioni.
   I partner commerciali hanno accesso a determinate funzionalità protette
   da password del servizio Amplify o Engage. Loro sono responsabili del
   mantenimento della riservatezza di tale password. Ricorda che,
   sfortunatamente, la trasmissione di informazioni tramite Internet non è
   completamente sicura. Una truffa comune su Internet è nota come
   "spoofing" o "phishing" e si verifica quando ricevi un'email
   proveniente da quella che sembra essere una fonte legittima che
   richiede i tuoi dati personali. Ti preghiamo di osservare che non ti
   invieremo alcuna e-mail che ti chieda di verificare la carta di
   credito, le coordinate bancarie o eventuali altri dati personali.
   Qualora dovessi ricevere un'e-mail che sembra provenire da noi e ti
   chiede tali informazioni ti preghiamo di non rispondere e non fare
   click su nessun link presente nell'e-mail. Al contrario, inoltraci
   l'e-mail all'indirizzo legal@outbrain.com, in quanto esamineremo
   possibili casi di frodi su Internet.
   Trasferimento dei dati al di fuori dell'UE/del SEE
   Quando trasferiamo i dati personali dallo Spazio economico europeo ad
   altri paesi nei quali le leggi applicabili non offrono il medesimo
   livello di protezione della privacy dei dati offerto nei Territori
   europei, adottiamo misure atte a fornire un livello appropriato di
   protezione della privacy dei dati. In altre parole, i tuoi diritti e le
   protezioni che ti spettano rimangono associati ai tuoi dati. Ad
   esempio, utilizziamo clausole contrattuali approvate e altre misure
   studiate per garantire che i destinatari dei tuoi dati personali li
   proteggano.
   Condivisione
   Oltre alla descrizione di come possiamo divulgare i tuoi dati personali
   per ciascun tipo di utente, possiamo altresì divulgare dati personali
   nei seguenti casi:
     * all'interno della famiglia di società controllate da Outbrain per
       ragioni interne, principalmente per scopi aziendali e operativi;

     * qualora dovessimo attraversare una transizione aziendale, quale una
       fusione, un'acquisizione da parte di un'altra società oppure una
       vendita di tutte o di parte delle nostre attività, i tuoi dati
       personali saranno probabilmente inclusi tra le attività trasferite;

     * laddove ciò sia richiesto dalla legge (ad esempio, per collaborare
       con indagini delle forze dell'ordine oppure con altri procedimenti
       giudiziari); e/o

     * per rispondere a un'emergenza effettiva.

   Inoltre, combiniamo i tuoi dati personali con quelli di altri utenti al
   fine di condividere informazioni sulle tendenze e aggregare le
   statistiche degli utenti con terze parti, sempre in forma aggregata e
   anonimizzata.
   Conservazione dei dati
   Il periodo di conservazione per ciascuno dei cookie utilizzati da
   Outbrain (sia per quelli propri sia per quelli usati da terzi per
   nostro conto) è indicato nella Tabella dei cookie.
   Outbrain mantiene altresì una politica di conservazione dei dati che
   dettaglia il periodo di conservazione dei dati personali in base alla
   nostra analisi della durata ragionevolmente necessaria di tale
   conservazione, rispetto a dati specifici, tenuto conto delle finalità
   legali o commerciali. Nel momento in cui non necessitiamo più dei dati
   personali, li cancelliamo o li distruggiamo in maniera sicura. I dati
   aggregati, che non consentono di identificare un dispositivo/browser (o
   una singola persona) e sono utilizzati per finalità di reporting e
   analisi vengono conservati per tutto il tempo necessario dal punto di
   vista commerciale.
   4. Minori

                                      +

   Nessuno dei nostri servizi si rivolge a minori di 16 anni. Non
   raccogliamo consapevolmente dati personali da minori di 16 anni. Se al
   momento della raccolta dovessimo stabilire che un Visitatore del sito,
   un Utente o un Partner commerciale ha meno di 16 anni, non useremo né
   conserveremo i suoi dati personali. Qualora dovessimo venire a
   conoscenza del fatto che abbiamo raccolto inconsapevolmente dati
   personali da un minore di età inferiore ai 16 anni, attueremo ogni
   ragionevole sforzo per eliminare tali informazioni dai nostri archivi.
   Se sei un bambino, vai a giocare in giardino, non usare o interagire
   con Outbrain!
   5. Cittadini dei territori europei

                                      +

   In conformità con le leggi europee in materia di tutela della vita
   privata (privacy), in particolare con il regolamento generale europeo
   sulla protezione dei dati (GDPR), Outbrain riconosce specifici diritti
   aggiuntivi ai cittadini dei Territori europei quali il diritto di
   accesso, di rettifica, di opposizione, di reclamo, di cancellazione e
   di blocco. Più specificamente:
     * il diritto di richiedere informazioni sull'eventualità del
       trattamento in atto e su quali dati personali siano trattati da
       noi, nonché il diritto di richiedere la rettifica o la modifica di
       tali dati personali.
     * in determinate circostanze, il diritto di richiedere che i dati
       personali siano cancellati.
     * in determinate circostanze, il diritto di chiedere che il
       trattamento dei dati personali sia soggetto a limitazioni.
     * il diritto alla revoca del proprio consenso al trattamento e
       all'utilizzo dei propri dati, in tutto o in parte, in qualsiasi
       momento con applicazione per il futuro.
     * il diritto di ottenere i propri dati personali in un formato
       comune, strutturato e leggibile da un dispositivo automatico.
     * il diritto di contattare il nostro responsabile della protezione
       dei dati nel caso in cui vi siano domande, commenti, reclami o
       richieste in relazione alla nostra dichiarazione sulla protezione
       dei dati e sul trattamento dei dati personali.
     * il diritto di sporgere reclamo presso l'autorità di controllo
       responsabile qualora si ritenga che il trattamento dei propri dati
       personali avvenga in violazione della legislazione.

   In aggiunta a quanto sopra, facciamo riferimento a determinati diritti
   per i cittadini dei Territori europei nel corso della presente politica
   sulla privacy. Ai sensi del GDPR, con il termine cittadini dei
   "Territori europei" si intendono i cittadini dello Spazio economico
   europeo (SEE) e della Svizzera. Ai fini della presente Informativa
   sulla privacy, il termine "Territori europei" continuerà a includere il
   Regno Unito, anche dopo che il Regno Unito avrà lasciato lo Spazio
   economico europeo in seguito alla Brexit.
   Nel caso avessi domande su come esercitare qualsiasi dei diritti
   descritti qui sopra, scrivici al seguente indirizzo e-mail:
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com.
   6. Diritti in materia di privacy della California

                                      +

   Ai sensi degli articoli 1798.83-1798.84 del Codice Civile della
   California, i residenti californiani hanno il diritto di richiederci
   un'informativa che descriva le categorie di informazioni personali che
   condividiamo con terzi o società affiliate per finalità di marketing
   diretto di tali terzi o società affiliate. Tale informativa individuerà
   le categorie di informazioni condivise e includerà un elenco dei terzi
   e delle società affiliate con le quali sono state condivise, unitamente
   ai loro nomi e indirizzi. Se sei residente in California e desideri una
   copia di tale informativa, invia una richiesta scritta a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oppure inviala al seguente indirizzo
   postale: Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY
   10011. Si prega di consentire 30 giorni per la risposta.
   7. Comunicazione antitracciamento (“Do Not Track”)

                                      +

   Alcuni browser trasmettono segnali antitracciamento, denominati "Do Not
   Track" (DNT), ai siti web. Poiché non esiste una comprensione comune su
   come interpretare il segnale DNT, al momento Outbrain non altera,
   modifica o risponde alle richieste o ai segnali DNT di tali browser.
   Continueremo a monitorare l'attività del settore in questo contesto e
   rivaluteremo le nostre pratiche DNT se necessario. Nel frattempo, puoi
   utilizzare la gamma di altri strumenti che mettiamo a disposizione per
   controllare la raccolta e l'utilizzo dei dati, ivi inclusa la capacità
   di rinunciare a ricevere raccomandazioni personalizzate consultando la
   sezione Utenti.
   8. Come può variare la presente politica sulla privacy

                                      +

   Occasionalmente potremmo modificare la presente politica sulla privacy.
   Inseriremo un avviso in evidenza che ti sarà visibile in qualità di
   Visitatore del sito o Partner commerciale, tuttavia non disponiamo di
   mezzi per avvertire gli Utenti in merito a un aggiornamento. In tal
   caso si raccomanda di verificare periodicamente questa pagina per
   sapere se la politica sulla privacy è stata aggiornata. Visualizzeremo
   sempre la data dell'ultima modifica della politica sulla privacy nella
   parte alta della pagina affinché tu possa sapere quando è stata rivista
   l'ultima volta.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   2018年5月24日
   アウトブレインはお客様の個人データを大切に保護します。このプライバシー ポリシーは（以下「プライバシー
   ポリシー」といいます。）、アウトブレインが収集する全ての個人データも含めた情報の利用方法を定めるものです。個人データは、お客様に関わる情報であ
   って、個人を特定できる情報です。アウトブレインは、お客様の個人データを利用に際しては、適用されるすべての法令を遵守します。プライバシーチャンピ
   オンチームのもと信頼と透明性というアウトブレインの価値を守ります
   + ＋全てを広げる
   – COLLAPSE ALL
   １．私たちについて、私たちのミッション、及びアウトブレイン・アウトブレインのDPO・又は関係部署へのお問い合わせ方法
   +
   アウトブレインについて
   私たちは、米国のデラウェア州で設立された株式会社及びその関連子会社（以下合わせて「アウトブレイン」又は「私たち」といいます。）であり、本社はニ
   ューヨークにあります。アウトブレインは、12 個のグローバルオフィスを有し、世界中のパブリッシャー及びマーケッターと提携関係を組んでいます。
   アウトブレインのミッション
   アウトブレインのミッションは、ユーザーの関心に基づいて、ユーザーの興味関心に基づいてレコメンデーションを提供することです。そのミッションのため
   、次のようなパートナーと提携しています。
     * 読者に価値があるコンテンツを勧めたいオンラインパブリッシャ及びパートナー（こちらの契約をOutbrain Engageといいます。）

     * コンテンツを読者に配信することを希望するアドバタイザー（こちらの契約を Outbrain Amplifyといいます。）

   アウトブレインへのお問い合わせ
   アウトブレインはプライバシーポリシーを遵守していることを定期的に確認しております。プライバシーポリシーに関するご質問、コメント、又は他のお問い
   合わせは次の連絡先までお願いします。
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com 又は
   Attn: Privacy Questions
   Outbrain Inc.
   39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor
   New York, NY 10011
   また上記のお問い合わせ以外にもご質問がございましたら、次の連絡先までご連絡下さい。
     * 外部のData Protection Officer （以下「DPO」と言う）：ePrivacy GmbH
       担当者：クリストフ・バウワー博士
       ePrivacy GmbHには privacy@eprivacy.eu 宛てご連絡ください。

     * 欧州内のアウトブレインの担当部署である Information Commissioner’s Officer

   自主規制機関
   アウトブレインは、Digital Advertising Alliance （以下「DAA」という）及び European
   Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance（以下「EDAA
   」という）において自主規制の原則を遵守します。アウトブレインは、責任あるデータの収集とデジタル広告におけるデータの使用を定める社団Networ
   k Advertising Initiative
   (NAI)の優良メンバーであり、そのウェブとモバイルのための行動規範を遵守します。アウトブレインは、オンライン行動アドバタイジング(OAB)
   に関するInteractive Advertising Bureau (IAB)の自主規制原則及びIAB の欧州OBA原則を遵守します。
   ２．アウトブレインのユーザータイプ（オプトアウトも含む）)
   +
   このプライバシーポリシーにおいては、様々な場面ごとに、お客さまのユーザータイプに応じて、どの情報を収集し、なぜ収集するのか、なぜ、どのクッキー
   を使うのか、またどのような類似の技術を用いるのか、私たちがどのようにその情報を共有するのか、またお客様にはどのような権利があるのかということを
   ご説明します。
   ウェブサイトの訪問者：お客様はアウトブレインのOutbrain.com （又は国によるアドレス、例えばOutbrain.co.uk、
   Outbrain.fr 、Outbrain.de 、など）及び MyOutbrain.com
   のウェブサイト、ウェブページ、相互作用機能（以下すべて合わせて「アウトブレインのサイト」という）を訪問、及び相互作用する場合、サイトの訪問者に
   なります。 詳しくは こちらへ。
   ア）収集する情報及びその理由
   アウトブレインは、アウトブレインのサイトにおいてお客様がどのコンテンツに興味を持つかを理解し、且つお客様がアウトブレインのサイトを訪問しない時
   にもアウトブレインが提供するサービスを認識していただきたいと考えています。このために、お客様から（１）IP
   アドレス、（２）ユーザーエージェントデータ、あるいはデバイスの種類（例えばiPhone など）、ブラウザの種類（例えばGoogle
   Chromeなど）、オペレーティングシステム（例えばiOS など）、（３）アウトブレインのサイト のどのページを閲覧したか
   （例えば、「アウトブレインについて」のページ）、（４）閲覧した時間（対応する時差）、（５）URL のリファーラル及びHTTP
   リクエストにおいて通常に通信される情報（例えば、この情報でお客様がアウトブレインのサイトにどの経由でいらしたのかを知ることができます）の情報を
   収集します。
   イ）利用するクッキー、又は使用する技術
   お客様がアウトブレインのサイトを訪問する際に使用されるクッキー（及びその有効期間）に関する詳細については、こちらの クッキーテーブル
   のウェッブサイト訪問者の部分をご参照ください。
   ウ）情報の共有
   アウトブレインのサイトにおいて収集したお客様の情報の共有
   原則として、アウトブレインはお客様の個人データを第三者に対しそのマーケティング活動のために共有することはいたしません。しかし、アウトブレインが
   お客様に対してマーケティング及び広告配信ができるように第三者のサービス（こちらの クッキーテーブル
   に表示されます）を利用することがあります。例えば、アウトブレインのサイトにおいて、アウトブレインがお客様にマーケティング及び広告配信を行うため
   に使用するクッキーの一部は、第三者のクッキーです。アウトブレインはこれら第三者に対して、共有された情報を機密情報として取り扱わせるとともに、こ
   れらの情報をアウトブレインに対する義務の履行のためにのみ使用させるものとします。私たちは、私たちのために個人データを処理するあらゆる第三者との
   間で、個人データを私たちの指示及び適用されるデータ保護に関するあらゆる法令を遵守して処理することを義務付ける契約を締結しております。又、お客様
   がアウトブレインのブログにコメントする場合、そのコメント及び情報は開示されます。コメントを削除するためには、
   support@outbrain.comまでご連絡ください。
   アウトブレインのサイトにおける第三者のサービスの利用
   アウトブレインのサイト上には、アウトブレインが所有又は管理しないウェブサイトへのリンクがあります。アウトブレインは、他の第三者のウェブサイトの
   コンテンツ、商品、サービス、プライバシーポリシー、又はデータ処理方法を管理又は保証することができません。例えば、アウトブレインのサイトにおいて
   、アウトブレインのFacebook のページ、又はLinkedin
   のページへのクリックできるアイコンがあります。お客様がこのリンクをクリックする際にFacebook 及びLinkedin
   がお客様のデバイスに自らのクッキーを送信し、個別に個人データを収集する可能性があります。従って、お客様にはFacebook やLinkedin
   のプライバシーポリシーもご確認いただきますようお願いいたします。
   エ）お客様の権利
   アウトブレインのサイトの利用は、アウトブレインのサイトの 利用条件
   にしたがうこととされ、お客様にも適用されます。お客様は、アウトブレインのサイトを利用することをいつでもやめることができます。お客様は利用するこ
   とをやめる場合に、お客様のデバイスに送信されたクッキーを削除することもできます。お客様はアウトブレインのサイトを利用する際にお客様のメールアド
   レスを提供している場合、アウトブレインから送信されるメールの「配信停止」のオプションを利用することもできます。
   アウトブレインは、 欧州
   からのサイト訪問者のために、お客様がアウトブレインのサイトで使用されるクッキー又は他の技術に同意・不同意を表明することを可能にする同意管理プラ
   ットフォーム（「 One
   Trust」を使用する）をアウトブレインのサイトおいて実施します。アウトブレインはお客様が同意しない限りクッキーを送信しません。したがって、ア
   ウトブレインが個人データを処理するための法的根拠は、「同意」となります。お客様はいつでも同意を撤回することができます。
   ユーザー：お客様は
   、アウトブレインのウィジェットがインストールされるアウトブレインのパートナーのウェブサイトのページ（以下「パートナーサイト」といいます。）を訪
   問者をユーザーといいます。例えば、お客様はhttps://news.sky.com/uk 、www.spiegel.de、又は
   www.cnn.com
   を訪問する場合、そのウェブサイトにおいてアウトブレインのウィジェットが表示されます。アウトブレインのウィジェットにおいて、アウトブレインに言及
   するテキスト（例えばレコメンデーションの近くに「アウトブレインのおすすめ」や「アウトブレインからの」といったテキスト）があります。お客様がアウ
   トブレインに言及するリンクをクリックする場合、アウトブレインがレコメンデーションにおいて利用するデータカテゴリーを提供する
   アウトブレインのInterest プロファイルへリンクする通知
   が表示されます。お客様はプロファイルにおいてパーソナルレコメンデーションからオプトアウトすることもできます。詳しくは こちらへ.
   アウトブレインのウィジェットの例
   Outbrain Example Recommendations
   ア）収集する情報及びその理由
   アウトブレインは、価値があるレコメンデーションを提供するために、UUID、IPアドレス、及び他の情報を利用します。アウトブレインのレコメンデー
   ションは、費用を払う広告社から新しいサイトへリンクするもの、又は同じパブリッシャのページへリンクするものです。
     * UUID

   お客様は最初にパートナーサイト（例えば、CNN.com）を訪問する際に、アウトブレインがUUID（一意なユーザー識別子）を割り当てることができ
   るよう、お客様のデバイスにクッキーが送信されます。アウトブレインは、お客様がパートナーサイトにおいて表示又は閲覧するコンテンツをカテゴライズし
   、分析します。アウトブレインのレコメンデーションは、（１）ブラウザの履歴、（２）他のユーザーの類似ブラウジングパータン、（３）アウトブレインの
   ユーザーにおけるその時に人気のコンテンツ、（４）ランダム、及び（５）Amplifyの顧客が提供する又は求めるターゲット条件に基づいて提供されま
   す。例えば、アウトブレインは、UUID123（例えばiPhoneXにおいてChromeのブラウザを使用してガーディアン新聞を訪問するお客様）が
   遠い外国の旅行先について読むことが好きだということ、且つ遠い外国の旅行先について読むことが好きな人は面白い外国の食べ物についても読むことが好き
   だということを知っている可能性があります。
   UUIDは数字又は文字の配列です。UUIDはお客様のデバイスに対応し、ブラウザによって変更されます。言い換えれば、アウトブレインは、お客様がパ
   ートナーサイトを訪問する毎に、お客様のデバイス又はブラウザごとに個別のUUIDを保存します。例えば、お客様がモバイルデバイスにおいてサファリと
   いうブラウザを使用してパートナーサイトを訪問する場合にあるひとつのUUIDが割り当てられ、iPadにおいてサファリというブラウザを使用してパー
   トナーサイトを訪問する場合にまた別のUUIDが割り当てられます。アウトブレインは、モバイルデバイス（携帯端末かタブレット）上のブラウザのUUI
   Dが同じデバイスにおいてアプリにアクセスする（逆も含む）場合、そのUUIDを結合します。
   アウトブレインは、デバイス又はブラウザにUUIDを割り当てることにより、お客様に対してお客様の関心に基づくレコメンデーションを提供することがで
   きるため、そのUUIDと訪問されたページ及びアウトブレインのレコメンデーションのクリックを対応させることができます。
   IPアドレス及び他の使用情報
   アウトブレインは、上記のようにUUIDを収集し、また、（１）IPアドレス、（２）ユーザーエージェントデータ；デバイスの種類（例えば携帯電話）、
   ブラウザの種類（例えばChrome）、オペレーティングシステム（例えばiOS）、（３）訪問したページ、（４）訪問時間、及び（５）リファラURL
   及びHTTP要求において通常に通信される情報を収集します。
   この統計情報は、アウトブレインのウィジェットがインストールされるパートナーサイトのページに何人が訪問しているのかということに関する情報、そのペ
   ージの訪問時間、ユーザーにクリックされたコンテンツ、及び一般的な訪問方法に関する情報をアウトブレインに提供するものです。この情報は、UUIDと
   対応しないため、個人データには該当しません。
   イ）利用するクッキー、又は使用する技術
   アウトブレインの技術が実施されるパートナーサイトを利用する際に使用するクッキーについては、こちらのクッキーテーブルの「ユーザー」の部分をご参照
   くだい。
   お客様がアウトブレインがレコメンドしたコンテンツのリンクをクリックする場合、そのレコメンデーションの遷移先ページが表示される前に、又は遷移先ペ
   ージが表示された際に、レコメンデーションのスポンサーをするAmplifyのアドバタイザーからリダイレクトを使用してお客様のデバイスにクッキーが
   送信される可能性があります。その場合、アドバタイザーのプライバシーポリシーが適用されます。
   アウトブレインのアドバタイザーは 、 表示されるアウトブレインのウィジェットに加えて
   アウトブレインピクセルを使用する可能性があります。アウトブレインピクセルは、ピクセルが実施されるページを訪問するユーザーに対応するアウトブレイ
   ン UUIDが存在するかどうか判断します。アウトブレインはエンドユーザーに対応するアウトブレインUUID が存在する場合、アドバタイザーがその
   UUIDをリターゲットすることができる機能やページを訪問する合計の UUID
   を提供します。アウトブレインピクセルは、ページへの訪問者がアウトブレイン UUID を保持しない場合にはユーザーの情報を収集しません。
   アウトブレインは、アドバタイザーが自らのウェブサイトにおいてアウトブレインピクセルが実施されている旨を開示するよう推奨しています。アウトブレイ
   ンはピクセルから収集した情報とUUIDのプロフィールを結合しません。
   各UUIDに対応するページの閲覧、及びクリック数のようなデータポイントは 13ヶ月間保存されます。例えば、UUID123が 2017年12月
   31日に記事を閲覧したという場合、その記事は2018年 2月1日にその UUIDのプロフィールから削除されます。
   ウ）情報の共有
   アウトブレインはいかなる第三者に対してもユーザーのプロフィールを共有しません。しかし、アウトブレインはクッキーの突合又は技術的に必要となる範囲
   で第三者にUUID を共有する可能性があります。
   詳しくはこのプライバシーポリシーのデータ共有の 部分もご参照ください。
   エ）お客様の権利
     * アウトブレインのオプトアウト

   お客様は、いつでもアウトブレインのパーソナルレコメンデーションからオプトアウトすることができます。お客様の個人データ及びその個人データに基づい
   てお客様にレコメンデーションをすることに関しては、アウトブレインのinterest プロファイル
   をご参照ください。お客様は、興味プロフィールからパーソナルレコメンデーションをオプトアウトすることもできます。ブラウザ上で行うオプトアウトはア
   ウトブレインのinterest プロファイル
   上で行われるものであり、アプリ上でのパーソナルレコメンデーションのオプトアウトはお客様のデバイスの設定を通して行われるものであることにご注意く
   ださい（interest プロファイル にオプトアウトの際のステップの例があります）。
   ご注意ください アウトブレインからオプトアウトしても：
     * お客様に対してまだアウトブレインのレコメンデーションが表示されます。
       アウトブレインのパーソナルトラッキングからオプトアウトをしてもアウトブレインからのレコメンデーションが表示されなくなるわけではありませ
       ん。以降表示されるレコメンデーションはお客様に特化していないだけのものとなります。レコメンデーションは、そのページに関するレコメンデー
       ションを提供するために、お客様が閲覧している文書に関する情報を利用します。
     * オプトアウトはクッキーベースであって、デバイス及びブラウザに特有される
       ものです。お客様が複数のデバイス又はブラウザからウェブサイトを訪問する場合、お客様のすべてのデバイス又はブラウザにおいてパーソナルトラ
       ッキングがなされないようにするため、お客様ご自身ですべてのデバイス又はブラウザにおいてオプトアウトをしていただく必要があります。また、
       お客様は新しいデバイスを買い、ブラウザを変更し、又はオプトアウトのクッキーを削除する場合、再度オプトアウトしなければなりません。また、
       パーソナルトラッキングからオプトアウトすることと、クッキー自体をブロックすることとは異なりますのでご注意ください。
     * お客様は、お客様のUUID
       と対応するプロフィールの削除を保証するために、最低２１日間の間はアウトブレインをオプトインしないようにご注意ください。
       お客様のアウトブレインのパーソナルレコメンデーションからのオプトアウトは直ちに実施されます。しかし、お客様のブラウザがローカル保存をす
       る設定となっており、オプトアウトから２１日以内にアウトブレインのパーソナルレコメンデーションにオプトインする場合、お客様のUUID
       にお客様の従前のプロフィールが再接続される可能性があります。お客様が２１日間以内にオプトインしない場合、お客様のプロフィールは削除され
       、回復することができなくなります。
     * アウトブレインのオプトアウト機能はクッキーに基づくものであり、ユーザーの希望を遵守するように作成されます。しかし、iOS11の
       Intelligent Tracking
       Preventionという機能は、２４時間の範囲を超える場合にウェブサイトのクッキーに影響を与える可能性があります。アウトブレインは、
       お客様が他の会社のオプトアウト方法に依存しなくてもいいように、他のブラウザを使用し、又はブラウザから第三者のクッキーをすべてブロックす
       ることをお勧めします。
     * オプトアウトの追加のオプション

   お客様は、NAI又はDAA のページ（DAA：http://www.aboutads.info/choices 、 DAAC：
   www.youradchoices.ca/choices、及び／又は EDAA
   www.youronlinechoices.eu）のような業界のツールを通してアウトブレイン又は他のアドバタイザーからのパーソナルアドバタイジ
   ングをオプトアウトすることもできます。お客様は、 NAI 、DAA、 DAAC、又は
   EDAAのページを訪問することにより、参加するメンバーのサービスから全体的、又は部分的にオプトアウトすることができます。こちらにもオプトアウト
   することで、アウトブレインのオプトアウトと同じように、お客様に広告が表示されないようになるという意味ではなく、ただお客様にパーソナルな広告が表
   示されないという意味になります。お客様が訪問するウェブサイトに基づく広告（例えば、内容に基づく広告）はまだお客様に対して表示されます。また、お
   客様は、 DAA、DAAC、又は
   EDAAコンスマーチョイスのウェブサイトを訪問する際にブラウザがクッキーを却下するように設定される場合、お客様のオプトアウトが実施されない可能
   性があります。
     * 法的根拠：
       ユーザーの個人データを処理することに関する法的根拠は、アウトブレインの各パートナーサイトの法的根拠に基づくものです。各パートナーサイト
       は、「同意」又は「正当な利益」に基づく法的根拠があります。各パートナーサイトの法的根拠の詳細については、各パートナーサイトのプライバシ
       ーポリシーをご参照ください。アウトブレインは、パートナーが「同意」という法的根拠を採用している場合、パートナーサイトにおいてお客様が同
       意しない限りクッキーを送信しません。

   ビジネスパートナー： お客様は、会社の役割としてアウトブレインの Amplify又はEngage
   のサービスを利用できるようにに登録する（又はアウトブレインとメールのやり取りを行う）場合、ビジネスパートナーとなります。詳しくは こちらへ.
   ア）収集する情報及びその理由
   お客様は、Amplify又はEngage
   のサービスに登録又はアウトブレインとのやり取りを行う際に個人データ（例えばメールアドレスなど）をアウトブレインに提供する可能性があります。お客
   様がビジネスパートナーとなることを希望される際には、アドバタイザーの申込書、広告掲載申込書、又は他の申込書において追加の情報が要求される可能性
   があります。アウトブレインは、アウトブレインダッシュボードにおいて、お客様に対応するユーザーネームの行動に関する情報を自動的に収集します。例え
   ば、お客様がキャンペーンの CPCを変更する場合、アウトブレインの監査証跡に全てのCPCの変更に対応する行動の記録が残ります。
   アウトブレインは、お客様とのビジネスパートナー（又はなり得るビジネスパートナー）としての契約条件を遵守するために例えば下記のような目的のため上
   記のようなデータを収集し、処理します。
     * お客様からのご質問及びお問い合わせに対応すること
     * お客様にAmplify及び
       Engageサービスが提供する機能へのアクセスを提供すること（例えばお客様のダッシュボードアカウントを提供、管理すること）
     * お客様のアイデンティティーを確認すること
     * お客様にお客様のアカウント、アウトブレインのサービス、又はAmplify及び
       Engageのサービスに関するプロモーションについてご連絡すること

   イ）利用するクッキー、又は使用する技術
   アウトブレインがビジネスパートナーに対して使用するクッキー（及びその有効期間）に関する詳細については、こちらのクッキーテーブル
   の「ビジネスパートナー」の部分をご参照ください。
   ウ）情報の共有
   アウトブレインは、ベンダー、コントラクター、又はアウトブレインのサービスをサポートする他の第三者（例えば、クレジットカード処理）にビジネスパー
   トナーの情報を開示する可能性があります。詳しくはこのプライバシーポリシーの データ共有 の部分をご参照ください。
   エ）お客様の権利
   お客様がビジネスパートナーとして、個人データを確認、修正、更新、又は削除を希望する場合、アウトブレインのダッシュボードの「プロフィール設定」か
   ら行っていただくことができます。あるいは、support@outbrain.com
   までご連絡ください。お客様は、お客様にアウトブレインのメールが送信されている場合、そのメールに記載されているリンクを通して配信停止をすることも
   できます。「配信停止」によっても、アウトブレインのサービスを提供するために必要な連絡又は通知にはオプトアウトの効果は生じません（例えば、請求書
   など）。
   アウトブレインがビジネスパートナーの個人データを処理する法的根拠は「正当な利益」です。
   ３．アウトブレインの情報保持、欧州経済領域外への移転、共有及び保存
   +
   セキュリティー
   アウトブレインには専門のセキュリティーチームがあります。アウトブレインは個人データの厳密な管理体制を整備し、その個人データは、ファイアウォール
   が設けられた安全なサーバーに保存され、且つ、アクセス権が限定されます。詳しくはアウトブレインのセキュリティー規定 をご参照ください。
   ビジネスパートナーは、Amply又はEngage
   のサービスにおいてパスワードによって保護される機能に対するアクセス権が有します。ビジネスパートナーはこのパスワードを秘密情報として扱う責任があ
   ります。お客様はインターネットを通じた情報通信は完全に安全ではないということにご注意ください。「スプーフィング」又は「フィッシング」と呼ばれる
   詐欺行為もあります。「スプーフィング」又は「フィッシング」とは、信頼されている主体になりすまして個人データを求める電子メールです。アウトブレイ
   ンが、クレジットカード、銀行情報、又は他の個人データを求めるメールを送信することはありません。もしお客様が、アウトブレインになりすました個人デ
   ータを求めるメールを受信したような場合には、これに対し返事すること、又は表示されたリンクをクリックすることのないようにご注意ください。アウトブ
   レインがそのインターネットを通じた詐欺行為を確認できるように、何かありましたら、 legal@outbrain.comまでにご連絡ください。
   欧州／欧州経済領域外のデータ移転
   アウトブレインは、欧州又は欧州経済領域から、欧州と同等のデータプライバシー保護がなされていない国にデータを移転する場合、適切なデータプライバシ
   ー保護を提供できるような措置を実施します。つまり、お客様のデータはお客様の権利と一緒に移転します。例えば、私たちは承認された契約条項（標準契約
   条項）の使用やその他の個人データの受領者がお客様のデータを保護するための措置を実施します。
   共有
   以上のユーザータイプ別の個人データの開示に加えて、次の方法で個人データが開示される可能性もあります。
     * ビジネス及び業務遂行を目的として、アウトブレインの関連子会社間における開示
     * アウトブレインが合併、買収、又は事業譲渡の対象となることにより、個人データも移転対象となることによる開示
     * 法令、規則、管轄官庁の求めに応じた開示（例えば、法律の執行の又は他の訴訟手続きの協力を目的とする開示）
     * 緊急事態下における開示

   上記に加えて、アウトブレインは、傾向情報及び集合体のユーザー情報を第三者に共有できるようにお客様の個人データと他のユーザー情報を結合します。結
   合される情報は常に集合体及び匿名扱いの状態にあります。
   データ保持
   アウトブレインが使用するクッキー（自らのクッキー及び第三者のも含む）の有効期間はクッキーテーブル に記載されます。
   アウトブレインは、個人データが法律上及び取引上どの程度の期間必要とされるかという分析を踏まえて、データの保存期間を定めるデータ保持ポリシーを整
   備します。
   個人データの必要性がなくなった場合、アウトブレインは確実に個人情報を削除、又は消去します。デバイス、ブラウザ、又は個人を特定しない集合体データ
   は、報告又は分析のため、商業的な必要性がある限り保持されます。
   ４．未成年に対して
   +
   アウトブレインは16歳未満の未成年を対象とするサービスを提供しません。また、アウトブレインは、
   16歳未満の未成年の個人データを意図的に収集することは行いません。データを取集する際にサイト訪問者、ユーザー、又はビジネスパートナーが16
   歳未満の未成年であることが判明した場合、その個人データが利用され、又は保存されることはありません。アウトブレインは、意図せず
   16歳未満の未成年者の個人データを収集したことを知った場合、その個人データを削除するために必要となる合理的な対応を行います。アウトブレインは、
   未成年者はアウトブレインを利用するよりも、外で遊ぶ方が望ましいと考えています。
   ５．欧州市民
   +
   欧州の市民には、欧州のプライバシーに関する法律、特に欧州の個人データ保護規則（General Data Protection
   Regulation）（以下「
   GDPR」という）に基づいた個人データに関するアクセス、訂正、拒否、削除、ブロック、及び苦情申し立ての権利があります。具体的には、
     * お客様の個人データが処理されているか否か、されているとすれば、どの情報についてであるのかについての情報を求める権利及び個人データの修正
       あるいは訂正を求める権利
     * 状況により、自己の個人データの削除を求める権利
     * 状況により、自己の個人データの処理の限定を求める権利
     * お客様の個人データの処理及び利用に対する同意の全部または一部を撤回する権利
     * 一般的に、整理された、機械的に読み取ることができる方法で事故の個人データのコピーを取得する権利
     * アウトブレインのデータ保持及びお客様の個人データの処理に関する質問、コメント、要求、又は苦情がある場合に、アウトブレインのData
       Protection Officerと連絡する権利
     * 規則に違反した個人データの処理が行われていると信じる場合の監督機関に対する苦情申し立ての権利

   上記に加えてこのプライバシーポリシーに欧州市民の権利が参照されます。GDPRに応じて、「欧州市民」とは、欧州経済領域及びスイス連邦を意味します
   。このプライバシーポリシーにおいては、「欧州」とは、ブレグジット以降イギリスが欧州連合から脱退した後でもイギリスを含むものとします。
   上記の権利についてお問い合わせがある場合、PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com までご連絡ください。
   ６．カリフォルニア州のプライバシーポリシー
   +
   カリフォルニア州住民は、カリフォルニア州の民法1798.83
   及び1798.84号により、アウトブレインに、アウトブレインがダイレクトマーケティングできるように第三者又は関連会社と共有する個人データのカテ
   ゴリーが記載された通知書の発行を求める権利があります。その通知書には共有される情報が特定され、また共有する第三者及び関連会社、その第三者及び関
   連会社の住所が含まれます。お客様がカリフォルニア州住民の場合、この通知書を取得するためには
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.comまでご連絡ください。又は次の住所までご連絡ください。
   Outbrain Inc.
   39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor
   New York, NY 10011
   応答のために30日間かかりますのでご了承ください。
   ７．「Do Not Track」の開示
   +
   ブラウザによって「Do Not Track」（以下「DNT
   」という）の信号が通信されます。アウトブレインは、DNT信号に関して一般的な解読がないため、現在ブラウザからの DNT
   信号に対応していません。アウトブレインは、DNT 信号に関する業界活動を監視し、必要性に応じて DNT 活動を更新します。
   お客様は、アウトブレインがユーザーのところにおいて パーソナルレコメンデーションからオプトアウトすること
   も含む他の提供されるツールを利用してデータ収集及び利用を管理することができます。
   ８．プライバシーポリシーの更新
   +
   アウトブレインはこのプライバシーポリシーを随時更新します。アウトブレインはサイト訪問者又はビジネスパートナーがこれを明確に知ることができるよう
   変更のお知らせをサイト上で表示しますが、ユーザーに対し個別に通知をする方法を有していません。アウトブレインは、お客様ご自身でプライバシーポリシ
   ーの更新を確認するため、このページを定期的に閲覧されるようお願いいたします。プライバシーポリシーの更新日付は、お客様にこのプライバシーポリシー
   がいつ更新されたのかをご確認いただけるように、常にこのページの上において表示されます。

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                 Última atualização: 23 de maio de 2018

   A Outbrain tem o compromisso de proteger seus dados pessoais. Esta
   política de privacidade (“Política de Privacidade”) rege o uso pela
   Outbrain dos dados coletados por nós, incluindo todos e quaisquer dados
   pessoais. Dados pessoais são informações relacionadas a você e que
   podem identificá-lo como indivíduo. Usamos seus dados pessoais
   cumprindo todas as leis aplicáveis. Para garantir a conformidade e o
   alinhamento aos valores da Outbrain de confiança e transparência, temos
   uma equipe de especialistas responsável por implementar continuamente o
   nosso programa global de privacidade.

                                                              + EXPAND ALL

   1. Quem somos, o que fazemos, como contatar a Outbrain, nosso DPO ou as
   autoridades competentes

                                      +

   Quem somos:
   Outbrain representa a Outbrain Inc., empresa de Delaware, EUA com sede
   em Nova York; e suas subsidiárias afiliadas (coletivamente denominadas
   “Outbrain” ou “nós”, “nos”, “nosso(as)”). Operamos a partir de 12
   escritórios globalmente e trabalhamos em parceria com editores de
   conteúdo e marketing do mundo todo.
   O que fazemos:
   A missão da Outbrain é oferecer recomendações interessantes aos seus
   Usuários com base nos seus interesses. Para cumprir nossa missão,
   firmamos acordos com:
     * Produtores e editores de conteúdo on-line e parceiros que desejam
       recomendar conteúdo relevante aos seus leitores (no Outbrain
       Engage); e
     * anunciantes que desejam que leitores visualizem seu conteúdo (no
       Outbrain Amplify).

   Como nos contatar:
   Fazemos verificações regulares de conformidade com base nesta Política
   de Privacidade. Perguntas, comentários e solicitações relacionados a
   esta Política de Privacidade são bem-vindos e devem ser encaminhados a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou via correio a Outbrain Inc., 39 West
   13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, USA, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Caso a Outbrain não forneça resposta satisfatória para suas perguntas
   ou preocupações, também é possível contatar o seguinte departamento
   para orientações, suporte ou reclamações:
     * responsável externa Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) da Outbrain:
       ePrivacy GmbH, representada pelo Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. A
       ePrivacy GmbH pode ser contatada diretamente via
       privacy@eprivacy.eu; e/ou
     * o órgão público britânico Information Commissioner’s Officer, que é
       o principal serviço supervisor da Outbrain nos Territórios
       Europeus.

   Órgãos de autorregulação
   A Outbrain segue os Princípios de Autorregulação definidos pela Digital
   Advertising Alliance (DAA) e pela European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Somos membros conceituados da Network
   Advertising Initiative (NAI), associação dedicada à coleta responsável
   de dados e ao seu uso para publicidade digital. Seguimos o Code of
   Conduct for Web and Mobile (Código de Conduta para Web e Internet
   Móvel) da NAI. A Outbrain também segue os Self-Regulatory Principles
   for Online Behavioral Advertising (Princípios de Autorregulação para
   Publicidade Comportamental On-line) e o Europe OBA Framework do
   Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB).
   2. Tipos de usuários da Outbrain

                                      +

   Parte desta Política de Privacidade está dividida em seções baseadas no
   seu modo de interagir com a Outbrain portanto é necessário definir em
   qual tipo de usuário você se encaixa. Para cada tipo de usuário,
   explicamos que tipo de informação coletamos e por que, quais cookies e
   outras tecnologias similares usamos, como compartilhamos essas
   informações e quais são os seus direitos.
   Visitantes do Site: Você é um “Visitante do Site” ao visitar e
   interagir com nossos websites, páginas na web, recursos interativos,
   blogs e seus respectivos conteúdos no Outbrain.com (ou qualquer página
   derivada, como Outbrain.co.uk; Outbrain.fr; Outbrain.de, etc.) e no
   MyOutbrain.com (“Nossos Sites“). Veja mais aqui.
   (a)&Tab;Quais informações coletamos e por quê
   Queremos entender quais serviços nos Nossos Sites interessam a você e
   lembrá-lo dos serviços que oferecemos quando você não está nos Nossos
   Sites. Para fazê-lo, coletamos as seguintes informações suas: (i)
   endereço IP; (ii) dados do Agente do Usuário: tipo de dispositivo (ex.:
   iPhone), tipo de navegador (ex.: Chrome), sistema operacional (ex.:
   iOS); (iii) páginas visitadas no Nosso Site (ex.: página “Sobre nós” da
   Outbrain); (iv) horário da visita (e respectivo fuso horário); e (v)
   URLs de encaminhamento e outras informações normalmente transmitidas em
   solicitações HTTP (ex.: essas informações nos dizem como você chegou
   aos Nossos Sites).
   (b)&Tab;Quais cookies e outras tecnologias similares utilizamos
   Consulte esta Tabela de Cookies em “Visitantes do Site” para uma lista
   detalhada dos cookies (e os respectivos períodos de retenção) que
   usamos quando você visita os Nossos Sites.
   (c)&Tab;Como podemos compartilhar informações
     * Compartilhamento de informações que coletamos sobre você nos Nossos
       Sites.

   De maneira geral, não compartilhamos dados pessoais seus com terceiros
   para fins de marketing ou publicidade de terceiros. No entanto,
   recorremos a vários terceiros (todos listados nesta Tabela de Cookies)
   para nos ajudar a vender ou fazer publicidade para você. Por exemplo:
   alguns dos cookies que usamos nos Nossos Sites pertencem a terceiros
   que ajudarão a Outbrain a vender ou fazer publicidade para você.
   Exigimos que esses terceiros e empresas se comprometam a manter
   confidenciais todas as informações compartilhadas com eles e a usar as
   informações somente para cumprir suas obrigações conosco. Fazemos isso
   firmando acordos com todos os terceiros que processam dados pessoais em
   nosso nome para garantir que eles processem seus dados pessoais em
   conformidade com nossas instruções exatas e com todas as leis de
   proteção de dados aplicáveis. Se você publicar em nosso blog, seu
   comentário e suas informações ficarão visíveis publicamente. Entre em
   contato com support@outbrain.com para solicitar a remoção do seu
   comentário.
     * Usando serviços de terceiros nos Nossos Sites.

   Nossos Sites contêm links para outros websites que não operamos nem são
   de nossa propriedade. Não controlamos, recomendamos ou endossamos o
   conteúdo, os produtos, serviços, políticas de privacidade ou práticas
   desses websites de terceiros. Por exemplo: nos Nossos Sites, você
   notará ícones clicáveis que o levam à página da Outbrain no Facebook ou
   no LinkedIn. Ao escolher clicar nesses links, você deve estar ciente de
   que Facebook e LinkedIn podem enviar seus próprios cookies ao seu
   aparelho, que podem coletar dados pessoais de maneira independente. Por
   isso, é importante que você leia as políticas de privacidade do
   Facebook e/ou LinkedIn.
     * Consulte também a seção de Compartilhamento desta Política de
       Privacidade.

   (d)&Tab;Seus direitos
   Os Termos de Uso no Nosso Site regem o uso do Nosso Site e também se
   aplicam a você. Você pode interromper o uso do Nosso Site a qualquer
   momento. Ao fazê-lo, também tem a opção de remover quaisquer cookies
   que tenhamos colocado em qualquer dispositivo usado para acessar o
   Nosso Site. Se você forneceu seu endereço de e-mail durante o uso dos
   Nossos Sites, todos os e-mails que você receber da Outbrain incluirão a
   opção de se “descadastrar”.
   Para Visitantes no Território Europeu, a Outbrain implementou uma
   plataforma de gestão de consentimento (operada pela One Trust) nos
   Nossos Sites que dá aos visitantes a oportunidade de autorizar ou não
   cookies e tecnologias similares de rastreamento nos Nossos Sites. Se
   você não deu seu consentimento (especificamente em “aceitar”), a
   Outbrain não permitirá que Nosso Site instale cookies. A base legal da
   Outbrain para processar dados pessoais em Nossos Sites é o
   consentimento. Você pode retirar seu consentimento a qualquer momento
   aqui.
   Usuários: Você é um “Usuário” ao visitar uma página de um website ou
   aplicativo de um dos parceiros da Outbrain onde o widget da Outbrain
   esteja instalado (“Sites Parceiros”). Por exemplo, ao visitar
   https://news.sky.com/uk, www.spiegel.de ou www.cnn.com, o widget
   Outbrain está implementado nesses sites. Ao interagir com um widget da
   Outbrain, você é informado por um texto que faz referência à Outbrain
   (ex.: “Recomendado pela Outbrain” ou “by Outbrain” ao lado das
   recomendações). Ao clicar no link que faz referência à Outbrain, você
   verá um aviso detalhado que permite acessar o Perfil de Interesse da
   Outbrain, que fornece uma visualização geral dos tipos de categorias de
   dados da Outbrain que podem ser usados para fazer suas recomendações.
   Ele também permite optar por recusar recomendações personalizadas. Veja
   mais aqui.
   Exemplo de widget da Outbrain
   [S1q4BIXJQ.png]
   (a) Quais informações coletamos e por quê
   Usamos UUIDs, endereço IP e outras Informações de Uso para poder lhe
   oferecer recomendações interessantes. As recomendações da Outbrain
   podem ser pagas por um anunciante que redireciona você para um novo
   website ou podem ser orgânicas, com link para outra página no site do
   mesmo anunciante.
     * UUID.

   Quando, como usuário, você visita pela primeira vez um Site Parceiro
   (ex.: CNN.com), a Outbrain instala um cookie no seu dispositivo para
   gerar um UUID (identificador único de usuário). Nós catalogamos e
   analisamos o conteúdo que você consome nos Sites Parceiros. Nossas
   recomendações baseiam-se em: (i) histórico de navegação; (ii) padrões
   de navegação similares de outros Usuários; (ii) recomendações
   geralmente populares entre o público da Outbrain atualmente; (iv) um
   certo grau de aleatoriedade; e (v) requisitos de público-alvo que podem
   ser fornecidos ou solicitados por nossos clientes Amplify. Por exemplo,
   a Outbrain pode saber que o UUID 123 (que poderia ser você no seu
   iPhone X acessando o jornal Guardian usando o Chrome como navegador)
   gosta de ler sobre destinos de férias remotos e que pessoas que gostam
   de ler sobre destinos de férias remotos também gostam de ler sobre
   comida exótica.
   O UUID é uma sequência de números e/ou letras. Esse UUID vincula-se ao
   seu dispositivo e varia conforme o navegador que você usa. Em outras
   palavras, a Outbrain registra um UUID diferente dependendo do aparelho
   e/ou navegador que você está usando ao acessar os Sites Parceiros. Por
   exemplo, isso significa que você terá um UUID quando visitar um Site
   Parceiro a partir do seu celular usando o navegador Safari e outro UUID
   ao visitar um Site Parceiro do seu iPad usando o navegador Safari. A
   Outbrain combinará e consolidará o UUID de um aparelho móvel (celular
   ou tablet) por um navegador que depois acessa um aplicativo (ou
   vice-versa) a partir do mesmo dispositivo.
   Atribuir um UUID permite à Outbrain associar as visualizações das
   páginas visitadas e cliques nas recomendações da Outbrain desse UUID –
   tudo com o objetivo de fornecer recomendações interessantes.
     * Endereço IP e outras Informações de Uso.

   Coletamos um UUID conforme explicado acima e ainda as seguintes
   informações: (i) endereço IP (depois anonimizado com base nos padrões
   do setor); (ii) dados do Agente do Usuário: tipo de dispositivo (ex.:
   iPhone), tipo de navegador (ex.: Chrome), sistema operacional (ex.:
   iOS); (iii) páginas visitadas; (iv) horário da visita; e (v) URLs de
   encaminhamento e outras informações normalmente transmitidas em
   solicitações HTTP.
   As informações estatísticas acima nos fornecem dados de como muitos
   Usuários visitaram determinada página dos nossos Sites Parceiros que
   tem o widget da Outbrain instalado, quanto tempo cada Usuário ficou
   nessa página, o tipo de conteúdo na página em que clicou e como foi seu
   engajamento geral com a página em questão. Essas informações só são
   dados pessoais quando associadas a um UUID.
   (b) Quais cookies e outras tecnologias similares utilizamos
   Consulte esta Tabela de Cookies em “Usuários” para uma lista detalhada
   dos cookies internos que usamos quando você interage com Sites
   Parceiros que tenham a tecnologia Outbrain implementada.
   Ao clicar no link para uma das nossas recomendações, o anunciante
   Amplify que patrocina a recomendação pode instalar cookies no seu
   aparelho via redirecionamentos antes da chegada à página de destino das
   recomendações ou ao chegar à página de destino. Nesses casos, você
   estará sujeito à política de privacidade desse anunciante.
   Além do widget visível em Sites Parceiros da Outbrain, determinados
   anunciantes Outbrain podem implementar o pixel Outbrain nos seus
   websites. O pixel Outbrain determina se o usuário que acessa a página
   na qual o pixel está instalado possui um UUID Outbrain. Se houver um
   UUID associado a esse usuário final, a Outbrain permitirá que
   anunciantes redirecionem sua publicidade a esses UUIDs e/ou fornecerá
   aos anunciantes o número total de UUIDs que acessaram a página em
   questão. Se não houver UUID Outbrain associado ao usuário que visitou a
   página, o pixel Outbrain não coletará nenhuma informação sobre o
   usuário. Encorajamos anunciantes a comunicar o uso do pixel Outbrain
   nos seus próprios websites. A Outbrain não combina informações do pixel
   a perfis UUID.
   Pontos de dados como visualizações de páginas e cliques são vinculados
   a um UUID particular e mantidos por 13 meses. Por exemplo: se o UUID
   123 leu um artigo em 31 de dezembro de 2017, em 1º de fevereiro de 2018
   esse artigo deixará de fazer parte do perfil UUID 123.
   (c) Como podemos compartilhar informações
   A Outbrain não compartilha perfis de Usuário com nenhum terceiro.
   Contudo, podemos compartilhar o UUID com determinados parceiros para
   fins de sincronização de cookies ou com base em requisitos técnicos.
   Consulte também a seção de Compartilhamento desta Política de
   Privacidade.
   (d) Seus direitos
     * Recusa à Outbrain.

   Você pode optar por recusar as recomendações personalizadas da Outbrain
   a qualquer momento. Consulte o Perfil de Interesse da Outbrain para uma
   visualização geral dos dados que a Outbrain conhece a seu respeito e
   pode usar para fazer suas recomendações. O Perfil de Interesse também
   permite optar por recusar recomendações personalizadas (você também
   pode fazer a recusa simplesmente clicando aqui). Note que a recusa nos
   navegadores é feita pelo Perfil de Interesse da Outbrain, mas que a
   recusa de recomendações personalizadas em aplicativos é feita pelas
   configurações do seu dispositivo (veja exemplos de passo a passo no
   Perfil de Interesse).
   IMPORTANTE – mesmo fazendo a recusa à Outbrain:
     * Você ainda verá recomendações da Outbrain. Recusar o rastreamento
       para personalização da Outbrain não significa que você deixará de
       receber recomendações da Outbrain. Em vez disso, significa que as
       recomendações da Outbrain não serão personalizadas. As
       recomendações ainda usarão informações sobre o documento que você
       está visualizando (ou seja, informações contextuais) para lhe
       fornecer recomendações na página em questão.
     * A recusa baseia-se em cookies e é específica para cada
       dispositivo/navegador. Se você navegar na internet em diferentes
       dispositivos e/ou navegadores, você precisará fazer a recusa em
       cada aparelho e/ou navegador para que possamos impedir o
       rastreamento para personalização em todos eles. Pela mesma razão,
       se você comprar um novo dispositivo, mudar de navegador ou excluir
       (ou limpar) o cookie de recusa, será necessário fazer a recusa
       novamente. Recusar o rastreamento para personalização não significa
       bloquear cookies.
     * Para garantir a exclusão do perfil vinculado ao seu UUID, não
       exclua seu cookie de recusa da Outbrain por ao menos 21 dias. Sua
       recusa às recomendações personalizadas da Outbrain entra em vigor
       imediatamente. No entanto, se o seu navegador permite armazenamento
       local e você aceitar novamente as recomendações personalizadas da
       Outbrain dentro de 21 dias após sua recusa, é possível que seu
       perfil anterior seja revinculado ao seu UUID. Se você não fizer
       nova aceitação dentro de 21 dias, seu perfil será excluído e não
       poderá ser recuperado.
     * Como acontece na maioria das recusas, a recusa à Outbrain no
       navegador é feita usando um cookie. O cookie de recusa é feito para
       ser mantido, a fim de cumprir as preferências do usuário. No
       entanto, o recurso de “Prevenção de Rastreamento Inteligente” do
       Safari no iOS 11 pode impactar na persistência dos cookies entre
       websites após uma janela de 24 horas. Sugerimos usar outro
       navegador ou bloquear todos os cookies de terceiros do navegador
       para que você faça a recusa sem precisar depender de nenhuma
       metodologia de recusa de nenhuma empresa.
     * Opções adicionais de recusa.

   Você também pode optar por recusar receber anúncios personalizados
   oferecidos por nós ou outras empresas de publicidade usando ferramentas
   de entidades do setor, como as páginas da NAI ou as diversas páginas
   baseadas na DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
   www.youradchoices.ca/choices e/ou EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
   Visitando as páginas da NAI, DAA, DAAC ou EDAA pró-escolha do
   consumidor permite recusar todos ou alguns dos serviços dos membros
   participantes. Como ocorre na recusa junto à Outbrain, essas recusas
   não significam que você deixará de receber todos os anúncios: eles só
   deixarão de ser sob medida para você. Você pode continuar a receber
   anúncios; por exemplo, com base no website específico que você está
   visualizando (ou seja, anúncios baseados no contexto). E se os seus
   navegadores estiverem configurados para rejeitar cookies quando você
   visitar as páginas pró-escolha do consumidor da DAA, DAAC ou EDAA, a
   recusa também pode não funcionar corretamente.
     * Bases legais.

   Os fundamentos legais da Outbrain para processar dados pessoais de
   Usuários apoiam-se nas bases legais determinadas por cada um dos nossos
   Sites Parceiros. Cada Site Parceiro baseia-se em consentimento ou
   interesse legítimo. Consulte a política de privacidade aplicável dos
   Sites Parceiros para mais informações sobre as bases legais utilizadas.
   Se um Parceiro se basear no seu consentimento, a Outbrain não instalará
   um cookie nos seus aparelhos sem que você tenha dado seu consentimento
   no respectivo Site Parceiro.
   Parceiros Comerciais: Você é um “Parceiro Comercial” ao se cadastrar
   (ou trocar e-mails com a Outbrain) em nome da empresa para a qual
   trabalha para utilizar os serviços Outbrain Amplify ou Outbrain Engage.
   Veja mais aqui.
   (a) Quais informações coletamos e por quê
   Você pode fornecer determinados dados pessoais (como endereço de
   e-mail) ao se inscrever para os serviços Amplify ou Engage ou se
   comunicar ou interagir conosco por outros meios. Se você se inscrever
   para se tornar Parceiro Comercial, podemos solicitar informações
   adicionais suas via formulários de inscrição para anunciante, pedidos
   de inserção e outros meios. Coletamos informações automaticamente sobre
   as ações do seu nome de usuário no painel da Outbrain. Por exemplo, se
   como Parceiro Comercial Amplify você alterar o custo por clique de uma
   de suas campanhas, o registro de auditoria da Outbrain terá o histórico
   de todas essas ações.
   Coletamos e processamos os dados pessoais acima para cumprir nossas
   obrigações nos termos do nosso acordo como Parceiro Comercial (ou
   potencial Parceiro Comercial) seu, inclusive para:
   responder às suas perguntas e solicitações;
   fornecer acesso a determinadas funções e recursos dos nossos serviços
   Amplify ou Engage (ex.: para fornecimento e manutenção da sua conta no
   painel);
   verificar sua identidade;
   nos comunicar com você sobre sua conta, nossos produtos e promoções
   disponíveis relevantes para o seu uso do serviço Amplify ou Engage.
   (b) Quais cookies e outras tecnologias similares utilizamos
   Consulte esta Tabela de Cookies em “Parceiros Comerciais” para uma
   lista detalhada dos cookies (e os respectivos períodos de retenção) que
   usamos com Parceiros Comerciais.
   (c) Como podemos compartilhar informações
   Podemos revelar determinadas informações de Parceiros Comerciais a
   fornecedores, prestadores de serviços ou outros que auxiliem a Outbrain
   na prestação dos seus serviços (ex.: processamento de cartões de
   crédito). Consulte também a seção de Compartilhamento desta Política de
   Privacidade.
   (d) Seus direitos
   Se, como Parceiro Comercial, você deseja verificar, corrigir, atualizar
   ou solicitar desativação das suas informações, você pode acessar o
   painel da Outbrain para editar suas preferências de perfil ou nos
   contatar em support@outbrain.com. Se você está recebendo e-mails da
   Outbrain, você pode se “descadastrar” acessando o link nos e-mails.
   Observe que o descadastramento pode não desativar o recebimento de
   notificações importantes para o fornecimento dos serviços Amplify ou
   Engage (ex.: faturas por e-mail).
   A base legal da Outbrain para processar dados pessoais dos Parceiros
   Comerciais é o seu interesse legítimo.
   3. Como mantemos a segurança das informações, transferências fora do
   EEE, compartilhamento e períodos de retenção

                                      +

   Segurança
   A Outbrain possui uma equipe de segurança dedicada. Mantemos rigorosos
   controles sobre os dados que coletamos, mantendo-os em bancos de dados
   protegidos com firewall e permissões de acesso estritamente limitadas e
   controladas, para garantir sua segurança. Verifique nossos padrões de
   segurança para mais informações.
   Parceiros Comerciais têm acesso a certos recursos protegidos por senha
   dos serviços Amplify ou Engage. Eles são responsáveis por manter sua
   senha confidencial. Lembre-se que, infelizmente, a transmissão de
   informações via internet não é totalmente segura. Um tipo de fraude
   comum na internet é conhecido como spoofing ou phishing. Ele ocorre
   quando você recebe um e-mail de uma fonte que parece legítima
   solicitando dados pessoais seus. Tenha em mente que não lhe mandaremos
   nenhum e-mail solicitando a verificação de cartão de crédito,
   informações bancárias ou quaisquer outros dados pessoais. Se você vier
   a receber um e-mail que pareça ser nosso solicitando essas informações
   suas, não responda e não clique em nenhum link constante no e-mail. Em
   vez disso, pedimos que nos encaminhe o e-mail para legal@outbrain.com
   para que possamos investigar possíveis casos de fraude pela internet.
   Transferências de dados fora da UE/do EEE
   Quando transferimos dados pessoais do Espaço Econômico Europeu a outros
   países nos quais as leis aplicáveis não oferecem o mesmo nível de
   proteção à privacidade dos dados que nos Territórios Europeus, tomamos
   medidas para fornecer um nível adequado de proteção à privacidade dos
   dados. Em outras palavras, seus direitos e proteções são conservados
   com seus dados. Por exemplo: usamos cláusulas contratuais aprovadas e
   outras medidas criadas para garantir que os receptores dos seus dados
   pessoais os protejam.
   Compartilhamento
   Adicionalmente à descrição de como podemos revelar seus dados pessoais
   para cada tipo de usuário, também podemos divulgar dados pessoais nos
   seguintes casos:
     * Dentro do grupo de empresas controladas pela Outbrain, por razões
       internas, principalmente para fins comerciais e operacionais;
     * Se passarmos por uma transição comercial, como uma fusão, aquisição
       por outra empresa ou venda total ou parcial dos nossos ativos, seus
       dados pessoais provavelmente estarão entre os ativos transferidos;
     * Quando legalmente exigido (ex.: para cooperar com investigações
       para aplicação da lei ou outros procedimentos legais); e/ou
     * Para reagir a emergências reais.

   Adicionalmente, combinamos seus dados pessoais aos dos outros usuários
   para compartilhar informações sobre tendências e reunir estatísticas de
   usuários com terceiros, sempre de forma agregada e anonimizada.
   Retenção de dados
   O período de retenção para cada um dos cookies usados pela Outbrain
   (seja por ela mesma ou em nosso nome por terceiros) está descrito na
   Tabela de Cookies.
   A Outbrain também mantém uma Política de Retenção de Dados que detalha
   o período de retenção de dados pessoais com base em nossa análise do
   prazo razoável em que é necessário manter cada dado específico para
   fins legais ou comerciais. Quando não precisamos mais dos dados
   pessoais, os excluímos ou destruímos com segurança. Dados agregados,
   que não são capazes de identificar um dispositivo/navegador (ou
   indivíduo) e são usados para fins de relatórios e análise, são mantidos
   enquanto comercialmente necessários.
   4. Crianças

                                      +

   Nenhum dos nossos serviços é destinado a crianças menores de 16 anos.
   Não coletamos deliberadamente dados pessoais de menores de 16 anos de
   idade. Se durante a coleta constatarmos que um Visitante do Site,
   Usuário ou Parceiro Comercial é menor de 16 anos, não usaremos ou
   manteremos seus dados pessoais. Se tomarmos ciência de que
   involuntariamente coletamos dados pessoais de uma criança menor de 16
   anos, tomaremos medidas razoáveis para excluir tais informações dos
   nossos registros. Se você é criança, pedimos que vá brincar no quintal
   em vez de usar ou interagir com a Outbrain!
   5. Cidadãos do Território Europeu

                                      +

   Em conformidade com as leis de privacidade europeias, especialmente com
   o Regulamento Geral de Proteção de Dados da União Europeia (RGPD), a
   Outbrain fornece direitos adicionais específicos a cidadãos dos
   Territórios Europeus, como o direito de acesso, retificação,
   contestação, reclamação, exclusão e bloqueio. Mais especificamente:
     * o direito de perguntar se ou quais dados pessoais estão sendo
       processados por nós e o direito de solicitar que os dados pessoais
       sejam corrigidos ou alterados;
     * em determinadas circunstâncias, o direito de solicitar a exclusão
       de dados pessoais;
     * em determinadas circunstâncias, o direito de exigir restrições no
       processamento de dados pessoais;
     * o direito de cancelar seu consentimento para processamento e uso
       dos seus dados, total ou parcialmente e a qualquer momento, com
       validade para o futuro;
     * o direito de receber seus dados pessoais em formato comum,
       estruturado e mecanicamente legível;
     * o direito de contatar nosso responsável pela proteção dos dados se
       tiver perguntas, comentários, reclamações ou solicitações
       relacionadas à nossa declaração sobre proteção de dados e o
       processamento dos seus dados pessoais;
     * o direito de reclamar à autoridade supervisora responsável caso
       acredite que o processamento dos seus dados pessoais está violando
       a legislação.

   Além dos itens acima, relacionamos determinados direitos para cdadãos
   do Território Europeu ao longo desta Política de Privacidade. Nos
   termos do RGPD, são considerados “Territórios Europeus” o Espaço
   Econômico Europeu (EEE) e a Suíça. Para os fins desta Política de
   Privacidade, o termo “Territórios Europeus” deve continuar a incluir o
   Reino Unido mesmo após sua retirada do Espaço Econômico Europeu em
   decorrência do Brexit.
   Em caso de perguntas sobre o exercício de quaisquer dos direitos acima,
   envie um e-mail a privacyquestions@outbrain.com.
   6. Direitos de privacidade da Califórnia

                                      +

   Conforme o Código Civil da Califórnia, EUA, nos termos das seções
   1798.83–1798.84, os residentes da Califórnia têm direito de nos
   solicitar uma notificação que descreva quais categorias de informações
   pessoais compartilhamos com terceiros ou afiliados corporativos para os
   fins de marketing direto desses terceiros ou afiliados corporativos.
   Essa notificação identificará as categorias de informações
   compartilhadas e incluirá uma lista dos terceiros e afiliados com os
   quais foram compartilhadas, junto com os respectivos nomes e endereços.
   Se você é residente da Califórnia e gostaria de receber uma cópia dessa
   notificação, envie sua solicitação por escrito a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou ao seguinte endereço: Outbrain Inc.,
   39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, USA. Pedimos que
   aguarde 30 dias para a resposta.
   7. Comunicazione antitracciamento (“Do Not Track”)

                                      +

   Alguns navegadores transmitem sinais Do Not Track (DNT), ou Não
   Rastrear, aos websites. Como não há consenso sobre como interpretar o
   sinal DNT, a Outbrain atualmente não altera, modifica ou responde a
   solicitações ou sinais DNT desses navegadores. Continuaremos a
   monitorar a atuação do setor nesse âmbito e reavaliaremos nossas
   práticas relacionadas a DNT se necessário. Enquanto isso, você pode
   utilizar as várias outras ferramentas que fornecemos para controlar a
   coleta e o uso de dados, incluindo a possibilidade de optar por recusar
   o recebimento de recomendações personalizadas na seção Usuários.
   8. Como esta Política de Privacidade pode mudar

                                      +

   De tempos em tempos, podemos fazer alterações nesta Política de
   Privacidade. Nesse caso, colocaremos um aviso em destaque, visível para
   você como Visitante do Site ou Parceiro Comercial. Contudo, não temos
   meios para alertar Usuários sobre atualizações. Recomendamos que você
   verifique aqui periodicamente se a Política de Privacidade foi
   atualizada. Sempre exibiremos a data da última alteração da Política de
   Privacidade no topo da página, para que você saiba a última vez em que
   foi revisada.

Cookies

Version 4.4

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   OUTBRAIN'S COOKIE TABLE
   This Cookie Table provides you with information about the cookies and
   other similar technologies Outbrain and/or its partners may use, their
   purpose and the retention period associated with such cookie. Where a
   third party partner drops a cookie, they determine the purpose for
   which that cookie is dropped and the relevant retention period.
   We may place cookies or similar files such as pixel tags and web
   beacons on the devices you use to engage with Outbrain for security
   purposes, to facilitate site navigation and to personalize your
   experience when you engage with Outbrain as a Site Vistior, a User or a
   Business Partner. Cookies allow us to collect technical and
   navigational information, such as browser type, time spent by you
   engaging with Outbrain and pages visited. Please read the Privacy
   Policy to further understand how we use data collected by these
   cookies.
   For even more information about cookies, we recommend visiting:
   https://cookies.insites.com/about-cookies/
   Users
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same page
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Site Visitors
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Unbounce

     Ubvt

     Ubvs

     ubpv
   These cookies are associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.

     3 days

     3 days

     5 months
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It is variation of the _gat cookie
   which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by Google on high
   traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Google Univesral Analytics
     * _ga
     * _gid

     This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports.

     This cookie is associated with Google Universal Analytics. No
   information is available from Google however, it appears to store and
   update a unique value for each page visited.
     * 2 years
     * a day

   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar. It uniquely identifies a visitor during a single browser
   session and indicates they are included in an audience sample.
   Session
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Piwik
     * _pk_id*
     * _pk_ses*

   These cookies are set by Piwiki and are used to help website owners
   track visitor behaviour and measure site performance. They are a
   pattern type cookie, where the prefix is followed by a short series of
   numbers and letters, which is believed to be a reference code for the
   domain setting the cookie.
     * 1 year
     * 24 minutes

   Kissmetrics

     km_lv

     km_uq

     km_ai
   These cookies are set by Kissmetrics analytics service. They are used
   to provide site owners with information about how visitors use the
   site.
   5 years
   Bing
     * MUIDB
     * MUID

   This domain is owned by Mircosoft - it is the site for the search
   engine Bing.
   a year
   JSESSIONID
   This domain is controlled by New Relic, which provides a platform for
   monitoring the performance of web and mobile applications.
   Session
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   obuid
   This cookie is used to hold an anonymous user's ID. IT is used for
   tracking user actions.
   3 months
   c
   This domain is owned by IPONWEB and is used to provide a real time
   bidding platform for online advertising.
   1 year
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   1 year
   TheTradeDesk
     * TDID
     * TDCPM

   This domain is owned by TheTradeDesk. The main business activity is: Ad
   Serving Platform
   1 year
   _uv_id
   This domain is owned by LinkedIn. It is used to provide services for
   embedding slide presentations into websites. Information collected via
   cookies on this domain can also be used for targeted advertising
   purposes.
   2 years
   YouTube
     * HSID
     * Demographics
     * VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
     * PREF
     * LOGIN_INFO
     * GPS
     * YSC

   YouTube collects user data through videos embedded in websites, which
   is aggregated with profile data from other Google services in order to
   display targeted advertising to web visitors. These cookies are:
     * Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user
       account and most recent login time
     * Used for demographic profiling and targeting for advertising
     * This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of
       videos
     * Stores user preference, can be used to personalise ads on google
       searches
     * Used for targeted advertising to web visitors across a broad range
       of their own and other websites.

     1 year

     1 year

     1 month

     5 years

     2 years

     a month

     Session
   Linkedin
     * BizoID
     * Lidc
     * __utmv
     * __utmz
     * __utmb
     * __utmt
     * Bcookie
     * Lang
     * __utma
     * SERVERID
     * language
     * bscookie__qca
     * __qca
     * __utmc
     * UserMatchHistory
     * visit

   These cookies are associated with Linkedin It typically acts as a third
   party host where website owners have placed one of its content sharing
   buttons in their pages, although its content and services can be
   embedded in other ways. Although such buttons add functionality to the
   website they are on, cookies are set regardless of whether or not the
   visitor has an active Linkedin profile, or agreed to their terms and
   conditions. For this reason it is classified as a primarily
   tracking/targeting domain.

     30 days

     1 month

     8 months

     6 months

     21 minutes

     a few seconds

     8 months

     Session

     2 years

     Session

     Session

     8 months

     2 months

     Session

     2 days

     8 months

   Facebook

     datr

     fr

     lu
   These cookies are owned by Facebook:

     It is not directly tied to individual Facebook the user. It is used
   to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially around
   detection of bots trying to access the service. This cookie is also
   read via Like and other Facebook buttons and tags placed on many
   different websites.

     This is used to serve targeted advertising to its users when logged
   into its services. In 2014 it also started serving up behaviourally
   targeted advertising on other websites, similar to most dedicated
   online marketing companies. Contains browser and user unique ID
   combination, used for targeted advertising.

     This is used to serve targeted advertising to its users when logged
   into its services. In 2014 it also started serving up behaviourally
   targeted advertising on other websites, similar to most dedicated
   online marketing companies. Contains browser and user unique ID
   combination, used for targeted advertising

     1 year

     3 months

     1 year
   Twitter
     * auth_token
     * twll
     * secure_session
     * guest_id
     * personalization_id
     * remember_checked
     * remember_checked_on
     * lang

   This domain is owned by Twitter. The main business activity is: Social
   Networking Services. Where twitter acts as a third party host, it
   collects data through a range of plug-ins and integrations, that is
   primarily used for tracking and targeting.

     15 years

     5 years

     15 years

     a year

     2 years

     5 years

     4 years

     session
   Google
     * APISID
     * SSID
     * NID
     * SAPISID

   This cookies are owned by Google Inc. It uses the data gathered from
   most of these services to profile the interests of web users and sell
   advertising space to organisations based on such interest profiles as
   well as aligning adverts to the content on the pages where its
   customer's adverts appear.

     2 years

     8 months

     5 months

     2 years
   AA003
   This domain is owned by Atlas Solutions which is in turn owned by
   Facebook. Atlas is an online advertising business, targeting users
   through tracking their web activity. From September 2014 the company
   re-launched under the ownership of Facebook, promising the ability to
   reach known users and target adverts based on profiles generated using
   Facebook's user data.
   2 months
   u
   This domain is owned by Aggregate Knowledge, which has been acquired by
   Neustar Inc. Aggregate Knowledge provides a data management platform
   which enables real time targeting and consumer profiling functionality.
   a month
   __cfduid
   This domain is owned by AddToAny. The main business activity is: Social
   Sharing Services and Tracking
   1 year
   rlas3
   This domain is owned by Live Ramp Inc, providers of a platform for
   targeted marketing and profiling.
   1 year
   Bluekai
     * bku
     * bkdc
     * bkpa

   This domain is owned by Blue Kai. The main business activity is:
   Advertising/Audience Targeting
   5 months
   d
   This domain is owned by Quantcast. The main business activity is:
   Market and Audience Segmentation, Targeted advertising services
   2 months
   Adobe Audience Manager
     * demdex
     * dpm

   This domain is owned by Adobe - Audience Manager.
   The main business activity is: Online profiling for targeted marketing
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
     * 6 months
     * 5 months

   tuuid_lu
   This domain is owned by IPONWEB and is used to provide a real time
   bidding platform for online advertising.
   1 year
   Amazon
     * ad-id
     * ad-privacy

   This domain is owned by online retailer Amazon and is used as part of
   its affiliate marketing programme.
     * 8 months
     * 8 months

   Doubleclick
     * id
     * IDE

   This domain is owned by Doubleclick (Google). The main business
   activity is: Doubleclick is Googles real time bidding advertising
   exchange
     * 8 months
     * 2 years

   OnAudience
     * cookie
     * done_redirects161

   This domain is owned by OnAudience. The company provides a range of
   marketing and advertising services.
     * a year
     * a month

   uuid2
   This domain is owned by AppNexus Inc. The company provides a range of
   online advertising technology and services.
   2 months
   pxcr
   This domain is owned by Live Ramp Inc, providers of a platform for
   targeted marketing and profiling.
   a month
   MediaMath
     * uuidc
     * uuid

   This domain is owned by MediaMath Inc. a US based digital advertising
   business.
   a year
   comScore
     * UID
     * UIDR

   This domain is owned by ScorecardResearch (comScore). The main business
   activity is: Advertising. The cookies in this domain have lifespans of
   2 years.
     * a month
     * 2 years

   ruds
   This domain is owned by Rocketfuel. The main business activity is:
   Advertising
   Session
   ab
   This domain is owned by Aggregate Knowledge, which has been acquired by
   Neustar Inc. Aggregate Knowledge provides a data management platform
   which enables real time targeting and consumer profiling functionality.
   Session
   ATN
   This domain is owned by Atlas Solutions which is in turn owned by
   Facebook. Atlas is an online advertising business, targeting users
   through tracking their web activity. From September 2014 the company
   re-launched under the ownership of Facebook, promising the ability to
   reach known users and target adverts based on profiles generated using
   Facebook's user data.
   2 years
   uvc
   This domain is owned by AddToAny. The main business activity is: Social
   Sharing Services and Tracking
   a month
   custom_data
   This domain is owned by BidSwitch. The company provides a range of
   marketing and advertising services.
   10+ years
   eud
   This domain is owned by Rocketfuel. The main business activity is:
   Advertising
   a year
   EE
   This domain is owned by Exelate. The main business activity is:
   Advertising Data Aggregation
   3 months
   _kuid_
   This domain is owned by Krux Digital, a US company providing a data
   management platform which enables real time profiling of visitor
   interests.
   5 months
   pi
   This domain appears to be connected to a company called Bombora, a USA
   based audience targeting and intelligence business.
   a year
   uid
   This domain is owned by Adform. The main business activity is: Real
   time bidding for display advertising to targeted audiences.
   a month
   ud
   This domain is owned by Exelate. The main business activity is:
   Advertising Data Aggregation
   3 months
   tuuid
   This domain is owned by IPONWEB and is used to provide a real time
   bidding platform for online advertising.
   a year
   Quantcast
     * mc
     * d

   This domain is owned by Quantcast. The main business activity is:
   Market and Audience Segmentation, Targeted advertising services
   2 months
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   recs_xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
   This is a pattern type cookie with the root being recs_ and the rest of
   the name being a unique, 32-length alphanumeric string. This cookie is
   used to store recommended documents so that the same document isn't
   recommended twice.
   1 minute or refresh
   ___distillery
   This cookie may be set by the website itself, or by Wistia, to support
   video functionality that may be found throughot the website. In
   addition to keeping track of the website visitor's position in a video
   should playback be interrupted, this cookie also notes user behavior
   regarding the video itself.
   1 year
   Vimeo
     * player
     * vuid

   This domain is owned by Vimeo. The main business activity is: Video
   Hosting/Sharing
     * 1 year
     * 2 years

   Business Partners
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Outbrains Cookie-Tabelle
   In dieser Cookie-Tabelle erhalten Sie verständliche und umfassende
   Informationen über die Cookies und ähnliche Technologien, die wir
   verwenden.
   Gegebenenfalls setzen wir auf den Geräten, die Sie zur Interaktion mit
   Outbrain verwenden, Cookies oder ähnliche Dateien wie Pixel-Tags und
   Web-Beacons, und zwar aus Sicherheitsgründen, zur leichteren
   Website-Navigation und zur Personalisierung Ihrer Erfahrung bei der
   Interaktion mit Outbrain als Websitebesucher, Nutzer oder
   Geschäftspartner. Cookies ermöglichen uns, technische oder für die
   Navigation erforderliche Informationen zu erfassen, beispielsweise
   Browsertyp, die Zeit, die Sie mit der Interaktion mit Outbrain
   verbracht haben, oder die besuchten Seiten. Bitte lesen Sie die
   Datenschutzbestimmungen, damit Sie genauer verstehen, wie wir Daten
   verwenden.
   Nutzer
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Websitebesucher
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Geschäftspartner
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Tabla de cookies de Outbrain
   La presente Tabla de cookies te facilita información clara y completa
   sobre las cookies y otras tecnologías similares que utilizamos.
   Es posible que introduzcamos cookies o archivos similares, como
   etiquetas de píxel y balizas web (web beacons), en los dispositivos que
   utilices para interactuar con Outbrain por motivos de seguridad, para
   facilitar la navegación por el sitio y para personalizar tu experiencia
   cuando interactúes con Outbrain como Visitante del Sitio, Usuario o
   Socio comercial. Las cookies nos permiten recopilar información técnica
   y de navegación, como el tipo de navegador, el tiempo que interactúas
   con Outbrain y las páginas visitadas. Por favor, lee la Política de
   privacidad para entender mejor cómo utilizamos los datos.
   Utenti
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visitantes del sitio
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Socios comerciales
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Table des cookies d’Outbrain
   Cette Table des cookies vous donne des informations claires et
   détaillées sur les cookies et autres technologies similaires que nous
   utilisons.
   Nous sommes susceptibles de déposer des cookies ou autres fichiers
   similaires comme des balises pixel ou des balises Web sur les appareils
   que vous utilisez en lien avec Outbrain pour des raisons de sécurité,
   pour faciliter la navigation dans le site, ou personnaliser votre
   expérience quand vous interagissez avec Outbrain en tant que Visiteur
   du Site, Utilisateur ou Partenaire commercial. Les cookies nous
   permettent de collecter des données techniques et de navigation, comme
   le type de navigateur, le temps passé à interagir avec Outbrain et les
   pages visitées. Veuillez lire la Politique de confidentialité pour
   mieux comprendre comment nous utilisons les cookies suivants.
   Utilisateurs
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visiteurs du site
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Partenaires commerciaux
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Tabella dei cookie di Outbrain
   La presente tabella dei cookie fornisce informazioni chiare complete
   sui cookie e su altre tecnologie simili che utilizziamo.
   Possiamo installare cookie o file analoghi quali pixel tag e web beacon
   sui dispositivi che utilizzi per interagire con Outbrain per finalità
   di sicurezza, per facilitare la navigazione sul sito e per
   personalizzare la tua esperienza quando interagisci con Outbrain in
   veste di Visitatore del sito, Utente o Partner commerciale. I cookie ci
   consentono di raccogliere informazioni tecniche e sulla navigazione,
   quali il tipo di browser, il tempo che hai trascorso interagendo con
   Outbrain e le pagine visitate. Si raccomanda di leggere la politica
   sulla privacy per capire meglio come utilizziamo i dati.
   Utenti
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visitatori del sito
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Partner commerciali
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   TABELA DE COOKIES DA OUTBRAIN
   Esta tabela de cookies fornece informações claras e completas sobre os
   cookies e outras tecnologias similares usadas por nós.
   Podemos instalar cookies ou arquivos similares como pixel tags ou web
   beacons nos aparelhos que você usa para interagir com a Outbrain, por
   fins de segurança, para facilitar a navegação no site e para
   personalizar sua experiência ao interagir com a Outbrain como Visitante
   do Site, Usuário ou Parceiro Comercial. Cookies nos permitem coletar
   informações técnicas e relacionadas à navegação, como tipo de
   navegador, tempo gasto por você na interação com a Outbrain e páginas
   visitadas. Leia a Política de Privacidade para compreender melhor como
   usamos os dados.
   Usuários
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visitantes do Site
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Parceiros Comercials
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

   Interest-Based Ads (and Opt-Out Preferences)Advertising
   GuidelinesPrivacy PolicySecurityPatentsTerms of Use

   Copyright © 2019 Outbrain Inc. All rights reserved.
   Outbrain is a trademark of Outbrain Inc. - IMPRESSUM
     __________________________________________________________________

   Legal Center powered by PactSafe

   Copyright © 2019, Outbrain Inc.
[outbrain-logo.png] Legal Center

   Error

Contracts

     * Engage Terms
     * Privacy Policy
     * Engage Terms
     * Amplify Terms
     * Amplify Terms
     * Cookies
     * Amplify Terms
     * Amplify Terms
     * Engage Terms
     * Engage Terms
     * 3rd Party Targeting Terms
     * Impressum & Nutzungsbedingungen
     * Outbrain Terms of Use
     * LiveRamp Terms
     * Outbrain Health Segment
     * Gambling Terms (United States)
     * Gambling Terms (United Kingdom Only)
     * LiveRamp Terms
     * Data Processing Agreement

   [English (United States)  ]

          Engage Terms
          Amplify Terms
          Terms of Use

Engage Terms

Version 2.4

Effective September 16, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   The following standard partner distribution terms (“Terms”) govern the
   implementation and use of the products, services, and technology made
   available by Outbrain to the Partner identified in a Partner Enrollment
   Form. To the extent that Partner has not yet signed a Partner
   Enrollment form (1) references to “the Agreement” shall be to the Terms
   and (2) these Terms permit the use of the Technology, but no payment
   shall accrue or be made to Partner until such Partner Enrollment Form
   is signed by both Outbrain and Partner.
    1. CERTAIN DEFINITIONS
         1. "Advertiser Recs" means Recommendations (that are not
            Recirculation Recommendations) in the Outbrain network
            submitted by Outbrain’s advertisers.
         2. "Content" means graphical, textual, and/or auditory content
            (which may include text, data, information, photos, images,
            graphics, audio, video or other content).
         3. "Data" means all data collected or generated by Outbrain
            through the Technology, including any reports or other data
            made available to Partner in connection with the Agreement.
         4. "Destination Page" means any webpage or other online location
            that may be accessed by clicking on Recommendations.
         5. "End User" means individual human end users of the Partner
            Site(s).
         6. "Partner Sites" means the web properties, applications or
            platforms identified in the Partner Enrollment Form, together
            with any additional properties on which Partner elects to
            implement the Technology upon prior written approval from
            Outbrain (e-mail will suffice).
         7. "Recirculation Recs" means Recommendations (that are not
            Advertiser Recs) which link to Content on Partner Sites.
         8. "Recommendations" means the display of Content that Outbrain
            delivers to the viewer of a web page, application or platform
            on which the Technology is implemented. For clarity,
            Recommendations may include Advertiser Recs and/or
            Recirculation Recs.
         9. "Revenue" means net revenue generated from Advertiser Recs and
            charged by Outbrain for the display of such Advertiser Recs in
            the Outbrain network.
        10. "Technology" means the Javascript, API, SDK and associated
            protocols provided by Outbrain to Partner that, when
            implemented on Partner Site(s), display one or more
            Recommendation(s) and/or permit users to navigate to
            Destination Pages by clicking on such Recommendations.
    2. TECHNOLOGY; PLACEMENT AND APPEARANCE
         1. Partner shall implement the Technology pursuant to Outbrain’s
            technical instructions, including any implementation guides
            made available by Outbrain, as revised from time to time.
            Outbrain, in its sole discretion, may determine which of
            Outbrain’s available Technology (e.g., JS, API, SDK) shall be
            used in each Partner implementation. Implementations of the
            Technology must appear directly below the main Content on each
            page of the Partner Sites on which the Technology is installed
            or as otherwise mutually agreed in writing (e-mail shall
            suffice).
         2. Partner shall display the Technology in accordance with all
            self-regulatory codes and
            applicable laws and regulations, including with respect to
            disclosing the source or nature of the Recommendations.
            Without limiting the foregoing obligation, Partner agrees to
            comply with Outbrain’s instructions regarding how the
            Technology is to be displayed, labelled or identified.
         3. Outbrain may make updates, modifications or improvements to
            the Technology from time to time in its sole discretion,
            including, but not limited to, adding Ads.txt lines and any
            other similar industry standards from time to time. If
            Outbrain requests Partner to implement any such update,
            Partner will use commercially reasonable efforts to do so
            within thirty (30) days of receipt of same from Outbrain;
            provided, that if Outbrain requests Partner to implement any
            update that Partner reasonably determines would materially and
            adversely affect the performance of the Partner Site(s),
            Partner may elect to cease displaying the Technology on such
            page(s) unless Outbrain either addresses Partner’s concerns to
            its reasonable satisfaction or agrees not to require Partner
            to implement such update.
         4. During the Term, Outbrain shall be Partner's sole and
            exclusive provider of content recommendations, where “content
            recommendations” are one or more links comprised of a headline
            or phrase indicating that an End User will be driven to
            Content (regardless of whether the Destination Page displays
            content, advertorials or advertisements).
         5. Notwithstanding any other provision of the Agreement and
            unless Outbrain provides prior written consent, any
            implementation of the Technology shall include at least one
            (1) link to Advertiser Recs per page (i.e., Partner may not
            use the Technology solely to provide Recirculation Recs).
         6. Outbrain may test changes to the Technology, and based result
            of each testing, Outbrain may make optimisations to the
            Technology if such optimisations may result in increased click
            through rates on Advertiser Recs (as calculated by Outbrain in
            its sole discretion). To the extent that Partner uses the API
            and thus controls any testing, Partner shall comply with such
            testing requests on at least a quarterly basis.
    3. REVENUE & PAYMENT
         1. During the Term, Partner will be paid the percentage of
            Adjusted Gross Revenue indicated on the Partner Enrollment
            Form. Outbrain shall make such payments within a certain
            number of days (as indicated on the Partner Enrollment Form)
            after the end of any calendar month during which Outbrain
            collects Revenue. For the avoidance of doubt, Revenue is net
            of, inter alia, fees for third-party data services integrated
            into Outbrain’s platform, invalid clicks/impressions, and
            advertiser and agency discounts/rebates.
         2. Partner must promptly provide Outbrain completed and accurate
            tax forms and all other similar materials Outbrain requires,
            which may include tax form W-8BEN, W-8BEN-E or W-9 if
            applicable (collectively all such forms and materials, “Tax
            Materials”). Notwithstanding anything set forth to the
            contrary in this Agreement, Outbrain may (a) withhold payments
            owed to Partner hereunder without penalty or late fee until
            Outbrain has received Partner’s Tax Materials, and (b) deduct
            any applicable withholding taxes payable by Outbrain from
            payments owed to Partner by Outbrain hereunder as required by
            law. Once Outbrain has received the Tax Materials, Outbrain
            will use commercially reasonable efforts to pay any amounts
            not paid to Partner pursuant to the foregoing subsection (a)
            as soon as reasonably practicable. All payments to Partner
            shall be subject to withholding for income taxes and similar
            deductions, as required by applicable law.
         3. To ensure proper payment, Partner is responsible for notifying
            Outbrain of accurate contact and payment information. Partner
            is also responsible for any charges assessed by Partner’s bank
            or payment provider. If the amount owed to Partner is less
            than US$50, then the amount owed will be accrued if and until
            the calendar month in which the balance of the payments due to
            Partner exceeds US$50. Any dispute regarding a payment from
            Outbrain must be submitted to Outbrain in writing within
            thirty (30) days of postage or wire transfer date of such
            payment or it shall be deemed waived.
         4. Outbrain may withhold, set off, charge or credit back payments
            to Partner, if Outbrain, in its sole reasonable discretion,
            believes that the performance related to them are fraudulent
            or invalid in nature or if Outbrain was charged or credited
            back by the advertiser. Invalid activity is determined by
            Outbrain in all cases and may include, but is not limited to,
            (i) invalid clicks on or impressions of Advertiser Recs
            generated by any person, bot, automated program or similar
            device, including through any clicks/impressions originating
            from Partner’s IP addresses or computers under Partner’s
            control; (ii) clicks/impressions solicited or generated by
            payment of money, false representation, or requests for End
            Users to click on Advertiser Recs or take other actions; (iii)
            Advertiser Recs served to End Users whose browsers have
            JavaScript disabled; and (iv) clicks/impressions co-mingled
            with a significant amount of the activity described in (i, ii,
            and iii) above.
         5. In addition to Outbrain’s other rights and remedies, Outbrain
            may (i) withhold and offset any payments owed to Partner under
            the Agreement against any fees Partner owes Outbrain under the
            Agreement or any other agreement, and/or (ii) require Partner
            to refund Outbrain within thirty (30) days of any invoice, any
            amounts Outbrain may have overpaid to Partner in prior
            periods. If an Outbrain advertiser whose Advertiser Recs are
            displayed on any Partner Site defaults on payment to Outbrain,
            Outbrain may withhold payment or charge back Partner’s
            account.
    4. PRIVACY
         1. Outbrain and Partner shall each maintain and display on their
            respective websites an easily accessible and discoverable
            privacy notice and/or policy that complies with all applicable
            laws, and with respect to Partner, that discloses usage of
            third-party technology to collect and use data in connection
            with the Partner Sites. Outbrain's privacy policy is available
            at here.
         2. The parties are independent controllers in respect of End User
            data processed via the Partner Site(s) and each party remains
            individually responsible for compliance with relevant data
            protection laws. It is Partner’s (and not Outbrain’s)
            responsibility to comply with all data protection legislation
            in particular, in respect of the placing and use of third
            party cookies, upon which the Technology relies, and the
            capturing of any consent to cookies required to be obtained
            from the relevant End User). Partner acknowledges that
            Outbrain relies on Partner’s lawful basis for processing End
            User data. Accordingly, Partner warrants that: (i) if
            Publisher relies on legitimate interest, it has completed a
            legitimate interest assessment which has considered Outbrain’s
            provision of the Outbrain Service; and (ii) if the Publisher
            relies on consent, the Publisher shall disclose Outbrain to an
            End User via a consent management platform using the IAB
            methodology and pass Outbrain a clear consent or no consent
            signal (i.e., the Publisher must not send Outbrain a null or
            invalid signal via a consent management platform). Regardless
            of the foregoing, the parties shall provide End Users access
            to a user-choice mechanism such as the opt out page(s) of the
            Network Advertising Initiative, the Digital Advertising
            Alliance, the European Digital Advertising Alliance, and/or a
            direct opt out of Outbrain through Outbrain’s privacy policy.
            If an End User has opted out of behavioral advertising through
            a mechanism, alerting Publisher (instead of Outbrain), such as
            device settings, Publisher must not pass Outbrain such End
            User’s advertiser ID or other identifying mechanism. The
            provisions of the Data Processing Agreement shall be
            incorporated into, and form part of, this Agreement.
    5. LICENSE TERMS
         1. During the Term and subject to Partner’s full compliance with
            all of the terms of the Agreement, Outbrain grants Partner a
            limited, non-exclusive, revocable, non-sublicensable,
            non-transferable license to use the Technology to display the
            Recommendations on Partner Sites in the form and format
            provided.
            Outbrain grants Partner, during the Term, a limited,
            worldwide, non-exclusive, royalty-free license to use and
            display Outbrain’s trademarks, service marks and logos
            (collectively, “Outbrain Marks”), as incorporated into the
            Technology, strictly in accordance with Partner’s obligations
            and rights in the Agreement. All goodwill arising out of
            Partner’s use of any of the Outbrain Marks shall inure solely
            to the benefit of Outbrain. Outbrain shall have the right to
            refer to Partner and the Partner Sites in any general listing
            of advertisers or partners (including in marketing and sales
            materials) who have implemented the Technology.
            Notwithstanding the foregoing, each party will request prior
            written consent before issuing a press release regarding the
            Agreement or using the other party’s name on its website other
            than in accordance with the Agreement.
         2. As between the parties: (a) Outbrain retains all right, title
            and interest in and to the Outbrain Marks, Technology, Data,
            and Content displayed on or made available by the Technology
            (excluding any Content from the Partner Sites which shall be
            owned by Partner); and (b) Partner retains all right, title
            and interest in and to the Partner Site(s) including the look
            and feel, excluding the items described in subparagraph (a)
            above, (including without limitation all intellectual property
            rights in them).The licenses granted under the Agreement are
            specifically set forth in the Agreement; there are no implied
            rights. All rights not expressly granted to Partner in the
            Agreement are reserved by Outbrain.
    6. PROHIBITED ACTIVITY
         1. Partner will not: (i) edit, modify, truncate, filter, or
            change the order of Recommendations; (ii) obscure, modify or
            redirect Partner Site users away from a Destination Page, or
            intersperse any Content between the Recommendations and any
            Destination Page; (iii) minimize, remove or otherwise inhibit
            the full and complete display of the Technology; (iv)
            artificially inflate clicks or impressions on Recommendations,
            or encourage or require any person to click on Recommendations
            using incentives or other methods; (v) remove, deface,
            obscure, or alter any notices of intellectual property rights
            included in the Technology; (vi) access, reproduce or use the
            Technology in any manner or for any purpose other than as
            expressly permitted under the Agreement; (vii) modify, adapt,
            translate, prepare derivative works from, decompile, reverse
            engineer, disassemble or otherwise attempt to derive source
            code from the Technology, or attempt to create a substitute or
            similar service or product through use of or access to
            Technology or related proprietary information; (viii) attempt
            to interfere with or disrupt the Technology or attempt to gain
            access to any systems or networks that connect to it other
            than through the Technology as implemented pursuant to the
            Agreement; (ix) copy, cache, distribute, display, alter, or
            otherwise use any Recommendations (or authorize or assist any
            third party to do so) except as such Recommendations are
            provided through the Technology; or (x) use the Technology for
            any purpose not authorized by Outbrain, including for any
            purpose that is inconsistent with the Implementation Guides as
            provided to Partner.
         2. Partner will not deploy the Technology on any properties that
            display adult, obscene, pornographic, defamatory, libelous,
            infringing, abusive, or illegal Content, that promotes hate or
            discrimination, facilitates the sale of firearms or illegal
            drugs, or that participates or encourages participation in,
            illegal activities or is directed at children under of the age
            of 16. Outbrain reserves the right in its sole discretion to
            disable the Technology on any property at any time.
         3. Except as expressly and unambiguously authorized under the
            Agreement, Partner will not copy, rent, lease, sell, transfer,
            assign, sublicense, disassemble, reverse engineer or decompile
            (except to the limited extent expressly authorized by
            applicable statutory law), modify or alter any part of the
            Technology or otherwise use the Technology on behalf of or for
            the benefit of any third party.
    7. REGISTRATION
       Partner is not required to register on the Outbrain website to use
       the Technology. If Partner registers, it will have access to online
       reports and the Outbrain dashboard, which allows Partner to control
       certain settings for the Technology, including certain
       Recommendation functionality. To the extent that Partner registers
       and has access to the Outbrain dashboard, Outbrain may collect
       Partner’s (or individuals who act on behalf of Partner) personally
       identifiable information. Partner will be solely responsible for
       all changes to data made by it, or individuals acting on Partner's
       behalf, through the Outbrain dashboard. Estimates of revenue
       displayed in the Outbrain dashboard are provided solely for the
       Partner’s convenience. Outbrain does not guarantee that these
       estimated amounts displayed during a calendar month, if any, shall
       be precise or definitively due to be paid to Partner as a result of
       the Agreement. Access to Outbrain dashboard shall be solely at the
       discretion of Outbrain and may be discontinued by Outbrain at any
       time.
    8. SUSPENSION OF TECHNOLOGY; TERMINATION
         1. Outbrain may suspend or discontinue all or any aspect of the
            Technology, including its availability, at any time if
            required by exigent circumstances (such as a significant
            security breach, propagation of malware, other viruses to
            users, etc.) or other improper, unlawful, fraudulent or
            misleading circumstances.
         2. Either party may terminate the Agreement at any time in the
            event of a material breach by the other party of any provision
            of the Agreement that remains uncured for seven (7) days after
            the breaching party’s receipt of written notice of the breach.
         3. The Agreement is terminable on fourteen (14) days prior
            written notice unless otherwise stated on the Partner
            Enrollment Form. Upon expiration or termination of the
            Agreement, all rights and obligations of the parties under the
            Agreement will be extinguished, except that Sections 9.6.,
            9.7., 10, 11 and 13 of the Terms will survive termination, as
            well as any other terms of this Agreement which, by their
            nature should survive termination, and continue to bind the
            parties.
    9. LIMITED WARRANTIES; INDEMNITY
         1. Each party represents and warrants to the other that: (i) it
            has all right, power, and authority necessary to enter into
            the Agreement and perform its obligations under it; and (ii)
            it will comply with all applicable laws, regulations and
            orders in its performance of the Agreement.
         2. Outbrain warrants that the Technology (as provided and made
            available by Outbrain and implemented by Partner in accordance
            with the Agreement does not and will not, to the best of
            Outbrain's knowledge, infringe any Intellectual Property Right
            of any third party.
         3. Partner represents and warrants that the Partner Site(s) do
            not and will not contain any Content that is: (i) illegal;
            (ii) infringes any Intellectual Property Right of any third
            party; (iii) is obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous
            material or material that violates any person’s right of
            publicity, privacy or personality; or (iv) knowingly contains
            a misrepresentation of fact or factual inaccuracy.
         4. Nothing in the Agreement shall be construed as a promise of
            any sort of minimum traffic volumes, clicks, impressions or
            usage or any other such commitments by Outbrain to Partner.
         5. Except as expressly provided in the Agreement, neither party
            makes any representations or warranties, express or implied in
            relation to the Agreement, the Partner Sites, the Technology,
            any Content made available by Outbrain through the Technology
            or any other matters (including any implied terms relating to
            satisfactory quality or fitness for any purpose, any
            warranties of availability or uninterrupted or error free
            performance, any warranties arising out of any course of
            performance or dealing).
         6. Outbrain makes no representations or warranties concerning any
            Content contained in or accessed via the Technology, including
            without limitation Advertiser Recs, and Outbrain will not be
            responsible or liable for the contents, accuracy, intellectual
            property infringement, legality or decency of Content provided
            through the Technology or for Partner’s reliance on any of the
            foregoing.
         7. Each party (the “Indemnifying Party”) shall indemnify, defend
            and hold harmless the other party and its parent and
            affiliates, and each of its and their respective affiliates,
            directors, officers, shareholders, members, authorized
            representatives, employees and agents (collectively, the
            “Indemnified Party”) from and against any and all claims,
            losses, liabilities, damages, costs, settlements, regulatory
            findings andor fines and other expenses (including reasonable
            legal fees) (collectively, “Claims”) that arise out of any
            third party claim occasioned by any breach or alleged breach
            of any of the Indemnifying Party’s representations, warranties
            and obligations of the Agreement. The Indemnified Party shall
            promptly notify the Indemnifying Party of any Claim in
            writing, provided, however, that any delay in providing such
            notice shall not relieve the Indemnifying Party of any of its
            obligations except to the extent that the Indemnifying Party
            is actually prejudiced by such delay. The Indemnified Party
            shall have the right to participate in the defense and
            settlement of the Claim with counsel of its own choosing and
            its own expense, subject to the Indemnifying Party’s control
            thereof.
   10. CONFIDENTIALITY
       Each party (the “Receiving Party”) acknowledges that it will have
       access to certain information and materials, including the terms of
       the Agreement, concerning the business, technology, products and
       services of the other party (the “Disclosing Party”) that are, or
       reasonably should be considered given the circumstances of
       disclosure to be, confidential (“Confidential Information”).
       Confidential Information will not include: (a) information known to
       the Receiving Party prior to disclosure by the Disclosing Party;
       (b) information independently developed by the Receiving Party
       without reference to Confidential Information of the Disclosing
       Party; (c) information that is or becomes publicly known through no
       fault of the Receiving Party; or (d) information disclosed to the
       Receiving Party by a third party without breach of any obligation
       of confidence. Except as permitted hereunder, the Receiving Party
       (aa) will not use any Confidential Information for its own account
       or the account of any third party, and (bb) will not disclose any
       Confidential Information to any third party other than its
       directors, employees, contractors, advisors, investors or potential
       investors who have a need to know and who have agreed not to use,
       and to maintain the confidentiality of, the Confidential
       Information consistent with this Section 10. The Receiving Party
       will return or destroy the Confidential Information promptly upon
       the Disclosing Party’s written request. Notwithstanding the
       foregoing, the Receiving Party may disclose Confidential
       Information to the extent required by applicable law or legal
       process, provided that the Receiving Party provides prompt written
       notice of any required disclosure to the Disclosing Party and
       provides reasonable cooperation (at the Disclosing Party’s expense)
       with any effort by the Disclosing Party to contest or limit the
       scope of such disclosure.
   11. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
         1. Neither Outbrain nor the Partner exclude or limit liability to
            the other for: (i) death or personal injury caused by its
            negligence or that of its employees or contractors; (ii) fraud
            or fraudulent misrepresentation; or (iii) any other liability
            which cannot lawfully be excluded or limited.
         2. EXCEPT IN CONNECTION WITH A PARTY’S INDEMNIFICATION
            OBLIGATIONS HEREUNDER, NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE FOR ANY
            SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES ARISING OUT OF OR
            IN CONNECTION WITH THE AGREEMENT OR ANY BREACH HEREOF
            (INCLUDING FOR LOSS OF DATA OR COST OF COVER), WHETHER OR NOT
            SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
            DAMAGES, AND WHETHER UNDER A THEORY OF CONTRACT, TORT
            (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE) OR OTHERWISE.
         3. EXCEPT FOR A PARTY’S INDEMNIFICATION OBLIGATIONS HEREUNDER OR
            LIABILITIES ARISING OUT OF A PARTY’S VIOLATION,
            MISAPPROPRIATION OR INFRINGEMENT OF A PARTY’S INTELLECTUAL
            PROPERTY RIGHTS, IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY’S AGGREGATE
            LIABILITY ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE AGREEMENT
            OR ANY BREACH HEREOF (WHETHER UNDER A THEORY OF CONTRACT, TORT
            (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE), WARRANTY OR OTHERWISE) EXCEED THE
            GREATER OF ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS ($100,000) OR THE
            AMOUNT OF ADJUSTED GROSS REVENUE PAID OR PAYABLE TO THE
            PARTNER IN THE 12-MONTH PERIOD IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE EVENT
            GIVING RISE TO LIABILITY (OR, IN THE CASE OF A SERIES OF
            CONNECTED EVENTS, THE FIRST SUCH EVENT).
   12. EXPORT CONTROLS
       Partner will comply with all export laws and restrictions and
       regulations of the Department of Commerce, the United States
       Department of Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control ("OFAC"),
       or other United States or foreign agency or authority, and shall
       not export, or allow the export or re-export of the Technology in
       violation of any such restrictions, laws or regulations. By
       downloading or using the Technology, Partner agrees to the
       foregoing and represent and warrants that it is not located in,
       under the control of, or a national or resident of any restricted
       country. Partner represents and warrants that none of it, or any
       individual, entity, or organization holding any ownership interest
       or controlling interest in Partner, including any officer or
       director, is an individual, entity, organization with whom any
       United States law, regulation, or executive order prohibits U.S.
       companies and individuals from dealing, including, names appearing
       on the Specially Designated Nationals List.
   13. MISCELLANEOUS
       The Agreement shall be interpreted and construed in accordance with
       and governed by the laws of the State of New York, without regard
       to its conflict of law provisions or the United Nations Conventions
       for the International Sale of Goods. Any action or proceeding
       arising from or relating to the Agreement must be brought in a
       federal court in the Southern District of New York or in state
       court in New York County, New York, and each party irrevocably
       submits to the jurisdiction and venue of any such court in any such
       action or proceeding. The parties agree that irreparable damage
       would occur in the event that any of the provisions of the
       Agreement is not performed in accordance with these specific terms.
       Accordingly, the parties agree that each shall be entitled to
       injunctive relief to prevent breaches of the Agreement and to
       enforce specifically the terms and provisions of the Agreement, in
       addition to any other remedy to which they are entitled at law or
       in equity. The parties are independent contractors, and nothing in
       the Agreement will be construed to create a partnership, joint
       venture, agency or other relationship between the parties. No
       failure or forbearance by a party to enforce any of its rights
       under the Agreement or insist upon performance of the other party’s
       obligations under the Agreement will be deemed a waiver of such
       rights or obligations to any extent, and no waiver by either party
       of any default or breach of the Agreement will constitute a waiver
       of any other or subsequent default or breach. Neither party will be
       liable for any failure to perform due to causes beyond the party's
       reasonable control. The Agreement constitutes the entire agreement
       between the parties concerning its subject matter and supersedes
       all prior or contemporaneous agreements or understandings, written
       or oral, concerning such subject matter. The Partner Enrollment
       Form may be amended, modified or superseded, only by a written
       instrument signed by both parties. The headings in the Agreement
       are for the convenience of reference only and have no legal effect.
       The Agreement may be executed and delivered via electronic
       transmission or another means of complete and accurate
       reproduction, and copies of the Agreement delivered via such means
       will be deemed originals for all purposes. The Agreement may be
       executed in counterparts, each of which will be deemed an original,
       but all of which together will constitute one and the same
       instrument. If any provision of the Agreement is held to be
       unenforceable for any reason, such provision shall be reformed only
       to the extent necessary to make it enforceable, failing which, it
       shall be severed from the Agreement and the balance of the
       Agreement shall continue in full force and effect. Neither party
       may assign the Agreement or any of its rights or obligations
       hereunder without the other party’s prior written consent, except
       (i) due to operation of law, merger, reorganization, or as a result
       of an acquisition or change of control, and (ii) by Outbrain to its
       subsidiaries. Subject to the foregoing, the Agreement will be
       binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties and their
       permitted successors and assigns.

Privacy Policy

Version 2.3

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   Last Updated May 24, 2018
   Outbrain is committed to protecting your personal data. This privacy
   policy (“Privacy Policy ”) governs Outbrain’s use of data collected by
   us, including any and all personal data. Personal data is information
   that relates to you and may identify you as an individual. We use your
   personal data in line with all applicable laws. To ensure compliance
   and to align with Outbrain’s values around Trust & Transparency, we
   have a team of privacy champions responsible for continuously
   implementing our global privacy program.
   + EXPAND ALL
   – COLLAPSE ALL
   1. Who we are, What we do, How you can contact Outbrain, our DPO or the
   relevant authorities
   +
   Who we are:
   Outbrain means Outbrain Inc., a Delaware, USA corporation with
   headquarters in New York; and its affiliated subsidiaries
   (collectively, “Outbrain,” or “we“, “us“, “our“). We operate out of 12
   global offices and we partner with publishers and marketers across the
   globe.
   What we do:
   Outbrain’s mission is to serve interesting recommendations to its Users
   based on their interests. To achieve our mission we enter into
   agreements with:
     * online publishers and partners who want to recommend relevant
       content to their readers (this is Outbrain Engage); and
     * advertisers who want readers to view their content (this is
       Outbrain Amplify).

   How to contact us:
   We regularly review our compliance with this Privacy Policy. Questions,
   comments and requests regarding this Privacy Policy are welcomed and
   should be addressed to PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com or by mail to
   Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011,
   Attn: Privacy Questions.
   If Outbrain does not satisfactorily answers your questions or concerns,
   you may also contact the following for advice, support or complaints:
     * Outbrain’s external Data Protection Officer (“DPO”): ePrivacy GmbH,
       represented by Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. ePrivacy GmbH can be
       reached directly at privacy@eprivacy.eu ; and/or
     * the Information Commissioner’s Officer, which is Outbrain’s lead
       supervisory service within the European Territories.

   Self-Regulatory Bodies
   Outbrain adheres to the Self-Regulatory Principles set forth by the
   Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) and the European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). We are members in good standing of the
   Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), an association dedicated to
   responsible data collection and its use for digital advertising. We
   adhere to the NAI Code of Conduct for Web and Mobile. Outbrain also
   adheres to the Interactive Advertising Bureau’s (IAB) Self-Regulatory
   Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising, and the IAB Europe OBA
   Framework.
   2. Outbrain User Types (including Opt Out Options)
   +
   Much of this Privacy Policy is divided into sections based on the way
   you may interact with Outbrain. Please determine what user type you
   are. For each user type we’ve explained what information we collect and
   why, what cookies and other similar technologies we use, how we share
   such information, and your rights.
   Site Visitors: You are a Site Visitor when you visit and interact with
   our web sites, web pages, interactive features, blogs and their
   respective contents at Outbrain.com (or any derivation, such as
   Outbrain.co.uk; Outbrain.fr; outbrain.de etc.) and MyOutbrain.com (“Our
   Sites“). See more here.
   (a) What information we collect and why
   We want to understand what services on Our Sites interest you and we
   want to remind you about the services we offer when you are not on Our
   Sites. To do this, we collect the following information from you: (i)
   IP address; (ii) User Agent data: device type (e.g., iPhone), browser
   type (e.g., Chrome), operating system (e.g., iOS); (iii) the pages
   visited on Our Site (e.g., the Outbrain “About” page); (iv) the time of
   visit (and corresponding timezone); and (v) referring URLs and other
   information normally transmitted in HTTP requests (e.g., this
   information tells us how you arrived on Our Sites).
   (b) What cookies and other similar technologies we use
   Please see this Cookie Table under “Site Visitors” for a detailed list
   of the cookies (and their corresponding retention periods) we use when
   you visit Our Sites.
   (c) How we may share information
     * Sharing Information we learn about you on Our Sites.

   In general, we do not share personal data about you with third parties
   for third party marketing or advertising purposes. However, we use
   various third parties (each listed on this Cookie Table) to help us
   market or advertise to you. For example, some of the cookies we use on
   Our Sites belong to third parties that will help Outbrain market or
   advertise to you. We require that these third parties and companies
   agree to keep all information shared with them confidential and to use
   the information only to perform their obligations to us. We do this by
   entering into agreements with all third parties who process personal
   data on our behalf to ensure that they process your personal data in
   accordance with our strict instructions and all applicable data
   protection laws. If you post on our blog, your comment and information
   will be publicly available. Please contact support@outbrain.com to
   remove your comment.
     * Using Third Party Services on Our Sites.

   Our Sites contain links to other websites that we do not own or
   operate. We do not control, recommend or endorse the content, products,
   services, privacy policies or practices of these third party websites.
   For example, on Our Sites you will notice clickable icons which take
   you to the Outbrain Facebook page or the Outbrain LinkedIn page. If you
   choose to click on these links, you should know that Facebook and
   Linkedin may send their own cookies to your device and they may
   independently collect personal data. It is therefore important that you
   read the Facebook and/or LinkedIn privacy policies.
     * Also see the Sharing section of this Privacy Policy.

   (d) Your rights
   The Terms of Use on Our Site govern the use of Our Site and also apply
   to you. You can stop using Our Site at any time. If you do, you may
   also want to remove any cookies that we have placed on any device used
   to access Our Site. If during your use of Our Sites you provided your
   email address, any email you receive from Outbrain includes an
   “unsubscribe” option.
   For European Territory Visitors, Outbrain has implemented a consent
   management platform (powered by One Trust) on Our Sites that provide
   visitors the opportunity to consent, or not consent, to cookies and
   similar tracking technologies on Our Sites. Upon accessing Our Sites,
   you will see a banner on the bottom of the page with information about
   the cookies we use. You may click the banner to reject any cookies that
   are not strictly necessary. Pressing “accept” on the banner or
   scrolling/clicking on Our Sites is an indication of your acceptance.
   Accordingly, Outbrain’s lawful basis for processing personal data on
   Our Sites is consent. You may withdraw your consent at any time here.
   Users: You are an User when you visit a page of a website or
   application of one of Outbrain’s partners where the Outbrain widget is
   installed (“Partner Sites”). For example, if you visit
   https://news.sky.com/uk, www.spiegel.de or www.cnn.com, the Outbrain
   widget is implemented on those websites. You know you are engaging with
   an Outbrain widget when you see text referencing Outbrain (e.g.,
   “Recommended by Outbrain”, “by Outbrain” near recommendations). If you
   click on the hyperlinked reference to Outbrain you will see a detailed
   notice that enables you to navigate to Outbrain’s Interest Portal,
   which provides a general visualization of the types of Outbrain data
   categories that may be used to make its recommendations. It also gives
   you the ablity to opt out of personalized recommendations. See more
   here.
   Example of an Outbrain Widget.
   Outbrain Example Recommendations
   (a) What information we collect and why
   We use UUIDs, IP Address and other Usage Information so that we can
   serve interesting recommendations. Outbrain’s recommendations may be
   paid for by an advertiser linking you to a new website or they may be
   organic such that the link is to another page on the same publisher’s
   website.
     * UUID.

   When as a User you first visit a Partner Site (e.g., CNN.com), Outbrain
   drops a cookie on your device in order to generate a UUID (a Unique
   User Identifier). We catalog and analyze the content you consume across
   Partner Sites. Our recommendations are based on: (i) browsing history;
   (ii) similar browsing patterns of other Users; (ii) recommendations
   that are generally popular with Outbrain’s audience at this time; (iv)
   some randomness, and (v) targeting requirements that may be provided or
   requested by our Amplify clients. As an example, Outbrain may know that
   UUID 123 (which could be you on your iPhone X on the Guardian using
   Chrome as your browser) likes to read about far away holiday
   destinations and that people who like to read about far away holiday
   destinations also like to read about exotic food.
   The UUID is a sequence of numbers and/or letters. This UUID attaches
   itself to your device and varies depending on which browser you use. In
   other words, Outbrain records a different UUID depending on which
   device and/or which browser you use when accessing the Partner Sites.
   For example, this means that you will have one UUID when you visit a
   Partner Site from your mobile phone using the browser Safari, and a
   different UUID when you visit a Partner Site from your iPad using the
   browser Safari. Outbrain will combine and consolidate a UUID from a
   mobile device (handheld or tablet) from a browser that then accesses an
   application (or vice versa) from the that same device.
   Assigning a UUID allows Outbrain to associate the page views visited
   and clicks on Outbrain’s recommendations from such UUID – all with the
   goal of providing interesting recommendations.
     * IP Address and Other Usage Information.

   We collect a UUID as explained above, we also collect the following
   information from you: (i) IP address; (ii) User Agent data: device type
   (e.g., iphone) , browser type (e.g., chrome), operating system e.g
   iOS); (iii) the pages visited; (iv) the time of visit; and (v)
   referring URLs and other information normally transmitted in HTTP
   requests .
   The above statistical information provides us with information about
   how many Users visited a specific page on our Partner Sites on which
   the Outbrain widget is installed, how long each User stayed on that
   page, the type of content on that page they clicked on and how they
   generally engaged with that page. This information is only personal
   data when it is associated to a UUID.
   (b) What cookies and other similar technologies we use
   Please see this Cookie Table under “Users” for a detailed list of the
   first party cookies we use when you interact with Partner Sites where
   the Outbrain technology is implemented.
   If you click on a link to one of our recommendations, the Amplify
   advertiser sponsoring the recommendation may place cookies on your
   device through redirects prior to arriving on the destination page of
   the recommendations or upon reaching the destination page. In such
   cases you will be subject to that advertiser’s privacy policy.
   In addition to Outbrain’s visible widget on Partner Sites, certain
   Outbrain advertisers may implement the Outbrain pixel on their
   websites. The Outbrain pixel determines whether the user reaching the
   page where the pixel is installed has an Outbrain UUID. If there is a
   UUID associated with such end user, Outbrain allows advertisers to
   retarget those UUIDs and/or provides advertisers with the total number
   of UUIDs that reached such page. If there was no Outbrain UUID on the
   page, the Outbrain pixel does not collect any information about the
   user.
   We encourage advertisers to disclose use of the Outbrain pixel on their
   own websites. Outbrain does not combine pixel information with a UUID’s
   profile.
   Data points such as page views and clicks are connected to a particular
   UUID are retained for 13 months. For example, if UUID 123 read an
   article on December 31, 2017, on February 1, 2018 that article will no
   longer be part of UUID 123’s profile.
   (c) How we may share information
   Outbrain does not share User profiles with any third parties. However,
   we may share the UUID with certain partners for the purpose of cookie
   syncing, or based on technical requirements. Also see the Sharing
   section of this Privacy Policy.
   (d) Your rights
     * Outbrain Opt Out.

   You may opt out of Outbrain’s personalized recommendations at any time.
   Please see Outbrain’s Interest Profile for a general visualization the
   data Outbrain knows about you and may use to make its recommendations.
   The Interest Profile also gives you the ability to opt out of
   personalized recommendations. Note that opting out of browsers is
   through the Outbrain Interest Profile , but opting out of personalized
   recommendations in applications is through the settings on your device
   (examples of steps are in the Interest Profile ).
   IMPORTANT – even though you have opted out of Outbrain:
     * You will still see Outbrain recommendations. Opting out of Outbrain
       personalization tracking does not mean you will no longer receive
       recommendations from Outbrain. Instead, it means that Outbrain’s
       recommendations will not be personalized. The recommendations will
       still use information about the document you are viewing (i.e.,
       contextual information) to provide you recommendations on that
       page.
     * The opt out is cookie based and device/browser specific. If you
       browse the web from several devices and/or browsers, you will need
       to opt out from each device and/or browser to ensure that we
       prevent personalization tracking on all of them. For the same
       reason, if you buy a new device, change browsers or delete (or
       clear) the opt out cookie, you will need to opt-out again. Opting
       out of personalization tracking is not the same as blocking
       cookies.
     * To ensure deletion of the profile tied to your UUID, do not opt in
       to Outbrain for at least 21 days. Your opt out from Outbrain’s
       personalized recommendations is effective immediately. However, if
       your browser permits local storage and you opt into Outbrain’s
       personalized recommendations within 21 days of your opt out, it is
       possible your prior profile will be reconnected to your UUID. If
       you do not opt in within 21 days, your profile will be deleted and
       cannot be recovered.
     * As with most opt out cookies, the Outbrain browser opt out relies
       upon a cookie. The opt-out cookie is intended to be persistent to
       honor the user’s preferences. However, the "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention" feature in iOS11 may impact the persistence of cookies
       across websites post a 24 hour window. We suggest using another
       browser or considering blocking all 3rd party cookies from the
       browser so that you are "opted out" without needing to rely on any
       company's actual opt out methodology.

     * Additional Opt-Out Options.

   You may also opt out of receiving personalized ads served by us or
   other advertising companies through industry powered tools such as the
   NAI or the various DAA-based pages (DAA,
   http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC, www.youradchoices.ca/choices ,
   and/or EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu) . Visiting the NAI, DAA, DAAC, or
   EDAA consumer choice pages allows you to opt out of all some or all of
   the participating members’ services. Like Outbrain’s opt out, these opt
   outs do not mean you will no longer receive any advertising – the
   advertisements will just not be tailored to you. You may continue to
   receive advertisements, for example, based on the particular website
   that you are viewing (i.e., contextually based ads). Also, if your
   browsers are configured to reject cookies when you visit the DAA, DAAC
   or EDAA consumer choice pages, your opt out may not be effective.
   • Lawful Basis. Outbrain’s lawful basis for processing a User’s
   personal data is based on the lawful basis determined by each of our
   Partner Sites. Each Partner Site will rely on consent or legitimate
   interest. Please consult the applicable Partner Sites’ privacy policy
   for more information about their lawful basis. If a Partner is relying
   on consent, Outbrain will not drop a cookie on you if you have not
   provided consent on such Partner Site.
   Business Partners: You are a Business Partner when you register (or
   email with Outbrain) on behalf of the company you work for to use the
   Outbrain Amplify or Outbrain Engage Services. See more here.
   (a) What information we collect and why
   You may provide certain personal data (such as email address) when you
   sign up for the Amplify or Engage services or otherwise communicate or
   interact with us. If you apply to become a Business Partner, we may
   request additional information from you via advertiser application
   forms, insertion orders and other forms. We automatically collect
   information about your username’s actions in the Outbrain dashboard. As
   an example, as an Amplify Business Partner if you change the
   cost-per-click for one your campaigns, Outbrain’s audit trail will have
   a record of all those actions.
   We collect and process the personal data above in order to perform our
   obligations under our agreement as a Business Partner (or prospective
   Business Partner) with you including to:
     * respond to your questions and requests;
     * to provide you with access to certain functions and features of our
       Amplify or Engage services (e.g., to provide and maintain your
       dashboard account);
     * verify your identity;
     * communicate with you about your account, our products, and
       available promotions relevant to your use of the Amplify or Engage
       service.

   (b) What cookies and other similar technologies we use
   Please see this Cookie Table under “Business Partners” for a detailed
   list of the cookies (and their corresponding retention periods) we use
   with Business Partners.
   (c) How we may share information with anyone
   We may disclose certain Business Partner information to vendors,
   contractors, or others who assist Outbrain in delivering the services
   (e.g., credit card processing). Also see the Sharing section of this
   Privacy Policy.
   (d) Your rights
   If as a Business Partner you wish to verify, correct, update or request
   the deactivation of your information, you may go the to the Outbrain
   dashboard edit your profile preferences or contact us at
   support@outbrain.com. If you are receiving Outbrain emails, you may
   “unsubscribe” using a link in the email. Note unsubscribing shall not
   opt you out notifications critical to providing the Amplify or Engage
   services (e.g., email invoices).
   Outbrain’s lawful basis for processing personal data of Business
   Partners is legitimate interest.
   3. How We Keep Information Safe, Transfers Outside the EEA, Sharing and
   Retention
   +
   Security
   Outbrain has a dedicated security team. We maintain tight controls over
   the personal data we collect, retaining it in firewalled and secured
   databases with strictly limited and controlled access rights, to ensure
   it is secure. Please see our security standards for more information.
   Business Partners have access to certain password-protected features of
   the Amplify or Engage service. They are responsible for keeping this
   password confidential. Please remember that unfortunately, the
   transmission of information via the internet is not completely secure.
   A common Internet scam is known as "spoofing" or "phishing." This
   occurs when you receive an email from what appears to be a legitimate
   source requesting personal data from you. Please be aware that we will
   not send you any emails requesting you to verify credit card, bank
   information, or any other personal data. If you ever receive an email
   that appears to be from us requesting such information from you, do not
   respond to it, and do not click on any links appearing in the email.
   Instead, please forward the email to us at legal@outbrain.com, as we
   will investigate instances of possible Internet fraud.
   Data Transfers Outside the EU/EEA
   When we transfer personal data from the European Economic Area to other
   countries in which applicable laws do not offer the same level of data
   privacy protection as in the European Territories, we take measures to
   provide an appropriate level of data privacy protection. In other
   words, your rights and protections remain with your data. For example,
   we use approved contractual clauses and other measures designed to
   ensure that the recipients of your personal data protect it.
   Sharing
   In addition to the description of how we may disclose your personal
   data for each user type, we may also disclose personal data as follows:
     * Within the family of companies controlled by Outbrain for internal
       reasons, primarily for business and operational purposes;
     * If we go through a business transition, such as a merger,
       acquisition by another company, or sale of all or a portion of our
       assets, your personal data will likely be among the assets
       transferred;
     * When legally required to do so (e.g., to cooperate with law
       enforcement investigations or other legal proceedings); and/or
     * To respond to a genuine emergency.

   In addition, we combine your personal data with those of other users in
   order to share trend information and aggregate user statistics with
   third parties, always in aggregated and anonymized form.
   Data Retention
   The retention period for each of the cookies Outbrain uses (whether its
   own or on our behalf by third parties) is stated on the Cookie Table.
   Outbrain also maintains a Data Retention Policy that details the
   retention period for personal data based on our analysis of how long
   the specific data is reasonably required for legal or business
   purposes. When we no longer need personal data, we securely delete or
   destroy it. Aggregated data, which cannot identify a device/browser (or
   individual) and is used for purposes of reporting and analysis, is
   maintained for as long as commercially necessary.
   4. Children
   +
   None of our services are directed to children under 16. We do not
   knowingly collect personal data from anyone under 16 years of age. If
   we determine upon collection that a Site Visitor, a User or a Business
   Partner is under 16, we will not use or maintain his/her personal data.
   If we become aware that we have unknowingly collected personal data
   from a child under the age of 16, we will make reasonable efforts to
   delete such information from our records. If you’re a kid, please go
   play in the yard, don’t use or interact with Outbrain!
   5. European Territory Citizens
   +
   In compliance with European privacy laws, in particular the European
   General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), Outbrain provides specific
   additional rights for citizens of the European Territories such as the
   right to access, rectification, right to object, to complaint, erasure
   and blockage. More specifically:
     * the right to request information about whether and which personal
       data is processed by us, and the right to demand that personal data
       is rectified or amended.
     * under certain circumstances, the right to request that personal
       data should be deleted.
     * under certain circumstances, the right to demand that the
       processing of personal data should be restricted.
     * withdraw your consent to the processing and use of your data
       completely or partially at any time with future application.
     * have the right to obtain your personal data in a common, structured
       and mechanically readable format.
     * contact our data protection officer if there are any questions,
       comments, complaints or requests in connection with our statement
       on data protection and the processing of your personal data.
     * the right to complain to the responsible supervisory authority if
       believed that the processing of your personal data is in violation
       of the legislation.

   In addition to the above, we reference certain rights for European
   Territory citizens throughout this Privacy Policy. Pursuant to the
   GDPR, citizens from "European Territories" mean the European Economic
   Area (EEA) and Switzerland. For the purpose of this Privacy Policy, the
   term "European Territories" shall continue to include the United
   Kingdom, even after the United Kingdom leaves the European Economic
   Area following Brexit.
   Please email PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com with any questions about
   exercising any of the above rights.
   6. California Privacy Rights
   +
   Under California Civil Code sections 1798.83-1798.84, California
   residents are entitled to ask us for a notice describing what
   categories of personal information we share with third parties or
   corporate affiliates for those third parties or corporate affiliates'
   direct marketing purposes. That notice will identify the categories of
   information shared and will include a list of the third parties and
   affiliates with which it was shared, along with their names and
   addresses. If you are a California resident and would like a copy of
   this notice, please submit a written request to
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com or send to the following address:
   Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011.
   Please allow 30 days for a response.
   7. “Do Not Track” Disclosure
   +
   Some browsers transmit Do Not Track (DNT) signals to websites. Because
   there is no common understanding of how to interpret the DNT signal,
   Outbrain does not currently alter, change, or respond to DNT requests
   or signals from these browsers. We will continue to monitor industry
   activity in this area and reassess our DNT practices as necessary. In
   the meantime, you can use the range of other tools we provide to
   control data collection and use, including the ability to opt out of
   receiving personalized recommendations in the Users section.
   8. How This Privacy Policy May Change
   +
   We may change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will place a
   prominent notice that will be visible to you as a Site Visitor or
   Business Partner, but we do not have a means of advising Users of an
   update. You should check back here periodically to see if the Privacy
   Policy has been updated. We will always show the date of the latest
   modification of the Privacy Policy at the top of the page so you can
   tell when it was last revised.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Letzte Aktualisierung: 23. Mai 2018
   Outbrain ist dem Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten verpflichtet.
   Diese Datenschutzbestimmungen („Datenschutzbestimmungen“) gelten für
   die Verwendung durch Outbrain der von uns erfassten Daten,
   einschließlich aller personenbezogenen Daten, durch Outbrain.
   Personenbezogene Daten sind Informationen, die sich auf Sie beziehen
   und Sie persönlich identifizieren können. Wir verwenden Ihre
   personenbezogenen Daten entsprechend den geltenden Gesetzen. Im Sinne
   der Compliance und der Übereinstimmung mit Outbrains Werten rund um
   Vertrauen und Transparenz verfügt Outbrain über ein Team von
   Datenschutz-Champions, die für die kontinuierliche Umsetzung unseres
   weltweit gültigen Maßnahmenkatalogs zum Datenschutz verantwortlich
   sind.

                                                          + ALLE ERWEITERN

                                                 – ALLEX ZUSAMMENBRECHEN

   1. Wer wir sind, Was wir tun, Wie Sie Outbrain kontaktieren können,
   unser Datenschutzbeauftragter oder die zuständigen Behörden

                                      +

   Wer wir sind:
   Outbrain bedeutet Outbrain Inc., ein Unternehmen nach dem Recht von
   Delaware, USA, mit Hauptsitz in New York, und dessen verbundene
   Tochterunternehmen (zusammen bezeichnet als: „Outbrain“ oder „wir“,
   „uns“, „unser“). Wir haben Niederlassungen in zwölf Ländern weltweit
   und arbeiten mit Publishern und Vermarktern auf der ganzen Welt
   zusammen.
   Was wir tun:
   Outbrains Mission ist es, für Nutzer relevante Empfehlungen anhand
   ihrer Interessen bereitzustellen. Zu diesem Zweck schließen wir
   Vereinbarungen mit:
     * Online-Publishern und Partnern, die ihren Lesern relevanten Content
       empfehlen wollen (dabei handelt es sich um Outbrain Engage); und

     * Werbetreibenden, die erreichen wollen, dass Leser ihren Content
       ansehen (hierbei handelt es sich um Outbrain Amplify).

   Wie Sie Kontakt mit uns aufnehmen:
   Unsere Compliance bezüglich dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen überprüfen
   wir regelmäßig. Wir freuen uns über Ihre Fragen, Anmerkungen und
   Anfragen zu diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen. Richten Sie diese bitte an
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oder auf postalischem Weg an Outbrain
   Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, Attn: Privacy
   Questions / Datenschutzanfrage.
   Sollte Outbrain Ihre Fragen oder Anliegen nicht zu Ihrer Zufriedenheit
   beantworten, können Sie sich auch an folgende Ansprechpartner wenden,
   um Rat oder Unterstützung zu erhalten bzw. Beschwerden vorzubringen:
     * Outbrains externen Datenschutzbeauftragten: ePrivacy GmbH,
       vertreten durch Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. Die ePrivacy GmbH können
       Sie direkt erreichen unter privacy@eprivacy.eu und/oder
     * den Information Commissioner’s Officer, die für Outbrain zuständige
       federführende Aufsichtsbehörde in den europäischen Ländern.

   Selbstkontrollgremien
   Outbrain befolgt die im Rahmen der Selbstverpflichtung formulierten
   Grundsätze der Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) und der European
   Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Wir sind
   vollberechtigte Mitglieder der Network Advertising Initiative (NAI),
   eines Verbands, der sich der verantwortungsvollen Erfassung von Daten
   und deren Verwendung in der Digitalwerbung verpflichtet hat. Wir
   befolgen die Verhaltensregeln der NAI für Web- und Mobilwerbung.
   Outbrain befolgt ebenfalls die im Rahmen der Selbstverpflichtung
   formulierten Grundsätze für die verhaltensgesteuerte Online-Werbung des
   Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) sowie die Rahmenbedingungen für
   die verhaltensgesteuerte Online-Werbung des IAB Europe.
   2. Outbrain-Nutzertypen (inklusive Deaktivierung/Opt-Out)

                                      +

   Ein Großteil dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen ist in einzelne Abschnitte
   unterteilt, die sich daran orientieren, wie Sie mit Outbrain
   interagieren. Bitte entscheiden Sie, welcher Nutzertyp Sie sind.
   Entsprechend den einzelnen Nutzertypen erläutern wir, welche
   Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun, welche Cookies und
   andere vergleichbare Technologien wir nutzen, wie wir diese
   Informationen weitergeben und über welche Rechte Sie verfügen.
   Websitebesucher: Sie sind ein Websitebesucher, wenn Sie unsere
   Websites, Internetseiten, interaktiven Funktionen, Blogs und deren
   jeweiligen Content auf Outbrain.com (oder einer darauf basierenden
   Ableitung wie Outbrain.co.uk, Outbrain.fr, Outbrain.de usw.) und
   MyOutbrain.com („unsere Websites“) besuchen und mit diesen
   interagieren. Sehen Sie hier mehr.
   (a) Welche Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun
   Wir möchten wissen, welche Dienstleistungen auf unseren Websites Sie
   interessieren, und Sie an die von uns angebotenen Services erinnern,
   wenn Sie nicht auf unseren Websites sind. Zu diesem Zweck erfassen wird
   folgende Informationen von Ihnen: (i) IP-Adresse; (ii)
   User-Agent-Daten: Gerätetyp (z.B. iPhone), Browsertyp (z.B. Chrome),
   Betriebssystem (z.B. iOS); (iii) die auf unserer Website besuchten
   Seiten (z.B. die Seite „Über Outbrain“); (iv) den Zeitpunkt des Besuchs
   (und die entsprechende Zeitzone); und (v) die verweisenden URLs und
   andere normalerweise bei HTTP-Anfragen übertragenen Informationen (z.B.
   wissen wir durch diese Information, wie Sie auf unsere Websites gelangt
   sind).
   (b) Cookies und andere vergleichbare Technologien, die wir nutzen
   In der Cookie-Tabelle unter „Site Visitors (Websitebesucher)“ erhalten
   Sie eine detaillierte Liste der Cookies (und ihrer jeweiligen
   Speicherfristen), die wir bei Ihrem Besuch unserer Websites verwenden.
   (c) So geben wir unter Umständen Informationen weiter
     * Weitergabe von Informationen, die wir auf unseren Websites von
       Ihnen erhalten.

   Im Allgemeinen geben wir keine personenbezogenen Daten über Sie an
   Dritte für deren Marketing- oder Werbezwecke weiter. Wir nutzen jedoch
   verschiedene Dritte (jeweils in der Cookie-Tabelle aufgeführt) zur
   Unterstützung unserer Marketing- oder Werbetätigkeit Ihnen gegenüber.
   So gehören einige der Cookies, die wir auf unseren Websites verwenden,
   Dritten, die Outbrain bei unserer Marketing- oder Werbetätigkeit Ihnen
   gegenüber unterstützen. Wir verlangen, dass diese Dritten und externen
   Unternehmen einwilligen, sämtliche an sie weitergegebenen Informationen
   vertraulich zu behandeln und nur zur Erfüllung ihrer Pflichten uns
   gegenüber zu verwenden. Zu diesem Zweck schließen wir Vereinbarungen
   mit allen Dritten, die für uns personenbezogene Daten verarbeiten,
   damit gewährleistet ist, dass sie Ihre personenbezogenen Daten in
   Übereinstimmung mit unseren strengen Anweisungen und allen geltenden
   Datenschutzgesetzen verarbeiten. Wenn Sie einen Post auf unserem Blog
   hinterlassen, sind Ihr Kommentar und Ihre Informationen öffentlich
   zugänglich. Bitte wenden Sie sich an support@outbrain.com, um Ihren
   Kommentar zu entfernen.
     * Verwendung von Dienstleistungen Dritter auf unseren Websites.

   Unsere Websites enthalten Links zu anderen Websites, die uns nicht
   gehören und die wir nicht betreiben. Wir kontrollieren, empfehlen oder
   billigen den Content, die Produkte, Dienstleistungen,
   Datenschutzbestimmungen oder -maßnahmen dieser Websites Dritter nicht.
   Auf unseren Websites sehen Sie beispielsweise anklickbare Symbole, über
   die Sie auf die Facebook-Seite von Outbrain oder die LinkedIn-Seite von
   Outbrain gelangen. Sofern Sie entscheiden, diese Links anzuklicken,
   sollten Sie sich dessen bewusst sein, dass Facebook und LinkedIn unter
   Umständen ihre eigenen Cookies auf Ihr Gerät senden und unabhängig
   personenbezogene Daten erfassen. Daher ist es wichtig, dass Sie die
   Datenschutzbestimmungen von Facebook und/oder LinkedIn lesen.
     * Beachten Sie auch den Abschnitt dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen über
       die Weitergabe von Daten.

   (d) Ihre Rechte
   Die Nutzungsbedingungen auf unserer Website regeln die Nutzung unserer
   Website und gelten auch für Sie. Sie können die Nutzung unserer Website
   jederzeit beenden. In diesem Fall können Sie auch die Cookies
   entfernen, die wir auf jedem für den Zugriff auf unsere Website
   verwendeten Gerät gesetzt haben. Falls Sie während Ihrer Nutzung
   unserer Websites Ihre E-Mail-Adresse übermitteln, enthält jede E-Mail,
   die Sie von Outbrain erhalten, eine Option zum Abbestellen des
   E-Mail-Empfangs.
   Für Besucher aus dem europäischen Gebiet hat Outbrain auf unseren
   Websites eine Plattform für das Zustimmungs-Management eingerichtet
   (betrieben durch One Trust), über die Nutzer die Möglichkeit haben,
   ihre Zustimmung zu Cookies und vergleichbaren Trackingtechnologien auf
   unseren Websites zu geben oder zu verweigern. Wenn Sie auf unsere
   Website zugreifen, sehen Sie einen Banner am unteren Ende der Seite,
   das Informationen über die Cookies, die wir einsetzen, enthält. Sie
   können auf das Banner klicken und sämtliche Cookies verweigern, die
   nicht absolut notwendig sind. Der Klick auf "Akzeptieren"/"Accept" auf
   dem Banner oder das Scrollen/Klicken auf unseren Seiten ist ein Zeichen
   Ihres Einverständnisses. Entsprechend basiert Outbrains Rechtmäßigkeit
   der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten auf unseren Websites auf
   Zustimmung. Sie können Ihre Zustimmung jederzeit widerrufen.
   Nutzer: Sie sind ein Nutzer, wenn Sie eine Seite einer Website oder
   Anwendung eines Partners von Outbrain besuchen, auf der das
   Outbrain-Widget installiert ist („Partner-Websites“). Falls Sie
   beispielsweise die Seiten https://news.sky.com/uk, www.spiegel.de oder
   www.cnn.com besuchen, wird das Outbrain-Widget in diese Websites
   eingebunden. Dass Sie mit einem Outbrain-Widget verbunden sind,
   erkennen Sie an dem Text, der auf Outbrain verweist (z.B. „Empfohlen
   von Outbrain“, „von Outbrain“ neben den Empfehlungen). Wenn Sie auf die
   Verlinkung zu Outbrain klicken, sehen Sie einen detaillierten Hinweis ,
   der Ihnen erlaubt, zum Interessenprofil von Outbrain zu navigieren, wo
   Sie eine allgemeine Darstellung der Arten von Datenkategorien finden,
   die Outbrain für die Abgabe seiner Empfehlungen verwendet. Sie haben an
   dieser Stelle auch die Möglichkeit, personalisierte Empfehlungen zu
   deaktivieren. Sehen Sie hier mehr.
   Beispiel eines Outbrain-Widgets
   Outbrain Example Recommendations
   (a) Welche Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun
   Wir verwenden UUIDs, IP-Adressen und andere Nutzungsdaten, damit wir
   Ihnen interessante Empfehlungen unterbreiten können. Outbrains
   Empfehlungen werden unter Umständen von einem Werbetreibenden bezahlt,
   der Sie auf eine neue Website leitet, oder es handelt sich um eigene
   Empfehlungen des Publishers, sodass der Link auf eine andere Seite
   desselben Publishers führt.
     * UUID.

   Wenn Sie als Nutzer erstmalig eine Partner-Website (z.B. CNN.com)
   besuchen, setzt Outbrain zur Erzeugung einer eindeutigen Nutzerkennung,
   UUID (Unique User Identifier), ein Cookie auf Ihrem Gerät. Wir
   katalogisieren und analysieren den Content, den Sie auf
   Partner-Websites konsumieren. Unsere Empfehlungen basieren auf: (i) dem
   Browserverlauf; (ii) ähnlichen Surfmustern anderer Nutzer; (ii)
   Empfehlungen, die bei Outbrains Adressaten zur gegebenen Zeit beliebt
   sind; (iv) einem gewissen Maß an Zufälligkeit und (v)
   Zielanforderungen, die durch unsere Amplify-Kunden bereitgestellt oder
   von ihnen verlangt werden. Beispielsweise weiß Outbrain, dass UUID 123
   (wobei es sich um Sie handeln kann, während Sie mit Ihrem iPhone X und
   dem Chrome-Browser auf der Spiegel-Website surfen) gern Texte über
   ferne Reiseziele liest und dass Personen, die gern von fernen
   Reisezielen lesen, sich auch für Artikel über exotisches Essen
   interessieren.
   Die UUID stellt eine Abfolge von Ziffern und/oder Buchstaben dar. Diese
   UUID ist an Ihr Gerät gebunden und variiert je nach verwendetem
   Browser. Mit anderen Worten: Outbrain erfasst verschiedene UUIDs
   abhängig davon, welches Gerät und/oder welchen Browser Sie für den
   Zugriff auf die Websites des Partners verwenden. Dies bedeutet
   beispielsweise, dass Sie eine UUID haben, wenn Sie eine Partner-Website
   von Ihrem Mobiltelefon aus mit dem Safari-Browser besuchen, und eine
   andere UUID, wenn Sie eine Partner-Website von Ihrem iPad aus mit dem
   Safari-Browser besuchen. Outbrain kombiniert und konsolidiert eine UUID
   von einem Mobilgerät (Handgerät oder Tablet) von einem Browser, der
   dann von demselben Gerät auf eine Anwendung (oder umgekehrt) zugreift.
   Durch die Zuweisung einer UUID kann Outbrain die besuchten Seiten und
   die Klicks auf Outbrains Empfehlungen von dieser UUID kombinieren, was
   alles dem Ziel dient, interessante Empfehlungen bereitzustellen.
     * IP-Adressen und andere Nutzungsdaten.

   Wir erfassen eine UUID wie oben erläutert, und wir erfassen auch die
   folgenden Daten: (i) IP-Adresse (wird nach Industriestandards
   anonymisiert); (ii) User-Agent-Daten: Gerätetyp (z.B. iPhone),
   Browsertyp (z.B. Chrome), Betriebssystem, z.B. iOS); (iii) die
   besuchten Seiten; (iv) den Zeitpunkt des Besuchs und (v) die
   verweisenden URLs und andere normalerweise bei HTTP-Anfragen
   übertragenen Informationen.
   Durch die oben genannten statistischen Daten erhalten wir Informationen
   darüber, wie viele Nutzer eine bestimmte Seite auf unseren
   Partner-Websites, auf denen das Outbrain-Widget installiert ist,
   besucht haben, wie lange jeder Nutzer auf der Seite blieb, die Art des
   Contents auf der Seite, die er angeklickt hat, und wie der Nutzer sich
   auf der Seite allgemein verhalten hat. Diese Informationen sind nur
   dann personenbezogene Daten, wenn sie mit einer UUID verbunden sind.
   (b) Cookies und andere vergleichbare Technologien, die wir nutzen
   Diese Cookie-Tabelle enthält unter „Nutzer“ eine detaillierte Liste der
   Erstanbieter-Cookies, die wir bei Ihrer Interaktion mit
   Partner-Websites, auf denen die Outbrain-Technologie implementiert ist,
   verwenden.
   Wenn Sie auf einen Link zu einer unserer Empfehlungen klicken, setzt
   der Amplify-Werbetreibende, der die Empfehlung finanziert, unter
   Umständen durch Weiterleitungen vor der Ankunft auf der Zielseite der
   Empfehlungen oder bei Erreichen der Zielseite Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät.
   In diesen Fällen gelten für Sie die Datenschutzbestimmungen des
   Werbetreibenden.
   Zusätzlich zu Outbrains sichtbarem Widget auf Partner-Websites
   implementieren bestimmte Outbrain-Werbetreibende gegebenenfalls das
   Outbrain-Pixel auf ihren Websites. Das Outbrain-Pixel ermittelt, ob der
   Nutzer, der auf die Seite mit dem installierten Pixel gelangt, über
   eine Outbrain-UUID verfügt. Falls es eine mit diesem Endnutzer
   verbundene UUID gibt, kann Outbrain den Werbetreibenden erlauben, diese
   UUIDs erneut anzusprechen, und/oder den Werbetreibenden die Gesamtzahl
   der UUIDs, die diese Seite erreicht haben, übermitteln. Sofern es auf
   der Seite keine Outbrain-UUID gab, erfasst das Outbrain-Pixel keine
   Daten über den Nutzer.
   Wir legen Werbetreibenden nahe, die Verwendung des Outbrain-Pixels auf
   ihren eigenen Websites offenzulegen. Outbrain kombiniert keine
   Pixelinformationen mit dem Profil einer UUID.
   Datenpunkte wie Seitenaufrufe und Klicks sind mit einer bestimmten UUID
   verbunden und werden 13 Monate lang gespeichert. Falls beispielsweise
   UUID 123 am 31. Dezember 2017 einen Artikel gelesen hat, ist dieser
   Artikel am 1. Februar 2018 nicht mehr Teil des Profils von UUID 123.
   (c) So geben wir unter Umständen Informationen weiter
   Outbrain leitet keine Nutzerprofile an Dritte weiter. Wir geben jedoch
   unter Umständen die UUID an bestimmte Partner zum Zweck der
   Cookie-Synchronisierung oder aufgrund technischer Anforderungen weiter.
   Beachten Sie bitte auch den Abschnitt dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen
   über die Weitergabe von Daten.
   (d) Ihre Rechte
     * Outbrain-Deaktivierung/Opt-Out. Sie können Outbrains
       personalisierte Empfehlungen jederzeit deaktivieren. In Outbrains
       Interessenprofil finden Sie eine allgemeine Darstellung, welche
       Ihrer Daten Outbrain kennt und gegebenenfalls für Empfehlungen
       nutzt. Über das Interessenprofil haben Sie auch die Möglichkeit,
       personalisierte Empfehlungen zu deaktivieren (Sie können ein
       solches Opt-Out auch hier vornehmen). Bitte beachten Sie, dass die
       Deaktivierung von Browsern über Outbrains Interessenprofil
       stattfindet, die Deaktivierung von personalisierten Empfehlungen in
       Anwendungen jedoch über die Einstellungen in Ihrem Gerät (Beispiele
       für die Schritte erhalten Sie im Interessenprofil).

   WICHTIG – obwohl Sie Outbrain deaktiviert haben:
     * Sie sehen weiterhin Outbrains Empfehlungen. Die Deaktivierung von
       Outbrains Personalisierungsverfolgung bedeutet nicht, dass Sie
       keine weiteren Empfehlungen von Outbrain erhalten. Stattdessen
       bedeutet es, dass Outbrains Empfehlungen nicht mehr personalisiert
       sind. Die Empfehlungen nutzen nach wie vor Informationen über das
       von Ihnen betrachtete Dokument (z.B. Kontextinformationen), um
       Ihnen auf dieser Seite Empfehlungen zu unterbreiten.

     * Die Deaktivierung basiert auf Cookies und ist spezifisch für das
       Gerät/den Browser. Sofern Sie im Web von verschiedenen Geräten
       und/oder Browsern aus surfen, müssen Sie eine Deaktivierung von
       jedem Gerät und/oder Browser aus vornehmen, damit dafür gesorgt
       ist, dass wir auf allen die Personalisierungsverfolgung verhindern.
       Aus demselben Grund müssen Sie, wenn Sie ein neues Gerät kaufen,
       den Browser wechseln oder das Deaktivierungs-Cookie löschen, eine
       erneute Deaktivierung vornehmen. Die Deaktivierung der
       Personalisierungsverfolgung ist nicht dasselbe wie die Blockierung
       von Cookies.

     * Um die Löschung des mit Ihrer UUID verbundenen Profils
       sicherzustellen, sollten Sie Outbrain über mindestens 21 Tage nicht
       aktivieren. Ihre Deaktivierung der personalisierten Empfehlungen
       durch Outbrain ist sofort wirksam. Falls Ihr Browser jedoch die
       lokale Speicherung zulässt und Sie innerhalb von 21 Tagen nach
       Ihrer Deaktivierung Outbrains personalisierte Empfehlungen
       aktivieren, wird Ihr vorheriges Profil möglicherweise wieder mit
       Ihrer UUID verbunden. Sofern Sie nicht innerhalb von 21 Tagen eine
       neue Aktivierung vornehmen, wird Ihr Profil gelöscht und kann nicht
       wiederhergestellt werden.

     * Wie bei den meisten Opt-Outs basiert auch der Outbrain
       Browser-Opt-Out auf einem Cookie. Das Cookie ist dazu bestimmt,
       bestehen zu bleiben, damit die Präferenz des Nutzers durchgesetzt
       werden kann. Allerdings kann die „Intelligent Tracking Prevention“
       (das Verhindern von Aufzeichnungen) für Safari in iOS 11 das
       Fortbestehen von Cookies über ein 24-Stunden-Zeitfenster hinaus
       beeinträchtigen. Wir empfehlen die Nutzung eines anderen Browsers
       oder das Blockieren aller 3rd-Party-Cookies in dem Browser, sodass
       Ihr Opt-Out-Wunsch berücksichtigt wird, ohne dass Sie sich auf die
       Opt-Out-Methodik eines einzelnen Unternehmens verlassen müssen.

     * Zusätzliche Deaktivierungsoptionen. Sie können auch den Erhalt
       personalisierter Werbung durch uns oder andere Werbeunternehmen
       über branchenbetriebene Tools deaktivieren, beispielsweise NAI oder
       die verschiedenen DAA-basierten Seiten (DAA,
       http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices, und/oder EDAA
       www.youronlinechoices.eu). Durch den Besuch der Seiten für
       Verbraucherwahlmöglichkeiten NAI, DAA, DAAC oder EDAA können Sie
       einige oder alle Leistungen der teilnehmenden Mitglieder
       deaktivieren. Wie auch die Deaktivierung von Outbrain bedeuten auch
       diese Deaktivierungen nicht, dass Sie gar keine Werbung mehr
       erhalten, sondern lediglich, dass die Werbung nicht mehr auf Sie
       zugeschnitten ist. Möglicherweise erhalten Sie weiterhin Werbung,
       beispielsweise anhand der speziellen Website, die Sie betrachten
       (d. h. kontextbasierte Werbung). Falls durch die Einstellungen
       Ihrer Browser zudem Cookies abgewiesen werden, wenn Sie die
       Verbraucherseiten DAA, DAAC oder EDAA besuchen, ist Ihre
       Deaktivierung unter Umständen nicht wirksam.
     * Rechtsgrundlage. Outbrains Rechtmäßigkeit der Verarbeitung
       personenbezogener Daten eines Nutzers gründet auf der durch unsere
       Partner-Websites festgelegten Rechtmäßigkeit. Jeder Partner-Website
       liegt Zustimmung oder berechtigtes Interesse zugrunde. Bitte lesen
       Sie die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen der Partner-Websites, um
       weitere Informationen über deren Rechtmäßigkeit zu erhalten. Falls
       bei einem Partner eine Zustimmung erforderlich ist, setzt Outbrain
       kein Cookie bei Ihnen, wenn Sie der Partner-Website keine
       Zustimmung erteilt haben.

   Geschäftspartner: Sie sind ein Geschäftspartner, wenn Sie sich im Namen
   des Unternehmens, für das Sie arbeiten, registrieren (oder Outbrain per
   E-Mail kontaktieren), um die Dienstleistungen Outbrain Amplify oder
   Outbrain Engage zu nutzen. Sehen Sie hier mehr.
   (a) Welche Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun
   Womöglich übermitteln Sie bestimmte personenbezogene Daten (wie die
   E-Mail-Adresse), wenn Sie sich für die Amplify- oder
   Engage-Dienstleistungen registrieren oder anderweitig mit uns
   kommunizieren oder interagieren. Wenn Sie sich bei uns als
   Geschäftspartner bewerben, benötigen wir gegebenenfalls weitere Daten
   von Ihnen über Anmeldebögen für Werbetreibende, Werbeaufträge und
   andere Formulare. Wir erfassen automatisch Informationen über die
   Aktivitäten Ihres Nutzernamens im Outbrain-Dashboard. Wenn Sie
   beispielsweise als Amplify-Geschäftspartner die Kosten pro Klick für
   eine Ihrer Kampagnen ändern, findet sich im Audit Trail von Outbrain
   eine Aufzeichnung all dieser Maßnahmen.
   Wir erfassen und verarbeiten die oben genannten personenbezogenen
   Daten, um unsere Verpflichtungen aus unserem Vertrag mit Ihnen als
   Geschäftspartner (oder zukünftiger Geschäftspartner) zu erfüllen, unter
   anderem:
     * Beantwortung Ihrer Fragen und Anforderungen;

     * Gewährung Ihres Zugriffs auf bestimmte Funktionen und Eigenschaften
       der Amplify- und Engage-Dienstleistungen (z.B. Bereitstellung und
       Pflege Ihres Dashboard-Kontos);

     * Verifizierung Ihrer Identität;

     * Kommunikation mit Ihnen über Ihr Konto, unsere Produkte und die für
       Ihre Nutzung der Amplify- oder Engage-Dienstleistung relevanten
       Werbeaktionen.

   (b) Cookies und andere vergleichbare Technologien, die wir nutzen
   In der Cookie-Tabelle unter „Geschäftspartner“ erhalten Sie eine
   detaillierte Liste der Cookies (und ihrer jeweiligen Speicherfristen),
   die wir für Geschäftspartner verwenden.
   (c) So geben wir unter Umständen Informationen weiter
   Wir legen bestimmte Informationen über Geschäftspartner gegenüber
   Anbietern, Auftragnehmern oder anderen offen, die Outbrain bei der
   Erbringung der Dienstleistungen unterstützen (z.B.
   Kreditkartenabwicklung). Beachten Sie bitte auch den Abschnitt dieser
   Datenschutzbestimmungen über die Weitergabe von Daten.
   (d) Ihre Rechte
   Sofern Sie als Geschäftspartner Ihre Daten verifizieren, berichtigen,
   aktualisieren oder deren Deaktivierung veranlassen möchten, können Sie
   Ihre Profileinstellungen im Outbrain-Dashboard editieren oder uns unter
   support@outbrain.com kontaktieren. Falls Sie von Outbrain E-Mails
   erhalten, können Sie den Empfang über einen Link in der E-Mail
   abbestellen. Bitte beachten Sie, dass Sie durch das Abbestellen nicht
   den Erhalt von Benachrichtigungen deaktivieren, die kritisch für die
   Erbringung der Amplify- oder Engage-Dienstleistungen sind (z.B.
   E-Mail-Rechnungen).
   Outbrains Rechtmäßigkeit der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten von
   Geschäftspartnern gründet in berechtigtem Interesse.
   3. Datensicherheit, Übertragungen außerhalb des EWR, Weitergabe und
   Speicherfristen

                                      +

   Sicherheit
   Outbrain verfügt über ein dezidiertes Sicherheitsteam. Wir führen eine
   strenge Kontrolle der durch uns erfassten Daten durch und speichern
   diese in durch Firewalls geschützten und sicheren Datenbanken mit
   streng begrenzten und kontrollierten Zugriffsrechten, damit deren
   Sicherheit gewährleistet ist. Weitere Informationen können Sie unseren
   Sicherheitsstandards entnehmen.
   Geschäftspartner haben Zugang zu bestimmten passwortgeschützten
   Funktionen der Dienstleistungen Amplify oder Engage. Sie sind für die
   Geheimhaltung dieses Passworts verantwortlich. Bitte denken Sie daran,
   dass die Informationsübertragung über das Internet leider nicht
   vollständig sicher ist. Ein häufig vorkommender Internetbetrug wird als
   „Spoofing“ oder „Phishing“ bezeichnet. Dabei erhalten Sie eine E-Mail,
   die von einer vertrauenswürdigen Quelle zu stammen scheint und in der
   Ihre personenbezogenen Daten erfragt werden. Bitte beachten Sie, dass
   wir Ihnen keine E-Mails senden, in denen wir Sie um die Überprüfung
   Ihrer Kreditkarten- oder Bankdaten oder anderer personenbezogener Daten
   bitten. Sollten Sie jemals eine E-Mail erhalten, die den Anschein
   erweckt, von uns zu sein, und in der derartige Daten von Ihnen
   angefordert werden, antworten Sie nicht darauf und klicken Sie auch auf
   keine Links in dieser E-Mail. Leiten Sie stattdessen diese E-Mail an
   uns unter legal@outbrain.com weiter, da wir Fälle möglichen
   Internetbetrugs untersuchen.
   Datenübertragungen außerhalb der EU/des EWR
   Wenn wir personenbezogene Daten aus dem Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum in
   andere Länder übertragen, deren geltende Gesetze nicht über dasselbe
   Datenschutzniveau wie in den europäischen Gebieten verfügen, sorgen wir
   durch eigene Maßnahmen für ein geeignetes Datenschutzniveau. Für Ihre
   Daten gelten somit weiterhin Ihre Rechte und Ihr Datenschutz.
   Beispielsweise verwenden wir anerkannte Vertragsklauseln und weitere
   Maßnahmen, durch die für den Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten durch
   die Empfänger gesorgt ist.
   Weitergabe von Daten
   Zusätzlich zu der beschriebenen Offenlegung Ihrer personenbezogenen
   Daten der einzelnen Nutzerarten legen wir personenbezogene Daten unter
   Umständen wie folgt offen:
     * Innerhalb der durch Outbrain kontrollierten Unternehmensgruppe aus
       internen Gründen, vorrangig für geschäftliche und betriebliche
       Zwecke;

     * Bei einem Geschäftsübergang, wie einer Fusion, dem Erwerb durch ein
       anderes Unternehmen oder dem teilweisen oder vollständigen Verkauf
       unserer Vermögenswerte, gehören Ihre personenbezogenen Daten
       wahrscheinlich zu den übertragenen Vermögenswerten;

     * Bei entsprechenden rechtlichen Anforderungen (z.B. zur
       Unterstützung strafrechtlicher Ermittlungen oder anderer
       Rechtsverfahren); und/oder

     * Als Reaktion auf einen echten Notfall.

   Außerdem kombinieren wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten mit denen anderer
   Nutzer, um Trendinformationen weiterzugeben und Nutzerstatistiken mit
   Dritten zu verbinden, jedoch stets in zusammengefasster und
   anonymisierter Form.
   Datenspeicherung
   Die Speicherfrist für jedes durch Outbrain verwendete Cookie (gleich ob
   unser eigenes oder für uns durch Dritte) ist in der Cookie-Tabelle
   genannt.
   Outbrain verfügt zudem über eine Richtlinie zur Datenspeicherung, in
   der die Speicherfrist für personenbezogene Daten aufgeführt ist, die
   auf unserer Analyse basiert, welche Speicherfrist für bestimmte Daten
   aus rechtlichen oder geschäftlichen Gründen angemessen ist. Wenn wir
   personenbezogene Daten nicht mehr benötigen, löschen oder vernichten
   wir diese auf sichere Weise. Zusammengefasste Daten, durch die kein
   Gerät/Browser (oder keine Person) identifiziert werden kann und die für
   die Berichterstattung und Analyse benötigt werden, behalten wir so
   lange, wie dies wirtschaftlich nötig ist.
   4. Kinder

                                      +

   Keine unserer Dienstleistungen richtet sich an Kinder unter 16 Jahren.
   Wir erfassen wissentlich keine personenbezogenen Daten von Personen
   unter 16 Jahren. Stellen wir bei der Datenerfassung fest, dass ein
   Websitebesucher, ein Nutzer oder ein Geschäftspartner unter 16 ist,
   verwenden oder behalten wir seine/ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht.
   Wenn wir davon Kenntnis erlangen, dass wir unwissentlich
   personenbezogene Daten von einem Kind im Alter von unter 16 erfasst
   haben, ergreifen wir angemessene Anstrengungen zur Löschung dieser
   Daten aus unseren Verzeichnissen. Wenn du ein Kind bist, nutze Outbrain
   nicht, verlasse diese Seite und geh lieber spielen!
   5. Bürger des europäischen Gebiets

                                      +

   In Übereinstimmung mit europäischen Datenschutzgesetzen, insbesondere
   der europäischen Datenschutz-Grundverordnung (DSGVO), gewährt Outbrain
   Bürgern der europäischen Gebiete bestimmte zusätzliche Rechte wie das
   Recht auf Zugriff, Berichtigung, Einspruch, Beschwerde, Löschung und
   Blockierung. Insbesondere:
     * das Recht auf Auskunft darüber, ob und welche personenbezogenen
       Daten von uns verarbeitet werden, sowie das Recht, die Berichtigung
       oder Änderung personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen.
     * unter bestimmten Umständen das Recht, die Löschung
       personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen.
     * unter bestimmten Umständen das Recht, die Einschränkung der
       Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen.
     * den jederzeitigen vollständigen oder teilweisen Widerruf Ihrer
       Zustimmung zur Verarbeitung und Nutzung Ihrer Daten mit zukünftiger
       Gültigkeit.
     * das Recht auf Erhalt Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten in einem
       üblichen, strukturierten und mechanisch lesbaren Format.
     * Kontaktaufnahme mit Ihrem Datenschutzbeauftragten bei Fragen,
       Anmerkungen, Beschwerden oder Anfragen im Zusammenhang mit unserer
       Datenschutzerklärung und der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen
       Daten.
     * das Recht auf Beschwerde bei der zuständigen Aufsichtsbehörde,
       falls Sie der Auffassung sind, dass die Verarbeitung Ihrer
       personenbezogenen Daten gesetzeswidrig ist.

   Neben dem oben Genannten weisen wir in diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen
   auf bestimmte Rechte für Bürger des europäischen Gebiets hin. Laut der
   DSGVO bezeichnet die Formulierung „Bürger aus europäischen Gebieten“
   den Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum (EWR) und die Schweiz. Im Sinne dieser
   Datenschutzbestimmungen umfasst der Begriff „europäische Gebiete“
   weiterhin das Vereinigte Königreich, auch nachdem dieses den
   Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum im Anschluss an den Austritt (Brexit)
   verlässt.
   Bitte senden Sie eine Nachricht an PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com, wenn
   Sie Fragen zur Ausübung dieser Rechte haben.
   6. Datenschutzrechte in Kalifornien

                                      +

   Laut dem California Civil Code, Abschnitte 1798.83-1798.84, sind
   Einwohner Kaliforniens berechtigt, von uns darüber Auskunft zu
   erhalten, welche Kategorien personenbezogener Daten wir an Dritte oder
   verbundene Unternehmen für diese Dritten oder für direkte
   Marketingzwecke verbundener Unternehmen weiterleiten. In dieser
   Auskunft werden die Kategorien der weitergeleiteten Daten
   identifiziert, einschließlich einer Liste der Dritten und verbundenen
   Unternehmen, an die die Daten weitergeleitet wurden, und deren Namen
   und Adressen. Falls Sie Ihren Wohnsitz in Kalifornien unterhalten und
   Sie diese Auskunft einholen möchten, senden Sie bitte eine schriftliche
   Anforderung an PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oder an die folgende
   Anschrift: Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY
   10011. Sie erhalten eine Antwort innerhalb von 30 Tagen.
   7. „Do Not Track“-Angabe

                                      +

   Einige Browser senden an Websites „Do Not Track (DNT)“-Signale, mit
   denen der Website mitgeteilt wird, dass die Aktivitäten des Nutzers
   nicht verfolgt werden sollen. Es besteht jedoch kein allgemeingültiges
   Verständnis darüber, wie DNT-Signale zu interpretieren sind, und daher
   findet durch Outbrain derzeit keine Modifizierung, Änderung oder
   Reaktion auf die DNT-Anforderungen oder -Signale von diesen Browsern
   statt. Wir beobachten weiterhin die Branchenaktivitäten in diesem
   Bereich und bewerten unsere DNT-Verfahren bei Bedarf neu.
   Zwischenzeitlich können Sie eine Reihe anderer durch uns
   bereitgestellter Tools zur Kontrolle der Datenerfassung und -nutzung
   einsetzen, unter anderem die Möglichkeit, im Nutzerbereich den Erhalt
   personalisierter Empfehlungen zu deaktivieren.
   8. Mögliche Änderungen dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen

                                      +

   Wir ändern diese Datenschutzbestimmungen zu gegebener Zeit. Darüber
   informieren wir durch einen deutlichen Hinweis, der für Sie als
   Websitebesucher oder Geschäftspartner erkennbar ist. Wir haben jedoch
   keine Möglichkeit, Nutzern gegenüber eine Aktualisierung anzukündigen.
   Sie sollten diesen Bereich regelmäßig daraufhin überprüfen, ob die
   Datenschutzbestimmungen aktualisiert worden sind. Wir zeigen stets das
   Datum der letzten Änderung der Datenschutzbestimmungen oben auf der
   Seite an, damit Sie wissen, wann diese zuletzt überarbeitet wurden.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                Última actualización: 23 de mayo de 2018

   Outbrain se compromete a proteger tus datos personales. Esta Política
   de privacidad («Política de privacidad») rige el uso por parte de
   Outbrain de los datos recopilados por nosotros, incluyendo todos y cada
   uno de los datos personales. Los datos personales son información que
   se relaciona contigo y que puede identificarte como individuo.
   Utilizamos tus datos personales de conformidad con todas las leyes
   aplicables. Para garantizar el cumplimiento y estar en sintonía con los
   valores de Outbrain en materia de confianza y transparencia, contamos
   con un equipo de defensores de la privacidad responsables de la
   implementación continua de nuestro programa de privacidad global.

                                                           + EXPANDIR TODO

   1. Quiénes somos, qué hacemos, cómo ponerse en contacto con Outbrain,
   nuestro RPD o las autoridades competentes

                                      +

   Quiénes somos:
   Outbrain significa Outbrain Inc, una sociedad de Delaware (EE.UU.) con
   sede en Nueva York y sus filiales (colectivamente, «Outbrain», o
   «nosotros», «nos», «nuestro»). Operamos desde 12 oficinas globales y
   colaboramos con editores y vendedores de todo el mundo.
   Qué hacemos:
   La misión de Outbrain es facilitar recomendaciones interesantes a sus
   usuarios basadas en sus intereses. Para lograr nuestra misión firmamos
   acuerdos con:
     * editores y socios en línea que desean recomendar contenido
       relevante a sus lectores (Outbrain Engage), y
     * anunciantes que quieren que los lectores vean su contenido
       (Outbrain Amplify).

   Cómo ponerse en contacto con nosotros:
   Revisamos regularmente nuestro cumplimiento de la presente Política de
   privacidad. Las preguntas, comentarios y solicitudes relacionadas con
   esta Política de privacidad son bienvenidas y deben dirigirse a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com o por correo postal a Outbrain Inc. 39
   West 13th Street, 3rd floor, Nueva York, NY 10011, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Si Outbrain no responde satisfactoriamente a tus preguntas o
   inquietudes, también puede ponerte en contacto con las siguientes
   personas para obtener asesoramiento, apoyo o realizar reclamaciones:
     * El Responsable de Protección de Datos externo de Outbrain («RPD»):
       ePrivacy GmbH, representada por D. Christoph Bauer. Se puede
       contactar con ePrivacy GmbH directamente en privacy@eprivacy.eu.
     * El Information Commissioner’s Officer, que es el principal servicio
       de supervisión de Outbrain en Europa.

   Órganos de autorregulación
   Outbrain se adhiere a los principios de autorregulación establecidos
   por la Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) y la European Interactive
   Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Somos miembros activos de la
   Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), una asociación dedicada a la
   recopilación responsable de datos y su uso para la publicidad digital.
   Nos adherimos al Código de conducta de NAI para sitios web y móviles.
   Outbrain también se adhiere a los Principios de autorregulación de la
   Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) para la Publicidad conductual en
   línea y al Marco OBA de IAB de Europa.
   2. Tipos de usuarios de Outbrain (incluyendo la gestión del Opt Out)

                                      +

   Gran parte de esta Política de privacidad está dividida en apartados en
   función de la manera en que puedes interactuar con Outbrain. Por favor,
   determina qué tipo de usuario eres. Para cada tipo de usuario hemos
   explicado qué información recopilamos y por qué, qué cookies y otras
   tecnologías similares utilizamos, cómo compartimos dicha información y
   sus derechos.
   Visitantes del sitio: Eres un Visitante del Sitio cuando visitas e
   interactúas con nuestros sitios, páginas web, funciones interactivas,
   blogs y tus respectivos contenidos en Outbrain.com (o cualquier
   derivación, como Outbrain.co.uk, Outbrain.fr, Outbrain.de, etc.) y
   MyOutbrain.com («Nuestros sitios»). Ver más aquí.
   (a) Qué información recopilamos y por qué
   Queremos entender qué servicios te interesan de Nuestros sitios y
   queremos recordarte los servicios que ofrecemos cuando no estés
   visitando Nuestros sitios. Para ello, recopilamos la siguiente
   información sobre ti: (i) dirección IP, (ii) datos del Agente usuario:
   tipo de dispositivo (por ejemplo, iPhone), tipo de navegador (por
   ejemplo, Chrome), sistema operativo (por ejemplo, iOS), (iii) las
   páginas visitadas en Nuestro sitios (por ejemplo, la página «Acerca de»
   de Outbrain), (iv) la hora de la visita (y la zona horaria
   correspondiente) y (v) las URL de referencia y otra información que
   normalmente se transmite en las solicitudes HTTP (por ejemplo, esta
   información nos dice cómo llegaste a Nuestros sitios).
   (b) Qué cookies y otras tecnologías similares utilizamos
   Consulta esta Tabla de cookies en «Visitantes del sitio» para obtener
   una lista detallada de las cookies (y sus correspondientes períodos de
   retención) que utilizamos cuando visitas Nuestros sitios web.
   (c) Cómo podemos intercambiar información
     * Intercambio de información sobre ti en Nuestros sitios.

   En general, no compartimos tus datos personales con terceros para fines
   de marketing o publicidad. Sin embargo, utilizamos varios terceros
   (cada uno de los cuales aparece en esta Tabla de cookies) para
   ayudarnos a vender o a enviarte publicidad. Por ejemplo, algunas de las
   cookies que utilizamos en Nuestros sitios pertenecen a terceros que
   ayudarán a Outbrain a vender o a enviarte publicidad. Exigimos que
   estos terceros y empresas se comprometan a mantener toda la información
   compartida con ellos de manera confidencial y a utilizar la información
   sólo para cumplir con sus obligaciones para con nosotros. Lo anterior
   se logra mediante acuerdos con todos los terceros que tratan datos
   personales en nuestro nombre para asegurarnos de que tratan tus datos
   personales de conformidad con nuestras estrictas instrucciones y todas
   las leyes de protección de datos aplicables. Si realizas una
   publicación en nuestro blog, tu comentario e información estarán
   disponibles públicamente. Póngate en contacto con support@outbrain.com
   para eliminar tu comentario.
     * Uso de servicios de terceros en Nuestros sitios.

   Nuestros sitios contienen enlaces a otras webs que no operamos ni son
   de nuestra propiedad. No controlamos, recomendamos ni respaldamos el
   contenido, los productos, los servicios, las políticas ni las prácticas
   de privacidad de estas webs de terceros. Por ejemplo, en Nuestros
   sitios encontrará iconos en los que podrá hacer clic y que te llevarán
   a la página de Facebook de Outbrain o a la página de LinkedIn de
   Outbrain. Si decides hacer clic en estos enlaces, debes saber que
   Facebook y LinkedIn podrán enviar sus propias cookies a tu dispositivo
   y que podrán recopilar datos personales de forma independiente. Por lo
   tanto, es importante que leas las políticas de privacidad de Facebook o
   LinkedIn.
     * Consulta también el apartado Intercambio de esta Política de
       privacidad.

   (d) Tus derechos
   Los Términos de uso en Nuestro site rigen el uso de Nuestro site y
   también se aplican a ti. Puedes dejar de usar Nuestro site en cualquier
   momento. Si lo haces, es posible que también desees eliminar las
   cookies que hayamos colocado en cualquier dispositivo utilizado para
   acceder a Nuestro site. Si durante tu uso de Nuestros site proporcionas
   tu dirección de correo electrónico, cualquier correo electrónico que
   recibas de Outbrain incluirá la opción «darse de baja».
   Para los usarios del territorio europeo, Outbrain ha implementado una
   plataforma de administración de consentimiento en nuestro site (con la
   tecnología de One Trust), que brinda al usuario la oportunidad de dar
   su aprobación, o no, a cookies y tecnologías de seguimiento similares
   en nuestros sites. Al acceder a nuestros sites, verás un banner en la
   parte inferior de la página con información sobre las cookies que
   utilizamos. Puedes hacer clic en el banner para rechazar cualquier
   cookie que no sea estrictamente necesaria. Aceptar en el banner o hacer
   scrolling/clic en nuestros sites se interpreta como una indicación de
   aceptación. En consecuencia, la base legal de Outbrain para procesar
   datos personales en nuestros sites es el consentimiento. El usuario
   puede retirar su consentimiento en cualquier momento aquí.
   Usuarios: Eres un Usuario cuando visitas una página de un site o
   aplicación de uno de los socios de Outbrain donde esté instalado el
   complemento (widget) de Outbrain («Sitios asociados»). Por ejemplo, si
   visitas https://news.sky.com/uk o www.elpais.com se implementará el
   complemento Outbrain en esas webs. Sabrás que estás interactuando con
   un complemento de Outbrain cuando veas un texto que haga referencia a
   Outbrain (por ejemplo, «Recomendado por Outbrain», «por Outbrain» cerca
   de las recomendaciones). Si hace clic en la referencia con hipervínculo
   a Outbrain, verás un aviso detallado que te permitirá navegar hasta el
   Perfil de intereses de Outbrain, que proporciona una visualización
   general de los tipos de categorías de datos de Outbrain que se pueden
   utilizar para hacer tus recomendaciones. También te ofrece la
   posibilidad de inhabilitar las recomendaciones personalizadas. Ver más
   aquí.
   Ejemplo de un complemento Outbrain
   [rydw687kQ.png]
   (a) Qué información recopilamos y por qué
   Utilizamos identificadores únicos de usuario (UUID, por sus siglas en
   inglés), direcciones IP y otra información de uso para poder ofrecer
   recomendaciones interesantes. Las recomendaciones de Outbrain podrán
   ser pagadas por un anunciante que las vincule a un nuevo sitio web o
   podrán ser orgánicas de tal manera que el enlace sea a otra página en
   el mismo sitio web del editor.
     * UUID.

   Cuando como Usuario visita por primera vez un Sitio asociado (por
   ejemplo, CNN.com), Outbrain introducirá una cookie en tu dispositivo
   para generar un UUID. Catalogamos y analizamos el contenido que
   consumas en los Sitios asociados. Nuestras recomendaciones se basan en:
   (i) el historial de navegación, (ii) los patrones de navegación
   similares de otros Usuarios, (ii) las recomendaciones que son
   generalmente populares entre la audiencia de Outbrain en ese momento,
   (iv) cierta aleatoriedad y (v) los requisitos de orientación que puedan
   ser proporcionados o solicitados por nuestros clientes de Amplify. Como
   ejemplo, Outbrain puede saber que a UUID 123 (que podrías ser tú en su
   iPhone X en el periódico The Guardian usando Chrome como tu navegador)
   le gusta leer sobre destinos vacacionales lejanos y que a la gente que
   le gusta leer sobre destinos vacacionales lejanos también le gusta leer
   sobre comida exótica.
   El UUID es una secuencia de números o letras. Este UUID se vincula tu
   dispositivo y varía dependiendo del navegador que utilices. En otras
   palabras, Outbrain registra un UUID diferente dependiendo del
   dispositivo o navegador que utilices para acceder a los Sitios
   asociados. Por ejemplo, esto significa que tendrás un UUID cuando
   visites un Sitio asociado desde tu teléfono móvil usando el navegador
   Safari y un UUID diferente cuando visites un Sitio asociado desde tu
   iPad usando el navegador Safari. Outbrain combinará y unificará el UUID
   de un dispositivo móvil (portátil o tableta) y el del navegador que
   acceda posteriormente a una aplicación (o viceversa) desde el mismo
   dispositivo.
   Asignar un UUID permite a Outbrain asociar las páginas visitadas y los
   clics realizados en las recomendaciones de Outbrain desde dicho UUID,
   todo ello con el objetivo de proporcionar recomendaciones interesantes.
     * Dirección IP y otra información de uso.

   Recopilamos UUID como se explicó anteriormente y también recopilamos la
   siguiente información sobre ti: (i) dirección IP (y luego anonimizado
   en base a los estándares de la industria); (ii) datos del Agente
   usuario: tipo de dispositivo (por ejemplo, Iphone), tipo de navegador
   (por ejemplo, Chrome), sistema operativo (por ejemplo, iOS), (iii) las
   páginas visitadas, (iv) el momento de la visita y (v) las URL de
   referencia y otra información que normalmente se transmite en las
   solicitudes HTTP.
   La información estadística anterior nos proporciona información sobre
   cuántos Usuarios visitaron una página específica de nuestros Sitios
   asociados en los que está instalado el complemento de Outbrain, cuánto
   tiempo permaneció cada Usuario en esa página, el tipo de contenido en
   esa página sobre el que hicieron clic y cómo interactuaron en general
   con esa página. Esta información sólo son datos personales cuando están
   asociados a un UUID.
   (b) Qué cookies y otras tecnologías similares utilizamos
   Por favor, consulta esta Tabla de cookies en el apartado «Usuarios»
   para obtener una lista detallada de las primeras cookies que utilizamos
   cuando interactúas con Sitios asociados en los que se implementa la
   tecnología de Outbrain.
   Si haces clic en un enlace a una de nuestras recomendaciones, el
   anunciante de Amplify que patrocina la recomendación puede colocar
   cookies en tu dispositivo a través de redirecciones antes de llegar a
   la página de destino de las recomendaciones o al llegar a la página de
   destino. En tales casos, estarás sujeto a la Política de privacidad de
   ese anunciante.
   Además del complemento visible de Outbrain en los Sitios asociados,
   algunos anunciantes de Outbrain podrán implementar el píxel de Outbrain
   en sus sitios web. El píxel de Outbrain determina si el usuario que
   llega a la página donde está instalado el píxel tiene un UUID de
   Outbrain. Si existe un UUID asociado con dicho usuario final, Outbrain
   permitirá a los anunciantes reorientar esos UUID o proporcionará a los
   anunciantes el número total de UUID que llegaron a dicha página. Si no
   había ningún UUID de Outbrain en la página, el píxel de Outbrain no
   recopilará ninguna información sobre el usuario.
   Animamos a los anunciantes a informar sobre el uso del píxel de
   Outbrain en sus propios sitios web. Outbrain no combina información de
   píxeles con el perfil de un UUID.
   Los puntos de datos como las páginas vistas y los clics están
   conectados a un UUID en particular y se retienen durante 13 meses. Por
   ejemplo, si UUID 123 leyó un artículo el 31 de diciembre de 2017, el 1
   de febrero de 2018 ese artículo ya no formará parte del perfil de UUID
   123.
   (c) Cómo podemos intercambiar información
   Outbrain no comparte perfiles de usuario con terceros. Sin embargo, es
   posible que compartamos el UUID con determinados socios con el fin de
   sincronizar las cookies o en función de los requisitos técnicos.
   Consulta también el apartado «Intercambio» de la presente Política de
   privacidad.
   (d) Tus derechos
     * Inhabilitación voluntaria de Outbrain

   Podrás inhabilitar las recomendaciones personalizadas de Outbrain en
   cualquier momento. Por favor, consulta el Perfil de intereses de
   Outbrain para una visualización general de los datos que Outbrain
   conoce sobre ti y que puede utilizar para hacer sus recomendaciones. El
   Perfil de intereses también te ofrece la posibilidad de inhabilitar las
   recomendaciones personalizadas (puedes también hacer opt-out aquí). Ten
   en cuenta que la inhabilitación de los navegadores se realiza a través
   del Perfil de intereses de Outbrain, pero que la inhabilitación de las
   recomendaciones personalizadas en las aplicaciones se realiza a través
   de la configuración de tu dispositivo (hay ejemplos de los pasos a
   seguir en el Perfil de intereses).
   IMPORTANTE – a pesar de que hayas inhabilitado el seguimiento
   personalizado de Outbrain,
     * seguirás viendo las recomendaciones de Outbrain. Inhabilitar el
       seguimiento personalizado de Outbrain no significa que vayas a
       dejar de recibir recomendaciones de Outbrain. Por el contrario,
       significa que las recomendaciones de Outbrain no serán
       personalizadas. Las recomendaciones seguirán utilizando información
       sobre el documento que estás consultando (es decir, información
       contextual) para proporcionarte recomendaciones en esa página.

     * La inhabilitación voluntaria está basada en las cookies y es
       específica del dispositivo/navegador. Si navegas por la página web
       desde varios dispositivos o navegadores, deberás inhabilitar cada
       dispositivo o navegador para asegurarte de que no realizamos el
       seguimiento personalizado en ninguno ellos. Por la misma razón, si
       compras un dispositivo nuevo, cambias de navegador o borra (o
       limpia) la cookie de inhabilitación tendrás que inhabilitarla de
       nuevo. Inhabilitar el seguimiento personalizado no es lo mismo que
       bloquear las cookies.

     * Para garantizar la eliminación del perfil vinculado a su UUID, no
       habilites Outbrain durante al menos 21 días. Tu inhabilitación de
       las recomendaciones personalizadas de Outbrain será efectiva de
       manera inmediata. Sin embargo, si tu navegador permite el
       almacenamiento local y habilitas las recomendaciones personalizadas
       de Outbrain dentro de los 21 días siguientes a tu inhabilitación,
       es posible que tu perfil anterior se vincule de nuevo a su UUID. Si
       no habilitas Outbrain en un plazo de 21 días, se eliminará tu
       perfil y no podrás recuperarse.

     * Al igual que con la mayoría de los opt-out, también la opción de
       opt-out del navegador de Outbrain se basa en una cookie. La cookie
       de opt-out voluntaria persiste para cumplir con las preferencias
       del usuario. Sin embargo, la función de "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention " en iOS11 puede afectar la persistencia de las cookies
       en los sitios web después de una ventana de 24 horas. Sugerimos
       usar otro navegador o considerar bloquear todas las cookies de
       terceros desde el navegador para que se efectúe el“opt-out" sin
       tener que depender de la metodología de exclusión voluntaria de
       ninguna empresa.

     * Opciones adicionales de inhabilitación voluntaria. También podrás
       inhabilitar los anuncios personalizados que te ofrecemos nosotros u
       otras compañías de publicidad a través de herramientas impulsadas
       por la industria, como la NAI o las diversas páginas basadas en la
       DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices ; o EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
       Visitar las páginas de elección del consumidor de la NAI, DAA, DAAC
       o EDAA te permitirá inhabilitar todos o algunos de los servicios de
       los miembros participantes. Al igual que la inhabilitación de
       Outbrain, estas inhabilitaciones no significan que ya no recibirás
       ninguna publicidad, sino que los anuncios simplemente no serán
       personalizados. Podrás continuar recibiendo anuncios, por ejemplo,
       basados en el sitio web en particular que estás viendo (es decir,
       anuncios basados en el contexto). Además, si tus navegadores están
       configurados para rechazar las cookies cuando visitas las páginas
       de elección del consumidor de la DAA, DAAC o EDAA, es posible que
       no se lleve a cabo la inhabilitación.

     * Base legal. La base legal de Outbrain para el tratamiento de los
       datos personales de un Usuario reside en la base legal determinada
       para cada uno de nuestros Sitios asociados. Cada Sitio asociado se
       basará en el consentimiento o interés legítimo. Consulta la
       Política de privacidad de los Sitios asociados para obtener más
       información sobre su base legal. Si un socio se basa en el
       consentimiento, Outbrain no introducirá ninguna cookie si tu no has
       proporcionado el consentimiento en dicho Sitio asociado.

   Socios comerciales: te conviertes en Socio comercial cuando te
   registras (o envías un correo electrónico a Outbrain) en nombre de la
   compañía para la que trabajas para utilizar los Servicios Outbrain
   Amplify o Outbrain Engage. Ver más aquí.
   (a) Qué información recopilamos y por qué
   Puede que proporciones ciertos datos personales (como la dirección de
   correo electrónico) cuando te suscribas a los servicios de Amplify o
   Engage o alternativamente cuando te pongas en contacto o interactúes
   con nosotros. Si solicitas convertirte en Socio comercial, es posible
   que te solicitemos información adicional a través de formularios de
   solicitud de anunciantes, órdenes de inserción y otros formularios.
   Recopilamos automáticamente información acerca de las acciones de tu
   nombre de usuario en el panel de control de Outbrain. Por ejemplo, como
   un Socio comercial de Amplify, si cambias el coste por clic para una de
   tus campañas, el registro de auditoría de Outbrain tendrá un registro
   de todas esas acciones.
     * Recopilamos y tratamos los datos personales anteriores con el fin
       de cumplir nuestras obligaciones en virtud de nuestro acuerdo como
       Socio comercial (o posible Socio comercial) con usted, incluido
       para:

     * responder a tus preguntas y solicitudes;

     * proporcionarte acceso a ciertas funciones y características de
       nuestros servicios Amplify o Engage (por ejemplo, para proporcionar
       y mantener tu cuenta del panel de control);

     * verificar tu identidad;

     * informarte sobre tu cuenta, nuestros productos y promociones
       disponibles que puedan ser relevantes para tu uso del servicio
       Amplify o Engage.

   (b) Qué cookies y otras tecnologías similares utilizamos
   Consulta esta Tabla de cookies en el apartado «Socios comerciales» para
   obtener una lista detallada de las cookies (y sus correspondientes
   períodos de retención) que empleamos con los Socios comerciales.
   (c) Cómo podemos compartir información con cualquier persona
   Podemos revelar cierta información de los Socios comerciales a
   proveedores, contratistas u otros que ayuden a Outbrain a prestar los
   servicios (por ejemplo, procesamiento de tarjetas de crédito). Consulta
   también el apartado Intercambio de esta Política de privacidad.
   (d) Tus derechos
   Si como Socio comercial deseas verificar, corregir, actualizar o
   solicitar la desactivación de tu información, puedes ir al panel de
   control de Outbrain para editar tus preferencias de perfil o ponerte en
   contacto con nosotros en support@outbrain.com. Si estás recibiendo
   correos electrónicos de Outbrain, puedes «darte de baja» haciendo uso
   del enlace en el correo electrónico. Ten en cuenta que la cancelación
   de la suscripción no inhabilitará las notificaciones que sean críticas
   para proporcionar los servicios de Amplify o Engage (por ejemplo,
   facturas por correo electrónico).
   La base legal de Outbrain para tratar los datos personales de los
   Socios comerciales es el interés legítimo.
   3. Cómo protegemos la información, las transmisiones fuera del EEE, el
   intercambio y la retención

                                      +

   Seguridad
   Outbrain tiene un equipo de seguridad específico. Mantenemos un
   estricto control de los datos que recopilamos y los retenemos en bases
   de datos seguras y protegidas por cortafuegos con derechos de acceso
   estrictamente limitados y controlados, para garantizar su seguridad.
   Consulta nuestras normas de seguridad para obtener más información.
   Los socios comerciales tienen acceso a determinadas funciones
   protegidas por contraseña del servicio Amplify o Engage. Ellos son
   responsables de mantener la confidencialidad de la contraseña. Por
   favor, recuerda que, lamentablemente, la transmisión de información a
   través de Internet no es completamente segura. El «spoofing» o
   «phishing» son algunas de las estafas más comunes en Internet. Esto se
   produce cuando recibes un correo electrónico que parece proceder de una
   fuente legítima que te solicita datos personales. Ten en cuenta que no
   te enviaremos ningún correo electrónico solicitándote que verifiques la
   información de tu tarjeta de crédito, bancaria o cualquier otro dato
   personal. Si alguna vez recibes un correo electrónico que parece ser de
   nuestra parte solicitándote dicha información, no respondas a él y no
   haga clic en ninguno de los enlaces que aparecen en el correo
   electrónico. En su lugar, reenvíenos el correo electrónico a
   legal@outbrain.com, ya que investigaremos casos de posible fraude en
   Internet.
   Transferencias de datos fuera de la UE/EEE
   Cuando transferimos datos personales desde el Espacio Económico Europeo
   a otros países en los que las leyes aplicables no ofrecen el mismo
   nivel de protección de la privacidad de los datos que en el territorio
   europeo, adoptamos medidas para proporcionar un nivel adecuado de
   protección de los datos. En otras palabras, tus derechos y niveles de
   protección se mantienen con tus datos. Por ejemplo, utilizamos
   cláusulas contractuales aprobadas y otras medidas diseñadas para
   asegurar que los destinatarios de tus datos personales los protejan.
   Intercambio
   Además de la descripción de cómo podemos revelar tus datos personales
   en función de cada tipo de usuario, también podemos revelar datos
   personales de la siguiente manera:
     * Dentro de la familia de empresas controladas por Outbrain por
       razones internas, principalmente con fines comerciales y
       operativos.

     * Si pasamos por una transición de negocios, como una fusión,
       adquisición por otra compañía o venta de todos o parte de nuestros
       activos, es probable que tus datos personales se encuentren entre
       los activos transferidos.

     * Cuando la ley así lo requiera (por ejemplo, para cooperar con
       investigaciones de las fuerzas del orden u otros procedimientos
       legales).

     * Para responder a una verdadera emergencia.

   Además, combinamos tus datos personales con los de otros usuarios para
   compartir información de tendencias y agregar estadísticas de usuarios
   con terceros, siempre de forma agregada y anónima.
   Retención de datos
   El período de retención para cada una de las cookies que utiliza
   Outbrain (ya sea por su cuenta o en nuestro nombre por parte de
   terceros) se indica en la Tabla de cookies.
   Outbrain también mantiene una Política de Retención de Datos que
   detalla el período de retención de datos personales sobre la base de
   nuestro análisis sobre cuánto tiempo es necesario retener
   razonablemente los datos específicos para fines legales o comerciales.
   Cuando ya no necesitamos datos personales, los borraremos o
   destruiremos de forma segura. Los datos agregados, que no puedan
   identificar un dispositivo/navegador (o a una persona) y se utilicen
   con fines de información y análisis, se mantendrán durante el tiempo
   que sea necesario desde el punto de vista comercial.
   4. Niños

                                      +

   Ninguno de nuestros servicios está dirigido a niños menores de 16 años.
   No recopilamos de manera consciente datos personales de ninguna persona
   menor de 16 años de edad. Si en el momento de la recopilación
   determinamos que un Visitante del sitio, un Usuario o un Socio
   comercial es menor de 16 años, no utilizaremos ni mantendremos tus
   datos personales. Si tenemos constancia de que sin saberlo hemos
   recopilado datos personales de un menor de 16 años, haremos todos los
   esfuerzos razonables para eliminar dicha información de nuestros
   registros. ¡Si eres un niño, ve a jugar al patio, no uses ni
   interactúes con Outbrain!
   5. Ciudadanos del territorio europeo

                                      +

   En cumplimiento de la legislación europea en materia de privacidad, en
   particular el Reglamento General de Protección de Datos de la Unión
   Europea (RGPD), Outbrain proporciona derechos adicionales específicos a
   los ciudadanos del territorio europeo, tales como el derecho de acceso,
   rectificación, oposición, reclamación, supresión y bloqueo. En
   concreto:
     * El derecho a solicitar información sobre si nosotros tratamos tus
       datos personales y, en caso afirmativo, qué datos personales son
       tratados, y el derecho a exigir que los datos personales sean
       rectificados o modificados.
     * En determinadas circunstancias, el derecho a solicitar la supresión
       de los datos personales.
     * En determinadas circunstancias, el derecho a exigir que se
       restrinja el tratamiento de datos personales.
     * El derecho a retirar tu consentimiento para el tratamiento y uso de
       sus datos total o parcialmente en cualquier momento a través de una
       solicitud en el futuro.
     * El derecho a obtener tus datos personales en un formato común,
       estructurado y legible mecánicamente.
     * El derecho a ponerte en contacto con nuestro responsable de
       protección de datos si tienes alguna pregunta, comentario,
       reclamación o solicitud en relación con nuestra declaración sobre
       la protección de datos y el tratamiento de tus datos personales.
     * El derecho a presentar una reclamación ante la autoridad
       supervisora responsable si crees que el tratamiento de tus datos
       personales infringe la legislación.

   Envía un correo electrónico a privacyquestions@outbrain.com con
   cualquier pregunta sobre el ejercicio de cualquiera de los derechos
   anteriores.
   Además de lo anterior, hacemos referencia a ciertos derechos de los
   ciudadanos del territorio europeo a través de la presente Política de
   Privacidad. De conformidad con el RGPD, por ciudadanos del «territorio
   europeo» se entenderán los ciudadanos del Espacio Económico Europeo
   (EEE) y Suiza. A los efectos de la presente Política de privacidad, el
   término «territorio europeo» seguirá incluyendo al Reino Unido, incluso
   después de que el Reino Unido abandone el Espacio Económico Europeo
   tras el Brexit.
   6. Derechos de Privacidad de California

                                      +

   En virtud de los artículos 1798.83-1798.84 del Código Civil de
   California, los residentes de California tienen derecho a solicitarnos
   un aviso que describa las categorías de información personal que
   compartimos con terceros o filiales corporativas para los propósitos de
   marketing directo de dichos terceros o filiales corporativas. Ese aviso
   identificará las categorías de información compartida e incluirá una
   lista de los terceros y filiales con los que se compartió, junto con
   tus nombres y direcciones. Si eres residente de California y deseas una
   copia de este aviso, por favor envía una solicitud por escrito a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com o envíala a la siguiente dirección:
   Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, Nueva York, NY 10011.
   Por favor, espera 30 días para recibir una respuesta.
   7. Declaración de «no rastreo» (Do Not Track)

                                      +

   Algunos navegadores transmiten señales de «no rastreo» (DNT, por sus
   siglas en inglés) a webs. Debido a que no existe una idea común de cómo
   interpretar la señal DNT, Outbrain no altera, cambia ni responde
   actualmente a las peticiones o señales DNT de estos navegadores.
   Seguiremos supervisando la actividad del sector en esta área y
   volveremos a evaluar nuestras prácticas de DNT según sea necesario.
   Mientras tanto, puedes utilizar el resto de las herramientas que
   ofrecemos para controlar la recopilación y el uso de datos, incluida la
   posibilidad de inhabilitar las recomendaciones personalizadas en el
   apartado «Usuarios».
   8. Cómo puede cambiar esta Política de privacidad

                                      +

   Podemos cambiar esta Política de privacidad cada cierto tiempo.
   Colocaremos un aviso que podrás ver claramente como Visitante del Sitio
   o Socio comercial, pero no disponemos de ningún medio para avisar a los
   Usuarios de las actualizaciones. Deberás comprobar, periódicamente, si
   se ha actualizado la Política de privacidad. Siempre mostraremos la
   fecha de la última modificación de la Política de privacidad en la
   parte superior de la página para que puedas saber cuándo se revisó por
   última vez.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                      Dernière mise à jour : 23 mai 2018

   Outbrain s’engage à protéger vos données personnelles. Cette politique
   de confidentialité (la « Politique de confidentialité ») régit
   l’utilisation des données collectées par Outbrain, notamment les
   données personnelles, quelles qu’elles soient. Par données
   personnelles, nous entendons les informations qui vous concernent et
   permettent éventuellement de vous identifier. Nous utilisons vos
   données personnelles conformément aux lois en vigueur. Afin de garantir
   la conformité et de nous aligner sur les valeurs d’Outbrain en matière
   de confiance et de transparence, nous disposons d’une équipe de «
   privacy champions » chargée de mettre en œuvre en continu notre
   programme mondial de respect de la vie privée.

                                                        + DÉVELOPPER TOUT

   1. Qui sommes-nous, que faisons-nous, comment contacter Outbrain, notre
   DPO ou les autorités compétentes

                                      +

   Qui sommes-nous ?
   Outbrain fait référence à Outbrain Inc., une société du Delaware
   (États-Unis) dont le siège se trouve à New York, et à ses succursales
   affiliées (collectivement désignées par les termes « Outbrain », ou «
   nous », « notre », « nos »). Nous exerçons nos activités à partir de 12
   bureaux internationaux et travaillons en partenariat avec des éditeurs
   et des annonceurs dans le monde entier.
   Que faisons-nous ?
   La mission d’Outbrain est de proposer des recommandations intéressantes
   et pertinentes aux utilisateurs en fonction de leurs centres d’intérêt.
   Pour remplir cette mission, nous concluons des accords avec :
     * des éditeurs en ligne et des partenaires qui souhaitent recommander
       des contenus pertinents à leurs utilisateurs (il s’agit d’Outbrain
       Engage) ; et

     * des annonceurs qui souhaitent que les utilisateurs visualisent
       leurs contenus (il s’agit d’Outbrain Amplify).

   Comment nous contacter ?
   Les questions, commentaires et demandes concernant cette Politique de
   confidentialité sont les bienvenus. Ils doivent être adressés à
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou par courrier à Outbrain Inc., 39 West
   13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, USA, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Si Outbrain ne répond pas de manière satisfaisante à vos questions ou
   inquiétudes, vous pouvez également contacter, pour des conseils, une
   assistance ou des réclamations :
     * le DPO ou délégué à la protection des données externe d’Outbrain :
       ePrivacy GmbH, représenté par Christoph Bauer. ePrivacy GmbH peut
       être contacté directement à l’adresse suivante privacy@eprivacy.eu
       ; et/ou
     * l’Information Commissioner’s Officer, le service de supervision
       principal d’Outbrain pour les pays européens.

   Les organismes d’autorégulation
   Outbrain adhère aux principes d’autorégulation définis par la Digital
   Advertising Alliance (DAA) et l’European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Nous sommes membres de plein droit de la
   Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), une association dédiée à une
   collecte et une utilisation responsable des données à des fins de
   publicité numérique. Nous adhérons au code de bonne conduite de la NAI
   pour le Web et les appareils mobiles. Outbrain adhère également aux
   principes d’autorégulation de l’Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB)
   pour la publicité comportementale en ligne et à l’OBA Framework de
   l’IAB Europe.
   2. Types d’utilisateurs Outbrain (et gestion d'exclusion "opt-out")

                                      +

   La majeure partie de cette Politique de confidentialité est divisée en
   sections basées sur la manière dont vous interagissez avec Outbrain.
   Veuillez déterminer quel type d’utilisateur vous êtes. Pour chaque type
   d’utilisateur, nous détaillons quelles informations nous collectons et
   pourquoi, quels témoins de connexion ou « cookies » et autres
   technologies similaires nous utilisons, comment nous partageons ces
   informations, et vos droits.
   Visiteurs du site: Vous êtes un Visiteur du site quand vous consultez
   et interagissez avec nos sites et pages Web, nos fonctionnalités
   interactives, nos blogs et leurs contenus sur Outbrain.com (ou tout
   autre site dérivé comme Outbrain.co.uk ; Outbrain.fr ; outbrain.de
   etc.) et MyOutbrain.com (« Nos Sites »). Voir plus ici.
   (a) Quelles informations collectons-nous et pourquoi ?
   Nous souhaitons comprendre quels services sur nos Sites vous
   intéressent et vous rappeler les services que nous proposons quand vous
   n’êtes pas sur nos Sites. Pour ce faire, nous collectons auprès de vous
   les informations suivantes : (i) l’adresse IP; (ii) les données agent
   utilisateur : le type d’appareil (ex : iPhone), le type de navigateur
   (ex : Chrome), le système d’exploitation (ex : iOS) ; (iii) les pages
   visitées sur notre Site (ex : la page « À propos » d’Outbrain ») ; (iv)
   l’heure de visite (et le fuseau horaire correspondant) ; et (v) les URL
   correspondantes et autres informations normalement transmises dans les
   requêtes HTTP (par exemple ces informations nous indiquent comment vous
   êtes arrivé sur nos Sites).
   (b) Quels cookies et autres technologies similaires utilisons-nous ?
   Veuillez consulter la Table des cookies sous « Visiteurs du site » pour
   une liste détaillée des cookies (et leurs durées de conservation
   associées) que nous utilisons quand vous visitez nos Sites.
   (c) Comment sommes-nous susceptibles de partager les informations ?
     * Le partage des informations que nous obtenons sur vous sur nos
       Sites.

   De manière générale, nous ne partageons pas les données personnelles
   vous concernant avec des tiers à des fins de marketing ou de publicité.
   Toutefois, nous faisons appel à divers tiers (chacun d’entre eux étant
   listé dans la Table de cookies) pour nous aider dans nos démarches
   commerciales et publicitaires envers vous. Certains des cookies que
   nous utilisons sur nos Sites appartiennent ainsi à des tiers qui
   aideront Outbrain à vous proposer des services ou des publicités. Nous
   demandons à ces tiers et entreprises d’accepter de préserver la
   confidentialité de toutes les informations que nous partageons avec eux
   et de ne les utiliser que pour remplir leurs obligations envers nous.
   Pour ce faire, nous concluons des accords avec tous les tiers qui
   traitent les données personnelles en notre nom afin de garantir qu’ils
   le font en conformité avec nos instructions rigoureuses et toutes les
   lois de protection des données applicables. Si vous publiez un post sur
   notre blog, vos commentaires et informations seront disponibles
   publiquement. Veuillez contacter support@outbrain.com pour supprimer
   vos commentaires.
     * Utilisation de services de tiers sur nos Sites.

   Nos Sites contiennent des liens vers d’autres sites Web dont nous ne
   sommes ni propriétaires, ni opérateurs. Nous ne contrôlons, ne
   recommandons et ne cautionnons pas le contenu, les produits, les
   services, les politiques de confidentialité ou les pratiques de ces
   sites Web tiers. Vous noterez par exemple sur nos Sites la présence
   d’icônes que vous pouvez cliquer pour accéder à la page Facebook ou
   LinkedIn d’Outbrain. Si vous choisissez de cliquer sur ces liens, vous
   devez savoir que Facebook et LinkedIn peuvent déposer leurs propres
   cookies sur votre appareil et collecter indépendamment des données
   personnelles. Il est donc important que vous lisiez les politiques de
   confidentialité de Facebook et/ou de LinkedIn.
     * Veuillez aussi consulter la section Partage de la présente
       Politique de confidentialité.

   (d) Vos droits
   Les Conditions d’utilisation sur notre Site régissent l’utilisation de
   notre Site et s’appliquent également à vous. Vous pouvez cesser
   d’utiliser notre Site à tout moment. Dans ce cas, vous souhaiterez
   peut-être aussi supprimer tout cookie placé sur les appareils, quels
   qu’ils soient, utilisés pour accéder à notre Site. Si, en cours
   d’utilisation de nos Sites vous avez fourni une adresse e-mail, chaque
   e-mail que vous recevez de la part d’Outbrain comporte une option de
   désabonnement (« unsubscribe »).
   Pour les visiteurs provenant des pays Européens, Outbrain a installé
   sur ses sites une CMP - plateforme de gestion du consentement - opérée
   par One Trust, qui donne aux utilisateurs la possibilité de consentir,
   ou non, à la dépose de cookies et autres technologies de ciblage. En
   accédant à nos sites, vous verrez une bannière située en bas de page
   donnant des informations sur les cookies que nous utilisons. Vous
   pouvez cliquer sur cette bannière pour supprimer les cookies, à
   l’exception de ceux strictement nécessaires. Le fait de cliquer sur
   “Accept” dans la bannière, de poursuivre votre navigation ou de cliquer
   dans un lien sur nos sites est une indication de votre consentement.
   Utilisateurs: Vous êtes un Utilisateur si vous visitez la page d’un
   site ou une application d’un des partenaires d’Outbrain sur laquelle
   est installée le widget Outbrain (les « Sites de partenaires »). Si
   vous vous rendez par exemple sur https://news.sky.com/uk,
   www.spiegel.de ou www.cnn.com, le widget Outbrain est installé sur ces
   sites Web. Les mentions référençant Outbrain (ex : « Recommandé par
   Outbrain », « by Outbrain » à côté des recommandations) vous indiquent
   la présence d’un widget Outbrain. Si vous cliquez sur le lien de la
   référence Outbrain, vous visualiserez une notification détaillée qui
   vous permettra de vous rendre sur le Portail des Centres d’Intérêt
   Outbrain, qui vous donne une vision globale des types de catégories de
   données que nous pouvons utiliser pour faire les recommandations. Ce
   portail vous donne également la possibilité d’opter pour une demande
   d’exclusion des recommandations personnalisées (« opt-out »). Voir plus
   ici.
   Exemple de widget Outbrain
   [SJ4v1w7y7.png]
   (a) Quelles informations collectons-nous et pourquoi ?
   Nous utilisons les UUID, l’adresse IP et autres informations d’usage
   afin de proposer des recommandations intéressantes aux utilisateurs.
   Les recommandations d’Outbrain peuvent être payées par un annonceur
   pour vous mettre en relation avec un nouveau site Web. Elles peuvent
   également être organiques avec un lien vers une autre page du site Web
   du même éditeur.
     * UUID.

   Quand vous consultez un Site de Partenaire (ex : CNN.com) en tant
   qu’Utilisateur pour la première fois, Outbrain dépose un cookie sur
   votre appareil afin de générer un UUID (identifiant utilisateur
   unique). Nous cataloguons et analysons le contenu que vous parcourez
   sur les Sites de Partenaires. Nos recommandations se basent sur : (i)
   l’historique de navigation ; (ii) les profils de consommation
   similaires d’autres Utilisateurs ; (ii) les recommandations
   généralement populaires auprès des utilisateurs d’Outbrain ; (iv)
   quelques données aléatoires, et (v) les exigences de ciblage
   éventuellement fournies ou demandées par nos clients Amplify. À titre
   d’exemple, Outbrain peut savoir que l’UUID 123 (cela pourrait être vous
   sur votre iPhone X lisant le Guardian en utilisant Chrome comme
   navigateur) aime lire des articles sur les voyages et que les personnes
   qui aiment lire ce type d’article aiment aussi les contenus sur la
   nourriture exotique.
   L’UUID est une séquence de chiffres et/ou de lettres. Cet UUID est
   associé à votre appareil et varie en fonction du navigateur que vous
   utilisez. Autrement dit, Outbrain enregistre un UUID différent selon le
   navigateur et/ou appareil que vous utilisez pour accéder aux Sites de
   Partenaires. Ceci signifie que vous aurez par exemple un UUID quand
   vous consultez un Site de Partenaire depuis votre téléphone portable
   avec le navigateur Safari et un autre UUID pour la consultation d’un
   Site de Partenaire depuis votre iPad avec le navigateur Safari.
   Outbrain va combiner et consolider l’UUID depuis un appareil mobile
   (portatif ou tablette) et un navigateur qui accède ensuite à
   l’application (ou vice versa) à partir du même appareil.
   L’affectation d’un UUID permet à Outbrain d’associer les pages vues et
   les clics sur les recommandations d’Outbrain à partir de cet UUID, avec
   pour objectif de vous proposer des recommandations intéressantes et
   pertinentes en fonction de vos centres d’intérêt.
     * Adresse IP et autres informations d’usage.

   Nous recueillons l’UUID comme expliqué précédemment, nous collectons
   également les informations suivantes : (i) l’adresse IP (puis rendus
   anonymes selon les normes de l'industrie); ; (ii) les données agent
   utilisateur : le type d’appareil (ex : iPhone) ; le type de navigateur
   (ex : Chrome), le système d’exploitation (ex : iOS) ; (iii) les pages
   visitées ; (iv) l’heure de visite ; et (v) les URL correspondantes et
   autres informations normalement transmises dans les requêtes HTTP.
   Les informations statistiques ci-dessus nous donnent des informations
   sur le nombre d’Utilisateurs consultant une page spécifique sur les
   Sites de Partenaires sur lesquels le widget Outbrain est installé, le
   temps que chaque Utilisateur a passé sur cette page, le type de contenu
   sur lequel ils ont cliqué et la manière générale dont ils ont interagi
   avec cette page. Ces informations ne constituent des informations
   personnelles que quand elles sont associées à un UUID.
   (b) Quels cookies et autres technologies similaires utilisons-nous ?
   Veuillez consulter la Table des cookies sous « Utilisateurs » pour une
   liste détaillée des cookies propriétaires que nous utilisons quand vous
   interagissez avec des Sites de Partenaires où la technologie Outbrain
   est mise en œuvre.
   Si vous cliquez sur le lien d’une de nos recommandations, l’annonceur
   Amplify qui sponsorise la recommandation est susceptible de placer des
   cookies sur votre appareil lors de la redirection avant d’arriver sur
   la page de destination ou en atteignant la page de destination. Dans de
   tels cas, vous serez soumis à la politique de confidentialité de
   l’annonceur.
   En complément du widget visible d’Outbrain sur nos Sites de
   Partenaires, certains annonceurs Outbrain peuvent installer le pixel
   Outbrain sur leurs sites Web. Le pixel Outbrain détermine si
   l’utilisateur qui atteint la page où le pixel est installé a un UUID
   Outbrain. S’il existe un UUID associé avec un utilisateur final,
   Outbrain permet aux annonceurs de recibler ces UUID et/ou leur donne le
   nombre total d’UUID ayant atteint cette page. S’il n’existe pas d’UUID
   Outbrain sur la page, le pixel Outbrain ne collecte aucune information
   sur l’utilisateur.
   Nous encourageons les annonceurs à divulguer l’utilisation du pixel
   Outbrain sur leurs propres sites Web. Outbrain ne combine aucune
   information pixel avec le profil d’un UUID.
   Les indicateurs sur la visualisation des pages ou les clics reliés à un
   UUID en particulier sont conservés pour une durée de 13 mois. Par
   exemple, si l’UUID 123 lit un article le 31 décembre 2017, cet article
   ne fera plus partie du profil de l’UUID 123 le 1 ^er février 2018.
   (c) Comment sommes-nous susceptibles de partager les informations ?
   Outbrain ne partage pas de profils d’Utilisateurs avec des tiers, quels
   qu’ils soient. Cependant, nous sommes susceptibles de partager l’UUID
   avec certains partenaires à des fins de synchronisation des cookies ou
   en raison d’exigences techniques. Veuillez également consulter la
   section Partage de la présente Politique de confidentialité.
   (d) Vos droits
   Demande d’exclusion (« opt-out ») d’Outbrain. Vous pouvez demander
   votre exclusion des recommandations personnalisées à tout moment.
   Veuillez consulter également le Profil d’intérêts d’Outbrain pour une
   vue générale des données qu’Outbrain connaît à votre sujet et peut
   utiliser pour faire ses recommandations. Le Profil d’intérêts vous
   donne également la possibilité d’ opter pour une exclusion des
   recommandations personnalisées (vous pouvez également demander une
   exclusion (“opt-out”) en cliquant ici). Veuillez noter que cette
   demande d’exclusion pour les navigateurs se fait par le Profil
   d’intérêts d’Outbrain, mais qu’elle se fait via les paramètres de votre
   appareil pour les applications (vous trouverez des exemples d’étapes à
   suivre dans le Profil d’intérêts).
   REMARQUE IMPORTANTE – même si vous avez opté pour une exclusion
   d’Outbrain,
     * vous continuerez à voir des recommandations Outbrain. Le fait de
       demander votre exclusion du suivi personnalisé d’Outbrain ne
       signifie pas que vous cesserez de recevoir des recommandations
       d’Outbrain. Cela signifie que les recommandations d’Outbrain ne
       seront pas personnalisées. Les recommandations continueront à
       utiliser les informations sur la page que vous êtes en train de
       parcourir (c.-à-d. les informations contextuelles) pour vous
       proposer des recommandations sur cette page.

     * L’exclusion de recommandations personnalisées est fondée sur les
       cookies et spécifique à un appareil/navigateur. Si vous naviguez
       sur Internet depuis plusieurs appareils et/ou navigateurs, vous
       devrez demander l’exclusion pour chaque appareil et/ou navigateur
       pour garantir que nous empêchons un suivi de personnalisation sur
       tous. Pour la même raison, si vous achetez un nouvel appareil,
       changez de navigateurs ou supprimez (ou effacez) le cookie
       d’exclusion, vous devrez procéder de nouveau à votre demande
       d’exclusion. Demander l’exclusion du suivi de personnalisation
       n’est pas la même chose que bloquer les cookies.

     * Pour garantir la suppression du profil lié à votre UUID, ne
       procédez pas à l’opération inverse (demande d’inclusion ou « opt-in
       » d’Outbrain) pendant au moins 21 jours. Votre demande d’exclusion
       des recommandations personnalisées d’Outbrain prend effet
       immédiatement. Cependant, si votre navigateur autorise un stockage
       local, et si vous demandez votre inclusion des recommandations
       personnalisées dans les 21 jours suivant votre demande d’exclusion,
       il est possible que votre profil antérieur soit reconnecté à votre
       UUID. Si vous ne procédez pas à une nouvelle demande d’inclusion
       dans les 21 jours, votre profil sera supprimé et ne pourra pas être
       récupéré.

     * Comme pour la plupart des cookies opt-out, le processus d’opt-out
       Outbrain sur navigateur s'appuie sur un cookie. Le cookie opt-out
       est destiné à être persistant afin d'honorer les préférences de
       l'utilisateur. Cependant, la fonction "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention" pour IPhone de l'iOS11 peut avoir un impact sur la
       persistance des cookies sur les sites Web qui affichent une fenêtre
       de 24 heures. Nous vous suggérons d'utiliser un autre navigateur ou
       d'envisager de bloquer tous les cookies d'une tierce partie du
       navigateur afin que vous soyez « désactivés » sans avoir besoin de
       vous fier à la méthode d'exclusion d’autres entreprises.

     * Options complémentaires d’exclusion. Vous pouvez également demander
       votre exclusion de la réception de publicités personnalisées de
       notre part ou de celle d’autres sociétés publicitaires à l’aide
       d’outils fournis par l’industrie comme la NAI ou des pages basées
       sur la DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices ; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices, et/ou EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
       En vous rendant sur les pages dédiées à la gestion des préférences
       consommateur de la NAI, la DAA, la DACC (Alliance de la publicité
       numérique du Canada) ou de l’EDAA, vous pourrez refuser tout ou
       partie des services de leurs membres. Comme dans le cas de
       l’exclusion pour Outbrain, ces retraits ne signifient pas que vous
       ne recevrez plus aucune publicité, mais les publicités que vous
       recevrez ne seront plus personnalisées. Vous êtes susceptible de
       continuer à recevoir des publicités, par exemple basées sur le site
       Web en particulier que vous êtes en train de consulter (c.-à-d. des
       publicités liées au contexte). Par ailleurs, si vos navigateurs
       sont configurés pour rejeter les cookies quand vous visitez les
       pages du consommateur de la DAA, de la DAAC ou de l’EDAA, votre
       exclusion (ou retrait) peut ne pas être effective.

     * Base juridique. La base juridique d’Outbrain pour le traitement des
       données personnelles d’un Utilisateur se fonde sur la base
       juridique déterminée par chacun des Sites de Partenaires. Chaque
       Site de Partenaire s’appuiera sur le consentement ou l’intérêt
       légitime. Veuillez consulter la politique de confidentialité
       applicable des Sites de Partenaires pour plus d’informations sur
       leurs bases juridiques. Si un Partenaire s’appuie sur le
       consentement, Outbrain ne déposera pas de cookie sur votre appareil
       si vous n’avez pas donné votre consentement sur le Site de
       Partenaire concerné.

   Partenaires commerciaux: Vous êtes un Partenaire commercial si vous
   vous inscrivez (ou échangez des e-mails avec Outbrain) au nom de la
   société dans laquelle vous travaillez pour l’utilisation des services
   Outbrain Amplify ou Outbrain Engage. Voir plus ici.
   (a) Quelles informations collectons-nous et pourquoi ?
   Vous êtes susceptible de fournir certaines données personnelles (par
   exemple une adresse e-mail) quand vous signez pour des services Amplify
   ou Engage, ou communiquez ou interagissez avec nous d’une autre
   manière. Si vous demandez à devenir Partenaire, nous sommes
   susceptibles de vous demander des informations complémentaires sous
   forme de formulaires de candidature annonceur, d’ordres d’insertion ou
   autres. Nous collectons automatiquement les informations sur vos
   actions liées à votre nom d’utilisateur dans le tableau de bord
   Outbrain. Par exemple, si vous changez, en tant que Partenaire Amplify,
   le coût-par-clic d’une de vos campagnes, la piste d’audit d’Outbrain
   gardera un enregistrement de toutes ces actions.
   Nous collectons et traitons les données personnelles ci-dessus afin de
   remplir nos obligations au titre de notre accord avec un Partenaire (ou
   Partenaire potentiel), notamment pour :
     * Répondre à vos questions et demandes.

     * Donner accès à certaines fonctions et fonctionnalités de nos
       services Amplify et Engage (par exemple pour fournir et tenir à
       jour le compte de votre tableau de bord).

     * Vérifier votre identité.

     * Communiquer avec vous sur votre compte, nos produits et les
       promotions disponibles compte tenu de votre utilisation du service
       Amplify ou Engage.

   (b) Quels cookies et autres technologies similaires utilisons-nous ?
   Veuillez consulter la Table des cookies sous « Partenaires commerciaux
   » pour une liste détaillée des cookies (et de leurs périodes de
   conservation associées) que nous utilisons avec les Partenaires.
   (c) Comment sommes-nous susceptibles de partager les informations ?
   Nous sommes susceptibles de divulguer certaines informations de
   Partenaires aux prestataires, sous-traitants ou autres, contribuant à
   la prestation des services Outbrain (ex : traitement des cartes de
   crédit). Veuillez aussi consulter la section Partage de la présente
   Politique de confidentialité.
   (d) Vos droits
   Si, en tant que Partenaire, vous souhaitez vérifier, corriger, mettre à
   jour ou demander la désactivation de vos informations, rendez-vous sur
   le tableau de bord Outbrain pour modifier vos préférences de profil ou
   contactez-nous à l’adresse support@outbrain.com. Si vous recevez des
   e-mails Outbrain, vous pouvez vous « désabonner » en utilisant le lien
   présent dans chaque e-mail. Veuillez noter que le désabonnement ne vous
   exclura pas de recevoir des notifications considérées comme critiques
   dans la fourniture de services Amplify ou Engage (ex : factures par
   e-mail).
   La base juridique du traitement des données personnelles de nos
   Partenaires commerciaux est l’intérêt légitime.
   3. Comment sécurisons-nous les informations ; les transferts en dehors
   de l’EEE ; le partage et les durées de conservation

                                      +

   Sécurité
   Outbrain dispose d’une équipe de sécurité dédiée. Nous mettons en œuvre
   des contrôles stricts sur les données que nous collectons, en les
   conservant dans des bases de données sécurisées et protégées par des
   pare-feu avec des droits d’accès contrôlés et limités afin de garantir
   leur sécurité. Veuillez consulter nos normes de sécurité pour de plus
   amples informations.
   Les Partenaires commerciaux ont un accès protégé par mot de passe à
   certaines fonctionnalités du service Amplify ou Engage. Ils ont la
   responsabilité de préserver la confidentialité de ce mot de passe. Il
   est néanmoins nécessaire de rappeler que la transmission d’informations
   par Internet n’est malheureusement pas complètement sécurisée. Une des
   fraudes classiques sur Internet est connue sous le nom d’usurpation
   d’identité électronique (« spoofing ») ou hameçonnage (« phishing »).
   Ceci se produit quand vous recevez un e-mail d’une source apparemment
   légitime vous demandant de lui fournir des données personnelles. Sachez
   que nous ne vous enverrons aucun e-mail vous demandant de vérifier un
   numéro de carte de crédit, des informations bancaires ou toutes autres
   données personnelles. S’il vous arrivait de recevoir un e-mail
   apparemment de notre part et vous demandant de nous fournir de telles
   informations, n’y répondez pas et ne cliquez sur aucun lien
   apparaissant dans ce message électronique. Veuillez plutôt nous
   transférer l’e-mail à l’adresse legal@outbrain.com, et nous mènerons
   des enquêtes sur d’éventuelles fraudes sur Internet.
   Transferts des données en dehors de l’UE/EEE
   Lorsque nous transférons des données personnelles de l’Espace
   économique européen vers d’autres pays dans lesquels les lois
   applicables n’offrent pas le même niveau de protection de
   confidentialité des données que les pays européens, nous prenons des
   mesures pour fournir un niveau approprié de protection de la
   confidentialité des données. En d’autres termes, vos droits et
   protections perdurent avec vos données. Nous utilisons par exemple des
   clauses contractuelles approuvées et d’autres mesures conçues pour
   garantir que les destinataires de vos données personnelles les
   protègent.
   Partage
   En complément de la description de la manière dont nous sommes
   susceptibles de divulguer vos données personnelles pour chaque type
   d’utilisateur, nous pouvons également divulguer les données
   personnelles comme suit :
     * Au sein de la famille des sociétés contrôlées par Outbrain pour des
       raisons internes, particulièrement pour des objectifs liés aux
       activités et au fonctionnement de l’entreprise ;

     * Si nous faisons face à une évolution de notre entreprise, comme une
       fusion, l’acquisition d’une autre société, ou la vente de tout ou
       partie de nos actifs, vos données personnelles sont susceptibles de
       faire partie des actifs transférés ;

     * En cas d’exigences légales le demandant (par exemple pour coopérer
       dans le cadre d’investigations sur la mise en application de la
       législation ou autres procédures légales) ; et/ou

     * Pour répondre à une urgence qualifiée.

   Par ailleurs, nous combinons vos données personnelles avec celles
   d’autres utilisateurs afin de partager des informations sur les
   tendances et agréger des statistiques d’utilisation avec des tiers,
   toujours sous forme agrégée et anonyme.
   Conservation des données
   La période de conservation pour chacun des cookies qu’Outbrain utilise
   (les siens propres ou au nom de tiers) est définie dans la Table des
   cookies.
   Outbrain tient également à jour une Politique de conservation des
   données qui détaille la période de conservation pour les données
   personnelles sur la base de notre analyse de la durée raisonnable de
   conservation nécessaire de données particulières pour des raisons
   légales ou opérationnelles. Quand nous n’avons plus besoin des données
   personnelles, nous les effaçons ou les supprimons de manière sécurisée.
   Les données agrégées, qui ne permettent pas d’identifier un
   appareil/navigateur (ou un individu) et sont utilisées pour des
   objectifs de reporting et d’analyse, sont conservées aussi longtemps
   que commercialement nécessaire.
   4. Enfants

                                      +

   Aucun de nos services n’est destiné à des enfants de moins de 16 ans.
   Nous ne recueillons pas sciemment de données personnelles auprès
   d’enfants âgés de moins de 16 ans. Si nous réalisons en cours de
   collecte qu’un Visiteur du site, un Utilisateur ou un Partenaire
   commercial a moins de 16 ans, nous n’utiliserons ni ne conserverons ses
   données personnelles. Si nous réalisons que nous avons involontairement
   collecté des données personnelles auprès d’un enfant de moins de 16
   ans, nous prendrons alors les mesures raisonnables pour supprimer ces
   informations de nos registres.
   5. Citoyens européens

                                      +

   Conformément aux lois européennes sur le respect de la vie privée, en
   particulier le Règlement général sur la protection des données (RGPD),
   Outbrain octroie des droits particuliers complémentaires aux citoyens
   des pays européens, comme le droit d’accès aux données, le droit de
   rectification, le droit d’opposition, le droit de porter réclamation,
   le droit à l’effacement et le droit de blocage. Plus spécifiquement :
     * Le droit de demander des informations sur l’utilisation ou non que
       nous faisons de données personnelles, et si oui, lesquelles, et le
       droit de demander la rectification ou la modification de ces
       données personnelles.
     * Dans certaines conditions, le droit de demander la suppression de
       données personnelles.
     * Dans certaines conditions, le droit de demander la limitation du
       traitement des données personnelles.
     * Le droit de retirer votre consentement à l’utilisation et au
       traitement de vos données, intégralement ou partiellement, à tout
       moment, avec effet futur.
     * Le droit d’obtenir vos données personnelles dans un format
       compréhensible, structuré et lisible.
     * La possibilité de contacter le délégué à la protection des données
       (« DPO ») pour toute question, commentaire, réclamation ou demande
       en lien avec notre déclaration sur la protection des données et le
       traitement de vos données personnelles.
     * Le droit de vous plaindre auprès de l’autorité de contrôle si vous
       êtes persuadé que le traitement de vos données personnelles
       constitue une violation de la législation.

   En complément des droits ci-dessus, nous référençons certains droits
   pour les citoyens des pays européens dans cette Politique de
   confidentialité. Conformément au RGPD, nous entendons par citoyens des
   « pays européens » les citoyens de l’Espace économique européen (EEE)
   et de la Suisse. Aux fins de cette Politique de confidentialité, le
   terme « pays européens » continuera d’inclure le Royaume-Uni, même
   après son départ de l’Espace économique européen suite au Brexit.
   Merci d’envoyer un mail à privacyquestions@outbrain.com pour toutes
   questions relatives à l’exercice des droits mentionnés ci-dessus.
   6. Droits au respect de la vie privée en Californie

                                      +

   Conformément au Code civil de Californie, articles 1798.83-1798.84, les
   résidents californiens ont le droit de nous demander une note décrivant
   les catégories d’informations personnelles que nous partageons avec des
   tiers et sociétés affiliées à des fins de marketing direct desdits
   tiers ou sociétés. Cette note indiquera les catégories d’informations
   partagées et inclura la liste des tiers et sociétés affiliées avec
   lesquels nous les partageons, avec leur nom et adresse. Si vous résidez
   en Californie et souhaitez une copie de cette note, veuillez en faire
   la demande par écrit à PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou l’envoyer à
   l’adresse suivante : Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New
   York, NY 10011, USA. Veuillez nous accorder 30 jours pour vous
   répondre.
   7. Dispositions « Do Not Track » (non-traçage)

                                      +

   Certains navigateurs transmettent des signaux refusant le traçage de
   données (« do not track ») aux sites Web. Outbrain ne procède
   actuellement à aucune altération, modification ou réponse aux demandes
   ou signaux de non-traçage de ces navigateurs car il n’existe pas de
   compréhension commune sur la manière d’interpréter les signaux de
   non-traçage. Nous continuerons de suivre l’activité du secteur dans ce
   domaine et réévaluerons nos pratiques de non-traçage si nécessaire. En
   attendant, vous pouvez utiliser la gamme d’autres outils que nous vous
   proposons pour contrôler la collecte et l’utilisation des données,
   notamment la possibilité de demander l’exclusion de la réception de
   recommandations personnalisées (« opt-out ») dans la section
   Utilisateurs.
   8. Les modifications qui pourraient être apportées à cette Politique de
   confidentialité

                                      +

   Nous sommes susceptibles de modifier cette Politique de confidentialité
   de manière ponctuelle. Nous afficherons clairement une notification que
   vous pourrez voir en tant que Visiteur du site ou Partenaire
   commercial, mais nous n’avons pas de moyen d’informer les Utilisateurs
   d’une mise à jour. Nous vous conseillons de régulièrement vérifier ici
   si la Politique de confidentialité a été mise à jour. Nous indiquerons
   toujours la date de dernière modification de la Politique de
   confidentialité en haut de la page afin que vous puissiez savoir quand
   elle a été révisée pour la dernière fois.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                      Ultimo aggiornamento: 23 maggio 2018

   Outbrain si impegna a proteggere i tuoi dati personali. La presente
   politica sulla privacy (“Politica sulla privacy ”) disciplina
   l'utilizzo da parte di Outbrain dei dati raccolti da noi, ivi inclusi
   tutti i dati personali. I dati personali sono informazioni che si
   riferiscono a te e possono identificarti come individuo. Utilizziamo i
   tuoi dati personali in linea con tutte le leggi applicabili. Al fine di
   garantire il rispetto e l'allineamento con i valori di Outbrain in
   materia di fiducia e trasparenza, disponiamo di team di esperti di
   privacy responsabili dell'implementazione continua del nostro programma
   di privacy globale.

                                                           + ESPANDI TUTTO

   1. Chi siamo, Cosa facciamo, Come contattare Outbrain, il nostro RPD o
   le autorità competenti

                                      +

   Chi siamo:
   Outbrain indica Outbrain Inc., un'azienda del Delaware (USA) con sede a
   New York; e le sue partecipate (collettivamente, “Outbrain,” o "noi",
   "ci", "nostro"). Operiamo da 12 uffici a livello globale e collaboriamo
   con editori e operatori di mercato in tutto il mondo.
   Cosa facciamo:
   La mission di Outbrain consiste nel fornire ai suoi utenti contenuti
   interessanti basati sui loro interessi. Per realizzare la nostra
   mission stipuliamo accordi con:
     * editori e partner online che desiderano raccomandare contenuti
       pertinenti ai loro lettori (si tratta del servizio Outbrain
       Engage); e

     * inserzionisti che desiderano che i lettori visualizzino i loro
       contenuti (si tratta del servizio Outbrain Amplify).

   Come contattarci
   Esaminiamo regolarmente il nostro rispetto della presente politica
   sulla privacy. Domande, commenti e richieste riguardanti la presente
   politica sulla privacy sono apprezzati e vanno indirizzati a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oppure all'indirizzo postale: Outbrain
   Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Qualora Outbrain non risponda in maniera soddisfacente alle tue domande
   o preoccupazioni, puoi altresì contattare i seguenti riferimenti per
   informazioni, supporto o reclami:
     * Responsabile esterno della protezione dei dati di Outbrain ("RPD"):
       ePrivacy GmbH, rappresentata dal Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. È
       possibile contattare direttamente ePrivacy GmbH all'indirizzo:
       privacy@eprivacy.eu; e/o
     * l'Information Commissioner’s Officer, che è la principale autorità
       di controllo su Outbrain all'interno dei Territori europei.

   Organismi di autoregolamentazione
   Outbrain aderisce ai principi di autoregolamentazione stabiliti da
   Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) e da European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Siamo soci in regola della Network
   Advertising Initiative (NAI), un'associazione dedicata alla raccolta
   responsabile di dati e al loro utilizzo per la pubblicità digitale.
   Aderiamo al Codice di condotta NAI per il settore Web e Mobile.
   Outbrain aderisce altresì ai principi di autoregolamentazione
   dell'Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) per la pubblicità
   comportamentale online e al framework di IAB Europa per la pubblicità
   comportamentale online.
   2. Tipi di utente Outbrain (compresa la gestione delle opzioni di Opt
   Out)

                                      +

   Gran parte della presente politica sulla privacy è suddivisa in sezioni
   in base al modo in cui è possibile interagire con Outbrain. Ti
   preghiamo di stabilire quale tipo di utente sei, in quanto, per ogni
   tipo di utente abbiamo spiegato quali informazioni raccogliamo e
   perché, quali cookie e altre tecnologie analoghe utilizziamo, come
   condividiamo tali informazioni e i tuoi diritti.
   Visitatori del sito: Sei un visitatore del sito quando visiti e
   interagisci con i nostri siti web, le nostre pagine web, le funzioni
   interattive, i blog e i loro rispettivi contenuti disponibili
   all'indirizzo Outbrain.com (o qualsiasi sua derivazione, come
   Outbrain.co.uk; Outbrain.fr; outbrain.de, ecc.) e MyOutbrain.com (“I
   nostri siti“). Vedi di più qui.
   (a) Quali informazioni raccogliamo e perché
   Desideriamo capire quali servizi sui nostri siti ti interessino e
   desideriamo ricordarti i servizi che offriamo quando non sei sui nostri
   siti. Per fare questo, raccogliamo le seguenti informazioni su di te:
   (i) indirizzo IP; (ii) dati dell'agente utente: tipo di dispositivo (ad
   es. iPhone), tipo di browser (ad es. Chrome), sistema operativo (ad es.
   iOS); (iii) le pagine visitate sul nostro sito (ad es. la pagina "Chi
   siamo" di Outbrain); (iv) l'orario della visita (e il fuso orario
   corrispondente); nonché (v) le URL di riferimento e altre informazioni
   normalmente trasmesse nelle richieste HTTP (ad esempio, queste
   informazioni ci dicono come sei arrivato sui nostri siti).
   (b) Quali cookie e altre tecnologie simili utilizziamo
   Ti rimandiamo a questa Tabella dei cookie alla sezione "Visitatori del
   sito" per un elenco dettagliato dei cookie (e dei relativi periodi di
   conservazione) che utilizziamo quando visiti i nostri siti.
   (c) Come possiamo condividere le informazioni
     * Condivisione delle informazioni che acquisiamo su di te sui nostri
       siti.

   In generale, non condividiamo i tuoi dati personali con terzi per
   finalità di pubblicità o marketing di terzi. Tuttavia, ricorriamo a
   vari terzi (ciascuno elencato nella Tabella dei cookie) affinché ci
   aiutino a svolgere attività di commercializzazione o pubblicità nei
   tuoi confronti. Ad esempio, alcuni dei cookie che utilizziamo sui
   nostri siti appartengono a terzi che aiuteranno Outbrain a svolgere
   attività di commercializzazione o pubblicità nei tuoi confronti.
   Richiediamo a tali parti e società terze di acconsentire a mantenere
   riservate tutte le informazioni condivise con loro e a utilizzare tali
   informazioni esclusivamente per adempiere ai loro obblighi nei nostri
   confronti. Facciamo ciò stipulando accordi con tutti i terzi che
   trattano dati personali per nostro conto in maniera da garantire che
   trattino i tuoi dati personali in conformità con le nostre severe
   istruzioni e tutte le leggi applicabili in materia di protezione dei
   dati. Se pubblichi un post sul nostro blog, i tuoi commenti e le tue
   informazioni saranno disponibili al pubblico. Contatta
   support@outbrain.com per rimuovere il tuo commento.
     * Utilizzo di servizi di terzi sui nostri siti.

   I nostri siti contengono collegamenti ad altri siti web che non sono di
   nostra proprietà o gestiti da noi. Non controlliamo, raccomandiamo o
   approviamo il contenuto, i prodotti, i servizi, le politiche sulla
   privacy o le pratiche di tali siti web di terzi. Ad esempio, sui nostri
   siti noterai icone cliccabili che ti condurranno alla pagina Facebook
   di Outbrain o alla pagina LinkedIn di Outbrain. Se scegli di fare click
   su tali collegamenti, devi sapere che Facebook e LinkedIn potrebbero
   inviare i propri cookie al tuo dispositivo e potrebbero raccogliere
   dati personali in maniera indipendente. Di conseguenza è importante che
   tu legga le politiche sulla privacy di Facebook e/o LinkedIn.
     * Consulta anche la sezione Condivisione della presente politica
       sulla privacy.

   (d) I tuoi diritti
   Le Condizioni d'uso presenti sul nostro sito disciplinano l'uso del
   nostro sito e si applicano anche a te. Puoi smettere di usare il nostro
   sito in qualsiasi momento. Se lo fai, puoi altresì desiderare rimuovere
   tutti i cookie che abbiamo inserito su qualsiasi dispositivo utilizzato
   per accedere al nostro sito. Se durante l'utilizzo dei nostri siti hai
   fornito il tuo indirizzo e-mail, qualsiasi e-mail che ricevi da
   Outbrain include un'opzione di "annullamento dell'iscrizione"
   (unsubscribe).
   Per gli utenti dei Territori europei, Outbrain ha implementato una
   piattaforma di gestione del consenso (gestita da One Trust ) sui nostri
   siti che offre ai visitatori l'opportunità di acconsentire, o meno, a
   cookie e tecnologie di tracciamento simili sui nostri siti. Accedendo
   ai nostri siti, vedrai un banner nella parte inferiore della pagina con
   informazioni sui cookie che utilizziamo. È possibile fare click sul
   banner per rifiutare tutti i cookie che non sono strettamente
   necessari. Premendo "accetta" sul banner o scorrendo / facendo click
   sui nostri siti è un'indicazione della tua accettazione. Di
   conseguenza, la base legale di Outbrain per il trattamento dei dati
   personali sui nostri siti è il consenso. Puoi ritirare il tuo consenso
   in qualsiasi momento cliccando qui.
   Utenti: Sei un utente se visiti una pagina di un sito web o di
   un'applicazione di uno dei partner di Outbrain nelle quali è installato
   il widget Outbrain (“Siti partner”). Ad esempio, se visiti
   https://news.sky.com/uk, www.corriere.it il widget Outbrain è
   implementato su tali siti web. Sai che stai interagendo con un widget
   Outbrain quando vedi del testo che fa riferimento a Outbrain (ad
   esempio "Recommended by Outbrain", "by Outbrain" accanto ai contenuti).
   Se fai click sul riferimento contenente il collegamento ipertestuale a
   Outbrain, visualizzerai una informativa dettagliata che ti consentirà
   di raggiungere il Profilo di interesse di Outbrain, che fornisce una
   visualizzazione generale dei tipi di categorie di dati di Outbrain che
   quest'ultima può utilizzare per formulare le sue raccomandazioni.
   Inoltre, ti dà la possibilità di rinunciare a ricevere contenuti
   personalizzati. Vedi di più qui.
   Esempio di un widget Outbrain
   [S1q4BIXJQ.png]
   (a) Quali informazioni raccogliamo e perché
   Usiamo UUID, indirizzo IP e altre informazioni di utilizzo in maniera
   da poter offrire contenuti interessanti. Le raccomandazioni di Outbrain
   possono essere pagate da un inserzionista che ti collega a un nuovo
   sito web oppure possono essere organiche, nel qual caso il collegamento
   rinvia a un'altra pagina sullo stesso sito web dell'editore.
     * UUID.

   Quando in veste di Utente visiti per la prima volta un Sito partner (ad
   esempio, CNN.com), Outbrain deposita un cookie sul dispositivo al fine
   di generare un UUID (un identificativo utente univoco). Cataloghiamo e
   analizziamo i contenuti che consumi attraverso i Siti partner. Le
   nostre raccomandazioni si basano su: (i) cronologia di navigazione;
   (ii) modelli di navigazione simili di altri Utenti; (ii)
   raccomandazioni di contenuto che sono in genere popolari presso il
   pubblico di Outbrain in quel dato momento; (iv) un pizzico di casualità
   e (v) requisiti di targeting che possono essere forniti o richiesti dai
   nostri clienti Amplify. Ad esempio, Outbrain potrebbe sapere che l'UUID
   123 (che potresti essere tu che sul tuo iPhone X stai visitando il
   Guardian usando Chrome come browser) ama leggere di destinazioni di
   vacanza lontane e che alle persone che amano leggere delle medesime
   destinazioni di vacanza lontane piace leggere di cibi esotici.
   L'UUID è una sequenza di numeri e/o lettere. L'UUID viene associato al
   tuo dispositivo e varia in base al browser che utilizzi. In altre
   parole, Outbrain registra un UUID diverso a seconda del dispositivo e/o
   del browser che utilizzi per accedere ai Siti partner. Ad esempio, ciò
   significa che avrai un UUID quando visiti un Sito partner dal tuo
   telefono cellulare utilizzando Safari come browser e un UUID diverso
   quando visiti un Sito partner dal tuo iPad utilizzando Safari come
   browser. Outbrain combinerà e consoliderà un UUID da un dispositivo
   mobile (palmare o tablet) da un browser che accede quindi a
   un'applicazione (o viceversa) da quel medesimo dispositivo.
   L'assegnazione di un UUID consente a Outbrain di associare le
   visualizzazioni di pagina visitate e i click sulle raccomandazioni di
   Outbrain provenienti da tale UUID, il tutto con l'obiettivo di fornire
   contenuti interessanti.
     * Indirizzo IP e altre informazioni sull'utilizzo.

   Raccogliamo un UUID come spiegato sopra, inoltre raccogliamo le
   seguenti informazioni da te: (i) indirizzo IP (reso anonimo in base
   agli standard di settore) (ii) dati dell'agente utente: tipo di
   dispositivo (ad es. iPhone), tipo di browser (ad es. Chrome), sistema
   operativo (ad es. iOS); (iii) le pagine visitate; (iv) l'orario della
   visita; e (v) gli URL di riferimento e altre informazioni normalmente
   trasmesse nelle richieste HTTP.
   Le suddette informazioni statistiche ci forniscono informazioni su
   quanti Utenti hanno visitato una pagina specifica sui nostri Siti
   partner sui quali è installato il widget Outbrain, per quanto tempo
   ciascun Utente è rimasto su quella pagina, il tipo di contenuto su
   quella pagina sul quale hanno fatto click e, in generale, come hanno
   interagito con tale pagina. Queste informazioni costituiscono dati
   personali soltanto quando sono associati a un UUID.
   (b) Quali cookie e altre tecnologie simili utilizziamo
   Visita questa Tabella dei cookie nella sezione "Utenti" per un elenco
   dettagliato dei cookie proprietari che utilizziamo quando interagisci
   con i Siti partner nei quali è implementata la tecnologia Outbrain.
   Se fai click su un collegamento verso una delle nostre raccomndazioni,
   l'inserzionista Amplify che sponsorizza tale contenuto può installare
   cookie sul tuo dispositivo tramite reindirizzamenti prima che tu giunga
   alla pagina di destinazione della raccomandazione di contenuto o nel
   momento in cui raggiungi la pagina di destinazione. In tali casi sarai
   soggetto alla politica sulla privacy di tale inserzionista.
   Oltre al widget Outbrain visibile su Siti partner, alcuni inserzionisti
   di Outbrain possono implementare il pixel Outbrain sui loro siti web.
   Il pixel Outbrain determina se l'utente che raggiunge la pagina nella
   quale è installato il pixel dispone di un UUID Outbrain. Se esiste un
   UUID associato a tale utente finale, Outbrain consente agli
   inserzionisti di reindirizzare tali UUID e/o fornisce agli
   inserzionisti il numero totale di UUID che hanno raggiunto tale pagina.
   Se nessun UUID Outbrain ha visitato la pagina, il pixel Outbrain non
   raccoglie alcuna informazione sull'utente.
   Invitiamo gli inserzionisti a divulgare l'uso di pixel Outbrain sui
   propri siti web. Outbrain non combina le informazioni ottenute dal
   pixel con il profilo di un UUID.
   I punti dati come le visualizzazioni delle pagine e i click che sono
   collegati a un UUID specifico sono conservati per 13 mesi. Ad esempio,
   se l'UUID 123 legge un articolo il 31 dicembre 2017, il 1° febbraio
   2018 quell'articolo non farà più parte del profilo dell'UUID 123.
   (c) Come possiamo condividere le informazioni
   Outbrain non condivide i profili Utente con terzi. Tuttavia, potremmo
   condividere l'UUID con taluni partner per fini di sincronizzazione dei
   cookie oppure in base a requisiti tecnici. Consulta anche la sezione
   Condivisione della presente politica sulla privacy.
   (d) I tuoi diritti
     * Opt Out di Outbrain. Puoi rinunciare (opt-out) alle raccomandazioni
       di contenuto personalizzate di Outbrain in qualsiasi momento.
       Consulta il Profilo di interesse di Outbrain per una panoramica
       generale dei dati che Outbrain conosce su di te e può utilizzare
       per formulare le sue raccomandazioni. Il Profilo di interesse ti dà
       altresì la possibilità di decidere di rinunciare alle
       raccomandazioni personalizzate (puoi anche effettuare l’opt-out
       cliccando qui). Tieni presente che l'esclusione dei browser avviene
       tramite il Profilo di interesse di Outbrain, ma la rinuncia ai
       contenuti personalizzati nelle applicazioni avviene attraverso le
       impostazioni presenti sul tuo dispositivo (esempi di passaggi sono
       disponibili nel Profilo di interesse).

   IMPORTANTE – anche se hai rinunciato a usufruire di Outbrain:
     * Continuerai a visualizzare le raccomandazioni di Outbrain. La
       disattivazione del tracking per la personalizzazione di Outbrain
       non significa che non riceverai più raccomandazioni di contenuto da
       Outbrain. Piuttosto significa che non saranno personalizzate. Tali
       raccomandazioni continueranno a utilizzare le informazioni relative
       al documento che stai visualizzando (ad esempio informazioni
       contestuali) per fornirti consigli su quella pagina.

     * La rinuncia (opt-out) è basata su cookie ed è specifica del
       dispositivo/browser. Se navighi sul web da dispositivi e/o browser
       diversi, dovrai esprimere la rinuncia da ciascun dispositivo e/o
       browser per assicurarti di impedire il tracking per la
       personalizzazione su ciascuno di loro. Per lo stesso motivo, se
       acquisti un nuovo dispositivo, cambi browser o cancelli (o annulli)
       il cookie di rinuncia, dovrai esprimere nuovamente tale rinuncia.
       Rinunciare al tracking per la personalizzazione non equivale a
       bloccare i cookie.

     * Per garantire la cancellazione del profilo legato al tuo UUID, non
       attivare Outbrain per almeno 21 giorni. La tua rinuncia alle
       raccomandazioni personalizzate di Outbrain è efficace
       immediatamente. Tuttavia, se il tuo browser consente
       l'archiviazione locale e attivi le raccomandazioni di contenuto
       personalizzate di Outbrain entro 21 giorni dalla rinuncia, è
       possibile che il tuo profilo precedente venga riconnesso al tuo
       UUID. Se non effettui l'attivazione entro 21 giorni, il profilo
       verrà eliminato e non potrà essere ripristinato.

     * Come con la maggior parte dei casi di opt-out, anche l’opzione di
       opt-out del browser Outbrain si basa su un cookie. Il cookie di
       opt-out è inteso come persistente per rispettare le preferenze
       dell'utente. Tuttavia, la funzionalità di "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention" in iOS11 potrebbe avere un impatto sulla persistenza
       dei cookie nei siti web nelle 24 ore successive. Ti suggeriamo di
       utilizzare un altro browser o di bloccare tutti i cookie di terze
       parti dal browser in modo da essere "disattivato" senza dover
       ricorrere all'effettiva metodologia di opt-out di qualsiasi
       azienda.

     * Ulteriori opzioni di rinuncia (opt-out). Puoi anche esprimere la
       tua rinuncia a ricevere contenuti personalizzati offerti da noi o
       da altre agenzie pubblicitarie attraverso strumenti messi a
       disposizione dal settore come la NAI o le varie pagine basate su
       DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices, e/o EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
       Visitare le pagine delle scelte dei consumatori di NAI, DAA, DAAC o
       EDAA ti consente di rinunciare a tutti o parte dei servizi dei
       membri partecipanti. Come la funzione di opt out di Outbrain,
       queste rinunce non fanno sì che non riceverai più alcuna
       pubblicità, semplicemente gli annunci pubblicitari non saranno
       personalizzati per te. Puoi continuare a ricevere annunci
       pubblicitari, ad esempio, in base al sito web specifico che stai
       visualizzando (ossia annunci basati sul contesto). Inoltre, se i
       tuoi browser sono configurati per rifiutare i cookie quando visiti
       le pagine delle scelte dei consumatori DAA, DAAC o EDAA, la tua
       rinuncia potrebbe non essere efficace.

     * Base giuridica. La base giuridica di Outbrain per il trattamento
       dei dati personali dell'Utente si fonda sulla base giuridica
       determinata da ciascuno dei nostri Siti partner. Ciascun Sito
       partner si baserà sul consenso o sul legittimo interesse. Consulta
       la politica sulla privacy dei Siti partner per ulteriori
       informazioni sulla loro base giuridica. Se un Partner fa
       affidamento sul consenso, Outbrain non depositerà un cookie sul tuo
       dispositivo se non hai fornito il consenso su tale Sito partner.

   Partner commerciali: Sei un Partner commerciale quando ti registri (o
   invii un'e-mail a Outbrain) per conto dell'azienda per la quale lavori
   per utilizzare i servizi Outbrain Amplify o Outbrain Engage. Vedi di
   più qui.
   (a) Quali informazioni raccogliamo e perché
   Puoi fornire determinati dati personali (quali ad esempio indirizzo
   e-mail) quando ti registri per i servizi Amplify o Engage o altrimenti
   quando comunichi o interagisci con noi. Se presenti domanda per
   diventare un Partner commerciale, potremmo richiederti ulteriori
   informazioni tramite moduli di domanda dell'inserzionista, ordini di
   inserzione e altri moduli. Raccogliamo automaticamente informazioni in
   merito alle azioni del tuo nome utente nella dashboard di Outbrain. Ad
   esempio, in qualità di Partner commerciale Amplify, se modifichi il
   costo per click per una delle tue campagne, la traccia di controllo di
   Outbrain registrerà tutte queste azioni.
   Raccogliamo e trattiamo i dati personali di cui sopra al fine di
   adempiere ai nostri obblighi ai sensi del nostro accordo come Partner
   commerciale (o potenziale Partner commerciale) stipulato con voi, ivi
   incluso per:
     * rispondere alle tue domande e richieste;

     * fornirti accesso a determinate funzioni e caratteristiche dei
       nostri servizi Amplify o Engage (ad esempio per fornirti e
       mantenere il tuo account dashboard);

     * verificare la tua identità;

     * comunicare con te in merito al tuo account, ai nostri prodotti e
       alle promozioni disponibili pertinenti al tuo utilizzo del servizio
       Amplify o Engage.

   (b) Quali cookie e altre tecnologie simili utilizziamo
   Ti rimandiamo a questa Tabella dei cookie nella sezione "Partner
   commerciali" per un elenco dettagliato dei cookie (e dei relativi
   periodi di conservazione) che utilizziamo con i Partner commerciali.
   (c) Come possiamo condividere le informazioni con chiunque
   Potremmo divulgare determinate informazioni dei Business Partner a
   venditori, contraenti o altri soggetti che assistono Outbrain
   nell'erogazione dei servizi (ad es. trattamento delle carte di
   credito). Consulta anche la sezione Condivisione della presente
   politica sulla privacy.
   (d) I tuoi diritti
   Se in veste di Partner commerciale desideri verificare, correggere,
   aggiornare o richiedere la disattivazione delle tue informazioni, puoi
   accedere alla dashboard di Outbrain e modificare le preferenze del tuo
   profilo oppure contattarci all'indirizzo: support@outbrain.com. Se stai
   ricevendo e-mail di Outbrain, puoi "annullare l'iscrizione" a tale
   invio utilizzando un collegamento presente nell'e-mail. Nota:
   l'annullamento dell'iscrizione non comporta la rinuncia a ricevere
   notifiche critiche all'erogazione dei servizi Amplify o Engage (ad es.
   fatture inviate via e-mail).
   La base giuridica di Outbrain per il trattamento dei dati personali dei
   Partner commerciali è il legittimo interesse.
   3. Come manteniamo le informazioni al sicuro, Trasferimenti al di fuori
   del SEE, Condivisione e conservazione

                                      +

   Sicurezza
   Outbrain dispone di un team dedicato per la sicurezza. Manteniamo
   rigorosi controlli sui dati che raccogliamo, conservandoli in database
   protetti e soggetti a firewall con diritti di accesso rigorosamente
   limitati e controllati, per garantirne la sicurezza. Consulta le nostre
   norme sulla sicurezza per maggiori informazioni.
   I partner commerciali hanno accesso a determinate funzionalità protette
   da password del servizio Amplify o Engage. Loro sono responsabili del
   mantenimento della riservatezza di tale password. Ricorda che,
   sfortunatamente, la trasmissione di informazioni tramite Internet non è
   completamente sicura. Una truffa comune su Internet è nota come
   "spoofing" o "phishing" e si verifica quando ricevi un'email
   proveniente da quella che sembra essere una fonte legittima che
   richiede i tuoi dati personali. Ti preghiamo di osservare che non ti
   invieremo alcuna e-mail che ti chieda di verificare la carta di
   credito, le coordinate bancarie o eventuali altri dati personali.
   Qualora dovessi ricevere un'e-mail che sembra provenire da noi e ti
   chiede tali informazioni ti preghiamo di non rispondere e non fare
   click su nessun link presente nell'e-mail. Al contrario, inoltraci
   l'e-mail all'indirizzo legal@outbrain.com, in quanto esamineremo
   possibili casi di frodi su Internet.
   Trasferimento dei dati al di fuori dell'UE/del SEE
   Quando trasferiamo i dati personali dallo Spazio economico europeo ad
   altri paesi nei quali le leggi applicabili non offrono il medesimo
   livello di protezione della privacy dei dati offerto nei Territori
   europei, adottiamo misure atte a fornire un livello appropriato di
   protezione della privacy dei dati. In altre parole, i tuoi diritti e le
   protezioni che ti spettano rimangono associati ai tuoi dati. Ad
   esempio, utilizziamo clausole contrattuali approvate e altre misure
   studiate per garantire che i destinatari dei tuoi dati personali li
   proteggano.
   Condivisione
   Oltre alla descrizione di come possiamo divulgare i tuoi dati personali
   per ciascun tipo di utente, possiamo altresì divulgare dati personali
   nei seguenti casi:
     * all'interno della famiglia di società controllate da Outbrain per
       ragioni interne, principalmente per scopi aziendali e operativi;

     * qualora dovessimo attraversare una transizione aziendale, quale una
       fusione, un'acquisizione da parte di un'altra società oppure una
       vendita di tutte o di parte delle nostre attività, i tuoi dati
       personali saranno probabilmente inclusi tra le attività trasferite;

     * laddove ciò sia richiesto dalla legge (ad esempio, per collaborare
       con indagini delle forze dell'ordine oppure con altri procedimenti
       giudiziari); e/o

     * per rispondere a un'emergenza effettiva.

   Inoltre, combiniamo i tuoi dati personali con quelli di altri utenti al
   fine di condividere informazioni sulle tendenze e aggregare le
   statistiche degli utenti con terze parti, sempre in forma aggregata e
   anonimizzata.
   Conservazione dei dati
   Il periodo di conservazione per ciascuno dei cookie utilizzati da
   Outbrain (sia per quelli propri sia per quelli usati da terzi per
   nostro conto) è indicato nella Tabella dei cookie.
   Outbrain mantiene altresì una politica di conservazione dei dati che
   dettaglia il periodo di conservazione dei dati personali in base alla
   nostra analisi della durata ragionevolmente necessaria di tale
   conservazione, rispetto a dati specifici, tenuto conto delle finalità
   legali o commerciali. Nel momento in cui non necessitiamo più dei dati
   personali, li cancelliamo o li distruggiamo in maniera sicura. I dati
   aggregati, che non consentono di identificare un dispositivo/browser (o
   una singola persona) e sono utilizzati per finalità di reporting e
   analisi vengono conservati per tutto il tempo necessario dal punto di
   vista commerciale.
   4. Minori

                                      +

   Nessuno dei nostri servizi si rivolge a minori di 16 anni. Non
   raccogliamo consapevolmente dati personali da minori di 16 anni. Se al
   momento della raccolta dovessimo stabilire che un Visitatore del sito,
   un Utente o un Partner commerciale ha meno di 16 anni, non useremo né
   conserveremo i suoi dati personali. Qualora dovessimo venire a
   conoscenza del fatto che abbiamo raccolto inconsapevolmente dati
   personali da un minore di età inferiore ai 16 anni, attueremo ogni
   ragionevole sforzo per eliminare tali informazioni dai nostri archivi.
   Se sei un bambino, vai a giocare in giardino, non usare o interagire
   con Outbrain!
   5. Cittadini dei territori europei

                                      +

   In conformità con le leggi europee in materia di tutela della vita
   privata (privacy), in particolare con il regolamento generale europeo
   sulla protezione dei dati (GDPR), Outbrain riconosce specifici diritti
   aggiuntivi ai cittadini dei Territori europei quali il diritto di
   accesso, di rettifica, di opposizione, di reclamo, di cancellazione e
   di blocco. Più specificamente:
     * il diritto di richiedere informazioni sull'eventualità del
       trattamento in atto e su quali dati personali siano trattati da
       noi, nonché il diritto di richiedere la rettifica o la modifica di
       tali dati personali.
     * in determinate circostanze, il diritto di richiedere che i dati
       personali siano cancellati.
     * in determinate circostanze, il diritto di chiedere che il
       trattamento dei dati personali sia soggetto a limitazioni.
     * il diritto alla revoca del proprio consenso al trattamento e
       all'utilizzo dei propri dati, in tutto o in parte, in qualsiasi
       momento con applicazione per il futuro.
     * il diritto di ottenere i propri dati personali in un formato
       comune, strutturato e leggibile da un dispositivo automatico.
     * il diritto di contattare il nostro responsabile della protezione
       dei dati nel caso in cui vi siano domande, commenti, reclami o
       richieste in relazione alla nostra dichiarazione sulla protezione
       dei dati e sul trattamento dei dati personali.
     * il diritto di sporgere reclamo presso l'autorità di controllo
       responsabile qualora si ritenga che il trattamento dei propri dati
       personali avvenga in violazione della legislazione.

   In aggiunta a quanto sopra, facciamo riferimento a determinati diritti
   per i cittadini dei Territori europei nel corso della presente politica
   sulla privacy. Ai sensi del GDPR, con il termine cittadini dei
   "Territori europei" si intendono i cittadini dello Spazio economico
   europeo (SEE) e della Svizzera. Ai fini della presente Informativa
   sulla privacy, il termine "Territori europei" continuerà a includere il
   Regno Unito, anche dopo che il Regno Unito avrà lasciato lo Spazio
   economico europeo in seguito alla Brexit.
   Nel caso avessi domande su come esercitare qualsiasi dei diritti
   descritti qui sopra, scrivici al seguente indirizzo e-mail:
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com.
   6. Diritti in materia di privacy della California

                                      +

   Ai sensi degli articoli 1798.83-1798.84 del Codice Civile della
   California, i residenti californiani hanno il diritto di richiederci
   un'informativa che descriva le categorie di informazioni personali che
   condividiamo con terzi o società affiliate per finalità di marketing
   diretto di tali terzi o società affiliate. Tale informativa individuerà
   le categorie di informazioni condivise e includerà un elenco dei terzi
   e delle società affiliate con le quali sono state condivise, unitamente
   ai loro nomi e indirizzi. Se sei residente in California e desideri una
   copia di tale informativa, invia una richiesta scritta a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oppure inviala al seguente indirizzo
   postale: Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY
   10011. Si prega di consentire 30 giorni per la risposta.
   7. Comunicazione antitracciamento (“Do Not Track”)

                                      +

   Alcuni browser trasmettono segnali antitracciamento, denominati "Do Not
   Track" (DNT), ai siti web. Poiché non esiste una comprensione comune su
   come interpretare il segnale DNT, al momento Outbrain non altera,
   modifica o risponde alle richieste o ai segnali DNT di tali browser.
   Continueremo a monitorare l'attività del settore in questo contesto e
   rivaluteremo le nostre pratiche DNT se necessario. Nel frattempo, puoi
   utilizzare la gamma di altri strumenti che mettiamo a disposizione per
   controllare la raccolta e l'utilizzo dei dati, ivi inclusa la capacità
   di rinunciare a ricevere raccomandazioni personalizzate consultando la
   sezione Utenti.
   8. Come può variare la presente politica sulla privacy

                                      +

   Occasionalmente potremmo modificare la presente politica sulla privacy.
   Inseriremo un avviso in evidenza che ti sarà visibile in qualità di
   Visitatore del sito o Partner commerciale, tuttavia non disponiamo di
   mezzi per avvertire gli Utenti in merito a un aggiornamento. In tal
   caso si raccomanda di verificare periodicamente questa pagina per
   sapere se la politica sulla privacy è stata aggiornata. Visualizzeremo
   sempre la data dell'ultima modifica della politica sulla privacy nella
   parte alta della pagina affinché tu possa sapere quando è stata rivista
   l'ultima volta.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   2018年5月24日
   アウトブレインはお客様の個人データを大切に保護します。このプライバシー ポリシーは（以下「プライバシー
   ポリシー」といいます。）、アウトブレインが収集する全ての個人データも含めた情報の利用方法を定めるものです。個人データは、お客様に関わる情報であ
   って、個人を特定できる情報です。アウトブレインは、お客様の個人データを利用に際しては、適用されるすべての法令を遵守します。プライバシーチャンピ
   オンチームのもと信頼と透明性というアウトブレインの価値を守ります
   + ＋全てを広げる
   – COLLAPSE ALL
   １．私たちについて、私たちのミッション、及びアウトブレイン・アウトブレインのDPO・又は関係部署へのお問い合わせ方法
   +
   アウトブレインについて
   私たちは、米国のデラウェア州で設立された株式会社及びその関連子会社（以下合わせて「アウトブレイン」又は「私たち」といいます。）であり、本社はニ
   ューヨークにあります。アウトブレインは、12 個のグローバルオフィスを有し、世界中のパブリッシャー及びマーケッターと提携関係を組んでいます。
   アウトブレインのミッション
   アウトブレインのミッションは、ユーザーの関心に基づいて、ユーザーの興味関心に基づいてレコメンデーションを提供することです。そのミッションのため
   、次のようなパートナーと提携しています。
     * 読者に価値があるコンテンツを勧めたいオンラインパブリッシャ及びパートナー（こちらの契約をOutbrain Engageといいます。）

     * コンテンツを読者に配信することを希望するアドバタイザー（こちらの契約を Outbrain Amplifyといいます。）

   アウトブレインへのお問い合わせ
   アウトブレインはプライバシーポリシーを遵守していることを定期的に確認しております。プライバシーポリシーに関するご質問、コメント、又は他のお問い
   合わせは次の連絡先までお願いします。
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com 又は
   Attn: Privacy Questions
   Outbrain Inc.
   39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor
   New York, NY 10011
   また上記のお問い合わせ以外にもご質問がございましたら、次の連絡先までご連絡下さい。
     * 外部のData Protection Officer （以下「DPO」と言う）：ePrivacy GmbH
       担当者：クリストフ・バウワー博士
       ePrivacy GmbHには privacy@eprivacy.eu 宛てご連絡ください。

     * 欧州内のアウトブレインの担当部署である Information Commissioner’s Officer

   自主規制機関
   アウトブレインは、Digital Advertising Alliance （以下「DAA」という）及び European
   Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance（以下「EDAA
   」という）において自主規制の原則を遵守します。アウトブレインは、責任あるデータの収集とデジタル広告におけるデータの使用を定める社団Networ
   k Advertising Initiative
   (NAI)の優良メンバーであり、そのウェブとモバイルのための行動規範を遵守します。アウトブレインは、オンライン行動アドバタイジング(OAB)
   に関するInteractive Advertising Bureau (IAB)の自主規制原則及びIAB の欧州OBA原則を遵守します。
   ２．アウトブレインのユーザータイプ（オプトアウトも含む）)
   +
   このプライバシーポリシーにおいては、様々な場面ごとに、お客さまのユーザータイプに応じて、どの情報を収集し、なぜ収集するのか、なぜ、どのクッキー
   を使うのか、またどのような類似の技術を用いるのか、私たちがどのようにその情報を共有するのか、またお客様にはどのような権利があるのかということを
   ご説明します。
   ウェブサイトの訪問者：お客様はアウトブレインのOutbrain.com （又は国によるアドレス、例えばOutbrain.co.uk、
   Outbrain.fr 、Outbrain.de 、など）及び MyOutbrain.com
   のウェブサイト、ウェブページ、相互作用機能（以下すべて合わせて「アウトブレインのサイト」という）を訪問、及び相互作用する場合、サイトの訪問者に
   なります。 詳しくは こちらへ。
   ア）収集する情報及びその理由
   アウトブレインは、アウトブレインのサイトにおいてお客様がどのコンテンツに興味を持つかを理解し、且つお客様がアウトブレインのサイトを訪問しない時
   にもアウトブレインが提供するサービスを認識していただきたいと考えています。このために、お客様から（１）IP
   アドレス、（２）ユーザーエージェントデータ、あるいはデバイスの種類（例えばiPhone など）、ブラウザの種類（例えばGoogle
   Chromeなど）、オペレーティングシステム（例えばiOS など）、（３）アウトブレインのサイト のどのページを閲覧したか
   （例えば、「アウトブレインについて」のページ）、（４）閲覧した時間（対応する時差）、（５）URL のリファーラル及びHTTP
   リクエストにおいて通常に通信される情報（例えば、この情報でお客様がアウトブレインのサイトにどの経由でいらしたのかを知ることができます）の情報を
   収集します。
   イ）利用するクッキー、又は使用する技術
   お客様がアウトブレインのサイトを訪問する際に使用されるクッキー（及びその有効期間）に関する詳細については、こちらの クッキーテーブル
   のウェッブサイト訪問者の部分をご参照ください。
   ウ）情報の共有
   アウトブレインのサイトにおいて収集したお客様の情報の共有
   原則として、アウトブレインはお客様の個人データを第三者に対しそのマーケティング活動のために共有することはいたしません。しかし、アウトブレインが
   お客様に対してマーケティング及び広告配信ができるように第三者のサービス（こちらの クッキーテーブル
   に表示されます）を利用することがあります。例えば、アウトブレインのサイトにおいて、アウトブレインがお客様にマーケティング及び広告配信を行うため
   に使用するクッキーの一部は、第三者のクッキーです。アウトブレインはこれら第三者に対して、共有された情報を機密情報として取り扱わせるとともに、こ
   れらの情報をアウトブレインに対する義務の履行のためにのみ使用させるものとします。私たちは、私たちのために個人データを処理するあらゆる第三者との
   間で、個人データを私たちの指示及び適用されるデータ保護に関するあらゆる法令を遵守して処理することを義務付ける契約を締結しております。又、お客様
   がアウトブレインのブログにコメントする場合、そのコメント及び情報は開示されます。コメントを削除するためには、
   support@outbrain.comまでご連絡ください。
   アウトブレインのサイトにおける第三者のサービスの利用
   アウトブレインのサイト上には、アウトブレインが所有又は管理しないウェブサイトへのリンクがあります。アウトブレインは、他の第三者のウェブサイトの
   コンテンツ、商品、サービス、プライバシーポリシー、又はデータ処理方法を管理又は保証することができません。例えば、アウトブレインのサイトにおいて
   、アウトブレインのFacebook のページ、又はLinkedin
   のページへのクリックできるアイコンがあります。お客様がこのリンクをクリックする際にFacebook 及びLinkedin
   がお客様のデバイスに自らのクッキーを送信し、個別に個人データを収集する可能性があります。従って、お客様にはFacebook やLinkedin
   のプライバシーポリシーもご確認いただきますようお願いいたします。
   エ）お客様の権利
   アウトブレインのサイトの利用は、アウトブレインのサイトの 利用条件
   にしたがうこととされ、お客様にも適用されます。お客様は、アウトブレインのサイトを利用することをいつでもやめることができます。お客様は利用するこ
   とをやめる場合に、お客様のデバイスに送信されたクッキーを削除することもできます。お客様はアウトブレインのサイトを利用する際にお客様のメールアド
   レスを提供している場合、アウトブレインから送信されるメールの「配信停止」のオプションを利用することもできます。
   アウトブレインは、 欧州
   からのサイト訪問者のために、お客様がアウトブレインのサイトで使用されるクッキー又は他の技術に同意・不同意を表明することを可能にする同意管理プラ
   ットフォーム（「 One
   Trust」を使用する）をアウトブレインのサイトおいて実施します。アウトブレインはお客様が同意しない限りクッキーを送信しません。したがって、ア
   ウトブレインが個人データを処理するための法的根拠は、「同意」となります。お客様はいつでも同意を撤回することができます。
   ユーザー：お客様は
   、アウトブレインのウィジェットがインストールされるアウトブレインのパートナーのウェブサイトのページ（以下「パートナーサイト」といいます。）を訪
   問者をユーザーといいます。例えば、お客様はhttps://news.sky.com/uk 、www.spiegel.de、又は
   www.cnn.com
   を訪問する場合、そのウェブサイトにおいてアウトブレインのウィジェットが表示されます。アウトブレインのウィジェットにおいて、アウトブレインに言及
   するテキスト（例えばレコメンデーションの近くに「アウトブレインのおすすめ」や「アウトブレインからの」といったテキスト）があります。お客様がアウ
   トブレインに言及するリンクをクリックする場合、アウトブレインがレコメンデーションにおいて利用するデータカテゴリーを提供する
   アウトブレインのInterest プロファイルへリンクする通知
   が表示されます。お客様はプロファイルにおいてパーソナルレコメンデーションからオプトアウトすることもできます。詳しくは こちらへ.
   アウトブレインのウィジェットの例
   Outbrain Example Recommendations
   ア）収集する情報及びその理由
   アウトブレインは、価値があるレコメンデーションを提供するために、UUID、IPアドレス、及び他の情報を利用します。アウトブレインのレコメンデー
   ションは、費用を払う広告社から新しいサイトへリンクするもの、又は同じパブリッシャのページへリンクするものです。
     * UUID

   お客様は最初にパートナーサイト（例えば、CNN.com）を訪問する際に、アウトブレインがUUID（一意なユーザー識別子）を割り当てることができ
   るよう、お客様のデバイスにクッキーが送信されます。アウトブレインは、お客様がパートナーサイトにおいて表示又は閲覧するコンテンツをカテゴライズし
   、分析します。アウトブレインのレコメンデーションは、（１）ブラウザの履歴、（２）他のユーザーの類似ブラウジングパータン、（３）アウトブレインの
   ユーザーにおけるその時に人気のコンテンツ、（４）ランダム、及び（５）Amplifyの顧客が提供する又は求めるターゲット条件に基づいて提供されま
   す。例えば、アウトブレインは、UUID123（例えばiPhoneXにおいてChromeのブラウザを使用してガーディアン新聞を訪問するお客様）が
   遠い外国の旅行先について読むことが好きだということ、且つ遠い外国の旅行先について読むことが好きな人は面白い外国の食べ物についても読むことが好き
   だということを知っている可能性があります。
   UUIDは数字又は文字の配列です。UUIDはお客様のデバイスに対応し、ブラウザによって変更されます。言い換えれば、アウトブレインは、お客様がパ
   ートナーサイトを訪問する毎に、お客様のデバイス又はブラウザごとに個別のUUIDを保存します。例えば、お客様がモバイルデバイスにおいてサファリと
   いうブラウザを使用してパートナーサイトを訪問する場合にあるひとつのUUIDが割り当てられ、iPadにおいてサファリというブラウザを使用してパー
   トナーサイトを訪問する場合にまた別のUUIDが割り当てられます。アウトブレインは、モバイルデバイス（携帯端末かタブレット）上のブラウザのUUI
   Dが同じデバイスにおいてアプリにアクセスする（逆も含む）場合、そのUUIDを結合します。
   アウトブレインは、デバイス又はブラウザにUUIDを割り当てることにより、お客様に対してお客様の関心に基づくレコメンデーションを提供することがで
   きるため、そのUUIDと訪問されたページ及びアウトブレインのレコメンデーションのクリックを対応させることができます。
   IPアドレス及び他の使用情報
   アウトブレインは、上記のようにUUIDを収集し、また、（１）IPアドレス、（２）ユーザーエージェントデータ；デバイスの種類（例えば携帯電話）、
   ブラウザの種類（例えばChrome）、オペレーティングシステム（例えばiOS）、（３）訪問したページ、（４）訪問時間、及び（５）リファラURL
   及びHTTP要求において通常に通信される情報を収集します。
   この統計情報は、アウトブレインのウィジェットがインストールされるパートナーサイトのページに何人が訪問しているのかということに関する情報、そのペ
   ージの訪問時間、ユーザーにクリックされたコンテンツ、及び一般的な訪問方法に関する情報をアウトブレインに提供するものです。この情報は、UUIDと
   対応しないため、個人データには該当しません。
   イ）利用するクッキー、又は使用する技術
   アウトブレインの技術が実施されるパートナーサイトを利用する際に使用するクッキーについては、こちらのクッキーテーブルの「ユーザー」の部分をご参照
   くだい。
   お客様がアウトブレインがレコメンドしたコンテンツのリンクをクリックする場合、そのレコメンデーションの遷移先ページが表示される前に、又は遷移先ペ
   ージが表示された際に、レコメンデーションのスポンサーをするAmplifyのアドバタイザーからリダイレクトを使用してお客様のデバイスにクッキーが
   送信される可能性があります。その場合、アドバタイザーのプライバシーポリシーが適用されます。
   アウトブレインのアドバタイザーは 、 表示されるアウトブレインのウィジェットに加えて
   アウトブレインピクセルを使用する可能性があります。アウトブレインピクセルは、ピクセルが実施されるページを訪問するユーザーに対応するアウトブレイ
   ン UUIDが存在するかどうか判断します。アウトブレインはエンドユーザーに対応するアウトブレインUUID が存在する場合、アドバタイザーがその
   UUIDをリターゲットすることができる機能やページを訪問する合計の UUID
   を提供します。アウトブレインピクセルは、ページへの訪問者がアウトブレイン UUID を保持しない場合にはユーザーの情報を収集しません。
   アウトブレインは、アドバタイザーが自らのウェブサイトにおいてアウトブレインピクセルが実施されている旨を開示するよう推奨しています。アウトブレイ
   ンはピクセルから収集した情報とUUIDのプロフィールを結合しません。
   各UUIDに対応するページの閲覧、及びクリック数のようなデータポイントは 13ヶ月間保存されます。例えば、UUID123が 2017年12月
   31日に記事を閲覧したという場合、その記事は2018年 2月1日にその UUIDのプロフィールから削除されます。
   ウ）情報の共有
   アウトブレインはいかなる第三者に対してもユーザーのプロフィールを共有しません。しかし、アウトブレインはクッキーの突合又は技術的に必要となる範囲
   で第三者にUUID を共有する可能性があります。
   詳しくはこのプライバシーポリシーのデータ共有の 部分もご参照ください。
   エ）お客様の権利
     * アウトブレインのオプトアウト

   お客様は、いつでもアウトブレインのパーソナルレコメンデーションからオプトアウトすることができます。お客様の個人データ及びその個人データに基づい
   てお客様にレコメンデーションをすることに関しては、アウトブレインのinterest プロファイル
   をご参照ください。お客様は、興味プロフィールからパーソナルレコメンデーションをオプトアウトすることもできます。ブラウザ上で行うオプトアウトはア
   ウトブレインのinterest プロファイル
   上で行われるものであり、アプリ上でのパーソナルレコメンデーションのオプトアウトはお客様のデバイスの設定を通して行われるものであることにご注意く
   ださい（interest プロファイル にオプトアウトの際のステップの例があります）。
   ご注意ください アウトブレインからオプトアウトしても：
     * お客様に対してまだアウトブレインのレコメンデーションが表示されます。
       アウトブレインのパーソナルトラッキングからオプトアウトをしてもアウトブレインからのレコメンデーションが表示されなくなるわけではありませ
       ん。以降表示されるレコメンデーションはお客様に特化していないだけのものとなります。レコメンデーションは、そのページに関するレコメンデー
       ションを提供するために、お客様が閲覧している文書に関する情報を利用します。
     * オプトアウトはクッキーベースであって、デバイス及びブラウザに特有される
       ものです。お客様が複数のデバイス又はブラウザからウェブサイトを訪問する場合、お客様のすべてのデバイス又はブラウザにおいてパーソナルトラ
       ッキングがなされないようにするため、お客様ご自身ですべてのデバイス又はブラウザにおいてオプトアウトをしていただく必要があります。また、
       お客様は新しいデバイスを買い、ブラウザを変更し、又はオプトアウトのクッキーを削除する場合、再度オプトアウトしなければなりません。また、
       パーソナルトラッキングからオプトアウトすることと、クッキー自体をブロックすることとは異なりますのでご注意ください。
     * お客様は、お客様のUUID
       と対応するプロフィールの削除を保証するために、最低２１日間の間はアウトブレインをオプトインしないようにご注意ください。
       お客様のアウトブレインのパーソナルレコメンデーションからのオプトアウトは直ちに実施されます。しかし、お客様のブラウザがローカル保存をす
       る設定となっており、オプトアウトから２１日以内にアウトブレインのパーソナルレコメンデーションにオプトインする場合、お客様のUUID
       にお客様の従前のプロフィールが再接続される可能性があります。お客様が２１日間以内にオプトインしない場合、お客様のプロフィールは削除され
       、回復することができなくなります。
     * アウトブレインのオプトアウト機能はクッキーに基づくものであり、ユーザーの希望を遵守するように作成されます。しかし、iOS11の
       Intelligent Tracking
       Preventionという機能は、２４時間の範囲を超える場合にウェブサイトのクッキーに影響を与える可能性があります。アウトブレインは、
       お客様が他の会社のオプトアウト方法に依存しなくてもいいように、他のブラウザを使用し、又はブラウザから第三者のクッキーをすべてブロックす
       ることをお勧めします。
     * オプトアウトの追加のオプション

   お客様は、NAI又はDAA のページ（DAA：http://www.aboutads.info/choices 、 DAAC：
   www.youradchoices.ca/choices、及び／又は EDAA
   www.youronlinechoices.eu）のような業界のツールを通してアウトブレイン又は他のアドバタイザーからのパーソナルアドバタイジ
   ングをオプトアウトすることもできます。お客様は、 NAI 、DAA、 DAAC、又は
   EDAAのページを訪問することにより、参加するメンバーのサービスから全体的、又は部分的にオプトアウトすることができます。こちらにもオプトアウト
   することで、アウトブレインのオプトアウトと同じように、お客様に広告が表示されないようになるという意味ではなく、ただお客様にパーソナルな広告が表
   示されないという意味になります。お客様が訪問するウェブサイトに基づく広告（例えば、内容に基づく広告）はまだお客様に対して表示されます。また、お
   客様は、 DAA、DAAC、又は
   EDAAコンスマーチョイスのウェブサイトを訪問する際にブラウザがクッキーを却下するように設定される場合、お客様のオプトアウトが実施されない可能
   性があります。
     * 法的根拠：
       ユーザーの個人データを処理することに関する法的根拠は、アウトブレインの各パートナーサイトの法的根拠に基づくものです。各パートナーサイト
       は、「同意」又は「正当な利益」に基づく法的根拠があります。各パートナーサイトの法的根拠の詳細については、各パートナーサイトのプライバシ
       ーポリシーをご参照ください。アウトブレインは、パートナーが「同意」という法的根拠を採用している場合、パートナーサイトにおいてお客様が同
       意しない限りクッキーを送信しません。

   ビジネスパートナー： お客様は、会社の役割としてアウトブレインの Amplify又はEngage
   のサービスを利用できるようにに登録する（又はアウトブレインとメールのやり取りを行う）場合、ビジネスパートナーとなります。詳しくは こちらへ.
   ア）収集する情報及びその理由
   お客様は、Amplify又はEngage
   のサービスに登録又はアウトブレインとのやり取りを行う際に個人データ（例えばメールアドレスなど）をアウトブレインに提供する可能性があります。お客
   様がビジネスパートナーとなることを希望される際には、アドバタイザーの申込書、広告掲載申込書、又は他の申込書において追加の情報が要求される可能性
   があります。アウトブレインは、アウトブレインダッシュボードにおいて、お客様に対応するユーザーネームの行動に関する情報を自動的に収集します。例え
   ば、お客様がキャンペーンの CPCを変更する場合、アウトブレインの監査証跡に全てのCPCの変更に対応する行動の記録が残ります。
   アウトブレインは、お客様とのビジネスパートナー（又はなり得るビジネスパートナー）としての契約条件を遵守するために例えば下記のような目的のため上
   記のようなデータを収集し、処理します。
     * お客様からのご質問及びお問い合わせに対応すること
     * お客様にAmplify及び
       Engageサービスが提供する機能へのアクセスを提供すること（例えばお客様のダッシュボードアカウントを提供、管理すること）
     * お客様のアイデンティティーを確認すること
     * お客様にお客様のアカウント、アウトブレインのサービス、又はAmplify及び
       Engageのサービスに関するプロモーションについてご連絡すること

   イ）利用するクッキー、又は使用する技術
   アウトブレインがビジネスパートナーに対して使用するクッキー（及びその有効期間）に関する詳細については、こちらのクッキーテーブル
   の「ビジネスパートナー」の部分をご参照ください。
   ウ）情報の共有
   アウトブレインは、ベンダー、コントラクター、又はアウトブレインのサービスをサポートする他の第三者（例えば、クレジットカード処理）にビジネスパー
   トナーの情報を開示する可能性があります。詳しくはこのプライバシーポリシーの データ共有 の部分をご参照ください。
   エ）お客様の権利
   お客様がビジネスパートナーとして、個人データを確認、修正、更新、又は削除を希望する場合、アウトブレインのダッシュボードの「プロフィール設定」か
   ら行っていただくことができます。あるいは、support@outbrain.com
   までご連絡ください。お客様は、お客様にアウトブレインのメールが送信されている場合、そのメールに記載されているリンクを通して配信停止をすることも
   できます。「配信停止」によっても、アウトブレインのサービスを提供するために必要な連絡又は通知にはオプトアウトの効果は生じません（例えば、請求書
   など）。
   アウトブレインがビジネスパートナーの個人データを処理する法的根拠は「正当な利益」です。
   ３．アウトブレインの情報保持、欧州経済領域外への移転、共有及び保存
   +
   セキュリティー
   アウトブレインには専門のセキュリティーチームがあります。アウトブレインは個人データの厳密な管理体制を整備し、その個人データは、ファイアウォール
   が設けられた安全なサーバーに保存され、且つ、アクセス権が限定されます。詳しくはアウトブレインのセキュリティー規定 をご参照ください。
   ビジネスパートナーは、Amply又はEngage
   のサービスにおいてパスワードによって保護される機能に対するアクセス権が有します。ビジネスパートナーはこのパスワードを秘密情報として扱う責任があ
   ります。お客様はインターネットを通じた情報通信は完全に安全ではないということにご注意ください。「スプーフィング」又は「フィッシング」と呼ばれる
   詐欺行為もあります。「スプーフィング」又は「フィッシング」とは、信頼されている主体になりすまして個人データを求める電子メールです。アウトブレイ
   ンが、クレジットカード、銀行情報、又は他の個人データを求めるメールを送信することはありません。もしお客様が、アウトブレインになりすました個人デ
   ータを求めるメールを受信したような場合には、これに対し返事すること、又は表示されたリンクをクリックすることのないようにご注意ください。アウトブ
   レインがそのインターネットを通じた詐欺行為を確認できるように、何かありましたら、 legal@outbrain.comまでにご連絡ください。
   欧州／欧州経済領域外のデータ移転
   アウトブレインは、欧州又は欧州経済領域から、欧州と同等のデータプライバシー保護がなされていない国にデータを移転する場合、適切なデータプライバシ
   ー保護を提供できるような措置を実施します。つまり、お客様のデータはお客様の権利と一緒に移転します。例えば、私たちは承認された契約条項（標準契約
   条項）の使用やその他の個人データの受領者がお客様のデータを保護するための措置を実施します。
   共有
   以上のユーザータイプ別の個人データの開示に加えて、次の方法で個人データが開示される可能性もあります。
     * ビジネス及び業務遂行を目的として、アウトブレインの関連子会社間における開示
     * アウトブレインが合併、買収、又は事業譲渡の対象となることにより、個人データも移転対象となることによる開示
     * 法令、規則、管轄官庁の求めに応じた開示（例えば、法律の執行の又は他の訴訟手続きの協力を目的とする開示）
     * 緊急事態下における開示

   上記に加えて、アウトブレインは、傾向情報及び集合体のユーザー情報を第三者に共有できるようにお客様の個人データと他のユーザー情報を結合します。結
   合される情報は常に集合体及び匿名扱いの状態にあります。
   データ保持
   アウトブレインが使用するクッキー（自らのクッキー及び第三者のも含む）の有効期間はクッキーテーブル に記載されます。
   アウトブレインは、個人データが法律上及び取引上どの程度の期間必要とされるかという分析を踏まえて、データの保存期間を定めるデータ保持ポリシーを整
   備します。
   個人データの必要性がなくなった場合、アウトブレインは確実に個人情報を削除、又は消去します。デバイス、ブラウザ、又は個人を特定しない集合体データ
   は、報告又は分析のため、商業的な必要性がある限り保持されます。
   ４．未成年に対して
   +
   アウトブレインは16歳未満の未成年を対象とするサービスを提供しません。また、アウトブレインは、
   16歳未満の未成年の個人データを意図的に収集することは行いません。データを取集する際にサイト訪問者、ユーザー、又はビジネスパートナーが16
   歳未満の未成年であることが判明した場合、その個人データが利用され、又は保存されることはありません。アウトブレインは、意図せず
   16歳未満の未成年者の個人データを収集したことを知った場合、その個人データを削除するために必要となる合理的な対応を行います。アウトブレインは、
   未成年者はアウトブレインを利用するよりも、外で遊ぶ方が望ましいと考えています。
   ５．欧州市民
   +
   欧州の市民には、欧州のプライバシーに関する法律、特に欧州の個人データ保護規則（General Data Protection
   Regulation）（以下「
   GDPR」という）に基づいた個人データに関するアクセス、訂正、拒否、削除、ブロック、及び苦情申し立ての権利があります。具体的には、
     * お客様の個人データが処理されているか否か、されているとすれば、どの情報についてであるのかについての情報を求める権利及び個人データの修正
       あるいは訂正を求める権利
     * 状況により、自己の個人データの削除を求める権利
     * 状況により、自己の個人データの処理の限定を求める権利
     * お客様の個人データの処理及び利用に対する同意の全部または一部を撤回する権利
     * 一般的に、整理された、機械的に読み取ることができる方法で事故の個人データのコピーを取得する権利
     * アウトブレインのデータ保持及びお客様の個人データの処理に関する質問、コメント、要求、又は苦情がある場合に、アウトブレインのData
       Protection Officerと連絡する権利
     * 規則に違反した個人データの処理が行われていると信じる場合の監督機関に対する苦情申し立ての権利

   上記に加えてこのプライバシーポリシーに欧州市民の権利が参照されます。GDPRに応じて、「欧州市民」とは、欧州経済領域及びスイス連邦を意味します
   。このプライバシーポリシーにおいては、「欧州」とは、ブレグジット以降イギリスが欧州連合から脱退した後でもイギリスを含むものとします。
   上記の権利についてお問い合わせがある場合、PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com までご連絡ください。
   ６．カリフォルニア州のプライバシーポリシー
   +
   カリフォルニア州住民は、カリフォルニア州の民法1798.83
   及び1798.84号により、アウトブレインに、アウトブレインがダイレクトマーケティングできるように第三者又は関連会社と共有する個人データのカテ
   ゴリーが記載された通知書の発行を求める権利があります。その通知書には共有される情報が特定され、また共有する第三者及び関連会社、その第三者及び関
   連会社の住所が含まれます。お客様がカリフォルニア州住民の場合、この通知書を取得するためには
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.comまでご連絡ください。又は次の住所までご連絡ください。
   Outbrain Inc.
   39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor
   New York, NY 10011
   応答のために30日間かかりますのでご了承ください。
   ７．「Do Not Track」の開示
   +
   ブラウザによって「Do Not Track」（以下「DNT
   」という）の信号が通信されます。アウトブレインは、DNT信号に関して一般的な解読がないため、現在ブラウザからの DNT
   信号に対応していません。アウトブレインは、DNT 信号に関する業界活動を監視し、必要性に応じて DNT 活動を更新します。
   お客様は、アウトブレインがユーザーのところにおいて パーソナルレコメンデーションからオプトアウトすること
   も含む他の提供されるツールを利用してデータ収集及び利用を管理することができます。
   ８．プライバシーポリシーの更新
   +
   アウトブレインはこのプライバシーポリシーを随時更新します。アウトブレインはサイト訪問者又はビジネスパートナーがこれを明確に知ることができるよう
   変更のお知らせをサイト上で表示しますが、ユーザーに対し個別に通知をする方法を有していません。アウトブレインは、お客様ご自身でプライバシーポリシ
   ーの更新を確認するため、このページを定期的に閲覧されるようお願いいたします。プライバシーポリシーの更新日付は、お客様にこのプライバシーポリシー
   がいつ更新されたのかをご確認いただけるように、常にこのページの上において表示されます。

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                 Última atualização: 23 de maio de 2018

   A Outbrain tem o compromisso de proteger seus dados pessoais. Esta
   política de privacidade (“Política de Privacidade”) rege o uso pela
   Outbrain dos dados coletados por nós, incluindo todos e quaisquer dados
   pessoais. Dados pessoais são informações relacionadas a você e que
   podem identificá-lo como indivíduo. Usamos seus dados pessoais
   cumprindo todas as leis aplicáveis. Para garantir a conformidade e o
   alinhamento aos valores da Outbrain de confiança e transparência, temos
   uma equipe de especialistas responsável por implementar continuamente o
   nosso programa global de privacidade.

                                                              + EXPAND ALL

   1. Quem somos, o que fazemos, como contatar a Outbrain, nosso DPO ou as
   autoridades competentes

                                      +

   Quem somos:
   Outbrain representa a Outbrain Inc., empresa de Delaware, EUA com sede
   em Nova York; e suas subsidiárias afiliadas (coletivamente denominadas
   “Outbrain” ou “nós”, “nos”, “nosso(as)”). Operamos a partir de 12
   escritórios globalmente e trabalhamos em parceria com editores de
   conteúdo e marketing do mundo todo.
   O que fazemos:
   A missão da Outbrain é oferecer recomendações interessantes aos seus
   Usuários com base nos seus interesses. Para cumprir nossa missão,
   firmamos acordos com:
     * Produtores e editores de conteúdo on-line e parceiros que desejam
       recomendar conteúdo relevante aos seus leitores (no Outbrain
       Engage); e
     * anunciantes que desejam que leitores visualizem seu conteúdo (no
       Outbrain Amplify).

   Como nos contatar:
   Fazemos verificações regulares de conformidade com base nesta Política
   de Privacidade. Perguntas, comentários e solicitações relacionados a
   esta Política de Privacidade são bem-vindos e devem ser encaminhados a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou via correio a Outbrain Inc., 39 West
   13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, USA, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Caso a Outbrain não forneça resposta satisfatória para suas perguntas
   ou preocupações, também é possível contatar o seguinte departamento
   para orientações, suporte ou reclamações:
     * responsável externa Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) da Outbrain:
       ePrivacy GmbH, representada pelo Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. A
       ePrivacy GmbH pode ser contatada diretamente via
       privacy@eprivacy.eu; e/ou
     * o órgão público britânico Information Commissioner’s Officer, que é
       o principal serviço supervisor da Outbrain nos Territórios
       Europeus.

   Órgãos de autorregulação
   A Outbrain segue os Princípios de Autorregulação definidos pela Digital
   Advertising Alliance (DAA) e pela European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Somos membros conceituados da Network
   Advertising Initiative (NAI), associação dedicada à coleta responsável
   de dados e ao seu uso para publicidade digital. Seguimos o Code of
   Conduct for Web and Mobile (Código de Conduta para Web e Internet
   Móvel) da NAI. A Outbrain também segue os Self-Regulatory Principles
   for Online Behavioral Advertising (Princípios de Autorregulação para
   Publicidade Comportamental On-line) e o Europe OBA Framework do
   Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB).
   2. Tipos de usuários da Outbrain

                                      +

   Parte desta Política de Privacidade está dividida em seções baseadas no
   seu modo de interagir com a Outbrain portanto é necessário definir em
   qual tipo de usuário você se encaixa. Para cada tipo de usuário,
   explicamos que tipo de informação coletamos e por que, quais cookies e
   outras tecnologias similares usamos, como compartilhamos essas
   informações e quais são os seus direitos.
   Visitantes do Site: Você é um “Visitante do Site” ao visitar e
   interagir com nossos websites, páginas na web, recursos interativos,
   blogs e seus respectivos conteúdos no Outbrain.com (ou qualquer página
   derivada, como Outbrain.co.uk; Outbrain.fr; Outbrain.de, etc.) e no
   MyOutbrain.com (“Nossos Sites“). Veja mais aqui.
   (a)&Tab;Quais informações coletamos e por quê
   Queremos entender quais serviços nos Nossos Sites interessam a você e
   lembrá-lo dos serviços que oferecemos quando você não está nos Nossos
   Sites. Para fazê-lo, coletamos as seguintes informações suas: (i)
   endereço IP; (ii) dados do Agente do Usuário: tipo de dispositivo (ex.:
   iPhone), tipo de navegador (ex.: Chrome), sistema operacional (ex.:
   iOS); (iii) páginas visitadas no Nosso Site (ex.: página “Sobre nós” da
   Outbrain); (iv) horário da visita (e respectivo fuso horário); e (v)
   URLs de encaminhamento e outras informações normalmente transmitidas em
   solicitações HTTP (ex.: essas informações nos dizem como você chegou
   aos Nossos Sites).
   (b)&Tab;Quais cookies e outras tecnologias similares utilizamos
   Consulte esta Tabela de Cookies em “Visitantes do Site” para uma lista
   detalhada dos cookies (e os respectivos períodos de retenção) que
   usamos quando você visita os Nossos Sites.
   (c)&Tab;Como podemos compartilhar informações
     * Compartilhamento de informações que coletamos sobre você nos Nossos
       Sites.

   De maneira geral, não compartilhamos dados pessoais seus com terceiros
   para fins de marketing ou publicidade de terceiros. No entanto,
   recorremos a vários terceiros (todos listados nesta Tabela de Cookies)
   para nos ajudar a vender ou fazer publicidade para você. Por exemplo:
   alguns dos cookies que usamos nos Nossos Sites pertencem a terceiros
   que ajudarão a Outbrain a vender ou fazer publicidade para você.
   Exigimos que esses terceiros e empresas se comprometam a manter
   confidenciais todas as informações compartilhadas com eles e a usar as
   informações somente para cumprir suas obrigações conosco. Fazemos isso
   firmando acordos com todos os terceiros que processam dados pessoais em
   nosso nome para garantir que eles processem seus dados pessoais em
   conformidade com nossas instruções exatas e com todas as leis de
   proteção de dados aplicáveis. Se você publicar em nosso blog, seu
   comentário e suas informações ficarão visíveis publicamente. Entre em
   contato com support@outbrain.com para solicitar a remoção do seu
   comentário.
     * Usando serviços de terceiros nos Nossos Sites.

   Nossos Sites contêm links para outros websites que não operamos nem são
   de nossa propriedade. Não controlamos, recomendamos ou endossamos o
   conteúdo, os produtos, serviços, políticas de privacidade ou práticas
   desses websites de terceiros. Por exemplo: nos Nossos Sites, você
   notará ícones clicáveis que o levam à página da Outbrain no Facebook ou
   no LinkedIn. Ao escolher clicar nesses links, você deve estar ciente de
   que Facebook e LinkedIn podem enviar seus próprios cookies ao seu
   aparelho, que podem coletar dados pessoais de maneira independente. Por
   isso, é importante que você leia as políticas de privacidade do
   Facebook e/ou LinkedIn.
     * Consulte também a seção de Compartilhamento desta Política de
       Privacidade.

   (d)&Tab;Seus direitos
   Os Termos de Uso no Nosso Site regem o uso do Nosso Site e também se
   aplicam a você. Você pode interromper o uso do Nosso Site a qualquer
   momento. Ao fazê-lo, também tem a opção de remover quaisquer cookies
   que tenhamos colocado em qualquer dispositivo usado para acessar o
   Nosso Site. Se você forneceu seu endereço de e-mail durante o uso dos
   Nossos Sites, todos os e-mails que você receber da Outbrain incluirão a
   opção de se “descadastrar”.
   Para Visitantes no Território Europeu, a Outbrain implementou uma
   plataforma de gestão de consentimento (operada pela One Trust) nos
   Nossos Sites que dá aos visitantes a oportunidade de autorizar ou não
   cookies e tecnologias similares de rastreamento nos Nossos Sites. Se
   você não deu seu consentimento (especificamente em “aceitar”), a
   Outbrain não permitirá que Nosso Site instale cookies. A base legal da
   Outbrain para processar dados pessoais em Nossos Sites é o
   consentimento. Você pode retirar seu consentimento a qualquer momento
   aqui.
   Usuários: Você é um “Usuário” ao visitar uma página de um website ou
   aplicativo de um dos parceiros da Outbrain onde o widget da Outbrain
   esteja instalado (“Sites Parceiros”). Por exemplo, ao visitar
   https://news.sky.com/uk, www.spiegel.de ou www.cnn.com, o widget
   Outbrain está implementado nesses sites. Ao interagir com um widget da
   Outbrain, você é informado por um texto que faz referência à Outbrain
   (ex.: “Recomendado pela Outbrain” ou “by Outbrain” ao lado das
   recomendações). Ao clicar no link que faz referência à Outbrain, você
   verá um aviso detalhado que permite acessar o Perfil de Interesse da
   Outbrain, que fornece uma visualização geral dos tipos de categorias de
   dados da Outbrain que podem ser usados para fazer suas recomendações.
   Ele também permite optar por recusar recomendações personalizadas. Veja
   mais aqui.
   Exemplo de widget da Outbrain
   [S1q4BIXJQ.png]
   (a) Quais informações coletamos e por quê
   Usamos UUIDs, endereço IP e outras Informações de Uso para poder lhe
   oferecer recomendações interessantes. As recomendações da Outbrain
   podem ser pagas por um anunciante que redireciona você para um novo
   website ou podem ser orgânicas, com link para outra página no site do
   mesmo anunciante.
     * UUID.

   Quando, como usuário, você visita pela primeira vez um Site Parceiro
   (ex.: CNN.com), a Outbrain instala um cookie no seu dispositivo para
   gerar um UUID (identificador único de usuário). Nós catalogamos e
   analisamos o conteúdo que você consome nos Sites Parceiros. Nossas
   recomendações baseiam-se em: (i) histórico de navegação; (ii) padrões
   de navegação similares de outros Usuários; (ii) recomendações
   geralmente populares entre o público da Outbrain atualmente; (iv) um
   certo grau de aleatoriedade; e (v) requisitos de público-alvo que podem
   ser fornecidos ou solicitados por nossos clientes Amplify. Por exemplo,
   a Outbrain pode saber que o UUID 123 (que poderia ser você no seu
   iPhone X acessando o jornal Guardian usando o Chrome como navegador)
   gosta de ler sobre destinos de férias remotos e que pessoas que gostam
   de ler sobre destinos de férias remotos também gostam de ler sobre
   comida exótica.
   O UUID é uma sequência de números e/ou letras. Esse UUID vincula-se ao
   seu dispositivo e varia conforme o navegador que você usa. Em outras
   palavras, a Outbrain registra um UUID diferente dependendo do aparelho
   e/ou navegador que você está usando ao acessar os Sites Parceiros. Por
   exemplo, isso significa que você terá um UUID quando visitar um Site
   Parceiro a partir do seu celular usando o navegador Safari e outro UUID
   ao visitar um Site Parceiro do seu iPad usando o navegador Safari. A
   Outbrain combinará e consolidará o UUID de um aparelho móvel (celular
   ou tablet) por um navegador que depois acessa um aplicativo (ou
   vice-versa) a partir do mesmo dispositivo.
   Atribuir um UUID permite à Outbrain associar as visualizações das
   páginas visitadas e cliques nas recomendações da Outbrain desse UUID –
   tudo com o objetivo de fornecer recomendações interessantes.
     * Endereço IP e outras Informações de Uso.

   Coletamos um UUID conforme explicado acima e ainda as seguintes
   informações: (i) endereço IP (depois anonimizado com base nos padrões
   do setor); (ii) dados do Agente do Usuário: tipo de dispositivo (ex.:
   iPhone), tipo de navegador (ex.: Chrome), sistema operacional (ex.:
   iOS); (iii) páginas visitadas; (iv) horário da visita; e (v) URLs de
   encaminhamento e outras informações normalmente transmitidas em
   solicitações HTTP.
   As informações estatísticas acima nos fornecem dados de como muitos
   Usuários visitaram determinada página dos nossos Sites Parceiros que
   tem o widget da Outbrain instalado, quanto tempo cada Usuário ficou
   nessa página, o tipo de conteúdo na página em que clicou e como foi seu
   engajamento geral com a página em questão. Essas informações só são
   dados pessoais quando associadas a um UUID.
   (b) Quais cookies e outras tecnologias similares utilizamos
   Consulte esta Tabela de Cookies em “Usuários” para uma lista detalhada
   dos cookies internos que usamos quando você interage com Sites
   Parceiros que tenham a tecnologia Outbrain implementada.
   Ao clicar no link para uma das nossas recomendações, o anunciante
   Amplify que patrocina a recomendação pode instalar cookies no seu
   aparelho via redirecionamentos antes da chegada à página de destino das
   recomendações ou ao chegar à página de destino. Nesses casos, você
   estará sujeito à política de privacidade desse anunciante.
   Além do widget visível em Sites Parceiros da Outbrain, determinados
   anunciantes Outbrain podem implementar o pixel Outbrain nos seus
   websites. O pixel Outbrain determina se o usuário que acessa a página
   na qual o pixel está instalado possui um UUID Outbrain. Se houver um
   UUID associado a esse usuário final, a Outbrain permitirá que
   anunciantes redirecionem sua publicidade a esses UUIDs e/ou fornecerá
   aos anunciantes o número total de UUIDs que acessaram a página em
   questão. Se não houver UUID Outbrain associado ao usuário que visitou a
   página, o pixel Outbrain não coletará nenhuma informação sobre o
   usuário. Encorajamos anunciantes a comunicar o uso do pixel Outbrain
   nos seus próprios websites. A Outbrain não combina informações do pixel
   a perfis UUID.
   Pontos de dados como visualizações de páginas e cliques são vinculados
   a um UUID particular e mantidos por 13 meses. Por exemplo: se o UUID
   123 leu um artigo em 31 de dezembro de 2017, em 1º de fevereiro de 2018
   esse artigo deixará de fazer parte do perfil UUID 123.
   (c) Como podemos compartilhar informações
   A Outbrain não compartilha perfis de Usuário com nenhum terceiro.
   Contudo, podemos compartilhar o UUID com determinados parceiros para
   fins de sincronização de cookies ou com base em requisitos técnicos.
   Consulte também a seção de Compartilhamento desta Política de
   Privacidade.
   (d) Seus direitos
     * Recusa à Outbrain.

   Você pode optar por recusar as recomendações personalizadas da Outbrain
   a qualquer momento. Consulte o Perfil de Interesse da Outbrain para uma
   visualização geral dos dados que a Outbrain conhece a seu respeito e
   pode usar para fazer suas recomendações. O Perfil de Interesse também
   permite optar por recusar recomendações personalizadas (você também
   pode fazer a recusa simplesmente clicando aqui). Note que a recusa nos
   navegadores é feita pelo Perfil de Interesse da Outbrain, mas que a
   recusa de recomendações personalizadas em aplicativos é feita pelas
   configurações do seu dispositivo (veja exemplos de passo a passo no
   Perfil de Interesse).
   IMPORTANTE – mesmo fazendo a recusa à Outbrain:
     * Você ainda verá recomendações da Outbrain. Recusar o rastreamento
       para personalização da Outbrain não significa que você deixará de
       receber recomendações da Outbrain. Em vez disso, significa que as
       recomendações da Outbrain não serão personalizadas. As
       recomendações ainda usarão informações sobre o documento que você
       está visualizando (ou seja, informações contextuais) para lhe
       fornecer recomendações na página em questão.
     * A recusa baseia-se em cookies e é específica para cada
       dispositivo/navegador. Se você navegar na internet em diferentes
       dispositivos e/ou navegadores, você precisará fazer a recusa em
       cada aparelho e/ou navegador para que possamos impedir o
       rastreamento para personalização em todos eles. Pela mesma razão,
       se você comprar um novo dispositivo, mudar de navegador ou excluir
       (ou limpar) o cookie de recusa, será necessário fazer a recusa
       novamente. Recusar o rastreamento para personalização não significa
       bloquear cookies.
     * Para garantir a exclusão do perfil vinculado ao seu UUID, não
       exclua seu cookie de recusa da Outbrain por ao menos 21 dias. Sua
       recusa às recomendações personalizadas da Outbrain entra em vigor
       imediatamente. No entanto, se o seu navegador permite armazenamento
       local e você aceitar novamente as recomendações personalizadas da
       Outbrain dentro de 21 dias após sua recusa, é possível que seu
       perfil anterior seja revinculado ao seu UUID. Se você não fizer
       nova aceitação dentro de 21 dias, seu perfil será excluído e não
       poderá ser recuperado.
     * Como acontece na maioria das recusas, a recusa à Outbrain no
       navegador é feita usando um cookie. O cookie de recusa é feito para
       ser mantido, a fim de cumprir as preferências do usuário. No
       entanto, o recurso de “Prevenção de Rastreamento Inteligente” do
       Safari no iOS 11 pode impactar na persistência dos cookies entre
       websites após uma janela de 24 horas. Sugerimos usar outro
       navegador ou bloquear todos os cookies de terceiros do navegador
       para que você faça a recusa sem precisar depender de nenhuma
       metodologia de recusa de nenhuma empresa.
     * Opções adicionais de recusa.

   Você também pode optar por recusar receber anúncios personalizados
   oferecidos por nós ou outras empresas de publicidade usando ferramentas
   de entidades do setor, como as páginas da NAI ou as diversas páginas
   baseadas na DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
   www.youradchoices.ca/choices e/ou EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
   Visitando as páginas da NAI, DAA, DAAC ou EDAA pró-escolha do
   consumidor permite recusar todos ou alguns dos serviços dos membros
   participantes. Como ocorre na recusa junto à Outbrain, essas recusas
   não significam que você deixará de receber todos os anúncios: eles só
   deixarão de ser sob medida para você. Você pode continuar a receber
   anúncios; por exemplo, com base no website específico que você está
   visualizando (ou seja, anúncios baseados no contexto). E se os seus
   navegadores estiverem configurados para rejeitar cookies quando você
   visitar as páginas pró-escolha do consumidor da DAA, DAAC ou EDAA, a
   recusa também pode não funcionar corretamente.
     * Bases legais.

   Os fundamentos legais da Outbrain para processar dados pessoais de
   Usuários apoiam-se nas bases legais determinadas por cada um dos nossos
   Sites Parceiros. Cada Site Parceiro baseia-se em consentimento ou
   interesse legítimo. Consulte a política de privacidade aplicável dos
   Sites Parceiros para mais informações sobre as bases legais utilizadas.
   Se um Parceiro se basear no seu consentimento, a Outbrain não instalará
   um cookie nos seus aparelhos sem que você tenha dado seu consentimento
   no respectivo Site Parceiro.
   Parceiros Comerciais: Você é um “Parceiro Comercial” ao se cadastrar
   (ou trocar e-mails com a Outbrain) em nome da empresa para a qual
   trabalha para utilizar os serviços Outbrain Amplify ou Outbrain Engage.
   Veja mais aqui.
   (a) Quais informações coletamos e por quê
   Você pode fornecer determinados dados pessoais (como endereço de
   e-mail) ao se inscrever para os serviços Amplify ou Engage ou se
   comunicar ou interagir conosco por outros meios. Se você se inscrever
   para se tornar Parceiro Comercial, podemos solicitar informações
   adicionais suas via formulários de inscrição para anunciante, pedidos
   de inserção e outros meios. Coletamos informações automaticamente sobre
   as ações do seu nome de usuário no painel da Outbrain. Por exemplo, se
   como Parceiro Comercial Amplify você alterar o custo por clique de uma
   de suas campanhas, o registro de auditoria da Outbrain terá o histórico
   de todas essas ações.
   Coletamos e processamos os dados pessoais acima para cumprir nossas
   obrigações nos termos do nosso acordo como Parceiro Comercial (ou
   potencial Parceiro Comercial) seu, inclusive para:
   responder às suas perguntas e solicitações;
   fornecer acesso a determinadas funções e recursos dos nossos serviços
   Amplify ou Engage (ex.: para fornecimento e manutenção da sua conta no
   painel);
   verificar sua identidade;
   nos comunicar com você sobre sua conta, nossos produtos e promoções
   disponíveis relevantes para o seu uso do serviço Amplify ou Engage.
   (b) Quais cookies e outras tecnologias similares utilizamos
   Consulte esta Tabela de Cookies em “Parceiros Comerciais” para uma
   lista detalhada dos cookies (e os respectivos períodos de retenção) que
   usamos com Parceiros Comerciais.
   (c) Como podemos compartilhar informações
   Podemos revelar determinadas informações de Parceiros Comerciais a
   fornecedores, prestadores de serviços ou outros que auxiliem a Outbrain
   na prestação dos seus serviços (ex.: processamento de cartões de
   crédito). Consulte também a seção de Compartilhamento desta Política de
   Privacidade.
   (d) Seus direitos
   Se, como Parceiro Comercial, você deseja verificar, corrigir, atualizar
   ou solicitar desativação das suas informações, você pode acessar o
   painel da Outbrain para editar suas preferências de perfil ou nos
   contatar em support@outbrain.com. Se você está recebendo e-mails da
   Outbrain, você pode se “descadastrar” acessando o link nos e-mails.
   Observe que o descadastramento pode não desativar o recebimento de
   notificações importantes para o fornecimento dos serviços Amplify ou
   Engage (ex.: faturas por e-mail).
   A base legal da Outbrain para processar dados pessoais dos Parceiros
   Comerciais é o seu interesse legítimo.
   3. Como mantemos a segurança das informações, transferências fora do
   EEE, compartilhamento e períodos de retenção

                                      +

   Segurança
   A Outbrain possui uma equipe de segurança dedicada. Mantemos rigorosos
   controles sobre os dados que coletamos, mantendo-os em bancos de dados
   protegidos com firewall e permissões de acesso estritamente limitadas e
   controladas, para garantir sua segurança. Verifique nossos padrões de
   segurança para mais informações.
   Parceiros Comerciais têm acesso a certos recursos protegidos por senha
   dos serviços Amplify ou Engage. Eles são responsáveis por manter sua
   senha confidencial. Lembre-se que, infelizmente, a transmissão de
   informações via internet não é totalmente segura. Um tipo de fraude
   comum na internet é conhecido como spoofing ou phishing. Ele ocorre
   quando você recebe um e-mail de uma fonte que parece legítima
   solicitando dados pessoais seus. Tenha em mente que não lhe mandaremos
   nenhum e-mail solicitando a verificação de cartão de crédito,
   informações bancárias ou quaisquer outros dados pessoais. Se você vier
   a receber um e-mail que pareça ser nosso solicitando essas informações
   suas, não responda e não clique em nenhum link constante no e-mail. Em
   vez disso, pedimos que nos encaminhe o e-mail para legal@outbrain.com
   para que possamos investigar possíveis casos de fraude pela internet.
   Transferências de dados fora da UE/do EEE
   Quando transferimos dados pessoais do Espaço Econômico Europeu a outros
   países nos quais as leis aplicáveis não oferecem o mesmo nível de
   proteção à privacidade dos dados que nos Territórios Europeus, tomamos
   medidas para fornecer um nível adequado de proteção à privacidade dos
   dados. Em outras palavras, seus direitos e proteções são conservados
   com seus dados. Por exemplo: usamos cláusulas contratuais aprovadas e
   outras medidas criadas para garantir que os receptores dos seus dados
   pessoais os protejam.
   Compartilhamento
   Adicionalmente à descrição de como podemos revelar seus dados pessoais
   para cada tipo de usuário, também podemos divulgar dados pessoais nos
   seguintes casos:
     * Dentro do grupo de empresas controladas pela Outbrain, por razões
       internas, principalmente para fins comerciais e operacionais;
     * Se passarmos por uma transição comercial, como uma fusão, aquisição
       por outra empresa ou venda total ou parcial dos nossos ativos, seus
       dados pessoais provavelmente estarão entre os ativos transferidos;
     * Quando legalmente exigido (ex.: para cooperar com investigações
       para aplicação da lei ou outros procedimentos legais); e/ou
     * Para reagir a emergências reais.

   Adicionalmente, combinamos seus dados pessoais aos dos outros usuários
   para compartilhar informações sobre tendências e reunir estatísticas de
   usuários com terceiros, sempre de forma agregada e anonimizada.
   Retenção de dados
   O período de retenção para cada um dos cookies usados pela Outbrain
   (seja por ela mesma ou em nosso nome por terceiros) está descrito na
   Tabela de Cookies.
   A Outbrain também mantém uma Política de Retenção de Dados que detalha
   o período de retenção de dados pessoais com base em nossa análise do
   prazo razoável em que é necessário manter cada dado específico para
   fins legais ou comerciais. Quando não precisamos mais dos dados
   pessoais, os excluímos ou destruímos com segurança. Dados agregados,
   que não são capazes de identificar um dispositivo/navegador (ou
   indivíduo) e são usados para fins de relatórios e análise, são mantidos
   enquanto comercialmente necessários.
   4. Crianças

                                      +

   Nenhum dos nossos serviços é destinado a crianças menores de 16 anos.
   Não coletamos deliberadamente dados pessoais de menores de 16 anos de
   idade. Se durante a coleta constatarmos que um Visitante do Site,
   Usuário ou Parceiro Comercial é menor de 16 anos, não usaremos ou
   manteremos seus dados pessoais. Se tomarmos ciência de que
   involuntariamente coletamos dados pessoais de uma criança menor de 16
   anos, tomaremos medidas razoáveis para excluir tais informações dos
   nossos registros. Se você é criança, pedimos que vá brincar no quintal
   em vez de usar ou interagir com a Outbrain!
   5. Cidadãos do Território Europeu

                                      +

   Em conformidade com as leis de privacidade europeias, especialmente com
   o Regulamento Geral de Proteção de Dados da União Europeia (RGPD), a
   Outbrain fornece direitos adicionais específicos a cidadãos dos
   Territórios Europeus, como o direito de acesso, retificação,
   contestação, reclamação, exclusão e bloqueio. Mais especificamente:
     * o direito de perguntar se ou quais dados pessoais estão sendo
       processados por nós e o direito de solicitar que os dados pessoais
       sejam corrigidos ou alterados;
     * em determinadas circunstâncias, o direito de solicitar a exclusão
       de dados pessoais;
     * em determinadas circunstâncias, o direito de exigir restrições no
       processamento de dados pessoais;
     * o direito de cancelar seu consentimento para processamento e uso
       dos seus dados, total ou parcialmente e a qualquer momento, com
       validade para o futuro;
     * o direito de receber seus dados pessoais em formato comum,
       estruturado e mecanicamente legível;
     * o direito de contatar nosso responsável pela proteção dos dados se
       tiver perguntas, comentários, reclamações ou solicitações
       relacionadas à nossa declaração sobre proteção de dados e o
       processamento dos seus dados pessoais;
     * o direito de reclamar à autoridade supervisora responsável caso
       acredite que o processamento dos seus dados pessoais está violando
       a legislação.

   Além dos itens acima, relacionamos determinados direitos para cdadãos
   do Território Europeu ao longo desta Política de Privacidade. Nos
   termos do RGPD, são considerados “Territórios Europeus” o Espaço
   Econômico Europeu (EEE) e a Suíça. Para os fins desta Política de
   Privacidade, o termo “Territórios Europeus” deve continuar a incluir o
   Reino Unido mesmo após sua retirada do Espaço Econômico Europeu em
   decorrência do Brexit.
   Em caso de perguntas sobre o exercício de quaisquer dos direitos acima,
   envie um e-mail a privacyquestions@outbrain.com.
   6. Direitos de privacidade da Califórnia

                                      +

   Conforme o Código Civil da Califórnia, EUA, nos termos das seções
   1798.83–1798.84, os residentes da Califórnia têm direito de nos
   solicitar uma notificação que descreva quais categorias de informações
   pessoais compartilhamos com terceiros ou afiliados corporativos para os
   fins de marketing direto desses terceiros ou afiliados corporativos.
   Essa notificação identificará as categorias de informações
   compartilhadas e incluirá uma lista dos terceiros e afiliados com os
   quais foram compartilhadas, junto com os respectivos nomes e endereços.
   Se você é residente da Califórnia e gostaria de receber uma cópia dessa
   notificação, envie sua solicitação por escrito a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou ao seguinte endereço: Outbrain Inc.,
   39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, USA. Pedimos que
   aguarde 30 dias para a resposta.
   7. Comunicazione antitracciamento (“Do Not Track”)

                                      +

   Alguns navegadores transmitem sinais Do Not Track (DNT), ou Não
   Rastrear, aos websites. Como não há consenso sobre como interpretar o
   sinal DNT, a Outbrain atualmente não altera, modifica ou responde a
   solicitações ou sinais DNT desses navegadores. Continuaremos a
   monitorar a atuação do setor nesse âmbito e reavaliaremos nossas
   práticas relacionadas a DNT se necessário. Enquanto isso, você pode
   utilizar as várias outras ferramentas que fornecemos para controlar a
   coleta e o uso de dados, incluindo a possibilidade de optar por recusar
   o recebimento de recomendações personalizadas na seção Usuários.
   8. Como esta Política de Privacidade pode mudar

                                      +

   De tempos em tempos, podemos fazer alterações nesta Política de
   Privacidade. Nesse caso, colocaremos um aviso em destaque, visível para
   você como Visitante do Site ou Parceiro Comercial. Contudo, não temos
   meios para alertar Usuários sobre atualizações. Recomendamos que você
   verifique aqui periodicamente se a Política de Privacidade foi
   atualizada. Sempre exibiremos a data da última alteração da Política de
   Privacidade no topo da página, para que você saiba a última vez em que
   foi revisada.

Engage Terms

Version 2.3

Effective September 16, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   The following standard partner distribution terms (“Terms”) govern the
   implementation and use of the products, services, and technology made
   available by Outbrain to the Partner identified in a Partner Enrollment
   Form. To the extent that Partner has not yet signed a Partner
   Enrollment form (1) references to “the Agreement” shall be to the Terms
   and (2) these Terms permit the use of the Technology, but no payment
   shall accrue or be made to Partner until such Partner Enrollment Form
   is signed by both Outbrain and Partner.
    1. CERTAIN DEFINITIONS
         1. "Advertiser Recs" means Recommendations (that are not
            Recirculation Recommendations) in the Outbrain network
            submitted by Outbrain’s advertisers.
         2. "Content" means graphical, textual and/or auditory content
            (which may include text, data, information, photos, images,
            graphics, audio, video or other content).
         3. "Data" means all data collected or generated by Outbrain
            through the Technology, including any reports or other data
            made available to Partner in connection with the Agreement.
         4. "Destination Page" means any webpage or other online location
            that may be accessed by clicking on Recommendations.
         5. "End User" means individual human end users of the Partner
            Site(s).
         6. "Partner Sites" means the web properties, applications or
            platforms identified in the Partner Enrollment Form, together
            with any additional properties on which Partner elects to
            implement the Technology upon prior written approval from
            Outbrain (e-mail will suffice).
         7. "Recirculation Recs" means Recommendations (that are not
            Advertiser Recs) which link to Content on Partner Sites.
         8. "Recommendations" means the display of Content that Outbrain
            delivers to the viewer of a web page, application or platform
            on which the Technology is implemented. For clarity,
            Recommendations may include Advertiser Recs and/or
            Recirculation Recs.
         9. "Revenue" means net revenue generated from Advertiser Recs and
            charged by Outbrain for the display of such Advertiser Recs in
            the Outbrain network.
        10. "Technology" means the Javascript, API, SDK and associated
            protocols provided by Outbrain to Partner that, when
            implemented on Partner Site(s), display one or more
            Recommendation(s) and/or permit users to navigate to
            Destination Pages by clicking on such Recommendations.
    2. TECHNOLOGY; PLACEMENT AND APPEARANCE
         1. Partner shall implement the Technology pursuant to Outbrain’s
            technical instructions, including any implementation guides
            made available by Outbrain, as revised from time to time.
            Outbrain, in its sole discretion, may determine which of
            Outbrain’s available Technology (e.g., JS, API, SDK) shall be
            used in each Partner implementation. Implementations of the
            Technology must appear directly below the main Content on each
            page of the Partner Sites on which the Technology is installed
            or as otherwise mutually agreed in writing (e-mail shall
            suffice).
         2. Partner shall display the Technology in accordance with all
            self-regulatory codes and applicable laws and regulations,
            including with respect to disclosing the source or nature of
            the Recommendations. Without limiting the foregoing
            obligation, Partner agrees to comply with Outbrain’s
            instructions regarding how the Technology is to be displayed,
            labelled or identified.
         3. Outbrain may make updates, modifications or improvements to
            the Technology from time to time in its sole discretion,
            including, but not limited to, adding Ads.txt lines and any
            other similar industry standards from time to time. If
            Outbrain requests Partner to implement any such update,
            Partner will use commercially reasonable efforts to do so
            within thirty (30) days of receipt of same from Outbrain;
            provided, that if Outbrain requests Partner to implement any
            update that Partner reasonably determines would materially and
            adversely affect the performance of the Partner Site(s),
            Partner may elect to cease displaying the Technology on such
            page(s) unless Outbrain either addresses Partner’s concerns to
            its reasonable satisfaction or agrees not to require Partner
            to implement such update.
         4. During the Term, Outbrain shall be Partner's sole and
            exclusive provider of content recommendations, where “content
            recommendations” are one or more links comprised of a headline
            or phrase indicating that an End User will be driven to
            Content (regardless of whether the Destination Page displays
            content, advertorials or advertisements).
         5. Notwithstanding any other provision of the Agreement and
            unless Outbrain provides prior written consent, any
            implementation of the Technology shall include at least one
            (1) link to Advertiser Recs per page (i.e., Partner may not
            use the Technology solely to provide Recirculation Recs).
         6. Outbrain may test changes to the Technology, and based on the
            results of such testing, Outbrain may make optimisations to
            the Technology if such optimisations may result in increased
            click through rates on Advertiser Recs (as calculated by
            Outbrain in its sole discretion). Such Outbrain testing will
            be completed on the smallest percentage of Partner Site(s)
            pages that would provide statistically significant results. To
            the extent that Partner uses the API and thus controls any
            testing, Partner shall comply with such testing requests on at
            least a quarterly basis.
    3. REVENUE & PAYMENT
         1. During the Term, Partner will be paid the percentage of
            Adjusted Gross Revenue indicated on the Partner Enrollment
            Form. Outbrain shall make such payments within a certain
            number of days (as indicated on the Partner Enrollment Form)
            after the end of any calendar month during which Outbrain
            collects Revenue. For the avoidance of doubt, Revenue is net
            of, inter alia, fees for third-party data services integrated
            into Outbrain’s platform, invalid clicks/impressions, and
            advertiser and agency discounts/rebates.
         2. Partner must promptly provide Outbrain completed and accurate
            tax forms and all other similar materials Outbrain requires,
            which may include tax form W-8BEN, W-8BEN-E or W-9 if
            applicable (collectively all such forms and materials, “Tax
            Materials”). Notwithstanding anything set forth to the
            contrary in this Agreement, Outbrain may (a) withhold payments
            owed to Partner hereunder without penalty or late fee until
            Outbrain has received Partner’s Tax Materials, and (b) deduct
            any applicable withholding taxes payable by Outbrain from
            payments owed to Partner by Outbrain hereunder as required by
            law. Once Outbrain has received the Tax Materials, Outbrain
            will use commercially reasonable efforts to pay any amounts
            not paid to Partner pursuant to the foregoing subsection (a)
            as soon as reasonably practicable. All payments to Partner
            shall be subject to withholding for income taxes and similar
            deductions, as required by applicable law.
         3. To ensure proper payment, Partner is responsible for notifying
            Outbrain of accurate contact and payment information. Partner
            is also responsible for any charges assessed by Partner’s bank
            or payment provider. If the amount owed to Partner is less
            than US$50, then the amount owed will be accrued if and until
            the calendar month in which the balance of the payments due to
            Partner exceeds US$50. Any dispute regarding a payment from
            Outbrain must be submitted to Outbrain in writing within
            thirty (30) days of postage or wire transfer date of such
            payment or it shall be deemed waived.
         4. Outbrain may withhold, set off, charge or credit back payments
            to Partner, if Outbrain, in its sole reasonable discretion,
            believes that the performance related to them are fraudulent
            or invalid in nature or if Outbrain was charged or credited
            back by the advertiser. Invalid activity is determined by
            Outbrain in all cases and may include, but is not limited to,
            (i) invalid clicks on or impressions of Advertiser Recs
            generated by any person, bot, automated program or similar
            device, including through any clicks/impressions originating
            from Partner’s IP addresses or computers under Partner’s
            control; (ii) clicks/impressions solicited or generated by
            payment of money, false representation, or requests for End
            Users to click on Advertiser Recs or take other actions; (iii)
            Advertiser Recs served to End Users whose browsers have
            JavaScript disabled; and (iv) clicks/impressions co-mingled
            with a significant amount of the activity described in (i, ii,
            and iii) above.
         5. In addition to Outbrain’s other rights and remedies, Outbrain
            may (i) withhold and offset any payments owed to Partner under
            the Agreement against any fees Partner owes Outbrain under the
            Agreement or any other agreement, and/or (ii) require Partner
            to refund Outbrain within thirty (30) days of any invoice, any
            amounts Outbrain may have overpaid to Partner in prior
            periods. If an Outbrain advertiser whose Advertiser Recs are
            displayed on any Partner Site defaults on payment to Outbrain,
            Outbrain may withhold payment or charge back Partner’s
            account.
    4. PRIVACY
         1. Outbrain and Partner shall each maintain and display on their
            respective websites an easily accessible and discoverable
            privacy notice and/or policy that complies with all applicable
            laws, and with respect to Partner, that discloses usage of
            third-party technology to collect and use data in connection
            with the Partner Sites. Outbrain's privacy policy is available
            at here.
         2. The parties are independent controllers in respect of End User
            data processed via the Partner Sites(s) and each party remains
            individually responsible for compliance with relevant data
            protection laws. It is Partner’s (and not Outbrain’s)
            responsibility to comply with all data protection legislation
            in respect of the placing and use of third party cookies, upon
            which the Technology relies, and the capturing of any consent
            to cookies required to be obtained from the relevant End
            User). Partner acknowledges that Outbrain relies on Partner’s
            lawful basis for processing End User data. Accordingly,
            Partner warrants that: (i) if Publisher relies on legitimate
            interest, it has completed a legitimate interest assessment
            which has considered Outbrain’s provision of the Outbrain
            Service; and (ii) if the Publisher relies on consent, the
            Publisher shall disclose Outbrain to an End User via a consent
            management platform using the IAB methodology and pass
            Outbrain a clear consent or no consent signal (i.e., the
            Publisher must not send Outbrain a null or invalid signal via
            a consent management platform). Regardless of the foregoing,
            the parties shall provide End Users access to a user-choice
            mechanism such as the opt out page(s) of the Network
            Advertising Initiative, the Digital Advertising Alliance, the
            European Digital Advertising Alliance, and/or a direct opt out
            of Outbrain through Outbrain’s privacy policy. If an End User
            has opted out of behavioral advertising through a mechanism
            alerting Publisher (instead of Outbrain), such as device
            settings, Publisher must not pass Outbrain such End User’s
            advertiser ID or other identifying mechanism. The provisions
            of the Data Processing Agreement shall be incorporated into,
            and form part of, this Agreement.
    5. LICENSE TERMS
         1. During the Term and subject to Partner’s full compliance with
            all of the terms of the Agreement, Outbrain grants Partner a
            limited, non-exclusive, revocable, non-sublicensable,
            non-transferable licence to use the Technology to display the
            Recommendations on Partner Sites in the form and format
            provided.
            Outbrain grants Partner, during the Term, a limited,
            worldwide, non-exclusive, royalty-free licence to use and
            display Outbrain’s trademarks, service marks and logos
            (collectively, “Outbrain Marks”), as incorporated into the
            Technology, strictly in accordance with Partner’s obligations
            and rights in the Agreement. All goodwill arising out of
            Partner’s use of any of the Outbrain Marks shall inure solely
            to the benefit of Outbrain. Outbrain shall have the right to
            refer to Partner and the Partner Sites in any general listing
            of advertisers or partners (including in marketing and sales
            materials) who have implemented the Technology.
            Notwithstanding the foregoing, each party will request prior
            written consent before issuing a press release regarding the
            Agreement or using the other party’s name on its website other
            than in accordance with the Agreement.
         2. As between the parties: (a) Outbrain retains all right, title
            and interest in and to the Outbrain Marks, Technology, Data,
            and Content displayed on or made available by the Technology
            (excluding any Content from the Partner Sites which shall be
            owned by Partner); and (b) Partner retains all right, title
            and interest in and to the Partner Site(s) including the look
            and feel, excluding the items described in subparagraph (a)
            above, (including without limitation all intellectual property
            rights in them).
         3. The licences granted under the Agreement are specifically set
            forth in the Agreement; there are no implied rights. All
            rights not expressly granted to Partner in the Agreement are
            reserved by Outbrain.
    6. PROHIBITED ACTIVITY
         1. Partner will not: (i) edit, modify, truncate, filter, or
            change the order of Recommendations; (ii) obscure, modify or
            redirect Partner Site users away from a Destination Page, or
            intersperse any Content between the Recommendations and any
            Destination Page; (iii) minimise, remove or otherwise inhibit
            the full and complete display of the Technology; (iv)
            artificially inflate clicks or impressions on Recommendations,
            or encourage or require any person to click on Recommendations
            using incentives or other methods; (v) remove, deface,
            obscure, or alter any notices of intellectual property rights
            included in the Technology; (vi) access, reproduce or use the
            Technology in any manner or for any purpose other than as
            expressly permitted under the Agreement; (vii) modify, adapt,
            translate, prepare derivative works from, decompile, reverse
            engineer, disassemble or otherwise attempt to derive source
            code from the Technology, or attempt to create a substitute or
            similar service or product through use of or access to
            Technology or related proprietary information; (viii) attempt
            to interfere with or disrupt the Technology or attempt to gain
            access to any systems or networks that connect to it other
            than through the Technology as implemented pursuant to the
            Agreement; (ix) copy, cache, distribute, display, alter, or
            otherwise use any Recommendations (or authorise or assist any
            third party to do so) except as such Recommendations are
            provided through the Technology; or (x) use the Technology for
            any purpose not authorised by Outbrain, including for any
            purpose that is inconsistent with the Implementation Guides as
            provided to Partner.
         2. Partner will not deploy the Technology on any properties that
            display adult, obscene, pornographic, defamatory, libelous,
            infringing, abusive, or illegal Content, that promotes hate or
            discrimination, facilitates the sale of firearms or illegal
            drugs, or that participates or encourages participation in,
            illegal activities or is directed at children under of the age
            of 16. Outbrain reserves the right in its sole discretion to
            disable the Technology on any property at any time.
         3. Except as expressly and unambiguously authorised under the
            Agreement, Partner will not copy, rent, lease, sell, transfer,
            assign, sublicense, disassemble, reverse engineer or decompile
            (except to the limited extent expressly authorised by
            applicable statutory law), modify or alter any part of the
            Technology or otherwise use the Technology on behalf of or for
            the benefit of any third party.
    7. REGISTRATION
       Partner is not required to register on the Outbrain website to use
       the Technology. If Partner registers, it will have access to online
       reports and the Outbrain dashboard, which allows Partner to control
       certain settings for the Technology, including certain
       Recommendation functionality. To the extent that Partner registers
       and has access to the Outbrain dashboard, Outbrain may collect
       Partner’s (or individuals who act on behalf of Partner)
       personally identifiable information. Partner will be solely
       responsible for all changes to data made by it, or individuals
       acting on Partner's behalf, through the Outbrain dashboard.
       Estimates of revenue displayed in the Outbrain dashboard are
       provided solely for the Partner’s convenience. Outbrain does not
       guarantee that these estimated amounts displayed during a calendar
       month, if any, shall be precise or definitively due to be paid to
       Partner as a result of the Agreement. Access to Outbrain dashboard
       shall be solely at the discretion of Outbrain and may be
       discontinued by Outbrain at any time.
    8. SUSPENSION OF TECHNOLOGY; TERMINATION
         1. Outbrain may suspend or discontinue all or any aspect of the
            Technology, including its availability, at any time if
            required by exigent circumstances (such as a significant
            security breach, propagation of malware, other viruses to
            users, etc.) or other improper, unlawful, fraudulent or
            misleading circumstances.
         2. Either party may terminate the Agreement at any time in the
            event of a material breach by the other party of any provision
            of the Agreement that remains uncured for seven (7) days after
            the breaching party’s receipt of written notice of the breach.
         3. The Agreement is terminable on thirty (30) days prior written
            notice unless otherwise stated on the Partner Enrollment Form.
            Upon expiration or termination of the Agreement, all rights
            and obligations of the parties under the Agreement will be
            extinguished, except that Sections 9.6, 9.7, 10, 11 and 13 of
            the Terms will survive termination, as well as any other terms
            of this Agreement which, by their nature should survive
            termination, and continue to bind the parties.
    9. LIMITED WARRANTIES; INDEMNITY
         1. Each party represents and warrants to the other that: (i) it
            has all right, power, and authority necessary to enter into
            the Agreement and perform its obligations under it; and (ii)
            it will comply with all applicable laws, regulations and
            orders in its performance of the Agreement.
         2. Outbrain warrants that the Technology as provided and made
            available by Outbrain and implemented by Partner in accordance
            with the Agreement does not and will not, to the best of
            Outbrain's knowledge, infringe any Intellectual Property Right
            of any third party.
         3. Partner represents and warrants that the Partner Site(s) do
            not and will not contain any Content that is: (i) illegal;
            (ii) infringes any Intellectual Property Right of any third
            party; (iii) is obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous
            material or material that violates any person’s right of
            publicity, privacy or personality; or (iv) knowingly contains
            a misrepresentation of fact or factual inaccuracy.
         4. Nothing in the Agreement shall be construed as a promise of
            any sort of minimum traffic volumes, clicks, impressions or
            usage or any other such commitments by Outbrain to Partner.
         5. Except as expressly provided in the Agreement, neither party
            makes any representations or warranties, express or implied in
            relation to the Agreement, the Partner Sites, the Technology,
            any Content made available by Outbrain through the Technology
            or any other matters (including any implied terms relating to
            satisfactory quality or fitness for any purpose, any
            warranties of availability or uninterrupted or error free
            performance, any warranties arising out of any course of
            performance or dealing).
         6. Outbrain makes no representations or warranties concerning any
            Content contained in or accessed via the Technology, including
            without limitation Advertiser Recs, and Outbrain will not be
            responsible or liable for the contents, accuracy, intellectual
            property infringement, legality or decency of Content provided
            through the Technology or for Partner’s reliance on any of the
            foregoing.
         7. Each party (the “Indemnifying Party”) shall indemnify, defend
            and hold harmless the other party and its parent and
            affiliates, and each of its and their respective affiliates,
            directors, officers, shareholders, members, authorised
            representatives, employees and agents (collectively, the
            “Indemnified Party”) from and against any and all claims,
            losses, liabilities, damages, costs, settlements, regulatory
            findings and/or fines
            and other expenses (including reasonable legal fees)
            (collectively, “Claims”) that arise out of any third party
            claim occasioned by any breach or alleged breach of any of the
            Indemnifying Party’s representations, warranties and
            obligations of the Agreement. The Indemnified Party shall
            promptly notify the Indemnifying Party of any Claim in
            writing, provided, however, that any delay in providing such
            notice shall not relieve the Indemnifying Party of any of its
            obligations except to the extent that the Indemnifying Party
            is actually prejudiced by such delay. The Indemnified Party
            shall have the right to participate in the defence and
            settlement of the Claim with counsel of its own choosing and
            its own expense, subject to the Indemnifying Party’s control
            thereof.
   10. CONFIDENTIALITY
       Each party (the “Receiving Party”) acknowledges that it will have
       access to certain information and materials, including the terms of
       the Agreement, concerning the business, technology, products and
       services of the other party (the “Disclosing Party”) that are, or
       reasonably should be considered given the circumstances of
       disclosure to be, confidential (“Confidential Information”).
       Confidential Information will not include: (a) information known to
       the Receiving Party prior to disclosure by the Disclosing Party;
       (b) information independently developed by the Receiving Party
       without reference to Confidential Information of the Disclosing
       Party; (c) information that is or becomes publicly known through no
       fault of the Receiving Party; or (d) information disclosed to the
       Receiving Party by a third party without breach of any obligation
       of confidence. Except as permitted hereunder, the Receiving Party
       (aa) will not use any Confidential Information for its own account
       or the account of any third party, and (bb) will not disclose any
       Confidential Information to any third party other than its
       directors, employees, contractors, advisors, investors or potential
       investors who have a need to know and who have agreed not to use,
       and to maintain the confidentiality of, the Confidential
       Information consistent with this Section 10. The Receiving Party
       will return or destroy the Confidential Information promptly upon
       the Disclosing Party’s written request. Notwithstanding the
       foregoing, the Receiving Party may disclose Confidential
       Information to the extent required by applicable law or legal
       process, provided that the Receiving Party provides prompt written
       notice of any required disclosure to the Disclosing Party and
       provides reasonable cooperation (at the Disclosing Party’s expense)
       with any effort by the Disclosing Party to contest or limit the
       scope of such disclosure.
   11. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
         1. Neither Outbrain nor the Partner exclude or limit liability to
            the other for: (i) death or personal injury caused by its
            negligence or that of its employees or contractors; (ii) fraud
            or fraudulent misrepresentation; or (iii) any other liability
            which cannot lawfully be excluded or limited.
         2. Subject always to Section 11.1, neither party will be liable
            for: (a) any special, indirect, incidental or consequential
            loss or damage; (b) any loss of goodwill or reputation; (c)
            any loss of data; (d) any loss of contracts, business or
            anticipated savings; or (e) any loss of profits arising out of
            or in connection with the Agreement or any breach hereof,
            whether or not such party has been advised of the possibility
            of such loss or damage, howsoever incurred and whether under a
            theory of contract, tort (including negligence) statutory duty
            or otherwise.
         3. Subject always to Section 11.1 and except for liabilities
            arising out of a party’s violation, misappropriation or
            infringement of a party’s Intellectual Property Rights, in no
            event will either party’s aggregate liability arising out of
            or in connection with the Agreement or any breach (whether
            under a theory of contract, tort (including negligence),
            statutory duty, or otherwise) exceed the greater of: (i)
            £100,000 GBP; and (ii) 125% of the amount of Revenue paid or
            payable to the Partner in the 12-month period immediately
            preceding the event giving rise to liability (or, in the case
            of a series of connected events, the first such event).
         4. Each party acknowledges to each other that it accepts that the
            restrictions on the liability of each other party, as set out
            in the Agreement are reasonable in all the circumstances.
   12. EXPORT CONTROLS
       Partner will comply with all export laws and restrictions and
       regulations of the Department of Commerce, the United States
       Department of Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control ("OFAC"),
       or other United States or foreign agency or authority, and shall
       not export, or allow the export or re-export of the Technology in
       violation of any such restrictions, laws or regulations. By
       downloading or using the Technology, Partner agrees to the
       foregoing and represent and warrants that it is not located in,
       under the control of, or a national or resident of any restricted
       country. Partner represents and warrants that none of it, or any
       individual, entity, or organisation holding any ownership interest
       or controlling interest in Partner, including any officer or
       director, is an individual, entity, organisation with whom any
       United States law, regulation, or executive order prohibits U.S.
       companies and individuals from dealing, including, names appearing
       on the Specially Designated Nationals List.
   13. MISCELLANEOUS
       The Agreement shall be interpreted and construed in accordance with
       and governed by the laws of England and Wales, without regard to
       its conflict of law provisions or the United Nations Conventions
       for the International Sale of Goods. Any action or proceeding
       arising from or relating to the Agreement must be submitted to the
       exclusive jurisdiction of English courts. The parties agree that
       irreparable damage would occur in the event that any of the
       provisions of the Agreement is not performed in accordance with
       these specific terms. Accordingly, the parties agree that each
       shall be entitled to injunctive relief to prevent breaches of the
       Agreement and to enforce specifically the terms and provisions of
       the Agreement, in addition to any other remedy to which they are
       entitled at law or in equity. The parties are independent
       contractors, and nothing in the Agreement will be construed to
       create a partnership, joint venture, agency or other relationship
       between the parties. No failure or forbearance by a party to
       enforce any of its rights under the Agreement or insist upon
       performance of the other party’s obligations under the Agreement
       will be deemed a waiver of such rights or obligations to any
       extent, and no waiver by either party of any default or breach of
       the Agreement will constitute a waiver of any other or subsequent
       default or breach. Neither party will be liable for any failure to
       perform due to causes beyond the party's reasonable control. The
       Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties
       concerning its subject matter and supersedes all prior or
       contemporaneous agreements or understandings, written or oral,
       concerning such subject matter. The parties to this Agreement do
       not intend that any term of this Agreement should be enforceable,
       by virtue of the Contracts (Rights of Third Parties) Act 1999 or
       otherwise, by any person who is not a Party to this Agreement. The
       Partner Enrollment Form may be amended, modified or superseded,
       only by a written instrument signed by both parties. The headings
       in the Agreement are for the convenience of reference only and have
       no legal effect. The Agreement may be executed and delivered via
       electronic transmission or another means of complete and accurate
       reproduction, and copies of the Agreement delivered via such means
       will be deemed originals for all purposes. The Agreement may be
       executed in counterparts, each of which will be deemed an original,
       but all of which together will constitute one and the same
       instrument. If any provision of the Agreement is held to be
       unenforceable for any reason, such provision shall be reformed only
       to the extent necessary to make it enforceable, failing which, it
       shall be severed from the Agreement and the balance of the
       Agreement shall continue in full force and effect. Neither party
       may assign the Agreement or any of its rights or obligations
       hereunder without the other party’s prior written consent, except
       (i) due to operation of law, merger, reorganisation, or as a result
       of an acquisition or change of control, and (ii) by Outbrain to its
       subsidiaries. Subject to the foregoing, the Agreement will be
       binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties and their
       permitted successors and assigns.

Amplify Terms

Version 8.7

Effective September 4, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   These terms last revised and are current as of the effective date set
   forth above. Outbrain reserve the right to change these terms from time
   to time.
   Amplify Terms and Conditions
   These Amplify Terms and Conditions (“Terms”) are entered into by
   Outbrain Inc. (“Outbrain”) and the entity executing an Insertion Order
   or using the Outbrain dashboard (“Customer”). These Terms govern
   Customer’s use of the Outbrain service, and together with an Insertion
   Order (or the information entered through the Outbrain dashboard
   (“Dashboard”)) comprise the " Agreement " between Outbrain and
   Customer. If there is any inconsistency between: (i) the terms of a
   signed Insertion Order or those entered through the Dashboard (either “
   Campaign Details ”), and (ii) these Terms, the Campaign Details as
   applicable, shall prevail.
   1.&Tab;Services
   1.1&Tab; Outbrain partners with a network of online properties (the
   “Network”) and displays a user interface containing links that navigate
   to websites (the “Service”). Outbrain uses its proprietary algorithms
   to determine what links appear within the Service on the Network.
   1.2 Outbrain shall display links to graphical, textual, video and/or
   auditory content selected by Customer (the links and the content
   accessed from the link together are the “Content”) on the Network
   through the Service. Outbrain shall continue to distribute the Content
   on the Network until the earlier of: (i) the end date of Customer’s
   campaign, (ii) reaching Customer’s budget, or (iii) the disabling of a
   campaign (provided that Outbrain reserves the right to charge for
   additional Actions as the Content is removed from circulation – see
   FAQs for more details).
   1.3 Outbrain does not guarantee: (i) the placement, positioning or the
   timing of delivery of any Content, (ii) clicks or impressions
   (including clicks from a particular audience segment) or (iii)
   conversions. If Fees (as defined in Section 5) do not reach Customer's
   budget, Customer's sole remedies shall be to: (i) extend the end date
   of the applicable campaign, (ii) replace or add to the Content with
   other Content (also subject to Section 2 below) to complete the
   campaign; or (iii) to pay only for accrued fees on the Content. In no
   event shall Outbrain be liable for failure to deliver traffic to
   Content.
   1.4 Outbrain will make reports available to the Customer regarding the
   campaign(s). The final monthly reports (which may differ from the daily
   reports) will provide the conclusive basis for Outbrain's calculation
   of the fees owed by Customer. Customer may submit its own
   Outbrain-compatible tracker. If there is a 10% discrepancy or more
   between Customer's numbers (based on the Outbrain-compatible tracker)
   and Outbrain's numbers then the parties agree to work in good faith to
   identify the correct amount to be paid to Outbrain. If the discrepancy
   is less than 10%, Outbrain's numbers shall be conclusive.
   2.&Tab;Content
   2.1 Customer has the right and authorizes Outbrain to place the Content
   on the Network, and is solely responsible for determining the propriety
   and legality of the Content. In addition, Content selected by Customer
   must comply with Outbrain's Advertising Guidelines, as may be updated
   from time to time by Outbrain. Outbrain may at any time (at its sole
   discretion) reject or remove Content. Customer acknowledges that
   Outbrain is not responsible for the Content and that the Content may
   change during the course of a campaign due to revisions by the
   Content's author, comments from readers, or otherwise. Customer's
   recourse in the event of such change shall be to direct Outbrain to
   remove such Content from its then-current campaign and/or select other
   Content. Customer further acknowledges that, if there is an objection
   to the Content (whether from the content author or publisher, or
   otherwise) Outbrain will act in accordance with Section 2 of it's Terms
   of Use and may cease (at it's sole discretion) including the Content in
   the Service.
   2.2 Customer represents and warrants that: (i) if the Content was
   written by or under the direction of Customer or paid for by Customer,
   that fact shall be clearly disclosed on or near the Content; (ii) it is
   authorized to use and/or has approved all words of the Content’s
   headline (whether written by Customer or on Customer’s behalf); (iii)
   Content headlines accurately reflect the tone and subject matter of the
   Content; and, (iv) it is authorized to use and/or has approved any
   image(s) related to its campaign(s) with Outbrain.
   2.3 Customer shall not, directly or indirectly, provide Content that:
   (i) is obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous, pornographic,
   violent, profane, indecent or unlawful; (ii) is factually inaccurate,
   misleading or deceptive; and/or (iii) facilitates or promotes any type
   of illegal activity, including without limitation pyramid schemes,
   gambling, the sale or use of illicit drugs, or discrimination or
   harassment of any individual or group. Further, each piece of Customer
   Content shall neither (a) redirect to a destination other than as
   originally submitted to the Service, and/or (b) be substantively
   different from the Content originally submitted to the Service.
   2.4 Both parties shall implement anti-malware scanning processes of the
   Content. Upon notice, both parties shall take immediate action to
   remove any suspicious Content from the Network.
   3.&Tab;Term and Cancellation
   The Campaign Details will set forth the start and end date of a
   particular campaign. However, the Agreement, or an individual campaign
   may be suspended or terminated: (i) by Customer for any reason upon two
   (2) business days' written notice to Outbrain or within twelve (12)
   hours through the Dashboard, or (ii) by Outbrain for any reason upon
   fourteen days (14) days’ written notice to Customer. During the notice
   period, all previously contracted campaigns shall continue to run
   pursuant to the Campaign Details and Customer shall be responsible for
   paying Outbrain for all Fees accrued during such notice period.
   Outbrain also reserves the right to suspend or terminate Customer's use
   of the Service if Outbrain reasonably believes Customer is in breach of
   the terms of this Agreement.
   4.&Tab;Campaign Details
   If Customer utilizes Outbrain’s Dashboard, Customer will have access to
   certain online reports and control over its campaign(s). To the extent
   Customer registers and has access to the Dashboard, Outbrain may
   collect certain personal data of the Customer. We collect and process
   this personal data in order to respond Customer questions or requests,
   provide Customer’s with access to certain services, verify Customer’s
   identity and communicate with Customers about the use of the Service.
   Customer is solely responsible for all changes requested or approved
   (either directly or via Outbrain's API), including those made through
   the Dashboard using its login. Customer is solely responsible for
   protecting its login and password to the Dashboard. Customer can manage
   campaigns using the Dashboard by modifying the Campaign Details, and/or
   Customer may have the option of working with an Outbrain account
   manager, as determined by Outbrain.
   5.&Tab;Fees and Payment Terms
   5.1 “Fees” are based on deliverables sold via one of following payment
   methods: (i) cost-per-click (“CPC”), (ii) cost-per thousand impressions
   (“CPM”), or (iii) other desired actions agreed between the parties from
   time to time, each an “Action”. Customer shall pay Outbrain Fees for
   Customer Content delivered via the Network as measured by Outbrain's
   tracking system, and any applicable taxes. If CPC is being used for
   campaign measurement, such CPC may not be less than Outbrain’s
   then-in-effect minimum CPC (which may vary by market). If Customer is
   utilizing Outbrain’s automatic bidding feature, Customer grants
   Outbrain the right to set and modify Customer’s CPC at Outbrain’s
   discretion to aid in achieving Customer’s targets for its campaign.
   Customer shall be solely responsible for any additional fees incurred
   for utilizing third party ad serving on its campaign(s). Customer may
   increase or decrease its budget through the Dashboard or through an
   amendment to an Insertion Order.
   5.2 If Customer has signed an Insertion Order, Fees will generally be
   invoiced by Outbrain to Customer by the end of the following calendar
   month, unless otherwise set forth in an IO. Customer shall pay all
   invoices within thirty (30) days from receipt. Any portion of a charge
   not disputed in good faith must be paid in full. If Customer has
   provided the Campaign Details through the Dashboard or has signed an
   Insertion Order and has used a credit card for billing purposes,
   Outbrain shall charge the Outbrain fees (including processing fees) to
   Customer’s credit card at such intervals as Outbrain determines in its
   sole discretion. The decision as to whether to allow Customer to choose
   between invoice and credit card rests solely with Outbrain. Outbrain
   shall review all billing inquiries, including refund requests, on a
   case-by-case basis and reserves the right to approve or deny any
   request in its sole discretion.
   5.3 If Customer disputes any amount on an invoice, Customer should
   provide written notice to Outbrain (email is sufficient) within thirty
   (30) days of receipt of invoice. Customer’s email must include the
   amount disputed and provide adequate information to support any such
   claim. Within twenty (20) business days of receipt of Customer’s email,
   Outbrain will investigate and provide Customer with a written response.
   Customer may not withhold payment for any undisputed amounts, and any
   portion of a charge not disputed in good faith within thirty (30) days
   from receipt of invoice must be paid in full.
   5.4 If payment is not made when due and not properly disputed pursuant
   to Section 5.3, Outbrain may charge interest at the rate of 6% per
   annum from the due date until the date of actual payment, whether
   before or after judgment. Outbrain also reserves the right to suspend
   or terminate Customer's use of the Service until Customer has paid all
   amounts due and to charge Customer for all costs of collection,
   including collection agency and reasonable legal fees and court costs.
   Customer authorizes Outbrain to investigate Customer's credit record.
   If applicable, Customer agrees to provide such further financial
   information and documentation as may be required from time to time by
   Outbrain as a condition for the continued extension of credit. Customer
   acknowledges and agrees that any account, credit card and related
   billing and payment information which Customer provides to Outbrain may
   be shared by Outbrain with companies who work on Outbrain's behalf
   solely for the purpose of performing credit checks, effecting payment
   to Outbrain, collecting debts owed to Outbrain and/or servicing
   Customer's account. Outbrain may, in its sole discretion, extend,
   revise or revoke credit at any time.
   6.&Tab;Additional Features and Terms
   6.1 Outbrain may also make additional Service features available to
   Customer from time to time and use of such features may be subject to
   Customer’s agreement to certain additional terms and conditions
   (“Additional Terms”) (e.g., via an online click-through agreement or
   via the Dashboard). Such features will be provided at Outbrain’s
   discretion to Customer and may include fees in addition to those
   described in Section 5.1. Customer’s acceptance of the Additional Terms
   will constitute a binding and enforceable agreement as between Outbrain
   and Customer. In the event of any inconsistency between these Terms,
   the Additional Terms, and the Campaign Details, the order of precedence
   is: (i) Additional Terms, (ii) Campaign Details, and (iii) these Terms.
   Customers who choose to utilize LiveRamp services (via the Outbrain
   dashboard or otherwise) for purposes of their Outbrain campaign(s) are
   subject to LiveRamp terms.
   6.2 Subject to Customer’s compliance with Section 8 below, Customer may
   place (i) Outbrain pixel(s) (the “Outbrain Pixel”) on Customer’s
   website or application pages and/or (ii) third party pixels or tags
   (“the “Third Party Pixels”) for the purpose of providing analytics
   related to Customer’s campaign and/or enhanced targeting functionality
   (the Outbrain Pixel and Third Party Pixels together are the “Pixels”).
   Customer represents and warrants that (a) its use of the Pixels is in
   accordance with Data Protection Laws; and (b) it has provided
   appropriate notice to users regarding use of the Pixels, including an
   explanation (1) that third parties, including Outbrain, may use cookies
   or similar technologies to collect or receive information from
   Customer’s website(s), and may use that information to provide
   measurement services and target ads; and (2) as to how users opt-out of
   the collection of information for targeting purposes. Customer shall
   not use the Pixels unless and until it has complied with the provisions
   of this Section 6.2.
   6.3 If Customer utilizes third party segments for enhanced targeting
   (“3rd Party Targeting”) of its campaign(s), Customer shall pay for its
   use of 3rd Party Targeting (“3rd Party Data Costs”) including any
   applicable taxes. Customer’s invoice for each campaign shall include
   both the Fees, pursuant to Section 5.1, plus the 3rd Party Data Costs
   (if applicable) for utilizing 3rd Party Targeting. Customer agrees that
   3rd Party Data costs will be based on Outbrain’s reporting metrics. If
   Customer utilizes 3rd Party Targeting the Customer shall (i) disclose
   this to users via an appropriate notice and/or in its privacy policy
   (as applicable), and (ii) not use 3rd Party Targeting to target minors
   or other sensitive categories of data.
   7.&Tab;Confidentiality
   7.1 Each party agrees that with respect to any Confidential Information
   (as defined below) that is disclosed by one party to the other in
   connection with the Agreement, the party receiving such Confidential
   Information shall not disclose such Confidential Information to any
   third party, or use it for any purpose, except in connection with its
   rights and obligations under the Agreement. "Confidential Information"
   means all information concerning a party or any of its subsidiaries or
   affiliates that is not generally known to the public, which information
   is marked confidential or proprietary, or which under the circumstances
   ought reasonably to be treated as confidential or proprietary, and
   includes, without limitation, the terms of the Agreement.
   Notwithstanding the foregoing, Confidential Information does not
   include information that: (i) is, as of the time of disclosure, or
   thereafter becomes, part of the public domain through a source other
   than the receiving party; (ii) was lawfully in the possession of the
   receiving party as of the time of disclosure; (iii) is independently
   developed by the receiving party without reference to the Confidential
   Information; or (iv) is subsequently obtained from a third party not
   subject to an obligation of confidentiality with respect to the
   information disclosed.
   7.2 Confidential Information shall be kept in the strictest confidence
   and shall be protected by all reasonable and necessary security
   measures. Confidential Information shall not be released by the
   receiving party to anyone except an employee or agent, who has a need
   to know same, and who is bound by confidentiality obligations at least
   as restrictive as these contained herein. Neither party will use any
   portion of Confidential Information provided by the other party
   pursuant to the Agreement for any purpose other than as expressly set
   forth under the Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, either party
   may disclose Confidential Information strictly necessary to comply with
   the demands of any court order, law or governmental agency and Outbrain
   may share Confidential Information of Customer with any holding company
   of Customer or with any subsidiary company of Customer’s holding
   company.
   7.3 If Customer is acting on behalf of a Content provider, Customer
   authorizes Outbrain to grant such Content provider (or any subsequent
   third party appointed by the Content provider) access to and a right to
   use the Campaign Details.
   8.&Tab;Additional Representations and Warranties/Disclaimers
   8.1 Each party represents and warrants to the other party that: (i) it
   has all necessary rights and authority to enter into the Agreement and
   grant the rights and licenses under the Agreement; (ii) it shall comply
   with Applicable Laws and (iii) the execution or acceptance of the
   Agreement (which includes the Campaign Details), and the performance of
   its respective obligations and duties pursuant to the Agreement, do not
   and will not violate any agreement to which such party is bound.
   “Applicable Laws” means any applicable federal, state or foreign laws
   or regulations or any industry self-regulatory rules or guidelines
   (including the Interactive Advertising Bureau Guidelines, Standards &
   Best Practices, the NAI Code of Conduct, the DAA Self-Regulatory
   Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising, and the EU General Dara
   Protection Regulation (2016/679) ("GDPR"). The GDPR, together with any
   applicable national data protection are hereinafter referred to as the
   "Data Protection Laws”.
   8.2 Customer further represents and warrants that: (i) the Content does
   not violate any Applicable Laws, rules and regulations and will not
   contain any material which may be harmful, abusive, obscene,
   threatening or defamatory; (ii) it has all necessary rights to permit
   and grants Outbrain pursuant to the Agreement all such rights which are
   necessary for Outbrain to (as applicable) use, host, cache, route,
   store, copy, modify, distribute, reformat, reproduce, publish, display,
   transmit and distribute the Content; (iii) use of the Content in
   accordance with the Agreement will not infringe any intellectual
   property rights of any third party; (iv) it cannot and will not attempt
   to provide Content that is targeted to children under the age of
   thirteen; (v) it will not use the Service in a manner that provides an
   unintended advantage or interferes with the integrity and/or overall
   performance of the Service, and (vi) if using the Dashboard, Customer
   will adhere to any rules of such use as solely determined by Outbrain
   (e.g. not using source bidding to whitelist any particular Network
   source).
   8.3 If Customer is an agency (or other third party acting on behalf of
   the provider of the Content), Customer represents and warrants that:
   (i) it is the authorized agent of the provider of the Content; (ii) it
   has the legal authority to enter into the Agreement and make all
   decisions and take all actions relating to the provider of the Content;
   (iii) it has entered into a written agreement granting the agent the
   authority to represent the provider of the Content in accordance with
   (i) and (ii) above (and shall submit such agreement to Outbrain on
   demand). Customer further agrees that it is not acting on behalf of a
   French company or a foreign company whose advertising content mainly
   targets French territory exclusively through the Dashboard. If Customer
   is acting on behalf of a French content provider, please contact
   info@outbrain.com for more information on how to purchase Outbrain
   Services on behalf of a French content provider advertising mainly
   targets the French territory and in compliance with applicable French
   laws.
   8.4 EXCEPT AS MAY BE EXPRESSLY SET FORTH IN THE AGREEMENT, OUTBRAIN
   MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS OR WARRANTIES, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED -- INCLUDING
   BUT NOT LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, TITLE,
   NON-INFRINGEMENT, OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, OR ANY
   WARRANTIES ARISING FROM A COURSE OF DEALING, USAGE OR TRADE PRACTICE --
   ABOUT ITS SERVICES AND THE PERFORMANCE OR SUCCESS OF ANY CAMPAIGNS MADE
   BY IT ON BEHALF OF CUSTOMER, OR THAT THE SERVICE WILL OPERATE
   UNINTERRUPTED, SECURE OR ERROR FREE.
   9.&Tab;Data Protection
   9.1 The parties acknowledge that some or all of data used or collected
   through the Service (or use of Outbrain Pixels) may qualify as, or
   include, Personal Data, however, as of the Effective Date, Outbrain
   does not send and/or receive any end-user data to the Customer.
   9.2 In addition to complying with all the all Applicable Laws
   (including Data Protection Laws) each party shall be individually
   responsible for including the provision of relevant notices and
   obtaining relevant consents as required by Data Protection Laws. To the
   extent necessary, the parties shall (i) collaborate with respect to
   requests from Data Subjects, and (ii) implement appropriate technical
   and organizational measures which prevent accidental or unlawful
   destruction and loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure of, or access
   to Personal Data. The parties shall each maintain and display on their
   respective websites an easily accessible and discoverable privacy
   policy that (i) discloses the use of any cookies (based on redirects or
   otherwise) through the Service, and (ii) includes relevant details
   regarding each party’s security controls and international transfers.
   The terms “Data Subject”, “Personal Data”, “Personal Data Breach” and
   “Controller” shall have the meanings stated in the GDPR.
   10.&Tab;Indemnification
   10.1 Each party shall defend, indemnify and hold harmless the other
   party and its respective agents, affiliates, subsidiaries, directors,
   officers, employees, contractors, and Network partners (as applicable)
   against any and all third party claims resulting from the breach of
   such party's duties, obligations and representations under the
   Agreement.
   10.2 In connection with any such claim: (i) the indemnified party shall
   provide prompt written notice to the indemnifying party of any such
   claim (provided that the failure to provide such prompt notice shall
   not relieve the indemnifying party of its indemnification obligations
   in the Agreement, except to the extent it has been damaged thereby);
   (ii) the indemnifying party shall have sole control of the defense or
   settlement of the claim (provided that the indemnifying party may not
   enter into any settlement that may adversely affect the rights or
   obligations of the indemnified party without the indemnified party's
   prior written consent); (iii) at the indemnifying party's request and
   expense, the indemnified party cooperating in the investigation and
   defense of such claim; and (iv) the indemnified party shall have the
   right to participate in its defense with counsel of its own choosing at
   the indemnified party's expense.
   11.&Tab;Limitation of Liability
   EXCEPT WITH RESPECT TO CLAIMS ARISING FROM A PARTY'S INDEMNITY
   OBLIGATIONS, WILLFUL MISCONDUCT OR A BREACH OF THE CONFIDENTIALITY,
   DATA PROTECTION PROVISIONS AND/OR NON-PAYMENT OF FEES OWED IN THE
   AGREEMENT, THE MAXIMUM AGGREGATE LIABILITY OF EITHER PARTY AND ITS
   DIRECTORS, OFFICERS, EMPLOYEES, VENDORS, NETWORK PARTNERS OR AGENTS FOR
   ANY ACTION REGARDLESS OF THE FORM OF THE ACTION, WHETHER IN TORT OR
   CONTRACT, ARISING UNDER OR RELATED IN ANY WAY TO THE AGREEMENT OR ITS
   IMPLEMENTATION SHALL BE LIMITED TO THE GREATER OF: (I) THE AMOUNT OF
   FEES PAYABLE BY CUSTOMER UNDER THE AGREEMENT IN THE 12 MONTHS
   IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE EVENT GIVING RISE TO A CLAIM; AND (II)
   $50,000. IN NO EVENT SHALL EITHER PARTY BE LIABLE FOR CONSEQUENTIAL,
   SPECIAL, PUNITIVE OR INCIDENTAL DAMAGES OR OTHER DAMAGES OF ANY KIND,
   INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION, LOST DATA, LOST REVENUES OR LOST PROFITS,
   ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED IN ANY WAY TO THE AGREEMENT OR ITS
   IMPLEMENTATION, EVEN IF SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY
   OF SUCH DAMAGES.
   12.&Tab;Miscellaneous
   12.1 Neither Party may assign the Agreement, in whole or in part, by
   operation of law or otherwise, without the prior written consent of the
   other; provided, however that either party may assign its rights or
   delegate its duties under the Agreement, in whole or in part, without
   the other's consent, in connection with a merger, reorganization or
   sale of all, or substantially all, of the assignor's assets, provided
   that the successor entity shall have sufficient resources to fully
   perform the Agreement and shall assume the obligation to fully perform
   the Agreement.
   12.2 The Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance
   with the laws of the State of New York applicable to contracts entered
   into and wholly to be performed therein, without regard to that body of
   law relating to conflict of laws. Each party hereby irrevocably and
   unconditionally consents to submit to the exclusive jurisdiction of the
   courts of the State of New York and of the United States of America, in
   each case located in the County of New York, for any claim arising out
   of or relating to the Agreement (and agrees not to commence any claim
   relating thereto except in such courts). The prevailing party in any
   action arising out of or to enforce the Agreement shall be entitled to
   recover its reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
   12.3 No press releases or general public announcements shall be made
   without the mutual written consent of Customer and Outbrain. Outbrain
   shall have the right to include Customer’s name on Outbrain’s client
   list and in other marketing materials. Customer shall not use
   Outbrain’s name, logo or trademark without Outbrain’s prior written
   consent.
   12.4 All notices under the Agreement will be in writing and will be
   delivered by personal service, confirmed by email, express courier, or
   certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address of the
   receiving party set forth on the IO, or at such different address as
   may be designated by such party by written notice to the other party
   from time to time. Notice will be effective on receipt.
   12.5 No failure of either party to enforce any of its rights under the
   Agreement will act as a waiver of such rights. If one or more
   provisions of the Agreement are held to be unenforceable under
   Applicable Laws, then such provision(s) shall be excluded from the
   Agreement, and the balance of the Agreement shall be enforceable in
   accordance with its terms.
   12.6 Neither party shall be liable for any delay or failure to perform
   any of its obligations set forth in the Agreement due to causes beyond
   its reasonable control. Neither party shall be liable for any
   unavailability or inoperability of the Internet, technical malfunction,
   or computer error or corruption resulting in loss of data or other
   harm.
   12.7 Sections 6, 8, 9,10, 11, and 12, together with any outstanding
   undisputed payment obligation, shall survive the termination of the
   Agreement.
   12.8 Customer and Outbrain shall each act as independent contractors.
   Nothing in the Agreement shall be deemed or create or construed as
   creating a joint venture or partnership between the parties.
   12.9 The Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties
   with respect to the subject matter hereof, and may not be modified
   without the prior written consent of both parties. In no event shall
   any inconsistent or conflicting terms and conditions contained in any
   purchase order, insertion order, invoice or other document submitted by
   Customer concerning the subject matter hereof have any force or effect
   even if accepted or signed by Outbrain.

Amplify Terms

Version 8.7

Effective September 4, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   These terms were last revised as of the effective date set forth above.
   Outbrain reserve the right to change these terms from time to time.
   Amplify Terms and Conditions
   These Amplify Terms and Conditions (“Terms”) are entered into by
   Outbrain UK Limited (“Outbrain”) and the entity executing an Insertion
   Order or using the Outbrain dashboard (“Customer”). These Terms govern
   Customer’s use of the Outbrain service, and together with an Insertion
   Order (or the information entered through the Outbrain dashboard
   (“Dashboard”)) comprise the "Agreement" between Outbrain and Customer.
   If there is any inconsistency between: (i) the terms of a signed
   Insertion Order or those entered through the Dashboard (either
   “Campaign Details”) and (ii) these Terms, the Campaign Details as
   applicable, shall prevail.
   1.&Tab;Services
   1.1 Outbrain partners with a network of online properties (the
   “Network”) and displays a user interface containing links that navigate
   to websites (the “Service”). Outbrain uses its proprietary algorithms
   to determine what links appear within the Service on the Network.
   1.2 Outbrain shall display links to graphical, textual, video and/or
   auditory content selected by Customer (the links and the content
   accessed from the link together are the “Content”) on the Network
   through the Service. Outbrain shall continue to distribute the Content
   on the Network until the earlier of: (i) the end date of Customer’s
   campaign, (ii) reaching Customer’s budget, or (iii) the disabling of a
   campaign (provided that Outbrain reserves the right to charge for
   additional Actions as the Content is removed from circulation – see
   FAQs for more details).
   1.3 Outbrain does not guarantee: (i) the placement, positioning or the
   timing of delivery of any Content; (ii) clicks or impressions
   (including clicks from a particular audience segment), or (iii)
   conversions. If Fees (as defined in Section 5) do not reach Customer's
   budget, Customer's sole remedies shall be to: (i) extend the end date
   of the applicable campaign; (ii) replace or add to the Content with
   other Content (also subject to Section 2 below) to complete the
   campaign; or (iii) to pay only for accrued Fees on the Content. In no
   event shall Outbrain be liable for failure to deliver traffic to
   Content.
   1.4 Outbrain will make reports available to the Customer, which provide
   information about the number of clicks received during the campaign.
   The final monthly reports (which may differ from the daily reports)will
   provide the conclusive basis for Outbrain's calculation of the fees
   owed by Customer. Customer may submit its own Outbrain-compatible click
   tracker. If there is a 10% discrepancy or more between Customer's
   numbers (based on the Outbrain-compatible click tracker) and Outbrain's
   numbers then the parties agree to work in good faith to identify the
   correct amount to be paid to Outbrain. If the discrepancy is less than
   10%, Outbrain's numbers shall be conclusive.
   2.&Tab;Content
   2.1 Customer has the right and authorises Outbrain to place the Content
   on the Network and is solely responsible for determining the propriety
   and legality of the Content. In addition, Content selected by Customer
   must comply with Outbrain's Advertising Guidelines, as may be updated
   from time to time by Outbrain. Outbrain may at any time (at its sole
   discretion) reject or remove Content. Customer acknowledges that
   Outbrain is not responsible for the Content and that the Content may
   change during the course of a campaign due to revisions by the
   Content's author, comments from readers, or otherwise. Customer's
   recourse in the event of such change shall be to direct Outbrain to
   remove such Content from its then-current campaign and/or select other
   Content. Customer further acknowledges that, if there is an objection
   to the Content (whether from the Content author or publisher, or
   otherwise) Outbrain will act in accordance with section 2 of its Terms
   of Use and may cease (at its sole discretion) including the Content in
   the Service.
   2.2 Customer represents and warrants that: (i) if the Content was
   written by or under the direction of Customer or paid for by Customer,
   that fact shall be clearly disclosed on or near the Content; (ii) it is
   authorised to use and/or has approved all words of the Content’s
   headline (whether written by Customer or on Customer’s behalf); and
   (iii) Content headlines accurately reflect the tone and subject matter
   of the Content and, (iv) it is authorized to use and/or has approved
   any image(s) related to its campaign(s) with Outbrain.
   2.3 Customer shall not, directly or indirectly, provide Content that:
   (i) is obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous, pornographic,
   violent, profane, indecent or unlawful; (ii) is factually inaccurate,
   misleading or deceptive; and/or (iii) facilitates or promotes any type
   of illegal activity, including without limitation pyramid schemes,
   gambling, the sale or use of illicit drugs, or discrimination or
   harassment of any individual or group. Further, each piece of Customer
   Content shall neither (a) redirect to a destination other than as
   originally submitted to the Service, and/or (b) be substantively
   different from the Content originally submitted to the Service.
   2.4 Both parties shall implement anti-malware scanning processes of the
   Content. Upon notice, both parties shall take immediate action to
   remove any suspicious Content from the Network.
   3.&Tab;Term and Cancellation
   The Campaign Details will set forth the start and end date of a
   particular campaign. However, the Agreement, or an individual campaign
   may be suspended or terminated: (i) by Customer for any reason upon two
   (2) business days' written notice to Outbrain or within twelve (12)
   hours through the Dashboard; or (ii) by Outbrain for any reason upon
   fourteen days (14) days’ written notice to Customer. During the notice
   period, all previously contracted campaigns shall continue to run
   pursuant to the Campaign Details and Customer shall be responsible for
   paying Outbrain for all Fees accrued during such notice period.
   Outbrain also reserves the right to suspend or terminate Customer's use
   of the Service if Outbrain reasonably believes Customer is in breach of
   the terms of this Agreement.
   4.&Tab;Campaign Details
   If Customer utilizes Outbrain’s Dashboard, Customer will have access to
   certain online reports and control over its campaign(s). To the extent
   Customer registers and has access to the Dashboard, Outbrain may
   collect certain personal data of the Customer. Outbrain collects and
   processes this personal data in order to respond Customer questions or
   requests, provide Customer’s with access to certain services, verify
   Customer’s identity and communicate with Customers about the use of the
   Service. Customer is solely responsible for all changes requested or
   approved (either directly or via Outbrain’s API) including those made
   through the Dashboard using its login. Customer is solely responsible
   for protecting its login and password to the Dashboard. Customer can
   manage campaigns using the Dashboard by modifying the Campaign Details
   and/or Customer may have the option of working with an Outbrain account
   manager, as determined by Outbrain.
   5.&Tab;Fees and Payment Terms
   5.1 Fees” are based on deliverables sold via one of following payment
   methods: (i) cost-per-click (“CPC”), (ii) cost-per thousand impressions
   (“CPM”), or (iii) other desired actions agreed between the parties from
   time to time, each an “Action”. Customer shall pay Outbrain Fees for
   Customer Content delivered via the Network as measured by Outbrain's
   tracking system and any applicable taxes. If CPC is being used for
   campaign measurement, such CPC may not be less than Outbrain’s
   then-in-effect minimum CPC (which may vary by market). If Customer is
   utilizing Outbrain’s automatic bidding feature, Customer grants
   Outbrain the right to set and modify Customer’s CPC at Outbrain’s
   discretion to aid in achieving Customer’s targets for its campaign.
   Customer shall be solely responsible for any additional fees incurred
   for utilizing third party ad serving on its campaign(s). Customer may
   increase or decrease its budget through the Dashboard or through an
   amendment to an Insertion Order.
   5.2 If Customer has signed an Insertion Order, Fees will generally be
   invoiced by Outbrain to Customer by the end of the following calendar
   month, unless otherwise set forth in an IO. Customer shall pay all
   invoices within thirty (30) days from receipt. Any portion of a charge
   not disputed in good faith must be paid in full. If Customer has
   provided the Campaign Details through the Dashboard or has signed an
   Insertion Order and has used a credit card for billing purposes,
   Outbrain shall charge the Outbrain fees (including processing fees) to
   Customer’s credit card at such intervals as Outbrain determines in its
   sole discretion. The decision as to whether to allow Customer to choose
   between invoice and credit card rests solely with Outbrain. Outbrain
   shall review all billing inquiries, including refund requests on a
   case-by-case basis and reserves the right to approve or deny any
   request in its sole discretion.
   5.3 If Customer disputes any amount on an invoice, Customer should
   provide written notice to Outbrain (email is sufficient) within thirty
   (30) days of receipt of invoice. Customer’s email must include the
   amount disputed and provide adequate information to support any such
   claim. Within twenty (20) business days of receipt of Customer’s email,
   Outbrain will investigate and provide Customer with a written response.
   Customer may not withhold payment for any undisputed amounts, and any
   portion of a charge not disputed in good faith within thirty (30) days
   from receipt of invoice must be paid in full
   5.4 If payment is not made when due and not properly disputed pursuant
   to Section 5.3, Outbrain may charge interest at the rate of 2% per
   annum above the prevailing base rate of Barclays Bank PLC from the due
   date until the date of actual payment, whether before or after
   judgment. Outbrain also reserves the right to suspend or terminate
   Customer's use of the Service until Customer has paid all amounts due
   and to charge Customer for all costs of collection, including
   collection agency and reasonable legal fees and court costs. Customer
   authorises Outbrain to investigate Customer's credit record. If
   applicable, Customer agrees to provide such further financial
   information and documentation as may be required from time to time by
   Outbrain as a condition for the continued extension of credit. Customer
   acknowledges and agrees that any account, credit card and related
   billing and payment information which Customer provides to Outbrain may
   be shared by Outbrain with companies who work on Outbrain's behalf
   solely for the purpose of performing credit checks, effecting payment
   to Outbrain, collecting debts owed to Outbrain and/or servicing
   Customer's account. Outbrain may, in its sole discretion, extend,
   revise or revoke credit at any time.
   6. Additional Features and Terms
   6.1 Outbrain may also make additional Service features available to
   Customer from time to time and use of such features may be subject to
   Customer’s agreement to certain additional terms and conditions
   (“Additional Terms”) (e.g., via an online click-through agreement or
   via the Dashboard). Such features will be provided at Outbrain’s
   discretion to Customer and may include fees in addition to those
   described in Section 5.1. Customer’s acceptance of the Additional Terms
   will constitute a binding and enforceable agreement as between Outbrain
   and Customer. In the event of any inconsistency between these Terms,
   the Additional Terms, and the Campaign Details, the order of precedence
   is: (i) Additional Terms, (ii) Campaign Details, and (iii) these Terms.
   Customers who choose to utilize LiveRamp services (via the Outbrain
   dashboard or otherwise) for purposes of their Outbrain campaign(s) are
   subject to LiveRamp terms.
   6.2 Subject to Customer’s compliance with Section 8 below, Customer may
   place (i) Outbrain pixel(s) (the “Outbrain Pixel”) on Customer’s
   website or application pages and/or (ii) third party pixels or tags
   (“the “Third Party Pixels”) for the purpose of providing analytics
   related to Customer’s campaign and/or enhanced targeting functionality
   (the Outbrain Pixel and Third Party Pixels together are the “Pixels”).
   Customer represents and warrants that (a) its use of the Pixels is in
   accordance with Data Protection Laws; and (b) it has provided
   appropriate notice to users regarding use of the Pixels, including an
   explanation (1) that third parties, including Outbrain, may use cookies
   or similar technologies to collect or receive information from
   Customer’s website(s), and may use that information to provide
   measurement services and target ads; and (2) as to how users opt-out of
   the collection of information for targeting purposes. Customer shall
   not use the Pixels unless and until it has complied with the provisions
   of this Section 6.2.
   6.3 If Customer utilizes third party segments for enhanced targeting
   (“3rd Party Targeting”) of its campaign(s), Customer shall pay for its
   use of 3rd Party Targeting (“3rd Party Data Costs”) including any
   applicable taxes. Customer’s invoice for each campaign shall include
   both the Fees, pursuant to Section 5.1, plus the 3rd Party Data Costs
   (if applicable) for utilizing 3rd Party Targeting. Customer agrees that
   3rd Party Data costs will be based on Outbrain’s reporting metrics. If
   Customer utilizes 3rd Party Targeting the Customer shall (i) disclose
   this to users via an appropriate notice and/or in its privacy policy
   (as applicable), and (ii) not use 3rd Party Targeting to target minors
   or other sensitive categories of data.
   7.&Tab;Confidentiality
   7.1 Each party agrees that with respect to any Confidential Information
   (as defined below) that is disclosed by one party to the other in
   connection with the Agreement, the party receiving such Confidential
   Information shall not disclose such Confidential Information to any
   third party, or use it for any purpose, except in connection with its
   rights and obligations under the Agreement. "Confidential Information"
   means all information concerning a party or any of its subsidiaries or
   affiliates that is not generally known to the public, which information
   is marked confidential or proprietary, or which under the circumstances
   ought reasonably to be treated as confidential or proprietary, and
   includes, without limitation, the terms of the Agreement.
   Notwithstanding the foregoing, Confidential Information does not
   include information that: (i) is, as of the time of disclosure, or
   thereafter becomes, part of the public domain through a source other
   than the receiving party; (ii) was lawfully in the possession of the
   receiving party as of the time of disclosure; (iii) is independently
   developed by the receiving party without reference to the Confidential
   Information; or (iv) is subsequently obtained from a third party not
   subject to an obligation of confidentiality with respect to the
   information disclosed.
   7.2 Confidential Information shall be kept in the strictest confidence
   and shall be protected by all reasonable and necessary security
   measures. Confidential Information shall not be released by the
   receiving party to anyone except an employee or agent, who has a need
   to know same, and who is bound by confidentiality obligations at least
   as restrictive as these contained herein. Neither party will use any
   portion of Confidential Information provided by the other party
   pursuant to the Agreement for any purpose other than as expressly set
   forth under the Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, either party
   may disclose Confidential Information strictly necessary to comply with
   the demands of any court order, law or governmental agency and Outbrain
   may share Confidential Information of Customer with any holding company
   of Customer or with any subsidiary company of Customer’s holding
   company.
   7.3 If Customer is acting on behalf of a Content provider, Customer
   authorises Outbrain to grant such Content provider (or any subsequent
   third party appointed by the Content provider) access to and a right to
   use the Campaign Details.
   8.&Tab;Additional Representations and Warranties/Disclaimers
   8.1 Each party represents and warrants to the other party that: (i) it
   has all necessary rights and authority to enter into the Agreement and
   grant the rights and licences under the Agreement; (ii) it shall comply
   with Applicable Laws, and (iii) the execution or acceptance of the
   Agreement (which includes the Campaign Details), and the performance of
   its respective obligations and duties pursuant to the Agreement, do not
   and will not violate any agreement to which such party is bound.
   “Applicable Laws” means any applicable federal, state or foreign laws
   or regulations or any industry self-regulatory rules or guidelines
   (including the Interactive Advertising Bureau Guidelines, Standards &
   Best Practices, the NAI Code of Conduct, the DAA Self-Regulatory
   Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising, and the EU General Data
   Protection Regulation (2016/679) (“GDPR”). The GDPR, together with any
   applicable national data protection laws are hereinafter referred to as
   the “Data Protection Laws”.
   8.2 Customer further represents and warrants that: (i) the Content does
   not violate any Applicable Laws, rules and regulations and will not
   contain any material which may be harmful, abusive, obscene,
   threatening or defamatory; (ii) it has all necessary rights to permit
   and grants Outbrain pursuant to the Agreement all such rights which are
   necessary for Outbrain to (as applicable) use, host, cache, route,
   store, copy, modify, distribute, reformat, reproduce, publish, display,
   transmit and distribute the Content; (iii) use of the Content in
   accordance with the Agreement will not infringe any intellectual
   property rights of any third party; (iv) it cannot and will not attempt
   to provide Content that is targeted to children under the age of
   thirteen; and (v) it will not use the Service in a manner that provides
   an unintended advantage or interferes with the integrity and/or overall
   performance of the Service and (vi) if using the Dashboard, Customer
   will adhere to any rules of such use as solely determined by Outbrain
   (e.g. not using source bidding to whitelist any particular Network
   source)..
   8.3 If Customer is an agency (or other third party acting on behalf of
   the provider of the Content), Customer represents and warrants that:
   (i) it is the authorised agent of the provider of the Content; (ii) it
   has the legal authority to enter into the Agreement and make all
   decisions and take all actions relating to the provider of the Content;
   (iii) it has entered into a written agreement granting the agent the
   authority to represent the provider of the Content in accordance with
   (i) and (ii) above (and shall submit such agreement to Outbrain on
   demand). Customer further agrees that it is not acting on behalf of a
   French company or a foreign company whose advertising content mainly
   targets French territory exclusively through the Dashboard. If Customer
   is acting on behalf of a French content provider whose advertising
   mainly targets the French territory, please contact info@outbrain.com
   for more information on how to purchase Outbrain Services on behalf of
   a French content provider whose advertising mainly targets the French
   territory and in compliance with applicable French laws.
   8.4 No conditions, warranties or other terms apply to any Outbrain
   services supplied by Outbrain under this Agreement unless expressly set
   out in this Agreement. No implied conditions, warranties or other terms
   apply (including without limitation any implied terms as to
   satisfactory quality, fitness for purpose or conformance with
   description or any warranties arising from a course of dealing, usage
   or trade practice or regarding the performance or success of any
   campaigns made by it on behalf of the Customer or that the Services
   will operate uninterrupted, secure or error free).
   9.&Tab;Data Protection
   9.1 The parties acknowledge that some or all of data used or collected
   through the Service (or use of Outbrain Pixels) may qualify as, or
   include, Personal Data, however, as of the Effective Date, Outbrain
   does not send and/or receive any end-user data to the Customer.
   9.2 In addition to complying with all applicable laws (including Data
   Protection laws) each party shall be responsible for including the
   provision of relevant notices and obtaining relevant consents as
   required by Data Protection Laws. To the extent necessary, the parties
   shall (i) collaborate with respect to requests from Data Subjects, and
   (ii) each party shall implement appropriate technical and
   organizational measures which prevent accidental or unlawful
   destruction and loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure of, or access
   to Personal Data. The parties shall each maintain and display on their
   respective websites an easily accessible and discoverable privacy
   policy that (i) discloses the use of any cookies (based on redirects or
   otherwise) through the Service, and (ii) includes relevant details
   regarding each party’s security controls and international transfers.
   The terms “Data Subject”, “Personal Data”, “Personal Data Breach” and
   “Controller” shall have the meanings stated in the GDPR.
   10.&Tab;Indemnification
   10.1 Each party shall defend, indemnify and hold harmless the other
   party and its respective agents, affiliates, subsidiaries, directors,
   officers, employees, contractors and Network partners (as applicable),
   against any and all third party claims resulting from the breach of
   such party's duties, obligations and representations under the
   Agreement.
   10.2 In connection with any such claim: (i) the indemnified party shall
   provide prompt written notice to the indemnifying party of any such
   claim (provided that the failure to provide such prompt notice shall
   not relieve the indemnifying party of its indemnification obligations
   in the Agreement, except to the extent it has been damaged thereby);
   (ii) the indemnifying party shall have sole control of the defense or
   settlement of the claim (provided that the indemnifying party may not
   enter into any settlement that may adversely affect the rights or
   obligations of the indemnified party without the indemnified party's
   prior written consent); (iii) at the indemnifying party's request and
   expense, the indemnified party cooperating in the investigation and
   defense of such claim; and (iv) the indemnified party shall have the
   right to participate in its defense with counsel of its own choosing at
   the indemnified party's expense.
   11.&Tab;Limitation of Liability
   11.1 Nothing in the Agreement excludes or limits either party’s
   liability: (i) for death or personal injury resulting from the
   negligence of either party or their servants, agents or employees; (ii)
   for fraud or fraudulent misrepresentation; (iii) for anything which
   cannot be excluded or limited by law.
   11.2 Except with respect to claims arising from the indemnity
   obligations or a breach of clause 6 (confidentiality), data protection
   provisions, and/or non-payment of fees owed, the maximum aggregate
   liability of either party and its’ directors, officers, employees,
   Network partners, vendors or agents arising from any given event or
   series of connected events arising under or related in any way to this
   Agreement or its implementation shall be limited to the greater of: (i)
   £50,000; and (ii) 100% of the amount of fees paid or payable by
   Customer under Agreement in the 12 months immediately preceding the
   month in which the event (or first in a series of connected events)
   occurred.
   11.3 In no event shall either party be liable for: (i) loss of
   revenues; (ii) loss of profits; (iii) loss of contracts; (iv) loss of
   business or anticipated savings; (v) loss of data; (vi) loss of
   goodwill or reputation; or (vii) for any consequential, special or
   indirect losses whether or not such losses were within the
   contemplation of the parties at the date of this Agreement, suffered or
   incurred by that party arising out of or in connection with the
   provisions of, or any matter under, this Agreement.
   12.&Tab;Miscellaneous
   12.1 Neither Party may assign the Agreement, in whole or in part, by
   operation of law or otherwise, without the prior written consent of the
   other; provided, however that either party may assign its rights or
   delegate its duties under the Agreement, in whole or in part, without
   the other's consent, in connection with a merger, reorganisation or
   sale of all, or substantially all, of the assignor's assets, provided
   that the successor entity shall have sufficient resources to fully
   perform the Agreement and shall assume the obligation to fully perform
   the Agreement.
   12.2 This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance
   with English law and the parties hereby submit to the exclusive
   jurisdiction of the English courts in respect of any dispute or matter
   arising out of or connected with this Agreement. The prevailing party
   in any action arising out of or to enforce this Agreement shall be
   entitled to recover its reasonable legal fees and costs.
   12.3 No press releases or general public announcements shall be made
   without the mutual written consent of Customer and Outbrain. Outbrain
   shall have the right to include Customer's name on Outbrain's client
   list and in other marketing materials. Customer shall not use
   Outbrain’s name, logo or trademark without Outbrain’s prior written
   consent.
   12.4 All notices under the Agreement will be in writing and will be
   delivered by personal service, confirmed by email, express courier, or
   certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address of the
   receiving party set forth on the IO, or at such different address as
   may be designated by such party by written notice to the other party
   from time to time. Notice will be effective on receipt.
   12.5 No failure of either party to enforce any of its rights under the
   Agreement will act as a waiver of such rights. If one or more
   provisions of the Agreement are held to be unenforceable under
   Applicable Laws, then such provision(s) shall be excluded from the
   Agreement, and the balance of the Agreement shall be enforceable in
   accordance with its terms.
   12.6 Neither party shall be liable for any delay or failure to perform
   any of its obligations set forth in the Agreement due to causes beyond
   its reasonable control. Neither party shall be liable for any
   unavailability or inoperability of the Internet, technical malfunction,
   or computer error or corruption resulting in loss of data or other
   harm.
   12.7 Sections 6, 8, 9, 10 and 11 and 12 together with any outstanding
   undisputed payment obligation, shall survive the termination of the
   Agreement.
   12.8 Customer and Outbrain shall each act as independent contractors.
   Nothing in the Agreement shall be deemed or create or construed as
   creating a joint venture or partnership between the parties.
   12.9 The Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties
   with respect to the subject matter hereof, and may not be modified
   without the prior written consent of both parties. In no event shall
   any inconsistent or conflicting terms and conditions contained in any
   purchase order, insertion order, invoice or other document submitted by
   Customer concerning the subject matter hereof have any force or effect
   even if accepted or signed by Outbrain.

Cookies

Version 4.4

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   OUTBRAIN'S COOKIE TABLE
   This Cookie Table provides you with information about the cookies and
   other similar technologies Outbrain and/or its partners may use, their
   purpose and the retention period associated with such cookie. Where a
   third party partner drops a cookie, they determine the purpose for
   which that cookie is dropped and the relevant retention period.
   We may place cookies or similar files such as pixel tags and web
   beacons on the devices you use to engage with Outbrain for security
   purposes, to facilitate site navigation and to personalize your
   experience when you engage with Outbrain as a Site Vistior, a User or a
   Business Partner. Cookies allow us to collect technical and
   navigational information, such as browser type, time spent by you
   engaging with Outbrain and pages visited. Please read the Privacy
   Policy to further understand how we use data collected by these
   cookies.
   For even more information about cookies, we recommend visiting:
   https://cookies.insites.com/about-cookies/
   Users
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same page
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Site Visitors
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Unbounce

     Ubvt

     Ubvs

     ubpv
   These cookies are associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.

     3 days

     3 days

     5 months
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It is variation of the _gat cookie
   which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by Google on high
   traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Google Univesral Analytics
     * _ga
     * _gid

     This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports.

     This cookie is associated with Google Universal Analytics. No
   information is available from Google however, it appears to store and
   update a unique value for each page visited.
     * 2 years
     * a day

   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar. It uniquely identifies a visitor during a single browser
   session and indicates they are included in an audience sample.
   Session
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Piwik
     * _pk_id*
     * _pk_ses*

   These cookies are set by Piwiki and are used to help website owners
   track visitor behaviour and measure site performance. They are a
   pattern type cookie, where the prefix is followed by a short series of
   numbers and letters, which is believed to be a reference code for the
   domain setting the cookie.
     * 1 year
     * 24 minutes

   Kissmetrics

     km_lv

     km_uq

     km_ai
   These cookies are set by Kissmetrics analytics service. They are used
   to provide site owners with information about how visitors use the
   site.
   5 years
   Bing
     * MUIDB
     * MUID

   This domain is owned by Mircosoft - it is the site for the search
   engine Bing.
   a year
   JSESSIONID
   This domain is controlled by New Relic, which provides a platform for
   monitoring the performance of web and mobile applications.
   Session
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   obuid
   This cookie is used to hold an anonymous user's ID. IT is used for
   tracking user actions.
   3 months
   c
   This domain is owned by IPONWEB and is used to provide a real time
   bidding platform for online advertising.
   1 year
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   1 year
   TheTradeDesk
     * TDID
     * TDCPM

   This domain is owned by TheTradeDesk. The main business activity is: Ad
   Serving Platform
   1 year
   _uv_id
   This domain is owned by LinkedIn. It is used to provide services for
   embedding slide presentations into websites. Information collected via
   cookies on this domain can also be used for targeted advertising
   purposes.
   2 years
   YouTube
     * HSID
     * Demographics
     * VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
     * PREF
     * LOGIN_INFO
     * GPS
     * YSC

   YouTube collects user data through videos embedded in websites, which
   is aggregated with profile data from other Google services in order to
   display targeted advertising to web visitors. These cookies are:
     * Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user
       account and most recent login time
     * Used for demographic profiling and targeting for advertising
     * This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of
       videos
     * Stores user preference, can be used to personalise ads on google
       searches
     * Used for targeted advertising to web visitors across a broad range
       of their own and other websites.

     1 year

     1 year

     1 month

     5 years

     2 years

     a month

     Session
   Linkedin
     * BizoID
     * Lidc
     * __utmv
     * __utmz
     * __utmb
     * __utmt
     * Bcookie
     * Lang
     * __utma
     * SERVERID
     * language
     * bscookie__qca
     * __qca
     * __utmc
     * UserMatchHistory
     * visit

   These cookies are associated with Linkedin It typically acts as a third
   party host where website owners have placed one of its content sharing
   buttons in their pages, although its content and services can be
   embedded in other ways. Although such buttons add functionality to the
   website they are on, cookies are set regardless of whether or not the
   visitor has an active Linkedin profile, or agreed to their terms and
   conditions. For this reason it is classified as a primarily
   tracking/targeting domain.

     30 days

     1 month

     8 months

     6 months

     21 minutes

     a few seconds

     8 months

     Session

     2 years

     Session

     Session

     8 months

     2 months

     Session

     2 days

     8 months

   Facebook

     datr

     fr

     lu
   These cookies are owned by Facebook:

     It is not directly tied to individual Facebook the user. It is used
   to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially around
   detection of bots trying to access the service. This cookie is also
   read via Like and other Facebook buttons and tags placed on many
   different websites.

     This is used to serve targeted advertising to its users when logged
   into its services. In 2014 it also started serving up behaviourally
   targeted advertising on other websites, similar to most dedicated
   online marketing companies. Contains browser and user unique ID
   combination, used for targeted advertising.

     This is used to serve targeted advertising to its users when logged
   into its services. In 2014 it also started serving up behaviourally
   targeted advertising on other websites, similar to most dedicated
   online marketing companies. Contains browser and user unique ID
   combination, used for targeted advertising

     1 year

     3 months

     1 year
   Twitter
     * auth_token
     * twll
     * secure_session
     * guest_id
     * personalization_id
     * remember_checked
     * remember_checked_on
     * lang

   This domain is owned by Twitter. The main business activity is: Social
   Networking Services. Where twitter acts as a third party host, it
   collects data through a range of plug-ins and integrations, that is
   primarily used for tracking and targeting.

     15 years

     5 years

     15 years

     a year

     2 years

     5 years

     4 years

     session
   Google
     * APISID
     * SSID
     * NID
     * SAPISID

   This cookies are owned by Google Inc. It uses the data gathered from
   most of these services to profile the interests of web users and sell
   advertising space to organisations based on such interest profiles as
   well as aligning adverts to the content on the pages where its
   customer's adverts appear.

     2 years

     8 months

     5 months

     2 years
   AA003
   This domain is owned by Atlas Solutions which is in turn owned by
   Facebook. Atlas is an online advertising business, targeting users
   through tracking their web activity. From September 2014 the company
   re-launched under the ownership of Facebook, promising the ability to
   reach known users and target adverts based on profiles generated using
   Facebook's user data.
   2 months
   u
   This domain is owned by Aggregate Knowledge, which has been acquired by
   Neustar Inc. Aggregate Knowledge provides a data management platform
   which enables real time targeting and consumer profiling functionality.
   a month
   __cfduid
   This domain is owned by AddToAny. The main business activity is: Social
   Sharing Services and Tracking
   1 year
   rlas3
   This domain is owned by Live Ramp Inc, providers of a platform for
   targeted marketing and profiling.
   1 year
   Bluekai
     * bku
     * bkdc
     * bkpa

   This domain is owned by Blue Kai. The main business activity is:
   Advertising/Audience Targeting
   5 months
   d
   This domain is owned by Quantcast. The main business activity is:
   Market and Audience Segmentation, Targeted advertising services
   2 months
   Adobe Audience Manager
     * demdex
     * dpm

   This domain is owned by Adobe - Audience Manager.
   The main business activity is: Online profiling for targeted marketing
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
     * 6 months
     * 5 months

   tuuid_lu
   This domain is owned by IPONWEB and is used to provide a real time
   bidding platform for online advertising.
   1 year
   Amazon
     * ad-id
     * ad-privacy

   This domain is owned by online retailer Amazon and is used as part of
   its affiliate marketing programme.
     * 8 months
     * 8 months

   Doubleclick
     * id
     * IDE

   This domain is owned by Doubleclick (Google). The main business
   activity is: Doubleclick is Googles real time bidding advertising
   exchange
     * 8 months
     * 2 years

   OnAudience
     * cookie
     * done_redirects161

   This domain is owned by OnAudience. The company provides a range of
   marketing and advertising services.
     * a year
     * a month

   uuid2
   This domain is owned by AppNexus Inc. The company provides a range of
   online advertising technology and services.
   2 months
   pxcr
   This domain is owned by Live Ramp Inc, providers of a platform for
   targeted marketing and profiling.
   a month
   MediaMath
     * uuidc
     * uuid

   This domain is owned by MediaMath Inc. a US based digital advertising
   business.
   a year
   comScore
     * UID
     * UIDR

   This domain is owned by ScorecardResearch (comScore). The main business
   activity is: Advertising. The cookies in this domain have lifespans of
   2 years.
     * a month
     * 2 years

   ruds
   This domain is owned by Rocketfuel. The main business activity is:
   Advertising
   Session
   ab
   This domain is owned by Aggregate Knowledge, which has been acquired by
   Neustar Inc. Aggregate Knowledge provides a data management platform
   which enables real time targeting and consumer profiling functionality.
   Session
   ATN
   This domain is owned by Atlas Solutions which is in turn owned by
   Facebook. Atlas is an online advertising business, targeting users
   through tracking their web activity. From September 2014 the company
   re-launched under the ownership of Facebook, promising the ability to
   reach known users and target adverts based on profiles generated using
   Facebook's user data.
   2 years
   uvc
   This domain is owned by AddToAny. The main business activity is: Social
   Sharing Services and Tracking
   a month
   custom_data
   This domain is owned by BidSwitch. The company provides a range of
   marketing and advertising services.
   10+ years
   eud
   This domain is owned by Rocketfuel. The main business activity is:
   Advertising
   a year
   EE
   This domain is owned by Exelate. The main business activity is:
   Advertising Data Aggregation
   3 months
   _kuid_
   This domain is owned by Krux Digital, a US company providing a data
   management platform which enables real time profiling of visitor
   interests.
   5 months
   pi
   This domain appears to be connected to a company called Bombora, a USA
   based audience targeting and intelligence business.
   a year
   uid
   This domain is owned by Adform. The main business activity is: Real
   time bidding for display advertising to targeted audiences.
   a month
   ud
   This domain is owned by Exelate. The main business activity is:
   Advertising Data Aggregation
   3 months
   tuuid
   This domain is owned by IPONWEB and is used to provide a real time
   bidding platform for online advertising.
   a year
   Quantcast
     * mc
     * d

   This domain is owned by Quantcast. The main business activity is:
   Market and Audience Segmentation, Targeted advertising services
   2 months
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   recs_xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
   This is a pattern type cookie with the root being recs_ and the rest of
   the name being a unique, 32-length alphanumeric string. This cookie is
   used to store recommended documents so that the same document isn't
   recommended twice.
   1 minute or refresh
   ___distillery
   This cookie may be set by the website itself, or by Wistia, to support
   video functionality that may be found throughot the website. In
   addition to keeping track of the website visitor's position in a video
   should playback be interrupted, this cookie also notes user behavior
   regarding the video itself.
   1 year
   Vimeo
     * player
     * vuid

   This domain is owned by Vimeo. The main business activity is: Video
   Hosting/Sharing
     * 1 year
     * 2 years

   Business Partners
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Outbrains Cookie-Tabelle
   In dieser Cookie-Tabelle erhalten Sie verständliche und umfassende
   Informationen über die Cookies und ähnliche Technologien, die wir
   verwenden.
   Gegebenenfalls setzen wir auf den Geräten, die Sie zur Interaktion mit
   Outbrain verwenden, Cookies oder ähnliche Dateien wie Pixel-Tags und
   Web-Beacons, und zwar aus Sicherheitsgründen, zur leichteren
   Website-Navigation und zur Personalisierung Ihrer Erfahrung bei der
   Interaktion mit Outbrain als Websitebesucher, Nutzer oder
   Geschäftspartner. Cookies ermöglichen uns, technische oder für die
   Navigation erforderliche Informationen zu erfassen, beispielsweise
   Browsertyp, die Zeit, die Sie mit der Interaktion mit Outbrain
   verbracht haben, oder die besuchten Seiten. Bitte lesen Sie die
   Datenschutzbestimmungen, damit Sie genauer verstehen, wie wir Daten
   verwenden.
   Nutzer
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Websitebesucher
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Geschäftspartner
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Tabla de cookies de Outbrain
   La presente Tabla de cookies te facilita información clara y completa
   sobre las cookies y otras tecnologías similares que utilizamos.
   Es posible que introduzcamos cookies o archivos similares, como
   etiquetas de píxel y balizas web (web beacons), en los dispositivos que
   utilices para interactuar con Outbrain por motivos de seguridad, para
   facilitar la navegación por el sitio y para personalizar tu experiencia
   cuando interactúes con Outbrain como Visitante del Sitio, Usuario o
   Socio comercial. Las cookies nos permiten recopilar información técnica
   y de navegación, como el tipo de navegador, el tiempo que interactúas
   con Outbrain y las páginas visitadas. Por favor, lee la Política de
   privacidad para entender mejor cómo utilizamos los datos.
   Utenti
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visitantes del sitio
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Socios comerciales
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Table des cookies d’Outbrain
   Cette Table des cookies vous donne des informations claires et
   détaillées sur les cookies et autres technologies similaires que nous
   utilisons.
   Nous sommes susceptibles de déposer des cookies ou autres fichiers
   similaires comme des balises pixel ou des balises Web sur les appareils
   que vous utilisez en lien avec Outbrain pour des raisons de sécurité,
   pour faciliter la navigation dans le site, ou personnaliser votre
   expérience quand vous interagissez avec Outbrain en tant que Visiteur
   du Site, Utilisateur ou Partenaire commercial. Les cookies nous
   permettent de collecter des données techniques et de navigation, comme
   le type de navigateur, le temps passé à interagir avec Outbrain et les
   pages visitées. Veuillez lire la Politique de confidentialité pour
   mieux comprendre comment nous utilisons les cookies suivants.
   Utilisateurs
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visiteurs du site
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Partenaires commerciaux
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Tabella dei cookie di Outbrain
   La presente tabella dei cookie fornisce informazioni chiare complete
   sui cookie e su altre tecnologie simili che utilizziamo.
   Possiamo installare cookie o file analoghi quali pixel tag e web beacon
   sui dispositivi che utilizzi per interagire con Outbrain per finalità
   di sicurezza, per facilitare la navigazione sul sito e per
   personalizzare la tua esperienza quando interagisci con Outbrain in
   veste di Visitatore del sito, Utente o Partner commerciale. I cookie ci
   consentono di raccogliere informazioni tecniche e sulla navigazione,
   quali il tipo di browser, il tempo che hai trascorso interagendo con
   Outbrain e le pagine visitate. Si raccomanda di leggere la politica
   sulla privacy per capire meglio come utilizziamo i dati.
   Utenti
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visitatori del sito
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Partner commerciali
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   TABELA DE COOKIES DA OUTBRAIN
   Esta tabela de cookies fornece informações claras e completas sobre os
   cookies e outras tecnologias similares usadas por nós.
   Podemos instalar cookies ou arquivos similares como pixel tags ou web
   beacons nos aparelhos que você usa para interagir com a Outbrain, por
   fins de segurança, para facilitar a navegação no site e para
   personalizar sua experiência ao interagir com a Outbrain como Visitante
   do Site, Usuário ou Parceiro Comercial. Cookies nos permitem coletar
   informações técnicas e relacionadas à navegação, como tipo de
   navegador, tempo gasto por você na interação com a Outbrain e páginas
   visitadas. Leia a Política de Privacidade para compreender melhor como
   usamos os dados.
   Usuários
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visitantes do Site
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Parceiros Comercials
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Amplify Terms

Version 8.3

Effective September 3, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   Estes Termos e Condições foram revisados e estão atualizados na data
   efetiva estabelecida acima. Outbrain reserva-se o direito de alterar
   esses Termos e Condições de tempos em tempos.
   Termos e Condições
   Estes Termos e Condições Amplos (“Termos”) são celebrados pela Outbrain
   Inc. (“Outbrain”) e a entidade executante de uma Ordem de Inserção
   (“Cliente”). Estes Termos regem o uso pelo Cliente dos serviços da
   Outbrain e, juntamente com um Pedido de Inserção (ou as informações
   inseridas através do painel de controle da Outbrain (“Painel de
   Controle”)) constitui o “Contrato” entre a Outbrain e o Cliente. Se
   houver qualquer inconsistência entre: (i) os termos de uma ordem de
   inserção assinados ou aqueles inseridos através do Painel de Controle
   (outros que os “Detalhes da Campanha”), e (ii) os Detalhes da Campanha,
   estes Termos, conforme aplicável, deverão prevalecer.
   1.&Tab;Serviços
   1.1&Tab; A Outbrain tem uma parceria com uma rede de propriedades
   online (a “Rede”) e exibe uma interface de usuários que contém links
   para conteúdos que navegam para os sites onde tal conteúdo é mantido (o
   “Serviço”). A Outbrain usa seus algoritmos para determinar quais links
   de conteúdo aparecem dentro do serviço na rede.
   1.2 A Outbrain deve exibir links para conteúdo gráfico, textual, video
   e/ou sonoro selecionado pelo Cliente (os links e conteúdos acessados a
   partir do link em conjunto são o “Conteúdo”) na Rede através do
   Serviço. A Outbrain deve continuar distribuindo o conteúdo na Rede até
   os segunites fatos, prevalecendo o que acontecer primeiro: (i) o fim do
   prazo da Campanha do Cliente, ou (ii) quando alcançado o orçamento do
   Cliente, ou (iii) quando desativada a campanha. A incidência das
   alíneas (i), ) e (ii) desta cláusula serão especificados pelo Cliente
   nas configurações da Campanha . A Outbrain reserva o direito de cobrar
   por Ações adicionais caso o Conteúdo seja retirado de circulação - ver
   FAQs para maiores detalhes.
   1.3 A Outbrain não garante: (i) a colocação, posicionamento ou o tempo
   de entrega de qualquer Conteúdo, (ii) cliques ou impressões de qualquer
   Conteúdo (incluindo cliques de um segmento de público específico), ou
   (iii) conversões. Se os honorários, conforme definidos na Cláusula 5,
   não atingirem o orçamento do Cliente, as únicas opções do Cliente são:
   (i) prorrogar a data final da campanha, (ii) substituir ou complementar
   o conteúdo com outro Conteúdo (sujeito à Cláusula 2 abaixo ) para
   completar a campanha; ou (iii) pagar apenas pelos cliques reais sobre o
   Conteúdo. Em nenhum caso a Outbrain será responsabilizada por não
   entregar o tráfego para o Conteúdo.
   1.4 A Outbrain disponibilizará relatórios para o Cliente relativamente
   a(s) campanha(s). Os relatórios finais mensais (os quais podem ser
   diferentes dos relatórios diários) servirão de base para o cálculo
   conclusivo dos honorários de serviço devidos pelo Cliente à Outbrain. O
   Cliente pode enviar o seu próprio rastreador de cliques compatível com
   a Outbrain. Se houver um desvio de 10% ou mais entre os números do
   Cliente (baseado no rastreador de cliques compatível com a Outbrain) e
   os números da Outbrain, então as partes concordam em trabalhar de
   boa-fé para identificar a quantidade correta a ser paga à Outbrain. Se
   a discrepância for inferior a 10%, os números da Outbrain serão
   definitivos.
   2.&Tab;Conteúdo
   2.1 O Cliente tem o direito e autoriza a Outbrain a colocar o Conteúdo
   na Rede e é o único responsável por determinar a propriedade, direitos
   de todas as naturezas, e legalidade do Conteúdo. Além disso, o Conteúdo
   selecionado pelo cliente deve estar de acordo com as Diretrizes de
   Publicidade da Outbrain, que podem ser atualizadas de tempos em tempos
   unilateralmente pela Outbrain. A Outbrain pode, a qualquer tempo,
   unilateralmente rejeitar ou remover o Conteúdo. O Cliente reconhece que
   a Outbrain não é responsável pelo Conteúdo e que o Conteúdo pode mudar
   durante o curso da campanha devido as revisões realizadas por seu
   autor, aos comentários dos leitores ou outras razões. O recurso do
   Cliente, em caso de tal mudança, será direcionar a Outbrain no sentido
   de remover tal Conteúdo de sua campanha atual e/ou selecionar outro
   Conteúdo. O Cliente reconhece ainda que, se houver objeção em relação
   ao Conteúdo (seja em relação ao Conteúdo do autor, editor o qualquer
   outro Conteúdo), a Outbrain irá atuar de acordo com a Cláusula 2 dos
   seus Termos de Uso, e poderá unilateralmente cessar,
   discricionariamente , a inclusão do Conteúdo no Serviço.
   2.2 O Cliente declara e garante que: (i) se o conteúdo foi escrito por
   ou sob direção do Cliente ou pago pelo Cliente, que possui todos os
   direitos e autorizações necessárias para usá-lo e reproduzi-lo, esse
   facto deve ser claramente divulgado no ou próximo ao Conteúdo; (ii) é
   autorizado a usar e/ou aprovou todas as palavras do título do Conteúdo
   (quer tenha sido escrito pelo Cliente ou em nome do Cliente); (iii) o
   título do Conteúdo corresponde precisamente ao objeto e ao assunto do
   Conteúdo; e (iv) está autorizado a usar e/ou aprovou toda e qualquer
   imagem relacionada às suas campanhas com a Outbrain.
   2.3&Tab; O Cliente não deverá, direta ou indiretamente, fornecer
   Conteúdo que: (i) seja obsceno, difamatório, calunioso, pornográfico,
   violento, profano, indecente ou ilegal; (ii) seja factualmente
   impreciso ou enganoso e/ou; (iii) facilite ou promova qualquer tipo de
   atividade ilegal, incluindo, sem hierarquia, o jogo, a venda ou o
   consumo de drogas ilícitas, ou discriminação ou assédio de qualquer
   indivíduo ou grupo. Ademais, cada parte do Conteudo do Cliente não
   poderá (a) redirecionar para um destino diferente daquele originalmente
   submetido ao Serviço, e/ou (b) ser substancialmente diferente do
   Conteúdo originalmente submetido ao Serviço.
   2.4 Ambas as partes devem implementar processos de verificação
   anti-malware do Conteúdo. Mediante notificação, ambas as partes devem
   tomar medidas imediatas para remover qualquer Conteúdo suspeito da
   Rede.
   3.&Tab;Termos e Cancelamento
   Nos Detalhes da Campanha ficarão estabelecidas a data de início e fim
   de uma campanha em particular. No entanto, o Contrato ou uma campanha
   individual podem ser suspensos ou cancelados: (i) pelo Cliente por
   qualquer motivo, mediante aviso prévio por escrito de dois (2) dias
   úteis para a Outbrain ou no prazo de 12 (doze) horas através do Painel
   de Controle, ou (ii) pela Outbrain por qualquer motivo mediante trinta
   (30) dias de aviso prévio por escrito para o Cliente. Durante o período
   de aviso prévio, todas as campanhas anteriormente contratadas devem
   continuar a funcionar de acordo com o estabelecido em Detalhes da
   Campanha e o Cliente será responsável pelo pagamento à Outbrain de
   todos os cliques recebidos durante esse período de aviso prévio. A
   Outbrain também se reserva o direito de suspender ou terminar o uso do
   Serviço por parte do Cliente se a Outbrain razoalvemente acreditar que
   o Cliente está em violação dos termos deste Acordo.
   4.&Tab;Detalhes da Campanha
   Se o Cliente utilizar o Painel da Outbrain, o Cliente terá acesso a
   determinados relatórios online e controle sobre sua(s) campanha(s). Na
   medida em que o Cliente registre e tenha acesso ao Painel, a Outbrain
   pode coletar certas informações pessoalmente identificáveis do Cliente.
   A Outbrain coleta e processa esses dados pessoais com a finalidade de
   responder questões ou solicitações do Cliente, proporcionar ao Cliente
   o acesso a certos serviços, verificar a identidade do Cliente e para
   comunicar-se com o Cliente sobre o uso do Serviço. O Cliente é o único
   responsável por todas as alterações solicitadas ou aprovados
   (diretamente ou via API - Interface de Programação de Aplicativos - da
   Outbrain), inclusive as efetuadas através do Painel de Controle usando
   seu login. O Cliente é o único responsável por proteger o seu login e
   sua senha para o uso do Painel de Controle. O Cliente pode gerenciar
   campanhas usando o Painel para modificar Detalhes da Campanha, e/ou o
   Cliente pode ter a opção de trabalhar com um gerente de contas da
   Outbrain, conforme determinado pela Outbrain.
   5.&Tab;Honorários e Pagamento
   5.1 Os “Honorários” serão fixados com base na venda de produtos
   entregue através de um dos seguintes métodos de pagamento: (i) custo
   por click (“CPC”), (ii) custo por mil impressões (“CPM”) ou (iii)
   outras ações desejadas e acordadas entre as partes, de tempos em
   tempos, cada uma denominada"Ação”. O Cliente deve pagar Honorários e
   taxas incidentes à Outbrain pelo Conteúdo do Cliente entregue, na Rede,
   e medida pelo sistema de rastreamento da Outbrain. Caso o CPC esteja
   sendo utilizado para medir a campanha o CPC não deverá ser menor que o
   CPC mínimo em vigor da Outbrain na época (o qual pode variar de acordo
   com o mercado).
   Se o Cliente estiver utilizando a ferramenta obrigatória automática da
   Outbrain, o Cliente concede à Outbrain o direito de definir e modificar
   o CPC do Cliente, a critério da Outbrain, para que e Outbrain possa
   ajudar a alcançar as metas do Cliente para sua campanha. O Cliente será
   o único responsável por quaisquer honorários adicionais devidos pela
   utilização da veiculação de anúncios de terceiros em suas campanhas. O
   Cliente pode aumentar ou diminuir seu orçamento através do Painel de
   Contrôle ou através do aditamento do Pedido de Inserção.
   5.2 Se o Cliente assinou uma Ordem de Inserção, os honorários serão
   geralmente faturados pela Outbrain ao Cliente no no último dia do
   calendário do mês seguinte, salvo se de outra forma estabelecido em uma
   Ordem de Iinserção. O Cliente deverá pagar todas as faturas no prazo de
   trinta (30) dias a partir do recebimento. Qualquer valor de uma
   cobrança não contestada de boa fé deve ser paga na íntegra. Se o
   Cliente forneceu os Detalhes da Campanha através do Painel de Controle
   ou assinou uma Ordem de Inserção e usou um cartão de crédito para fins
   de faturamento, a Outbrain deverá cobrar suas taxas (incluindo taxas de
   processamento) através do cartão de crédito do Cliente em intervalos
   determinados pela Outbrain, a seu exclusivo critério. A decisão sobre
   permitir ou não ao cliente escolher entre fatura e cartão de crédito
   recai exclusivamente sobre a Outbrain. A Outbrain deve analisar todos
   os pedidos de faturação, incluindo os pedidos de reembolso, caso-a-caso
   e se reserva o direito de aprovar ou negar qualquer pedido a seu
   exclusivo critério.
   5.3 Se o Cliente contestar qualquer quantia em uma fatura, o Cliente
   deverá fornecer um aviso por escrito à Outbrain (por e-mail é
   suficiente) no prazo de trinta (30) dias após o recebimento da fatura.
   O e-mail do cliente Cliente deve incluir o valor contestado e fornecer
   informações adequadas para apoiar tal reivindicação. Dentro de vinte
   (20) dias úteis após o recebimento do e-mail do Cliente, a Outbrain
   investigará e fornecerá uma resposta por escrito ao Cliente. O Cliente
   não pode reter o pagamento de quaisquer quantias não contestadas, e
   qualquer parte de uma cobrança não contestada de boa fé deve ser paga
   integralmente dentro de trinta (30) dias a partir do recebimento da
   fatura.
   5.4 Se o pagamento não for realizado no prazo previsto e não for
   devidamente contestado de acordo com a Cláusula 5.3, a Outbrain pode
   cobrar juros de mora à taxa de 12% ao ano, a partir da data de
   vencimento até a data do efetivo pagamento, bem como correção monetária
   conforme a variação positiva do IGPM/FGV no período, seja antes ou após
   o julgamento. A Outbrain também se reserva o direito de suspender ou
   cancelar o uso do Cliente do Serviço até que o Cliente pague todos os
   valores devidos e de cobrar do Cliente todos os custos de cobrança,
   incluindo a agência de cobrança e honorários advocatícios e custos
   judiciais. O Cliente autoriza a Outbrain a investigar o histórico de
   crédito do Cliente. Se aplicável, o Cliente concorda em fornecer essas
   informações financeiras e documentação que possam ser solicitadas de
   tempos em tempos pela Outbrain como condição para a contínua extensão
   de crédito. O Cliente reconhece e concorda que qualquer conta, cartão
   de crédito e informações relacionadas a cobrança e pagamento que o
   Cliente forneça à Outbrain pode ser compartilhado pela Outbrain com
   empresas que trabalhem em seu benefício com a exclusiva finalidade de
   executar verificações de crédito, efetuar pagamento em favor da
   Outbrain, coletar dívidas para a Outbrain e/ou para fins de manutenção
   de conta do Cliente. A Outbrain pode, a seu exclusivo critério,
   prorrogar, rever ou revogar o crédito a qualquer tempo.
   5.5 Caso o cliente solicite à um terceira parte segmentos para uma
   segmentação aprimorada (3ª Parte) da sua(s) campanha(s), o Cliente
   concorda que deverá efetuar o pagamento dos honorários por click para a
   3ª Parte (geralmente varia de $0.05 e $0.95 por click), baseados no
   preço de um segmento em particular fixado pelo provedor de dados da 3ª
   Parte (Custos dos Dados da 3ª Parte) para uso da 3ª Parte nas sua(s)
   campanhas (s), incluindo ainda todas os impostos e taxas aplicáveis. As
   notas fiscais emitidas pelo Cliente para cada campanha deverão incluir
   os honorários devidos à Outbrain, em conformidade com a cláusula 5.1 e
   o Custos dos Dados da 3ª Parte pelo uso dos mesmo pela 3ª Parte. A
   Outbrain deverá pagar ao Provedor de Dados da 3ª Parte em nome do
   Cliente. O Cliente concorda que todos os clicks utilizados no cálculo
   dos custos do Provedor de Dados da 3ª Parte serão fundamentados no
   relatório de métricas da Outbrain.
   6.&Tab;Recursos e Termos Adicionais
   6.1 6.1 Outbrain também pode disponibilizar, de tempos em tempos,
   recursos adicionais de Serviços ao Cliente, os quais poderão estar
   sujeitos à concordância do Cliente de certos termos e condições
   adicionais (“Termos Adicionais”) (por exemplo, através de um acordo via
   acesso online ou através do Painel de Controle). Esses recursos serão
   fornecidos a critério da Outbrain, ao Cliente, e podem incluir
   honorários adicionais de CPC, além dos descritos na Cláusula 5.1. A
   aceitação, pelo Cliente, dos Termos Adicionais constituirá acordo
   vinculativo e executável entre a Outbrain e o Cliente. Na hipótese de
   um conflito entre estes Termos, os Termos Adicionais e os Detalhes da
   Campanha, a ordem de precedência será a seguinte: (i) Termos
   Adicionais, (ii) Detalhes da Campanha, e (iii) estes Termos. Os
   Clientes que escolherem utilizar os serviços LiveRamp (através do
   Painel de Controle da Outbrain ou de outra forma), para fins da sua
   campanha na Outbrain, estão sujeitos aos Termos da Outbrain LiveRamp.
   6.2 Sujeito ao cumprimento pelo Cliente o disposto na Cláusula 8
   abaixo, o Cliente poderá (i) colocar o(s) pixel(s) da Outbrain
   (“Outbrain Pixel”) no site ou nas páginas do aplicativo do Cliente e/ou
   (ii) Tags ou Pixel de terceiros (“Pixels de Terceiros”) com a
   finalidade de proporcionar análises relacionadas à campanha do Cliente
   e/ou à funcionalidade de segmentação aprimorada (os Pixels da Outbrain
   e os Pixels de Terceiros são chamados conjuntamente de “Pixels”) . O
   Cliente declara e garante que: (a) o uso dos Pixels está em
   conformidade com as Leis de Proteção de Dados, e (b) providenciou a
   devida notificação aos usuários a respeito do uso de pixels, incluindo
   explicações a respeito: (1) de que terceiros, incluindo a Outbrain,
   poderão utilizar cookies ou outras tecnologias similares para coletar
   ou receber de informações do site(s) do Cliente e que estas informações
   poderão ser utilizadas para proporcionar medidas de serviços e
   propaganda direcionada; e (2) como os usuários podem recusar a coleta
   de informações para fins de direcionamento de conteúdo. O Cliente
   declara estar ciente de que não poderá utilizar pixels sem antes
   cumprir com o disposto nesta Cláusula 6.2.
   6.3 Caso o Cliente tenha solicitado segmentos de terceiros para
   segmentação aprimorada (“Segmentação de Terceiros”) da sua campanha(s)
   o Cliente deverá pagar pelo uso da Segmentação de Terceiros (“Custos de
   Dados de Terceiros ”), incluindo as taxas e os impostos. A nota fiscal
   do Cliente, para cada uma das campanhas, deve incluir tanto os
   honorários da Outbrain, de acordo com a cláusula 5.1, como os Custos de
   Dados de Terceiros (caso seja aplicável), pela utilização de
   Segmentação de Terceiros. O Cliente concorda que todos os cliques, para
   fins de cálculo dos Custos de Dados de Terceiros, serão baseados nos
   relatórios métricos da Outbrain. Caso o Cliente utilize Segmentação de
   Terceiros, o Cliente deverá: (i) revelar o uso aos usuários, através da
   notificação cabível e/ou nas suas políticas de privacidade
   (aplicáveis), e (ii) não utilizar Segmentação de Terceiros para atingir
   categorias de dados menores e sensíveis.
   7. Confidencialidade
   7.1 Cada parte concorda em respeitar qualquer Informação Confidencial
   (como definido abaixo) que seja revelada de uma parte para a outra em
   relação ao Contrato, a parte que receber tal Informação Confidencial
   não a divulgará para quaisquer terceiros ou irá usá-la para qualquer
   fim exceto se relacionado a seus direitos e obrigações dentro do
   Contrato. “Informação Confidencial” significa toda informação relativa
   à parte ou quaisquer de suas subsidiárias ou afiliadas que não seja
   geralmente conhecida pelo público, a informação que seja marcada como
   confidencial ou de propriedade, ou como informações confidenciais ou de
   propriedade, ou que, sob as circunstâncias, deveriam razoavelmente ser
   tratadas como confidenciais ou de propriedade, e inclui, sem limitação,
   os termos do Contrato. Não obstante o acima descrito, Informações
   Confidenciais não incluem informações que: (i) a partir do momento da
   divulgação, ou após essa data tornam-se de domínio público através de
   uma fonte que não seja a parte que a recebeu; (ii) esteja legalmente em
   posse da parte que a recebeu a partir do momento da divulgação; (iii)
   tenha sido desenvolvida de forma independente pela parte receptora sem
   referência à Informação Confidencial; ou (iv) seja posteriormente
   obtida por um terceiro não sujeito a uma obrigação de confidencialidade
   com relação à informação divulgada.
   7.2 Informações Confidenciais serão mantidas em sigilo estrito e devem
   ser protegidas com todas as medidas de segurança necessárias e
   razoáveis. Informações Confidenciais não serão liberadas pela parte
   receptora a ninguém, exceto um funcionário ou agente que tenha
   necessidade de conhecê-la e que esteja vinculado por obrigações de
   confidencialidade pelo menos tão restritas quanto estas aqui contidas.
   Nenhuma das partes vai usar qualquer porção das informações
   confidenciais fornecidas pela outra parte, nos termos do Contrato, para
   qualquer outra finalidade que não aquelas expressamente definidas no
   âmbito do Contrato. Não obstante, quaisquer das partes pode divulgar
   Informações Confidenciais estritamente necessárias para cumprir as
   exigências de qualquer ordem judicial, lei ou agência governamental e a
   Outbrain pode compartilhar informações confidenciais de Cliente com
   qualquer empresa holding do Cliente ou com qualquer empresa subsidiária
   da holding do Cliente.
   7.3 Se o Cliente estiver agindo em nome de um provedor de Conteúdo, o
   Cliente autoriza a Outbrain a conceder a tal provedor de Conteúdo (ou
   qualquer terceiro subsequente nomeado pelo provedor de conteúdo) o
   acesso e o direito de usar os Detalhes da Campanha.
   8.&Tab;Representações adicionais e Garantias / Isenções de
   responsabilidade
   8.1&Tab; Cada parte representa e garante à outra parte que: (i) possui
   todos os direitos e poderes necessários para celebrar o Contrato e
   garantir os direitos e licenças no âmbito do Contrato; (ii) cumprirá as
   Leis Aplicáveis; e (iii) a execução ou aceitação do Contrato (que
   inclui os Detalhes da Campanha), e o desempenho das suas respectivas
   obrigações e deveres nos termos do Contrato não irá violar qualquer
   contrato a qual tal parte esteja vinculada. “Leis Aplicáveis” significa
   quaisquer leis ou regulamentos federais, estaduais ou estrangeiros
   aplicáveis ou quaisquer regras ou diretrizes de autorregulamentação do
   setor (incluindo Diretrizes, Padrões e Melhores Práticas do Interactive
   Advertising Bureau, o Código de Conduta da NAI, os Princípios de
   Autorregulação da DAA para Publicidade Comportamental Online, a
   Proteção de Geral de Dados da UE (2016/679) (“GDPR’). A GDPR juntamente
   com qualquer proteção nacional de dados são doravante designadas como
   “Leis de Proteção de Dados”.
   8.2 O Cliente adicionalmente representa e declara que: (i) o Conteúdo
   não viola quaisquer Leis Aplicáveis, regras e regulamentos aplicáveis e
   não contêm qualquer material que possa ser prejudicial, abusivo,
   obsceno, ameaçador ou difamatório; (ii) possui todos os direitos
   necessários para permitir e garantir a Outbrain nos termos do Acordo
   todos os direitos que sejam necessários para a Outbrain (conforme
   aplicável) usar, hospedar, ocultar, percorrer, armazenar, copiar,
   modificar, distribuir, reformatar, reproduzir, publicar, exibir,
   transmitir e distribuir o Conteúdo; (iii) o uso do Conteúdo de acordo
   com o Contrato não irá infringir quaisquer direitos de propriedade
   intelectual de terceiros; (iv) não pode e não tentará fornecer conteúdo
   destinado a crianças menores de treze (13) anos; (v) não usará o
   Serviço de maneira a obter uma vantagem inesperada ou interferir com a
   integridade e/ou perfomance geral do Serviço; e (vi) se estiver usando
   o Painel de Controle, o Cliente adere a quaisquer regras de uso tal
   como determinado pela Outbrain (por exemplo, não usando “source
   bidding” para listar em “whitelist” qualquer fonte de Rede particular).
   8.3 Se o Cliente é uma agência (ou outro tipo de terceiro agindo em
   nome do provedor do Conteúdo), o Cliente declara e garante que: (i) é o
   agente autorizado do provedor do Conteúdo; (ii) tem a autoridade legal
   para entrar no Contrato e tomar todas as decisões e ações relacionadas
   ao provedor do Conteúdo; (iii) firmou um contrato por escrito que
   concede à agência autoridade para representar o provedor do Conteúdo,
   de acordo com (i) e (ii) acima (e deve submeter esse contrato à
   Outbrain sob demanda). O Cliente também concorda que não está agindo,
   através do Painel de Controle, em nome de uma empresa francesa ou
   estrangeira cujo conteúdo de propaganda visa atingir principalmente o
   território francês. Se o Cliente está agindo em nome de um provedor que
   visa atingir o territorio francês, por favor, entre em contato com
   info@outbrain.com para obter mais informações sobre como adquirir
   Serviços Outbrain em nome de um provedor de conteúdo francês cujo a
   propaganda vise atingir o território frances e em conformidade com as
   leis francesas aplicáveis.
   8.4&Tab; EXCETO SE EXPRESSAMENTE EXPOSTO ADIANTE NO CONTRATO, A
   OUTBRAIN NÃO FAZ QUAISQUER DECLARAÇÕES OU GARANTIAS, EXPRESSAS OU
   IMPLÍCITAS – INCLUSIVE, MAS NÃO LIMITANDO-SE À GARANTIAS DE
   COMERCIALIZAÇÃO, TÍTULO, NÃO-VIOLAÇÃO, OU ADEQUAÇÃO A UM DETERMINADO
   FIM, OU QUAISQUER GARANTIAS DECORRENTES DE UM CONTRATO, USO OU PRÁTICA
   COMERCIAL – SOBRE SEUS SERVIÇOS E O DESEMPENHO OU ÊXITO DE QUALQUER
   CAMPANHA REALIZADA EM BENEFÍCIO DO CLIENTE, OU QUE O SERVIÇO FUNCIONE
   ININTERRUPTAMENTE, DE FORMA SEGURA E SEM ERROS.
   9.&Tab; Proteção de Dados
   9.1 As partes reconhecem que alguns ou todos os dados usados ou
   coletados por meio do Serviço (ou uso dos Pixels da Outbrain) poderão
   se qualificar como ou incluir Dados Pessoais. Contudo, até a Data
   Efetiva a Outbrain não envia e/ou recebe quaisquer Dados Pessoais do
   usuário final ao Cliente.
   9.2 Além de cumprir com todas as Leis Aplicáveis (incluindo-se as Leis
   de Proteção de Dados) cada parte deve se responsabilizar,
   individualmente, por incluir as previsões de notificações relevantes e
   obter o devido consentimento como requerido nas Leis de Proteção de
   Dados e, na medida do necessário, as partes devem: (i) colaborar no que
   diz respeito às solicitações dos Titulares dos Dados e (ii) implementar
   medidas técnicas e organizacionais apropriadas medidas para prevenir,
   de forma acidental ou ilegal, a destruição, perda, alteração,
   divulgação não autorizada ou acesso de Dados Pessoais. As partes
   deverão manter e exibir em seus respectivos sites uma política de
   privacidade facilmente acessível e identificável que divulgue o uso de
   cookies (baseados em redirecionamento ou qualquer outro meio) através
   do Serviço e (ii) que inclua detalhes relevantes sobre os controles de
   segurança e transferências internacionais de cada parte. Os termos
   “Titulares dos Dados”, “Dados Pessoais”, “Violação de Dados Pessoais” e
   “Controlador” terão os significados declarados no GDPR.
   10.&Tab;Indenização
   10.1&Tab; Cada parte defenderá, indenizará e segurará a outra de
   qualquer má conduta assim como seus agentes representativos, afiliadas,
   subsidiárias, diretores, representantes legais, empregados,
   contratados, e sócios da Rede (se aplicável) em caso de toda e qualquer
   demanda de terceiros que resulte da quebra das obrigações e
   representações do Contrato.
   10.2 Em relação a quaisquer de tais demandas : (i) a parte a ser
   indenizada proverá uma pronta notificação por escrito para a parte a
   indenizar sobre quaisquer de tais demandas ( visto que a falha em
   prover tal pronta notificação não exonerará a parte a indenizar de suas
   obrigações de indenização no Contrato, exceto à medida em que já tenha
   sofrido dano ); (ii) a parte a indenizar deverá ter sozinha o controle
   de defesa e regularização da demanda (dado que a parte a indenizar não
   pode entrar em qualquer acordo que possa afetar de forma adversa os
   direitos e obrigações da parte a ser indenizada sem o consentimento
   prévio por escrito da parte a ser indenizada); (iii) a pedido e
   despesas da parte a indenizar, a parte a ser indenizada cooperará com a
   investigação e defesa de tal demanda; e (iv) a parte a ser indenizada
   terá o direito de participar na sua defesa com o advogado de sua
   própria escolha, a despesas da parte a ser indenizada.
   11.&Tab;Limitação de Responsabilidade
   EXCETO COM RELAÇÃO A DEMANDAS DECORRENTES DE OBRIGAÇÕES DE INDENIZAÇÃO
   , DOLO OU VIOLAÇÃO DA NORMA DE CONFIDENCIALIDADE E/OU NÃO PAGAMENTO DOS
   ENCARGOS DEVIDOS NO CONTRATO POR UMA DAS PARTES, A RESPONSABILIDADE
   TOTAL MÁXIMA AGREGADA DE UMA PARTE E SEUS DIRETORES, EXECUTIVOS,
   FUNCIONÁRIOS, FORNECEDORES, SÓCIOS DA REDE OU, AGENTES PARA QUALQUER
   AÇÃO, INDEPENDENTEMENTE DA FORMA DA AÇÃO, SEJA EM RESPONSABILIDADE
   CIVIL OU CONTRATO, SURGIDA OU RELACIONADA DE QUALQUER FORMA AO CONTRATO
   OU SUA APLICAÇÃO SERÁ LIMITADA AO MAIOR DE: (I) O VALOR DAS TAXAS A
   SEREM PAGAS PELO CLIENTE NO ÂMBITO DO CONTRATO NOS 12 MESES
   IMEDIATAMENTE ANTERIORES AO EVENTO QUE ORIGINE UMA DEMANDA; E (II) US $
   50.000,00. EM NENHUMA HIPÓTESE QUALQUER UMA DAS PARTES SERÁ RESPONSÁVEL
   POR DANOS CONSEQUENCIAIS, ESPECIAIS, PUNITIVOS OU FORTUITOS OU POR
   OUTROS DANOS DE QUALQUER NATUREZA, INCLUINDO, SEM SE LIMITAR A, PERDA
   DE DADOS, PERDA DE RECEITAS OU PERDA DE LUCROS, DECORRENTES DE OU DE
   ALGUMA FORMA RELACIONADOS AO CONTRATO OU SUA EXECUÇÃO, MESMO QUE TAL
   PARTE TENHA SIDO AVISADA DA POSSIBILIDADE DE TAIS DANOS.
   12.&Tab;Disposições Gerais
   12.1 Nenhuma das partes poderá outorgar o Contrato, no todo ou em
   parte, por força da lei ou de outra forma, sem o prévio consentimento
   por escrito da outra parte; previsto entretanto que, quaisquer das
   partes pode outorgar seus direitos ou delegar a sua competência no
   âmbito do Contrato, no todo ou em parte, sem o consentimento do outro,
   se em caso de fusão, reorganização ou venda de todos ou
   substancialmente todos os ativos da outorgante, desde que a entidade
   sucessora disponha de recursos suficientes para executar plenamente o
   Contrato e assumir a obrigação de cumpri-lo plenamente.
   &Tab;12.2&Tab; O presente Contrato será regido e interpretado de acordo
   com as leis do Estado de Nova York aplicáveis aos contratos celebrados
   e inteiramente executados dentro dele, sem levar em conta o corpo de
   lei relativo ao conflito de leis. Cada parte neste contrato de forma
   irrevogável e incondicional consente submeter-se à jurisdição exclusiva
   dos tribunais do Estado de Nova York e dos Estados Unidos da América,
   em cada caso localizado no Município de Nova York, para qualquer
   demanda resultante ou relacionada ao Contrato (e concorda em não
   começar qualquer reivindicação que lhe diga respeito que não seja em
   tais tribunais). A parte prevalecente em qualquer demanda decorrente do
   contrato terá o direito de recuperar taxas e custos razoáveis de seu
   advogado.
   12.3&Tab; Notas de imprensa ou anúncios públicos gerais não devem ser
   feitos sem o consentimento mútuo do Cliente e da Outbrain. A Outbrain
   terá o direito de incluir o nome do Cliente na lista de clientes da
   Outbrain e em outros materiais de marketing. Clientes não poderão usar
   o nome, logo ou a marca registrada da Outbrain sem a autorização prévia
   e por escrito da mesma.
   12.4 Todas as notificações no âmbito do Contrato devem ser por escrito
   e serão entregues por um serviço personalizado, fax confirmado, e-mail,
   correio expresso, ou carta registrada, com aviso de recebimento, para o
   endereço do destinatário definido na Ordem de Inserção, ou em qualquer
   outro endereço como pode ser indicado mediante notificação por escrito
   à outra parte, de tempos em tempos. A notificação será eficaz no
   recebimento.
   12.5&Tab; Nenhuma falha de quaisquer das partes em aplicar quaisquer de
   seus direitos ao abrigo do Contrato atuará como uma renúncia a tais
   direitos. Se uma ou mais disposições do Contrato forem considerados
   aplicáveis sob as Leis Aplicáveis, então essa (s) disposição (s) deve
   (m) ser excluída (s) do acordo, e o saldo do Contrato será executável
   de acordo com seus termos.
   12.6&Tab; Nenhuma das partes será responsável por qualquer atraso ou
   falha em cumprir quaisquer de suas obrigações estabelecidas no Contrato
   devido a causas que estejam fora de seu controle razoável. Nenhuma das
   partes será responsável por qualquer indisponibilidade ou
   inoperabilidade da Internet, falha técnica ou erro ou corrupção de
   computador resultando em perda de dados ou outros danos.
   12.7 As Cláusulas 6, 8, 9, 10, 11 e 12, em conjunto com qualquer
   disputa pendente de obrigação de pagamento sobreviverão à rescisão do
   Contrato.
   12.8&Tab; Nada no Contrato será considerado ou será interpretado como
   agindo para a criação de um empreendimento conjunto ou parceria entre
   as partes.
   12.9&Tab; O Contrato constitui a totalidade do acordo entre as partes
   com relação ao assunto aqui tratado e não pode ser modificado sem o
   prévio consentimento por escrito de ambas as partes. Em nenhuma
   hipótese, quaisquer termos e condições inconsistentes ou conflitantes
   contidos em qualquer ordem de compra, ordem de inserção, fatura ou
   outro documento enviado pelo Cliente relativo ao assunto aqui tratado,
   tem qualquer força ou efeito, ainda que aceito e assinado pela
   Outbrain.

Amplify Terms

Version 9.3

Effective December 7, 2018

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

                           Amplify 取引条件書

   本取引条件書は、上記の発効日に修正され、上記の発効日から現在の取引条件書となる。アウトブレインジャパン株式会社は本取引条件書を変更、修正、又は
   更新することができる。
   本Amplify取引条件書（以下「本条件書」という）は、アウトブレインジャパン株式会社（以下「アウトブレイン」という）と広告掲載申込書またはア
   ウトブレインのダッシュボードを利用する事業主体（以下「顧客」という）との間で締結される。本条件書に準じて顧客はアウトブレインサービスを利用し、
   本条件書及び顧客の作成する広告掲載申込書あるいはアウトブレインダッシュボード（以下「ダッシュボード」という）を通じて入力された情報が両当事者間
   の全ての合意事項（以下「本合意事項」という）を構成するものとする。特別の定めがある場合を除き、
   (i)広告掲載申込書の条件あるいはダッシュボードを通じて入力された条件（以下「キャンペーン詳細」という）と(ii)
   本条件書との間に齟齬がある場合には、キャンペーン詳細が優先される。
   1. サービス
   1.1
   アウトブレインはオンライン資産のネットワーク（以下「ネットワーク」という）と提携し、ウェブサイトへ誘導するコンテンツへのリンクを含んだユーザー
   インターフェイスを表示する（以下「サービス」という）。アウトブレインは独自のアルゴリズムを用いて、ネットワーク上のサービスに、どのコンテンツリ
   ンクを表示するか決定する。
   1.2
   アウトブレインは、サービスを通じてネットワーク上に顧客の選択するグラフィック、テキスト、映像及び／又は音声コンテンツへのリンク（リンクとリンク
   からアクセスできるコンテンツを合わせて「コンテンツ」という）を表示する。顧客はコンテンツのクリック数分のみ請求される。料金は、クリック数をキャ
   ンペーン詳細で顧客が決定するクリック単価（以下「CPC」という）で乗じた金額となるが、CPCはその時点でアウトブレインの定める最低CPCを下回
   ってはならない。顧客がアウトブレインの自動入札機能を利用した配信機能を使用する場合、キャンペーンに対する顧客のKPIを達成するため、アウトブレ
   インが自らの裁量で顧客のCPCを設定、及び／又は変更することができる。アウトブレインは、(i)顧客のキャンペーンの
   終了日、又は(ii)顧客の予算に達した時点、若しくは (iii)
   キャンペーンが無効になった時点のいずれかのうち、最も早い時点までネットワークでのコンテンツ配信を継続する。尚、(i)及び(ii)はそれぞれ、キ
   ャンペーン詳細で顧客によって指定されるものとする。（但し、アウトブレインは配信停止されたコンテンツに対する追加クリック分を請求することができる
   。これについては、 FAQを参照)
   1.3 アウトブレインは、キャンペーン中のクリック数の情報に関するレポートを顧客に提供する。最終月次レポート(
   日次レポートとは異なる場合もある)は、顧客の支払うべき料金のアウトブレインの計算の根拠となる。顧客はアウトブレインと互換性のある自らのクリック
   トラッカーを提出することができる。顧客の計測値（アウトブレインと互換性のあるクリックトラッカーに基づく）とアウトブレインの計測値の間に10％以
   上の乖離がある場合には、両当事者は誠意を持って協力し、アウトブレインに支払われるべき正確な金額を確定させる。乖離が10%に満たない場合にはアウ
   トブレインの数値を最終的な数値とする。
   1.4 アウトブレインは、 (i) コンテンツの配置、位置、提供のタイミング、(ii)
   コンテンツ上のクリック（特定セグメントのクリックも含む）、(iii)
   コンバージョンを保証しない。コンテンツが予算に至るクリック数を得られない場合、顧客の要求できる救済措置は、(i)
   適用されるキャンペーンの終了日を延期する、(ii)
   キャンペーンを完了させるためにコンテンツを別のコンテンツに置き換える、又は別のコンテンツを追加する（下記第2節に従う）、(iii)
   コンテンツに対する実際のクリック分だけ支払いを行う、のいずれかのみである。アウトブレインはいかなる場合にも、クリック数が得られなかったことにつ
   いて賠償責任を負わない。
   1.5アウトブレインは追加のサービスに関する機能を顧客に提供する。この提供される機能を使用する場合、顧客は追加の条件（「追加条件」という）に同
   意することもある（例えば,ダッシュボード、又はオンラインのクリックスルー条件書）。その機能はアウトブレインの裁量で提供され、5.1条に記載され
   る料金以外のCPCを含むこともある。追加条件を同意する場合、顧客とアウトブレインの間に拘束力及び執行力がある契約になる。本条件書、追加条件、及
   びキャンペーン詳細の間に異なる部分がある場合、（ア）追加条件、（イ）キャンペーン詳細、（ウ）本条件書の順番で優先される。
   1.6
   顧客は、下記第8節に従い、顧客のウェブサイト又はアプリのページにアウトブレインピクセルを設置することができる。アウトブレインピクセルは、顧客の
   キャンペーン分析、及び／又はターゲティング機能の向上を目的とする。
   2. コンテンツ
   2.1
   顧客はアウトブレインに、コンテンツをネットワークに掲載することを許可する権利を有し、自らコンテンツの妥当性と合法性を判断する責任を負う。さらに
   顧客の選択するコンテンツはアウトブレインのアドバタイジングガイドラインに準拠しなければならない。アウトブレインは随時アドバタイジングガイドライ
   ンを改定することがある。アウトブレインは何ときでも、理由を問わずコンテンツを拒否又は除外することができる。顧客は、アウトブレインがコンテンツに
   責任を負わないことを理解し、またコンテンツの作者による見直し、読者からのコメント等によりキャンペーン中にコンテンツが変更される場合があることを
   認識する。こうした変更の場合に顧客が行う措置は、顧客のキャンペーンの当該コンテンツを停止するようアウトブレインに指示し、及び／又は他のコンテン
   ツを選択することである。コンテンツの作者又はパブリッシャーから異議申し立てがあった場合には、顧客はアウトブレインが当該コンテンツをサービスから
   除外することを了承する。
   2.2 顧客は(i)
   コンテンツは顧客により、あるいは顧客の指示に基づいて作成され、あるいは顧客により支払われていることを表明し、保証する。この事実はコンテンツ上ま
   たはその傍らに明確に表示されるものとする。また、顧客は、(ii)
   コンテンツの見出し（顧客または顧客の代理人、もしくは代理店によって作成されたかを問わない）を使用する権利があること、及び／又はコンテンツの見出
   しに使われている表現を承認すること、 (iii) コンテンツの見出しがコンテンツの基調および主題を正確に反映していること、並びに(iv)
   アウトブレインのキャンペーンに関するイメージ、画像、及び映像を使用することの権利があることを表明し保証する。
   2.3 顧客は、直接的にも間接的にも、 (i)
   わいせつな内容、誹謗、中傷、名誉棄損、ポルノ、暴力的・冒涜的内容を含む社会通念上好ましくない、あるいは非合法なコンテンツ、(ii)
   事実に関して不正確で誤解を招く、あるいは欺瞞的なコンテンツ、(iii)
   ねずみ講、賭博、違法薬物の販売ないし使用、特定の個人ないし集団に対する差別または嫌がらせなど、非合法活動を奨励又は推進するコンテンツを提供しな
   いものとする。更に、顧客のコンテンツは、入稿時と異なるリンク先にリダイレクトしてはならず、及び入稿時と記載内容を変更してはならない。
   2.4
   両当事者は、コンテンツに対してアンチマルウェアのスキャン処理を行うものとする。指摘された場合、両当事者は直ちにネットワークから不審なコンテンツ
   の削除を行う。
   3. 期間と解除
   キャンペーン詳細は、個別のキャンペーンの開始日と終了日を定める。ただし、(i)
   顧客は理由を問わず2営業日前までにアウトブレインに文書で、又はダッシュボードを通じて12時間前までに予告することにより、又(ii)
   アウトブレインは理由を問わず30日前までに顧客に文書で予告することにより、本契約あるいは個別のキャンペーンを中断または中止することができる。予
   告期間中、それ以前に契約されたキャンペーンはキャンペーン詳細に従って継続されるものとし、顧客は予告期間中に得られた全クリック数についてアウトブ
   レインに対し支払いを行う責任を負う。また、顧客が本契約の定めに違反していると合理的に判断した場合、アウトブレインは、顧客が本サービスを利用する
   ことを停止、もしくは終了することができる。
   4. キャンペーン詳細
   顧客は、アウトブレインのダッシュボードを通じ、オンラインレポート及びキャンペーンを管理することができる。尚、アウトブレインはダッシュボードに登
   録された顧客の個人データを取扱うことができる。顧客は、自らログインし、ダッシュボードから、要求又は承認したすべての変更（直接的、又は間接的にア
   ウトブレインのAPIを介して行った変更を含む）について単独で責任を負う。顧客はそのダッシュボードへのログインとパスワードの保護について単独で責
   任を負う。顧客はダッシュボードを用いてキャンペーン詳細を変更することでキャンペーンを管理し、アウトブレインの定める通り、アウトブレインアカウン
   トマネージャと相互に協力し合う。
   5. 料金及び支払い条件
   5.1顧客は、（アウトブレインのトラッキングで測定したクリック数にCPCを乗じた金額に基づき）アウトブレイン料金を支払う。顧客はダッシュボード
   から、あるいは広告掲載申込書での変更により予算を増額することができる。
   5.2
   顧客が広告掲載申込書に署名したという条件において、料金は通常、各暦月の末日から30日以内に、前月中に発生したクリック数がアウトブレインから顧客
   に請求される。顧客は当該暦月の末日から60日以内にすべての請求金額を支払うものとする。料金請求に対し異議がない場合、全額支払わないとならない。
   顧客がダッシュボードからキャンペーン詳細を設定し、又は広告掲載申込書に署名をし、料金請求のためにクレジットカードを使用した場合には、アウトブレ
   インは、アウトブレインが自らの裁量で設定する間隔をあけて顧客のクレジットカードにアウトブレイン費用を請求する。但し、通常請求とクレジットカード
   請求の決定権はアウトブレインにある。アウトブレインは払い戻し請求を含め、すべての請求に関する照会をケースバイケースで見直し、その裁量で請求を承
   認又は拒否する権利を有する。
   5.3
   顧客は、請求書に対し異議がある場合、請求書受領日から30日以内にアウトブレインに文書又は電子メールで告知するものとする。顧客の告知メールは、異
   議がある金額及びその異議の証拠となる情報を含むものとする。アウトブレインは顧客からの告知受領日から20日以内に検証し、文書で回答する。顧客は異
   議がない請求額に対し、期限内に全額支払うものとする。
   5.4.
   支払期日までに支払いが為されない、又は第5.3節により告知されない場合には、判決の前後にかかわらずアウトブレインは支払期日から実際に支払いが為
   される日まで年利6％の利息を請求することができる。またアウトブレインは、顧客が支払い義務のあるすべての金額を支払うまで顧客によるサービスの利用
   を停止又は終了させ、回収会社や合理的な弁護士費用、裁判費用を含むあらゆる改修費用を顧客に請求する権利を有する。顧客はアウトブレインが顧客のクレ
   ジット履歴を調査することを許可する。場合によっては、顧客はアウトブレインがクレジットの拡大の条件として適時要求することがある金融情報や書類を提
   供することに同意する。顧客は、自らがアウトブレインに提供する口座情報、クレジットカード情報、関連する請求・支払い情報を、クレジットの確認、アウ
   トブレインへの支払いの履行、アウトブレインへの負債の回収及び／又は顧客の口座への支払いのみを目的として、アウトブレインがアウトブレインの協力会
   社と共有することを認識し、同意する。アウトブレインは何ときでも、自らの裁量でクレジットを拡大、修正、又は取り下げることができる。
   5.5
   顧客は、キャンペーンにおいて第三者セグメントのターゲティング向上（第三者ターゲティング）を求める場合、クリックあたりの第三者ターゲティング料金
   （第三者データプロバイダにより設定された特定セグメントの税込の金額、通常クリックあたり$0.05 and $0.95）を支払うものとする。
   第三者ターゲティングのクリック数はアウトブレインのレポーティング数値を利用することとする。なお、アウトブレインが第三者プロバイダの料金を立て替
   えるため、顧客に対する各キャンペーンの請求書には上記5.1 のアウトブレイン料金及び第三者ターゲティング料金が含まれる。
   6. 守秘義務
   6.1
   各当事者は、本契約に関連して一方の当事者から他方の当事者に開示された機密情報（以下に定義する）に関して、機密情報の開示を受けた側の当事者は、か
   かる機密情報を第三者に漏洩せず、また本契約に基づくその権利と義務に関連する目的以外に使用しないことに合意する。「機密情報」とは、当事者又はその
   子会社ないし系列会社に関する情報で、一般に知られておらず、秘密又は所有権ありとの記載があり、あらゆる状況で機密又は所有権のあるものとして扱われ
   るすべての情報を意味し、本契約の規定も機密情報に含まれる。ただし以下の(i)～(iv)のいずれかに該当する情報は機密情報に含まれない。(i)
   開示の時点ですでに公知であった情報又は開示後に被開示者以外の情報源から公知となった情報。(ii)
   開示の時点で被開示者が合法的に所持していた情報。(iii) 機密情報を参照することなく被開示者が独自で開発した情報。(iv)
   開示された情報に関する守秘義務を負わない第三者から後に取得した情報。
   6.2
   機密情報は厳密に秘密のままに維持し、あらゆる合理的かつ必要な措置により保護されるものとする。被開示者は、機密情報を知る必要がありかつ本契約書に
   記載の守秘義務と同等以上の守秘義務に拘束される自らの従業員、代理人、もしくは代理店以外の者に機密情報を開示しないものとする。各当事者は、本契約
   に従って他方の当事者により提供される機密情報のいかなる部分をも、本契約に基づき明確に規定されている目的以外の目的に用いないものとする。ただし各
   当事者は裁判所の命令、法律または政府機関の要求に従うために必要な機密情報は開示することができ、アウトブレインは顧客の親会社や顧客の親会社の子会
   社との間で顧客の機密情報を共有することができる。
   6.3
   顧客がプロバイダの代理人もしくは代理店の場合、顧客はアウトブレインに、このコンテンツプロバイダ（又はコンテンツプロバイダが指定する第三者）のキ
   ャンペーン詳細の閲覧及び使用権を付与することを認める。
   7. 追加表明及び保証／免責事項
   7.1 各当事者は他方の当事者に対し、次のことを表明し保証する。(i)
   自らが本契約を締結し、本契約に基づく権利とライセンスを付与するために必要なすべての権利と権限を有すること、(ii)
   適用されるいかなる法律、規則、規制も遵守すること、(iii)
   本契約（キャンペーン詳細を含む）の締結と受け入れ、及び本契約に基づく自らの債務と義務の履行が自らが締結している別の契約と抵触しないこと、及び(
   iv)
   各当事者は、自己又はその代表者、責任者若しくは実質的に経営権を有する者が、暴力団、暴力団員、暴力団関係者、総会屋その他の反社会的勢力ではないこ
   と。尚、「適用されるいかなる法律、規則、規制」とは本条件書において当事者の義務に対し適用されるいかなる連邦、州、又は外国の法律、規則、又は業界
   の自主規制、又は自主ガイドライン等（Interactive Advertising Bureau Guidelines, Standards
   & Best Practices、 NAI Code of Conduct、 DAA Self-Regulatory Principles
   for Online Behavioral Advertising、 EU Directive 95/46/EC、EU Directive
   2002/58/EC、the General Data Protection Regulation （以下「
   GDPR」という）を含む）を意味する。GDPR又はGDPRに基づき国ごとに制定されるデータ保護に関する法律は以下「欧州データ保護法」という。
   7.2 顧客はさらに次のことを表明し、保証する。(i)
   コンテンツが、適用されるいかなる法律、規則、規制にも違反せず、有害、暴言、わいせつ、脅迫的あるいは名誉棄損と捉えられる可能性のある内容を含まな
   いこと。(ii)
   アウトブレインがコンテンツを使用し、そのホストとなり、キャッシュをとり、ルーティング、保存、コピー、変更、配信、再フォーマット、複製、公開、表
   示、転送するために必要なすべての権利を本契約に基づいてアウトブレインに許可するための権利を自らが有していること。(iii)
   本契約に基づくコンテンツの利用が第三者の知的財産権を侵害しないこと。(iv) 13歳以下の子供に向けるコンテンツを提供しないこと。(v)
   サービスを通じて目的外の利益を得ようとしないこと、またはサービスの一体性および（または）総合的性能を阻害しないこと。(vi)
   ダッシュボードを使用する場合、顧客が、アウトブレインから自らの裁量で定義されるダッシュボードの使用に関するルールを守ること（例えば、個別のネッ
   トワークソースをホワイトリストするための入札を使用してはいけない）。
   7.3 顧客が代理人、もしくは代理店（コンテンツプロバイダの間に入る第三者）である場合には、顧客は次のことを表明し、保証する。(i)
   自らが正式に認められたコンテンツプロバイダの代理人、もしくは代理店であること(ii)
   自らが、本契約を締結し、コンテンツプロバイダに関するあらゆる意思決定をし、あらゆる行為を行う法的権限を有すること(iii)
   上記(i)及び(ii)に従ってコンテンツプロバイダの代理する権利を付与する書面により契約を締結していること（要求があればこの契約書をアウトブレ
   インに提出すること）。
   7.4
   本契約に明記されているものを除き、アウトブレインは商品性、権原、非侵害、特定目的への適合性についての保証あるいは取引の過程、使用あるいは取引慣
   行に起因する保証を含め、そのサービス、顧客の代理として実施するキャンペーンの履行ないし成功について明示・黙示を問わずいかなる表明も保証も行わな
   い。アウトブレインのサービスが途切れることなく続き、安全、又はエラーが発生しないという表明や保証も行わない。
   8. データ保護
   両当事者は、サービス（又はアウトブレインピクセルの設置）において利用された、又は収集されたデータの全部もしくは一部が個人データであるものと合意
   する。各当事者は、(i) 個人データを処理する場合に欧州データ保護法を遵守し、及び(ii)
   独立的な管理者として個人データを処理するものとする。顧客は疑義が生じないように、アウトブレインのパートナーに提供する顧客データ、及び／又はサー
   ビスにおいて実施されるクッキー（リダイレクトに基づくものかどうかに関わらず）に対する法的根拠がなければならない。両当事者は、必要性がある限り、
   (i) データ主体に関する要求に協力し、(ii)
   いかなる個人データの侵害も各当事者に開示するものとする。各当事者は、ウェブサイトの簡単にアクセス、又は発見できる箇所にプライバシーポリシーを継
   続的に表示するものとする。そのプライバシーポリシーはいかなる法律、規則、規制に遵守し、また各当事者のセキュリティー管理及び国際移転に関する情報
   を含む。また用いる際に、顧客のプライバシーポリシーはアウトブレインピクセルの利用を開示とするものとする。尚、「データ主体」、「個人データ」、「
   個人データの侵害」、「情報管理者」はGDPRに定義づけられる。
   9. 補償
   9.1
   各当事者が本契約に基づく自らの義務及び表明に対する違反から生ずる第三者の請求から、他方の当事者、その代理人、もしくは代理店、関連会社、子会社、
   取締役、役員、従業員、その他契約関係に該当する場合はネットワークパートナーを保護及び、補償し、損失を与えないよう保つものとする。
   9.2かかる請求に関連して、(i)
   被補償当事者は迅速に書面で補償当事者に請求があった旨を通知する（迅速な通知が為されなかった場合にも補償当事者が補償義務を免れることはないが、迅
   速な通知が為されなかったことにより補償当事者が被った損害についてはこの限りでない）。(ii)
   補償当事者は単独で請求に対する防御を行い、又は和解をすることができる（ただし補償当事者は、被補償当事者の書面による事前の同意がない限り、被補償
   当事者の権利または義務に悪影響を及ぼす可能性がある和解を行うことはできない）。(iii)
   補償当事者が要求し、その費用を負担するときには、被補償当事者はかかる請求に関する調査検討及びこれに対する防御に協力する。(iv)
   被補償当事者は自らの費用負担により自ら選択する弁護士を使って、自らの権利の防御をする権利を有する。
   10. 賠償責任の制限
   当事者の補償義務、故意の違法行為あるいは本契約の守秘義務違反、及び/又は費用の未払に起因する請求に関する場合を除き、不法行為によるものであれ契
   約によるものであれ形態にかかわらず、本契約あるいはその履行に起因し、あるいは何らかの形でこれに関連して生じるあらゆる訴訟に関する各当事者とその
   取締役、役員、従業員、納入業者、ネットワークパートナー、代理人、もしくは代理店の賠償責任総額の上限は、(i)
   賠償請求の原因となった事象に先立つ12ヶ月間に本契約に基づいて顧客が支払うべき料金の額と(ii)
   500万円のうち、いずれか大きいほうを上限とする。各当事者は、たとえ損害の可能性について事前に知らされていた場合であっても、結果損害賠償、特別
   損害賠償、懲罰的損害賠償、付随的損害賠償や、本契約又はその履行に起因ないし関連して生じるデータの消失、逸失収益、逸失利益などその他いかなる損害
   についても責任を負わない。
   11. 雑則
   11.1
   いずれの当事者も、法律の効果あるいはそれ以外の方法により、他方の当事者の書面による事前の同意なく第三者に対し本契約の全部又は一部を譲渡すること
   はできない。ただし譲受人が本契約を履行するに十分な能力を有し、本契約の履行義務を引き受ける場合には、一方の当事者は、他方の当事者の同意を要する
   ことなく、合併、再生、資産の全部ないしその大半の譲渡を行い、本契約に基づく自らの権利の全部又は一部を譲渡し、義務の全部又は一部を承継させること
   ができる。
   11.2
   本契約は、日本法に準拠し、それに従って解釈されるものとする。当事者は、本契約に起因又は関連して生じるあらゆる紛争について、東京地方裁判所裁判所
   を専属的合意管轄裁判所とすることに合意する。かかる訴訟において勝訴をした当事者は、敗訴当事者に対し、合理的な範囲内の弁護士費用及び訴訟費用の支
   払いを求めることができる。
   11.3いかなる新聞発表又は一般公告も、顧客とアウトブレインの相互の合意なく行わないものとする。アウトブレインは自らの顧客リスト及びその他のマ
   ーケティング資料に顧客の名称を記載する権利を有する。顧客は、アウトブレインの事前の承認を得ずにアウトブレインの名称、ロゴまたは商標を使用するこ
   とはできない。
   11.4本契約に基づいて為されるすべての通知は文書で行うものとし、手渡し、ファックス、電子メール、速達、配達証明付書留郵便により、広告掲載申込
   書に記載の相手方当事者の住所又は相手方が適時文書で指定するその他の住所に配布する。通知は受理された時点をもって有効となる。
   11.5一方の当事者が本契約に基づく自らの権利の1つを行使しなかった場合においても、かかる権利を放棄したものとはみなされない。本契約の1つまた
   は複数の条項が準拠法に基づいて強制不能であると解釈される場合には、かかる条項は本契約から除外され、合意の残りの条項は効力を失わない。
   11.6いずれの当事者も、その合理的に制御できない事由により本合意事項に記載された自らの義務の履行が遅滞する場合、あるいは履行不能となる場合に
   は、この履行遅滞、又は履行不能に賠償責任を負わない。また、いずれの当事者も、インターネットへの接続や操作の失敗、技術的不具合、コンピュータのエ
   ラー、データ損傷によるデータの紛失その他の損害を受けた場合に賠償責任を負うことはない。
   11.7第6節、第9節、第10節、第11節及び異議の生じていない未払いに対する支払い義務は、本契約の終了後も存続する。
   11.8顧客とアウトブレインは相互に独立した契約当事者である。本合意事項に記載のいかなる文言も、両当事者間に合弁関係や提携関係を作るものと解釈
   されてはならない。
   11.9本契約はその主題に関する両当事者の完全なる合意をあらわし、両当事者の書面による事前の合意がない限り修正することはできない。広告掲載申込
   書、請求書あるいは本合意事項の主題に関して顧客が提出するその他の書類に矛盾または相反する規定がある場合は、アウトブレインがそれら書類を受諾また
   は署名したとしても、一切効力を持たない。
   本取引条件書は、上記の発効日に修正され、上記の発効日から現在の取引条件書となる。アウトブレインは本取引条件書を変更、修正、又は更新することがで
   きる.

Engage Terms

Version 1.2

Effective March 26, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   パートナー登録フォームに記載されているパートナーがOutbrainの商品、サービスおよびテクノロジーを実装ならびに使用する際には、以下の標準的
   なパートナー配信規約（以下「利用規約」という。）が適用される。パートナー登録フォームに署名がなされていない場合、（1）「本契約」とは利用規約を
   意味し、（2）利用規約に準じてテクノロジーの使用はできるが、当該パートナー登録フォームにOutbrainおよびパートナーの両当事者が署名するま
   で、パートナーに対する支払は一切行われない。
    1. 定義
         1. 「本コンテンツ」とは、グラフィック、テキストおよび（または）オーディオコンテンツ（テキスト、データ、情報、写真、画像、グラフ
            ィック、オーディオ、動画その他のコンテンツを含む場合がある）をいう。
         2. 「本コンテンツレコメンデーション」とは、テクノロジーが実装されているウェブページ、アプリまたはプラットフォームの閲覧者に対し
            て配信される本コンテンツへのリンクをいう。本コンテンツレコメンデーションには、プロモーションコンテンツおよび（または）サイト
            内回遊リンクが含まれる。
         3. 「データ」とは、Outbrainのテクノロジーを通じて収集または作成されるすべてのデータを意味し、これには、本契約に基づいて
            パートナーに提供されるレポートまたは他のデータが含まれる。
         4. 「デスティネーションページ」とは、本コンテンツレコメンデーションをクリックすることによってアクセスされるあらゆるウェブページ
            またはオンライン上のページをいう。
         5. 「エンドユーザー」とは、パートナーのウェブサイトを閲覧する個人ユーザーをいう。
         6. 「知的財産権」とは、特許権、著作権、商標、企業秘密、ノウハウおよびいずれの司法管轄地域においても知的財産と認められているその
            他一切の権利をいい、かかる権利の登録、出願、更新および延長を含む。
         7. 「本パートナーウェブサイト」とは、パートナー登録フォームに明記されているウェブプロパティ、アプリまたはプラットフォーム、なら
            びに、事前に書面で（Eメール可）Outbrainの承認を受けてパートナーがテクノロジーの実装を決めた追加的プロパティ
            をいう。
         8. 「本プロモーションコンテンツ」とは、エンドユーザーによる正当なクリックにより収益が得られる本コンテンツレコメンデーションをい
            う。
         9. 「本プロモーション収益」とは、本プロモーションコンテンツの配信を目的にOutbrainのカスタマーからOutbrainに支払
            われる収益をいう。
        10. 「サイト内回遊リンク」とは、本プロモーションコンテンツではない本コンテンツレコメンデーションを指し、パートナー自らが選択およ
            び承認した本パートナーウェブサイト上の本コンテンツへパートナーの意向に従いOutbrainが挿入するリンクをいう。
        11. 「テクノロジー」とは、Outbrainがパートナーに提供するJavaScript, API, SDK
            および関連プロトコルをいい、本パートナーウェブサイトに実装することにより、1つまたは複数の本コンテンツレコメンデーションが表
            示され、当該本コンテンツレコメンデーションをクリックすることにより、ウェブページ閲覧者はデスティネーションページにナビゲーシ
            ョンすることができる。
    2. テクノロジー、位置および外観
         1. テクノロジーは、本パートナーウェブサイトの各ページ上のメインの本コンテンツのすぐ下、もしくは、書面にて（Eメール可）両当事者
            が合意した場所に配置されるものとする。
         2. パートナーは、本コンテンツレコメンデーションのソースまたは内容の開示に関するものを含むすべての適用法および規則に準じてテクノ
            ロジーを表示しなければならない。上記の義務のみならず、パートナーは、テクノロジーの表示、表記または識別の仕方についてOutb
            rainの指示に従うことに同意する。
         3. Outbrainは、随時、自らの裁量で、テクノロジーをアップデート、変更、または改良することができる。 Outbrain
            が、パートナーに対して当該アップデートを実装するよう要請した場合、パートナーは、Outbrainからその要請を受領した後30
            日以内に、商業的見地からみて合理的な努力を用いて、そのアップデートを実装することとする。ただし、Outbrainが、パートナ
            ーに対して、本パートナーウェブサイトのパフォーマンスに重大な悪影響を及ぼすとパートナーが合理的に判断したアップデートを実装す
            るよう要請した場合、Outbrainがパートナーの懸念を合理的に満足いく程度に解消しない限り、または当該アップデートの実装を
            求めないことに同意しない限り、パートナーは、当該ページ上でテクノロジーの表示を停止することを選択できる。
         4. 契約期間中、Outbrainはパートナーの唯一かつ排他的なコンテンツレコメンデーションのプロバイダとなる。「コンテンツレコメ
            ンデーション」は、見出しまたはエンドユーザーが本コンテンツ（デスティネーションページがコンテンツ、アドバトリアルまたは広告を
            問わない）へ誘導されることを示すフレーズを含む1つまたは複数のリンクのことをいう。
         5. 本契約の他の規定にかかわらず、Outbrainの書面による事前の同意がない限り、テクノロジーの実装によって各ページに最低1つ
            の本プロモーションコンテンツが含まれなければならない（即ち、パートナーは、サイト内回遊リンクのみの目的でテクノロジーを使用す
            ることはできない）。
    3. 収益および支払
         1. 調整済み総所得にパートナー登録フォームで定めたパーセンテージを掛けた金額がパートナーに支払わる。支払い条件はパートナー登録フ
            ォームの4.収益および支払いに準ずる。
         2. パートナーに対して支払われるべき金額が1万円を下回る場合は、パートナーに対して支払うべき金額が累計1万円を超える月まで支払わ
            れないものとする。かかる支払は、適用される法律の定めに準じて、源泉所得税ならびに各種控除の対象となる。Outbrainの支払
            に関するクレームの一切は、Outbrainに対して、当該支払が振り込まれた日から30日以内に書面で提起されなければならない。
            かかる期間経過後は、パートナーは、当該支払にかかるクレームを放棄したものとみなす。Outbrainが、合理的な裁量でパートナ
            ーのパフォーマンスが不正なもの、もしくは無効なものであると考えるとき、またはそれらの点でOutbrainの顧客から費用もしく
            はクレジットバックの支払を求められたときは、Outbrainはパートナーに対する手数料およびクレジットバックの支払を留保する
            権利を有する。
            かかる場合、パートナーからの要請があれば、Outbrainはかかる決定に至った証拠をパートナーに提示する。無効な操作とは、以
            下の行為を含むがこれに限らない：（i）本プロモーションコンテンツの無効なクリックが人物、ボット、自動プログラムまたは類似のデ
            バイスにより生成された場合（これには、パートナーのIPアドレスまたはパートナーの管理下にあるコンピューターからなされたクリッ
            クを含む）、（ii）金銭の支払いを伴うクリック、虚偽表示によるクリック、もしくは、エンドユーザーに本プロモーションコンテンツ
            のクリックなどを要請してなされたクリックの場合、　（iii）本プロモーションコンテンツをクリックしたエンドユーザーのブラウザ
            のJavaScriptが無効に設定されている場合、および（iv）以下第6条に記載されている禁止行為が行われた場合。また、Ou
            tbrainが有する権利および救済措置に加えて、Outbrainは、（i）
            本契約書の下でOutbrainがパートナーに支払うべき金額を保留すること、および、かかる金額と本契約書または他の契約書の下で
            パートナーがOutbrainに支払うべき金額とを相殺することができ、そして（また）（ii）Outbrainからパートナーへの
            書面による（Eメール可）通知後30日以内に、パートナーから過払い金の払い戻しを受ける請求することができる。本パートナーウェブ
            サイト上に本プロモーションコンテンツを表示させているOutbrainの顧客がOutbrainに対して支払を怠った場合、両当事
            者は誠意をもって協議し、解決策を見出す。支払いを確実にするために、パートナーはOutbrainに正確な連絡先および支払情報を
            通知しなければならない。また、パートナーは、パートナーの金融機関または決済サービスプロバイダの手数料を負担するものとする。
         3. Outbrainはパートナーに管理画面を開放することができ、パートナーは推定収益を確認することができる。疑義を避けるために明
            記するが、Outbrainは、当該月における推定収益が本契約の下でパートナーに対して最終的に支払われる正確な金額であることを
            保証しない。
    4. プライバシー
         1. Outbrainおよびパートナーは、適用法に準じたプライバシーポリシーを各々のウェブサイト上に表示する。パートナーは、Out
            brainの指示に従い、本パートナーウェブサイトにおける個人情報の収集および取扱いについて説明を行う。Outbrainのプラ
            イバシーポリシーは以下のページに記載している：https://www.outbrain.com/legal/privacy.
         2. パートナーは、テクノロジーの実装にあたっては、Outbrainが個人情報保護法を遵守するために必要だと判断する合理的な指示に
            従うものとする。パートナーは、テクノロジーの使用がパートナーに適用される個人情報保護法に適合していることについて、自ら責任を
            負うことを了解する。とりわけ、テクノロジーが依拠する第三者クッキーの配置および使用、ならびに、クッキーの使用についてエンドユ
            ーザーから同意を得ることなどを含み、Outbrainは、これらに関して一切責任を負わない。
    5. ライセンス規約
         1. 本契約期間中、パートナーが本契約の定めを遵守することを条件に、Outbrainはパートナーに対して、限定的、非排他的、取り消
            し可能でサブライセンス権がない、譲渡不可能のライセンスを付与し、パートナーは、本パートナーウェブサイト上で本コンテンツレコメ
            ンデーションを既定のフォームおよびフォーマットで表示するテクノロジーを使用することができる。パートナーにOutbrainのA
            PIまたはSDKの使用が許諾された場合、パートナーは、当該APIまたはSDKをOutbrainが随時提供する実装ガイドに準じ
            て使用するものとする。Outbrainは、通知の上、当該実装ガイドを随時改訂することができる。
         2. Outbrainは、本契約期間中、パートナーに対して、限定的、世界規模、非排他的、ロイヤルティフリーのライセンスを付与し、パ
            ートナーは、テクノロジーに組み込まれているOutbrainの商標、サービスマークおよびロゴ（併せて「Outbrainマーク」
            という。）を本契約に基づくパートナーの権利および義務に厳格に従って使用および表示することができる。Outbrainマークの使
            用から生じるグッドウィルはOutbrainにのみ帰属する。パートナーの事前の書面による同意を得ることを条件に（Eメール可）、
            Outbrainはテクノロジーを実装したカスタマーまたはパートナーの総リストにパートナーおよび本パートナーウェブサイトの名前
            を載せることができる（マーケティングおよび販売資料を含む）。同様に、各当事者は本契約に関するプレスリリース、または、本契約で
            定める以外の自己のウェブサイト上で相手方当事者の名前を使用する場合は、相手方当事者の書面による同意を事前に得るものとする。
         3. 当事者間の権利関係は以下のとおりとする。（a）Outbrainは、Outbrainマーク、テクノロジー、データおよびテクノロ
            ジーにより表示または使用可能となる本コンテンツ（ただし、パートナーが所有権を有する、本パートナーウェブサイトからの本コンテン
            ツは除く）に関する一切の権利、権限および利益を保持する。また（b）パートナーは、ルック＆フィールを含む本パートナーウェブサイ
            トに関する一切の権利、権限および利益を保有するが、前号（a）に記載された項目（かかる項目の知的財産権のすべてなどを含む）は除
            外される。
         4. 本契約のもと付与されるライセンスは、本契約によって具体的に定められ、黙示の権利は一切存在しない。本契約で明示的にパートナーに
            付与されていない権利は、すべてOutbrainが留保するものとする。
    6. 禁止行為
         1. パートナーは、（i）本コンテンツレコメンデーションを編集、修正、切り捨て、フィルター処理、または本コンテンツレコメンデーショ
            ンの順序を変える行為（ii）デスティネーションページを曖昧にし、変更し、またはエンドユーザーをデスティネーションページからリ
            ダイレクトさせる行為、もしくは、本コンテンツレコメンデーションとデスティネーションページの間に本コンテンツを点在させる行為（
            iii）テクノロジー本来の表示を縮小、削除または阻害する行為（iv）人為的に本コンテンツレコメンデーションのクリックを水増し
            する行為、または、インセンティブもしくは他の方法を用いて本コンテンツレコメンデーションのクリックを勧奨したり要請したりする行
            為（v）テクノロジーに含まれる知的財産権に関する通知の一切を削除し、毀損し、曖昧にし、または変更する行為（vi）本契約で明示
            的に規定されている方法や目的以外に、テクノロジーにアクセス、複製または使用する行為（vii）テクノロジーの変更、翻案、翻訳、
            二次的著作物の作成、逆コンパイル、リバースエンジニアリング、逆アセンブル、その他テクノロジーのソースコードを抽出しようと試み
            る行為、また、テクノロジーまたはそれに関連する機密情報の使用またはアクセスを通じて、代替物または類似サービスもしくは製品を作
            成する行為（viii）テクノロジーの干渉または妨害を試み、または本契約に準じて実装されたテクノロジーを通じた方法以外の方法で
            、システムまたはネットワークへのアクセスを確立しようとする行為、（ix）テクノロジーを通じて送信された本コンテンツレコメンデ
            ーションを複製、キャッシュ、配信、表示、変更、その他使用する行為（または、第三者の当該行為を承認または幇助する行為）。ただし
            、テクノロジーを通じて提供された本コンテンツレコメンデーションは除く。または（x）テクノロジーをOutbrain
            が許可しない目的で使用する行為。APIまたはSDKについては、パートナーに配布されたAPIまたはSDKの実装ガイドに矛盾する
            目的で使用する行為を含む。
         2. パートナーは、テクノロジーをアダルトコンテンツ、猥褻なコンテンツ、性的コンテンツ、名誉を毀損するコンテンツ、中傷的コンテンツ
            、侵害的コンテンツ、虐待的コンテンツ、並びに、ヘイトスピーチまたは差別の勧奨、銃器および不法薬物の売買、または不法行為の参加
            を促すような不法コンテンツを表示するページに実装しない。Outbrainは、独自の裁量で、いつでも、テクノロジーを無効にする
            権利を留保する。
         3. 本契約で明確に許可された場合を除き、パートナーは、第三者の代理または利益のために、テクノロジーを複製、賃借、賃貸、売買、移譲
            、譲渡、サブライセンスの付与、逆アセンブル、リバースエンジニアリング、または逆コンパイル（適用される制定法によって限られた範
            囲内で明確に許可されている場合を除く）、修正、もしくはテクノロジーの一部の改ざんを行ってはならない。
    7. 登録
       パートナーは、Outbrainウェブサイト上で登録手続きをしなくてもテクノロジーを使用することができる。登録後、オンラインリポートの閲
       覧ならびにOutbrainダッシュボードへのアクセスが可能となり、パートナーは自ら本コンテンツレコメンデーションのファンクションを含む
       数々の管理・設定を行うことができる。登録手続きを済ませてパートナーがOutbrainダッシュボードにアクセスした場合、Outbrain
       ダッシュボードを通してなされた変更に対する責任はすべてパートナーが負うものとする。Outbrainは、パートナーに書面で事前通知するこ
       とにより（Eメール可）、Outbrainダッシュボードへのアクセスを中止することができる。
    8. テクノロジーの停止および終了
         1. 緊急事態が発生した場合（重大なセキュリティの侵害、ユーザーへのマルウェアその他のウィルスの拡散、不適切・不法・不正な使用など
            ）、Outbrainは、随時、テクノロジーの全部または一部を停止もしくは打ち切ることができる（テクノロジーの使用を不可にする
            などの措置を含む）。
         2. いずれの当事者も、相手方当事者が本契約の定めについて重大な違反を犯し、違反当事者が書面による違反通知を受領してから15日経過
            しても当該違反が治癒されない場合、本契約を解除することができる。
         3. 本契約は、パートナー登録フォームに別段の定めがない限り、30日前の書面による通知をもって終了することができる。本契約が満了ま
            たは終了された場合、本契約上の権利および義務の一切は消滅するものとする。ただし、本契約第9条f、第9条g、第10条、第11条
            および第13条は、その規定に従い、存続し、当事者を拘束し続けるものとする。
    9. 限定保証および補償
         1. 各当事者は相手方当事者に対して以下の事項を表明し保証する。（a）本契約を締結し、かつ、本契約に基づく義務を履行する権利、能力
            および権限の一切を保有していること。（ｂ）本契約の履行に際して、適用される法律、規則および命令の一切を遵守すること。
         2. Outbrainは、Outbrainの商標の所有者であり、本契約の定めに従ってパートナーが実装するテクノロジーに関する知的財
            産を所有していることを保証する。
         3. パートナーは、本パートナーウェブサイトが、（i）違法なコンテンツ、（ii）第三者の持つ権利を侵害するコンテンツ、または（ii
            i）猥褻なコンテンツ、名誉を毀損するコンテンツ、誹謗的なコンテンツ、中傷的なコンテンツ、いかなる者のパブリシティ権、プライバ
            シー権もしくは人格権を侵害するコンテンツを含んでおらず、そして将来においても含まないことを表明し保証する。
         4. 本契約に規定されたいかなる事項も、Outbrainが最低限のトラフィック量、クリック数または使用数などをパートナーに約束する
            ものと解釈されてはならない。
         5. 本契約で明確に表明された場合を除き、いずれの当事者も、本契約、本パートナーウェブサイト、テクノロジー、データ、テクノロジーを
            通じて使用可能な本コンテンツそしてその他の事項（目的の如何を問わずクォリティまたは適合性が満足いくものであること、サービスを
            中断またはエラーもなく常時使用できること、サービスまたは取引に際して生じる保証など）に関して、明示的もしくは黙示的かを問わず
            、一切、表明または保証を行わない。
         6. Outbrainは、テクノロジーに組み込まれている本コンテンツ、またはテクノロジーを通してアクセスする本コンテンツ（本プロモ
            ーションコンテンツ等を含む）に関して一切の表明または保証を行わない。Outbrainは、テクノロジーを介して配信される本コン
            テンツの内容、正確性、本コンテンツのよる知的財産権の侵害、合法性または品位について一切責任を負わず、また、パートナーが前述事
            項を当てにしていた場合でも、Outbrainは一切責任を負わない。
         7. 各当事者（以下「補償当事者」という。）は、相手方当事者、相手方当事者の親会社および関連会社、ならびに当該会社の取締役、役員、
            株主、社員、代表者、従業員および代理人（以下あわせて「被補償当事者」という。）を、本契約で定めた補償当事者の表明、保証または
            義務の違反、もしくは違反疑惑が原因で第三者により提起された訴えに関するすべての請求、損失、責任、損害、費用、和解金およびその
            他の支出（合理的な弁護士費用を含む）（以下あわせて「本クレーム」という。）について補償し、防御し、何ら損失を被らせないものと
            する。被補償当事者は、本クレームを補償当事者に速やかに通知しなければならない。ただし、かかる通知の遅滞は、その遅滞により補償
            当事者が実際に損害を被った場合を除き、補償当事者の義務を一切軽減しない。被補償当事者は、補償当事者の指揮の下、自らが選任し、
            費用を負担する弁護士と本クレームの防御および和解に参加する権利を有する。
   10. 秘密保持
       各当事者（以下「受領当事者」という。）は、相手方当事者（以下「開示当事者」）の営業、技術、製品およびサービスに関して、開示された状況を
       斟酌すると、当然、秘密情報とみなされる特定の情報および資料（本契約の条項を含む）（以下「秘密情報」という。）にアクセスすることを承認す
       る。秘密情報には以下のものは含まれない。（a）受領当事者が、開示者当事者による開示前に既に知得していた情報、（b）開示当事者の秘密情報
       を参照することなく、受領当事者が独立して開発した情報、（c）受領当事者の責めに帰さずして、公知もしくは公知となった情報、（d）秘密保持
       義務に一切違反することなく、第三者から受領当事者に開示された情報。本契約で許可されている場合を除き、受領当事者は（aa）秘密情報を自己
       または第三者の利益のために一切使用せず、（bb）本第１０条に従い秘密情報を使用しないこと、および秘密情報の秘密性を保持することに合意し
       た、受領当事者の取締役、従業員、請負業者、顧問、投資家または潜在的な投資家以外には、秘密情報を一切開示しない。受領当事者は、開示当事者
       の書面による要請があった場合、速やかに、秘密情報を返還または廃棄する。前述の定めにかかわらず、受領当事者は、適用法律または法的手続きに
       より必要となった範囲で、秘密情報を開示することができる。ただし、受領当事者は、かかる開示請求があったことを速やかに開示当事者に通知し、
       開示当事者が当該開示に異議を申し立て、または開示範囲を限定する旨を求めた場合は、開示当事者に対し、開示当事者の費用をもって妥当な協力を
       する。
   11. 責任制限
         1. いずれの当事者も、以下の場合、相手方当事者に対する賠償責任を除外または制限するものではない。（i）当事者、または自己の従業員
            もしくは請負業者の過失により引き起こされた死亡または人身傷害、（ii）詐欺または詐欺的不実表示、もしくは（iii）法律上、除
            外または制限することを禁じられているその他の責任。
         2. 本契約で規定されている当事者の補償義務を除き、いずれの当事者も、本契約に関連して生じる特別損害または本契約違反について（デー
            タの損失または代替品の調達費用を含む）、当該当事者がかかる損害賠償の可能性について助言を受けたかどうかを問わず、法的責任を一
            切負わない。
         3. 本契約で規定されている当事者の補償義務、当事者の知的財産の違反、不正使用または侵害、いずれかの当事者による本契約第10条の違
            反、もしくは重大な過失または故意の過失の場合を除き、本契約の下で当事者が負う賠償責任限度額は、1000万円もしくは当該行為が
            行われた直近12ヶ月間（複数行為が行われた場合は、最初の行為日を基準とする）にパートナーに対して支払われたまたは支払われるべ
            き調整済み総所得のどちらか大きい方の金額を上限とする。
   12. 反社会勢力の排除
         1. 各当事者は、以下に列挙する人物・事項に現在該当しないことを表明する：暴力団、暴力団員、暴力団員でなくなってから５年が経過して
            いない者、暴力団関連企業、総会屋、社会運動標榜ゴロ、特殊知能暴力集団及びこれらに相当するもの。
         2. 当事者が虚偽の表明をした場合、相手方当事者は、他の権利及び救済手段に影響を与えることなく、本契約を終了することができる。
   13. 一般条項

   本契約は、日本法に準拠し、日本法に従って解釈される。各当事者は、本契約に関連して生じる一切の紛争については、東京簡易裁判所および東京地方裁判所
   を専属的合意管轄裁判所とする。本契約に関連して訴訟が提起された場合、勝訴当事者は、当該提訴に関して発生した合理的範囲内の弁護士報酬および費用を
   請求する権利がある。当事者は、本契約のいずれかの規定が特別に定められた条件に従い実行されなかった場合、またはその他の違反があった場合、回復不可
   能な損害が生じる可能性があることに同意する。従って、いずれの当事者も、法律において講じることのできるその他の救済措置に加えて、本契約違反の防止
   および本契約の特別な定めを確実なものとするために、差止命令を求めることができる。当事者は、独立した契約者であり、本契約のいかなる事項も、パート
   ナーシップ、ジョイントベンチャー、代理人その他の関係を当事者間に形成するものと解釈しない。一方の当事者が本契約に基づく自らの権利の一部を行使し
   ない場合または本契約に基づく他の一方の当事者の義務の履行を求めない場合にも、これらの権利ないし義務が放棄されたとはみなされず、またいずれかの当
   事者が本契約に対するある不履行ないし違反を免責されたとしても、その事実によってそれ以外のまたはそれ以降の不履行ないし違反が免責されるわけではな
   い。支払い義務を除き、いずれの当事者も、その妥当な制御能力を超えた事由により本契約に基づく当該当事者の義務のいずれかを履行できない場合、かかる
   不履行に対する責任を一切負わない。本契約は、本契約の主題に関して、当事者間の完全かつ唯一の合意を構成するものであり、書面によるか口頭によるかを
   問わず、かかる主題に関する本契約締結前または締結時におけるすべての合意または了解に優先する。本契約書は、両当事者が署名した文書によってのみ、変
   更、修正または取り換えることができる。本契約の条項に関する見出しは全て、参照の目的においてのみ挿入され、いかなる法的影響力も持たないものとする
   。本契約書は、電子的な送信または忠実に再現できるその他の手段により履行および配達することができ、かかる手段により配達された本契約書は、本契約書
   において原本とみなされるものとする。本契約は、複数の副本で締結することができ、それぞれの副本は原本とみなされるが、当該副本全ては、１個の、かつ
   同一の文書を構成する。本契約の規定のうち、所有権、保証免責および責任制限などに関する規定など、本契約終了後も本質的に存続すべき規定は、本契約の
   終了後においても存続する。本契約の規定が、何らかの理由により、法的強制力がないものと判断された場合、かかる規定は、法的強制を可能とするために必
   要な範囲に限り修正され、それができない場合は、本契約から分離され、本契約の残りの規定引き続き完全で有効であるものとする。いずれの当事者も、相手
   方当事者の書面による事前同意を得ずに、本契約または本契約に基づく権利または義務を譲渡することはできない。ただし、（i）法に基づく手続き、合併、
   再編成もしくは支配権の取得または変更があった場合、（ii）OutbrainからOutbrainの子会社への譲渡の場合はこの限りでなない。上記の
   規定に従い、本契約は，両当事者及びその認めらえた承継人および譲受人に対して拘束力を有し、またこれらの利益のために効力を生じる。

Engage Terms

Version 2.4

Effective July 18, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   Termos de Uso Padrão
   Os seguintes Termos de Uso Padrão (“Termos”) regem a implementação e
   uso dos produtos, serviços, e tecnologia fornecidos pela Outbrain ao
   Divulgador identificado no Contrato de Distribuição para Divulgadores.
   Na medida em que o Divulgador ainda não tenha assinado um Contrato de
   Distribuição para Divulgadores, (1) as referências a "Contrato" deverão
   ser aos Termos, e (2) estes Termos permitem o uso da Tecnologia, mas
   nenhum pagamento deve ser acumulado ou ser feito ao Divulgador até que
   tal Contrato de Distribuição para Divulgadores seja assinado por
   Outbrain e pelo Divulgador.
    1. DEFINIÇÕES.
         1. “Recomendações de Anunciantes” significa Recomendações na rede
            da Outbrain submetidas pelos anunciantes da Outbrain.
         2. “Conteúdo” significa conteúdo gráfico, textual e/ou auditivo
            (que poderá incluir texto, dados, informações, fotos, imagens,
            gráficos, conteúdo de áudio, vídeo ou outro conteúdo).
         3. “Dados” significa todos os dados coletados ou gerados pela
            Outbrain através do Serviço, incluindo relatórios ou outros
            dados disponibilizados ao Divulgador com relação a este
            Contrato.
         4. “Página de Destino” significa qualquer página da internet ou
            outra localização online que possa ser acessada ao clicar nas
            Recomendações de Conteúdo.
         5. “Usuário Final” significa pessoa física usuária do(s) Site(s)
            do Divulgador.
         6. “Sites do Divulgador” significa propriedades da Web,
            aplicativos, ou plataformas identificadas no Contrato de
            Distribuição para Divulgadores, juntamente com qualquer ou
            quaisquer propriedades adicionais nas quais o Divulgador
            escolha implementar a Tecnologia com autorização prévia e por
            escrito da Outbrain (sendo a autorização por e-mail
            suficiente).
         7. “Recomendações de Recirculação” significa Recomendações que
            não são Recomendações de Anunciantes e que conectam ao
            Conteúdo por meio de Sites do Divulgador.
         8. “Recomendações" significa a exibição de Conteúdo que a
            Outbrain entrega ao visualizador de uma página da Web,
            aplicativo ou plataforma na qual a Tecnologia é implementada.
            Importante esclarecer que as Recomendações podem incluir
            Recomendações de Anunciantes e/ou Recomendações de
            Recirculação.
         9. “Receita” significa a receita líquida coletada pela Outbrain
            de Recomendações de Anunciantes e cobradas pela Outbrain para
            a exibição de tais Recomendações de Anunciantes da rede da
            Outbrain.
        10. “Tecnologia” significa o Javascript, API, SDK e protocolos
            relacionados fornecidos pela Outbrain ao Divulgador que,
            quando implementados no(s) Site(s) do Divulgador, exibem uma
            ou mais Recomendação(ões) e/ou permite aos usuários navegar
            para a Página de Destino clicando em tais Recomendações.
    2. TECNOLOGIA; POSICIONAMENTO E APARÊNCIA.
         1. Implementações da Tecnologia deverão aparecer diretamente
            abaixo do Conteúdo principal de cada página dos Sites do
            Divulgador nos quais a Tecnologia é instalada ou de outra
            forma mutualmente acordada por escrito (sendo a autorização
            por e-mail suficiente).
         2. O Divulgador deverá exibir a Tecnologia de acordo com todas as
            leis e regulamentos aplicáveis, inclusive com respeito à
            divulgação da origem ou natureza das Recomendações. Sem
            prejuízo da obrigação anterior, o Divulgador concorda em
            cumprir as instruções da Outbrain relativas a como a
            Tecnologia deve ser exibida, marcadas ou identificadas.
         3. A Outbrain pode fazer atualizações, modificações ou melhorias
            da Tecnologia de tempos em tempos, a seu critério exclusivo.
            Caso a Outbrain solicite ao Divulgador que implemente tais
            atualizações, o Divulgador empregará esforços comerciais
            razoáveis para o fazer em trinta (30) dias do recebimento de
            tais atualizações da Outbrain; desde que, se a Outbrain
            solicitar que o Divulgador implemente qualquer Atualização que
            o Divulgador razoavelmente entenda afetar de forma
            significativa e adversa o desempenho da(s) Página(s) do
            Divulgador, o Divulgador poderá optar por deixar de exibir a
            Tecnologia em tal(is) página(s), a menos que Outbrain atenda
            às preocupações do Divulgador para a sua satisfação razoável
            ou concorde em não exigir que o Divulgador implemente tal
            Atualização.
         4. Durante o Prazo, a Outbrain deverá ser o único e exclusivo
            provedor de recomendações de conteúdo do Divulgador, tendo que
            “recomendações de conteúdo" são um ou mais links compostos por
            uma manchete ou frase indicando que um Usuário Final será
            conduzido ao Conteúdo (independentemente de a Página de
            Destino exibir conteúdo, publicidades ou propagandas).
         5. Não obstante qualquer outra disposição do Contrato e a menos
            que Outbrain forneça o consentimento prévio por escrito,
            qualquer implementação da Tecnologia deve incluir pelo menos
            um (1) link por página de Recomendações de Anunciantes (ou
            seja, o Divulgador não pode usar a Tecnologia apenas para
            fornecer Recomendações de Recirculação).
         6. Durante o Prazo, o Outbrain poderá testar mudanças na exibição
            da Tecnologia. Esses testes de Outbrain serão concluídos na
            menor porcentagem de páginas de Site(s) do Divulgador que
            proporcionem resultados estatisticamente significativos. Com
            base nos resultados de tais testes, Outbrain pode sugerir
            modificações na exibição das Recomendações e Tecnologia; tais
            modificações serão efetivadas apenas após o consentimento
            prévio do Divulgador (o qual não deverá ser indevidamente
            protelado). Na medida em que o Divulgador faça uso da API e,
            portanto, controle qualquer teste, o Divulgador deve cumprir
            esses pedidos de teste pelo menos trimestralmente.
    3. RECEITA E PAGAMENTO.
         1. Durante o Prazo, o Divulgador será pago a percentagem da
            Receita Bruta Ajustada indicada no Contrato de Distribuição
            para Divulgadores. A Outbrain deverá fazer esses pagamentos
            dentro de um certo número de dias (conforme indicado no
            Contrato de Distribuição para Divulgadores) após o final de
            qualquer mês do calendário durante o qual o Outbrain cobre
            Receita. Para evitar dúvidas, a Receita é líquida, entre
            outras, de taxas de serviços de dados de terceiros integrados
            na plataforma da Outbrain, cliques/impressões inválidos e
            descontos/reembolsos de anunciantes e agências.
         2. O Divulgador deve fornecer prontamente a Outbrain formulários
            fiscais completos e precisos e todos os outros materiais
            similares que Outbrain exija, que podem incluir o formulário
            de imposto W-8BEN, W-8BEN-E ou W-9, se aplicável
            (coletivamente, todos esses formulários e materiais,
            "Materiais Fiscais"). Não obstante qualquer disposição
            estabelecida em contrário neste Contrato, o Outbrain pode: (a)
            reter os pagamentos devidos ao Divulgador nestes Termos, sem
            multa ou taxa de atraso até que o Outbrain tenha recebido os
            Materiais Fiscais do Divulgador, e (b) deduzir quaisquer
            impostos retidos na fonte a pagar por Outbrain dos pagamentos
            devidos aos Divulgadores por Outbrain, conforme exigido por
            lei. Uma vez que Outbrain receba os Materiais Fiscais,
            Outbrain usará esforços comercialmente razoáveis para pagar os
            montantes em aberto ao Divulgador de acordo com a subseção
            acima (a), assim que razoavelmente praticável. Todos os
            pagamentos ao Divulgador estarão sujeitos a retenção de
            imposto de renda e deduções similares, conforme exigido pela
            lei aplicável.
         3. Para assegurar pagamento adequado, o Divulgador é responsável
            por notificar a Outbrain de informações precisas sobre contato
            e pagamento. O Divulgador também é responsável por quaisquer
            encargos avaliados pelo banco do Divulgador ou pelo provedor
            de pagamento. Se o montante devido ao Divulgador for inferior
            a R$ 150,00 (cento e cinquenta Reais), tal valor será
            acumulado até o mês calendário em que o saldo dos pagamentos
            devidos ao Divulgador exceda R$ 150,00 (cento e cinquenta
            Reais). Qualquer controvérsia em relação a um pagamento da
            Outbrain deve ser submetida à Outbrain por escrito dentro de
            trinta (30) dias após a data de postagem ou transferência
            eletrônica desse pagamento ou a mesma será considerada
            renunciada.
         4. A Outbrain poderá reter, cobrar ou efetuar devolução
            pagamentos na forma de crédito ao Divulgador caso a Outbrain,
            a seu critério único e razoável, acredite que sua realização
            seja fraudulenta ou inválida por natureza, ou caso a Outbrain
            tenha sido cobrada ou recebido crédito de volta do anunciante
            a esse respeito. A atividade inválida é determinada pela
            Outbrain em todos os casos e pode incluir, mas não está
            limitada a: (i) cliques inválidos ou impressões de
            Recomendações de Anunciantes gerados por qualquer pessoa, bot,
            programa automatizado ou dispositivo similar, inclusive
            através de quaisquer cliques/impressões originados dos
            endereços de IP do Divulgador ou dos computadores sob o
            controle do Divulgador; (ii) cliques/impressões solicitados ou
            gerados pelo pagamento de dinheiro, representação falsa ou
            pedidos de Usuários Finais para clicar em Recomendações de
            Anunciantes ou tomar outras ações; (iii) Recomendações de
            Anunciantes servidas para Usuários Finais cujos navegadores
            tenham o JavaScript desativado; e (iv) cliques/impressões
            misturadas com uma quantidade significativa da atividade
            descrita em (i, ii e iii) acima.
         5. Além dos outros direitos e remédios da Outbrain, a Outbrain
            pode (i) reter e compensar quaisquer pagamentos devidos ao
            Divulgador no Contrato contra qualquer taxa que o Divulgador
            deva à Outbrain sob o Contrato ou qualquer outro contrato,
            e/ou (ii) exigir que o Divulgador reembolse a Outbrain Dentro
            de trinta (30) dias de qualquer fatura, qualquer montante que
            a Outbrain possa ter pago em excesso ao Divulgador em períodos
            anteriores. Se um anunciante do Outbrain cujas Recomendações
            de Anunciantes sejam exibidas em qualquer Site do Divulgador
            não efetue pagamento à Outbrain, a Outbrain poderá reter o
            pagamento ou cobrar a conta do Divulgador.
    4. PRIVACIDADE.
         1. A Outbrain e o Divulgador deverão manter e exibir em seus
            respectivos websites política de privacidade de fácil acesso e
            localização que deverá cumprir todas as leis aplicáveis, e que
            no que respeita ao Divulgador, deverá divulgar o use de
            tecnologia de terceiros para coletar e utilizar informações
            com relação às Páginas do Divulgador. A política de
            privacidade da Outbrain está disponível em
            https://www.outbrain.com/legal/privacy.
         2. O Serviço conforme implementado nos termos deste instrumento
            não coletará quaisquer informações de identificação pessoal,
            tais como número de conta, número de seguridade social, nome,
            endereço ou endereço eletrônico. O Divulgador reconhece que os
            usuários da Tecnologia poderão escolher se registrar no
            Outbrain por meio do website da Outbrain e que esse registro
            poderá resultar na coleta de informação pessoal identificável.
            O Divulgador deverá implementar a Tecnologia de acordo com
            todas as instruções da Outbrain que sejam razoáveis e por ela
            determinadas como necessárias para permitir que a Outbrain
            cumpra com as leis de proteção de dados aplicáveis. O
            Divulgador reconhece e concorda que é responsabilidade do
            Divulgador (e não da Outbrain) garantir que o uso da
            Tecnologia pelo Divulgador atenda a toda a legislação de
            proteção de dados aplicável ao Divulgador (incluindo,
            especialmente, a colocação e uso de cookies de terceiros, do
            qual a Tecnologia dependa, e a captura de qualquer
            consentimento para os cookies necessários a serem obtidos do
            Usuário Final relevante). Além disso, as partes devem fornecer
            aos Usuários Finais o acesso a um mecanismo de escolha do
            usuário, como a página de exclusão da Iniciativa da
            Publicidade em Rede (Network Advertising Initiative), a
            Aliança da Publicidade Digital (Digital Advertising Alliance),
            a Aliança Europeia da Publicidade Digital Interactiva
            (European Digital Advertising Alliance) e/ou uma exclusão
            direta da Outbrain através da política de privacidade da
            Outbrain. Se um Usuário Final optar por não ter publicidade
            comportamental através de um Site de Divulgador (ou um
            mecanismo do Divulgador), o Divulgador não poderá passar à
            Outbrain a ID do anunciante do Usuário Final ou outro
            mecanismo de identificação.
    5. TERMOS DA LICENÇA.
         1. Durante o Prazo e sujeita ao cumprimento integral dos termos
            do Contrato pelo Divulgador, a Outbrain concede ao Divulgador
            uma licença limitada, não exclusiva, revogável, não
            sublicenciável e não transferível para exibição da Tecnologia
            e das Recomendações de Conteúdo nos Sites do Divulgador na
            forma e formato fornecidos pela Tecnologia, para uso da
            Tecnologia para mostrar as Recomendações em Sites do
            Divulgador na forma e formato fornecidos. O Divulgador deve
            implementar a Tecnologia de acordo com as instruções técnicas
            da Outbrain, incluindo quaisquer guias de implementação
            disponibilizadas pela Outbrain, que podem ser revisados de
            tempos em tempos mediante notificação da Outbrain. A Outbrain,
            a seu exclusivo critério, pode determinar qual das
            implementações de tecnologia da Outbrain disponíveis (por
            exemplo, JS, API, SDK) devem ser usadas em cada implementação
            do Divulgador (ou seja, o SDK deve ser usado para qualquer
            instalação baseada em aplicativos).
         2. A Outbrain concede ao Divulgador, durante o Prazo, uma licença
            limitada, mundial, não exclusiva e isenta de royalties para
            uso e exibição das marcas, marcas de serviço e logotipos da
            Outbrain (conjuntamente, as “Marcas Outbrain”), conforme
            incorporadas à Tecnologia, estritamente de acordo com as
            obrigações e direitos do Divulgador nos termos deste
            instrumento. Todo fundo de comércio decorrente da utilização,
            pelo Divulgador, de quaisquer das Marcas Outbrain será
            revertido exclusivamente em benefício da Outbrain. A Outbrain
            terá o direito de se referir ao Divulgador e aos Sites do
            Divulgador em qualquer listagem geral de clientes ou parceiros
            (incluindo em materiais de marketing e vendas) que tenham
            implementado a Tecnologia. Não obstante o disposto acima, cada
            parte terá de requerer consentimento prévio escrito antes de
            emitir comunicados à imprensa relativamente a este Contrato ou
            usar o nome da outra parte no seu website de forma não
            prevista neste instrumento.
         3. Conforme estabelecido entre as partes: (a) a Outbrain retém
            todos os direitos, titularidades e participações nas Marcas
            Outbrain, Tecnologia, Dados e Conteúdo mostrados no ou por
            meio da Tecnologia (excluindo qualquer Conteúdo dos Sites do
            Divulgador que seja de propriedade do Divulgador); e (b) o
            Divulgador retém todos os direitos, titularidades e
            participações no(s) Site(s) do Divulgador incluindo o formato
            e a aparência do(s) mesmo(s), excluindo os itens descritos no
            subparágrafo (a) acima, incluindo todos os Direitos de
            Propriedade Intelectual neste instrumento.
         4. As licenças concedidas nos termos deste Contrato são
            especificamente previstas neste instrumento; não existem
            direitos implícitos. Todos os direitos não concedidos
            expressamente ao Divulgador neste Contrato são reservados pela
            Outbrain.
    6. ATIVIDADES PROIBIDAS.
         1. O Divulgador não: (i) editará, modificará, truncará, filtrará
            ou alterará a ordem das Recomendações; (ii) obscurecerá,
            modificará ou redirecionará os usuários do Site do Divulgador
            para outra página que não uma Página de Destino nem
            intercalará nenhum Conteúdo entre a Tecnologia e qualquer
            Página de Destino; (iii) minimizará, removerá ou de outra
            forma inibirá a exibição total e completa da Tecnologia; (iv)
            inflacionará artificialmente os cliques nas Recomendações ou
            Conteúdo Promovido, ou incentivará ou exigirá que qualquer
            pessoa clique em Recomendações ou Conteúdo Promovido
            utilizando incentivos ou outros métodos fraudulentos; (v)
            removerá, deformará, obscurecerá ou alterará nenhuma
            notificação de Direitos de Propriedade Intelectual inclusos na
            Tecnologia; (vi) acessará, reproduzirá ou utilizará a
            Tecnologia de qualquer modo ou para qualquer fim que não
            conforme ao expressamente permitido neste instrumento; (vii)
            modificará, adaptará, traduzirá, preparará trabalhos
            derivativos de, descompilará, aplicará engenharia reversa,
            desarmará ou de outra forma tentará derivar o código fonte da
            Tecnologia, nem tentará criar um serviço ou produto substituto
            ou semelhante por meio da utilização ou do acesso à Tecnologia
            ou a informações exclusivas a eles relacionadas; (viii)
            tentará interferir ou interromper a Tecnologia nem tentará
            obter acesso a nenhum sistema ou rede que se conecte a ele,
            exceto por meio da Tecnologia implementada de acordo com este
            Contrato; (ix) copiará, ocultará, distribuirá, exibirá,
            alterará ou de outra forma utilizará nenhuma Recomendação ou
            Conteúdo Promovido transmitidos por meio da Tecnologia(nem
            autorizará ou auxiliará nenhum terceiro a fazê-lo), exceto
            conforme essas Recomendações e Conteúdo Promovido forem
            fornecidas por meio da Tecnologia; ou (x) usará a Tecnologia
            para qualquer outro fim que não o autorizado pela Outbrain,
            incluindo no que respeita ao API, para qualquer fim que não
            seja consistente com o Guia de Implementação API facultado ao
            Divulgador.
         2. O Divulgador não instalará a Tecnologia em nenhum website que
            mostre conteúdo exclusivo para adultos, obsceno, pornográfico,
            difamatório, calunioso, transgressor, abusivo, ou ilegal, que
            promova o ódio ou a descriminação, facilite a venda de armas
            de fogo ou drogas ilegais, ou que participe ou incentive à
            participação em atividades ilegais ou que seja direcionado a
            menores de 13 anos. A Outbrain se reserva o direito de
            desativar a Tecnologia a seu exclusivo critério em qualquer
            site a qualquer momento.
         3. Exceto quando autorizado expressamente e sem ambiguidades
            neste Contrato, o Divulgador não copiará, alugará, alugará em
            sistema de lease, venderá, transferirá, atribuirá,
            sublicenciará, desarmará, aplicará engenharia reversa ou
            descompilará (exceto na medida expressamente autorizada por
            lei), modificará ou alterará nenhuma parte da Tecnologia, ou
            Dados, ou de outra forma usará a Tecnologia ou Dados em nome
            de ou para benefício de qualquer terceira parte.
    7. REGISTRO. O Divulgador não é obrigado a registrar-se no Site para
       usar a Tecnologia. Se o Divulgador se registrar para usar o Site,
       terá acesso a relatórios online e ao painel da Outbrain, que
       permite ao Divulgador controlar certas configurações da Tecnologia,
       incluindo a funcionalidade de Recomendação. À medida em que o
       Divulgador se registre e tenha acesso ao painel da Outbrain, a
       Outbrain poderá coletar informações de identificação pessoal de tal
       Usuário Final e o Divulgador terá a responsabilidade exclusiva por
       todas as mudanças aplicáveis feitas através do painel da Outbrain
       por esse Usuário Final. As estimativas de receita apresentadas no
       painel da Outbrain são fornecidas apenas para a conveniência do
       Divulgador. A Outbrain não garante que esses valores estimados e
       exibidos durante um determinado mês de calendário sejam precisos ou
       definitivamente devidos a serem pagos ao Divulgador como resultado
       do Contrato. A disponibilização do acesso ao painel da Outbrain
       fica a exclusivo critério da Outbrain e poderá ser encerrada a
       qualquer momento.
    8. SUSPENSÃO DO SERVIÇO; RESCISÃO.
         1. A Outbrain poderá suspender ou interromper todo ou qualquer
            aspecto da Tecnologia, incluindo a sua disponibilidade, a
            qualquer momento, se for exigido por circunstâncias
            imperativas (tais como uma violação significativa de
            segurança, propagação de malware, outros vírus para usuários,
            etc.) ou quaisquer outras circunstâncias impróprias, ilegais
            fraudulentas ou enganosas.
         2. Qualquer uma das partes pode rescindir o Contrato a qualquer
            momento em caso de violação material pela outra parte de
            qualquer disposição do Contrato que permaneça sem remediação
            por quinze (15) dias após o recebimento pela parte violadora
            de aviso por escrito notificando o descumprimento.
         3. O Contrato pode ser rescindido em pré-aviso escrito com trinta
            (30) dias de antecedência, salvo indicação em contrário no
            Formulário de Inscrição do Divulgador. Após o vencimento ou
            encerramento do Contrato, todos os direitos e obrigações das
            partes nos termos do Contrato serão extintos, exceto as
            cláusulas 9.6, 9.7, 10, 11 e 13 dos Termos, as quais
            sobreviverão e continuarão a vincular as partes de acordo com
            seus termos.
    9. GARANTIAS LIMITADAS; INDENIZAÇÃO
         1. Cada parte declara e garante à outra que: (i) possui todo
            direito, poder e autoridade necessários para celebrar este
            Contrato e cumprir suas obrigações nos termos deste
            instrumento; e (ii) cumpre todas as leis, regulamentos, e
            quaisquer exigências aplicáveis no cumprimento deste Contrato.
         2. O Outbrain garante que a Tecnologia, conforme fornecida e
            disponibilizada pela Outbrain e implementada pelo Divulgador
            de acordo com o Contrato, não infringe e não irá infringir, de
            acordo com o melhor conhecimento de Outbrain, qualquer Direito
            de Propriedade Intelectual de qualquer terceiro.
         3. O Divulgador declara e garante que o(s) Site(s) do Divulgador
            não conterá(rão) nenhum conteúdo ilegal ou que (i) seja
            ilegal; (ii) infrinja qualquer Direito de Propriedade
            Intelectual de qualquer terceiro; (iii) contenha qualquer
            material obsceno, difamatório, calunioso, injurioso ou que
            viole o direito de qualquer pessoa à publicidade, privacidade
            ou individualidade; ou (iv) contenha uma falsa declaração de
            fato ou imprecisão factual.
         4. Nada no Contrato deve ser interpretado como uma promessa de
            qualquer tipo de volume de tráfego mínimo, cliques, impressões
            ou uso ou quaisquer outros compromissos desse tipo da Outbrain
            ao Divulgador.
         5. Exceto quando estabelecido expressamente neste instrumento,
            nenhuma das partes faz nenhuma declaração ou garantia expressa
            ou implícita com relação a este contrato, o(s) Site(s) do
            Divulgador, a Tecnologia, qualquer conteúdo disponibilizado
            pela Outbrain através da Tecnologia ou quaisquer outros
            assuntos (incluindo qualquer termo implícito relacionado à
            satisfação de qualidade ou adequação a determinada finalidade,
            quaisquer garantias de disponibilidade ou desempenho
            ininterrupto ou livre de erros, quaisquer garantias que surjam
            no decurso de qualquer desempenho, negociação ou utilização
            comercial).
         6. A Outbrain não faz nenhuma declaração ou garantia no que diz
            respeito aos Dados ou qualquer Conteúdo que consta ou é
            acessado por meio da Tecnologia, incluindo, entre outros,
            Recomendações do Divulgador, e a Outbrain não será responsável
            ou responsabilizada pelos conteúdos, precisão, respeito a
            direitos de propriedade intelectual, legalidade ou decoro do
            Conteúdo acessados por meio da Tecnologia ou pela confiança do
            Divulgador em um dos itens ora mencionados.
         7. Cada parte (a “Parte Indenizadora”) deverá indenizar, defender
            e isentar a outra parte, suas controladoras, afiliadas e cada
            uma de suas respectivas afiliadas, conselheiros, diretores,
            acionistas, membros, representantes autorizados, empregados e
            prepostos (conjuntamente, a “Parte Indenizadora”) de e contra
            todas e quaisquer reivindicações, perdas, responsabilidades,
            danos, custos, acordos e outras despesas (incluindo honorários
            advocatícios razoáveis) (conjuntamente, “Reivindicações”) que
            surjam de qualquer reivindicação por terceiros ocasionada por
            qualquer violação ou suposta violação de qualquer das
            declarações, garantias ou obrigações da Parte Indenizadora
            estabelecidas neste Contrato. A Parte Indenizada deverá
            notificar imediatamente a Parte Indenizadora sobre qualquer
            Reivindicação, estabelecido, contudo, que qualquer atraso na
            entrega dessa notificação não isentará a Parte Indenizadora de
            nenhuma de suas obrigações, salvo na medida em que a Parte
            Indenizadora for de fato prejudicada por esse atraso. A Parte
            Indenizadora terá direito ao controle da defesa e acordo de
            qualquer Reivindicação indenizada, estabelecido que a Parte
            Indenizada terá direito de participar da defesa e acordo da
            Reivindicação com o advogado de sua própria escolha e às suas
            próprias expensas, sujeita ao controle da Parte Indenizadora a
            esse respeito.
   10. CONFIDENCIALIDADE
       Cada parte (a “Parte Receptora”) reconhece que terá acesso a certas
       informações e materiais, incluindo os termos do Contrato, relativos
       ao negócio, tecnologia, produtos e serviços da outra parte (a
       “Parte Divulgadora”) que são, ou razoavelmente devam ser
       consideradas, tendo em conta as circunstâncias da divulgação,
       confidenciais (“Informações Confidenciais”). As Informações
       Confidenciais não incluirão: (a) informações conhecidas da Parte
       Receptora antes da divulgação pela Parte Divulgadora; (b)
       informações obtidas de forma independente pela Parte Receptora sem
       referência a Informações Confidenciais da Parte Divulgadora; (c)
       informações que são ou tornam-se publicamente conhecidas sem culpa
       da Parte Receptora; ou (d) informações divulgadas à Parte Receptora
       por um terceiro sem violação de qualquer obrigação de confiança.
       Exceto conforme permitido a seguir, a Parte Receptora (aa) não
       usará Informações Confidenciais para sua própria conta ou a conta
       de terceiros, e (bb) não divulgará nenhuma Informação Confidencial
       a terceiros que não sejam seus diretores, funcionários,
       contratados, conselheiros, investidores ou potenciais investidores
       que precisam saber de tal Informação Confidencial e que concordaram
       em não usar e manter a confidencialidade das Informações
       Confidenciais consistentes com esta cláusula 10. A Parte Receptora
       retornará ou destruirá as Informações Confidenciais prontamente
       sobre pedido escrito da Parte Divulgadora. Não obstante o acima
       exposto, a Parte Receptora pode divulgar Informações Confidenciais
       na medida exigida por lei aplicável ou por decisão judicial, desde
       que a Parte Receptora forneça aviso prévio de qualquer divulgação
       necessária à Parte Divulgadora e forneça uma cooperação razoável
       (às custas da Parte Divulgadora) com qualquer esforço da Parte
       Divulgadora para contestar ou limitar o alcance dessa divulgação.
   11. LIMITAÇÃO DE RESPONSABILIDADE
        11. Nem Outbrain nem o Divulgador excluem ou limitam a
            responsabilidade do outro por: (i) morte ou ferimento pessoal
            causado por sua negligência ou a de seus empregados ou
            contratados; (ii) fraude ou representação fraudulenta; ou
            (iii) qualquer outra responsabilidade que não possa ser
            legalmente excluída ou limitada.
        12. EXCETO COM RELAÇÃO ÀS OBRIGAÇÕES DE INDENIZAÇÃO DE UMA DAS
            PARTES NESTE INSTRUMENTO, NENHUMA DAS PARTES SERÁ RESPONSÁVEL
            POR NENHUM DANO ESPECIAL, EMERGENTE OU CONSEQUENTE DECORRENTE
            OU COM RELAÇÃO A ESTE CONTRATO OU POR QUALQUER VIOLAÇÃO DESTE
            INSTRUMENTO (INCLUINDO POR PERDAS DE DADOS, LUCROS OU CUSTOS
            DE COBERTURA), TENHA SIDO OU NÃO TAL PARTE AVISADA DA
            POSSIBILIDADE DE TAIS DANOS, E SEJA SOB UMA TEORIA DE
            CONTRATO, ATO ILÍCITO (INCLUINDO NEGLIGÊNCIA), OU DE OUTRA
            FORMA.
        13. EXCETO NO QUE DIZ RESPEITO ÀS OBRIGAÇÕES DE INDENIZAÇÃO NESTE
            INSTRUMENTO OU ÀS RESPONSABILIDADES LEGAIS DE UMA PARTE
            DECORRENTES DA VIOLAÇÃO DE DIREITOS, APROPRIAÇÃO INDEVIDA OU
            INFRAÇÃO DOS DIREITOS DE PROPRIEDADE INTELECTUAL DE UMA PARTE,
            EM HIPÓTESE ALGUMA A RESPONSABILIDADE TOTAL DECORRENTE OU COM
            RELAÇÃO A ESTE CONTRATO OU QUALQUER VIOLAÇÃO DESTE INSTRUMENTO
            (SOB UMA TEORIA DE CONTRATO, ATO ILÍCITO (INCLUINDO
            NEGLIGÊNCIA), GARANTIA, OU DE OUTRA FORMA) POR QUALQUER UMA
            DAS PARTES SERÁ SUPERIOR A R$200.000 OU O MONTANTE DA RECEITA
            BRUTA AJUSTADA PAGA OU PAGÁVEL AO DIVULGADOR NO PERÍODO DE 12
            (DOZE) MESES IMEDIATAMENTE ANTERIOR AO EVENTO QUE MOTIVA A
            RESPONSABILIDADE (OU, NO CASO DE UMA SÉRIE DE EVENTOS
            CONECTADOS, O PRIMEIRO DE TAIS EVENTOS).
   12. CONTROLES DE EXPORTAÇÃO
       O Divulgador irá cumprir todas as leis de exportação e restrições e
       regulamentos do Departamento de Comércio, do Departamento de
       Tesouraria dos Estados Unidos do Escritório de Controle de Ativos
       Estrangeiros ( Department of Commerce, the United States Department
       of Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control - OFAC) ou de outra
       agência ou autoridade dos Estados Unidos ou estrangeiros, e não
       deverá exportar, ou permitir a exportação ou reexportação da
       Tecnologia em violação a tais restrições, leis ou regulamentos. Ao
       fazer o download ou utilizar a Tecnologia, o Divulgador concorda
       com o que precede e declara sob as penas da lei que não está
       localizado, ou sob o controle de, nacional ou residente de qualquer
       país restrito. O Divulgador declara sob as penas da lei que nenhum
       deles, ou qualquer entidade ou organização que detenha qualquer
       participação no Divulgador, incluindo qualquer funcionário ou
       diretor, é um indivíduo, entidade, organização com quem qualquer
       lei, regulamento ou ordem executiva proíba as empresas e os
       indivíduos dos Estados Unidos de negociar, inclusive os nomes que
       aparecem na Lista de Nacionais Especialmente Designados ( Specially
       Designated Nationals List).
   13. DISPOSIÇÕES GERAIS
       Este Contrato será interpretado e regido pelas leis da República
       Federativa do Brasil, sem considerar as disposições de conflito de
       leis ou as Convenções das Nações Unidas para a Venda Internacional
       de Mercadorias. As partes elegem o Foro Central da Comarca da
       Capital do Estado de São Paulo para a resolução de quaisquer
       controvérsias decorrentes deste Contrato, excluindo quaisquer
       outros. As partes concordam que dano irreparável poderia ocorrer em
       caso de descumprimento ou violação de qualquer das disposições do
       Contrato. Por conseguinte, as partes concordam que cada um terá
       direito a uma medida cautelar para evitar violações do Contrato e
       para fazer cumprir especificamente os termos e disposições do
       Contrato, além de qualquer outro remédio para o qual tenham
       direito. As partes são contratadas independentes, e nenhuma
       disposição neste Contrato será interpretada de forma a criar uma
       parceria, joint venture, agenciamento ou outra relação entre as
       partes. A omissão de uma das Partes em fazer valer, a qualquer
       tempo, quaisquer disposições deste instrumento, ou de pleitear
       quaisquer direitos ou exercer qualquer opção prevista, não deverá
       ser considerada como uma renúncia a tais disposições, direitos ou
       opções, nem afetará de nenhuma maneira a validade deste Contrato ou
       de qualquer disposição do mesmo. Nenhuma das partes será
       responsável por qualquer falha em realizar devido a causas além do
       controle razoável da mesma parte. Este Contrato constitui o acordo
       integral entre as partes com relação a seu objeto e cancela e
       substitui todos os acordos ou entendimentos anteriores ou
       contemporâneos, escritos ou verbais com relação a esse objeto. O
       Contrato de Distribuição para Divulgador pode ser alterado,
       modificado ou substituído, apenas por um instrumento escrito
       assinado por ambas as partes. Os títulos neste instrumento e no
       Contrato são apenas para fins de conveniência de referência e não
       têm nenhum efeito legal. Este Contrato poderá ser celebrado e
       entregue por meio de transmissão eletrônica ou outro meio de
       reprodução completa e precisa, e as cópias do Contrato entregues
       por esses meios serão consideradas originais para todos os fins.
       Este Contrato poderá ser celebrado em vias, cada uma das quais será
       considerada um original, porém todas juntas constituirão um único e
       mesmo instrumento. Todas as disposições do Contrato que, por sua
       natureza, deveriam sobreviver à rescisão, sobreviverão à rescisão,
       incluindo, sem limitação, provisões de propriedade, indenizações de
       garantia e limitações de responsabilidade. Caso qualquer disposição
       deste Contrato seja considerada inexequível por qualquer motivo,
       essa disposição será reformada apenas na medida em que necessário
       para torná-la exequível, caso contrário, ela será separada do
       Contrato e o restante do Contrato continuará em vigor e a produzir
       efeitos. Nenhuma das partes pode ceder o Contrato ou qualquer dos
       seus direitos ou obrigações de acordo sem o consentimento prévio e
       por escrito da outra parte, exceto (i) devido à operação de lei,
       fusão, reorganização ou como resultado de uma aquisição ou mudança
       de controle, ou (ii) pela Outbrain às suas subsidiárias. Sujeito ao
       acima exposto, o Contrato será vinculativo e operante para o
       benefício das partes e seus sucessores e cessionários que sejam
       permitidos.

3rd Party Targeting Terms

Version 9.1

Effective January 23, 2018

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   By accepting these terms you agree that:
     * You and/or the company you represent ("Customer") has requested
       third party segments for enhanced targeting (“3rd Party Targeting”)
       of its Outbrain Amplify campaign(s). You are authorized to act on
       behalf of and bind Customer.
     * Customer shall pay the per-click fee for the 3rd Party Targeting
       (generally ranging between $0.05 and $0.95 per click), based on the
       price of a particular segment set by the 3rd party data provider
       (“3rd Party Data Costs”) for use of the 3rd Party Targeting on
       Customer's Amplify campaign(s), including any applicable taxes.
     * Customer’s invoice for each campaign shall include both the
       Outbrain Fees, pursuant to Amplify Terms (or Customer's customized
       terms), plus the 3rd Party Data Costs for utilizing 3rd Party
       Targeting. Outbrain shall pay the 3rd Party Data provider on
       Customer’s behalf.
     * Customer agrees that all clicks for the purposes of calculating 3rd
       Party Data costs will be based on Outbrain’s reporting metrics.

Impressum & Nutzungsbedingungen

Version 1.2

Effective September 3, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   aktualisiert: August 2012
   Impressum
   https://www.outbrain.com/de/ wird angeboten von
   Outbrain UK Limited
   5th Floor, The Place
   175 High Holborn
   London
   WC1V 7AA
   United Kingdom
   Register-Nummer
   7479183 (London)
   Ust-IdNr. (VAT): GB115005961
   Vertretungsberechtigter (Geschäftsführer)
   / Authorized Representative (Managing Director):
   Yaron Galai
   Anschrift des Vertretungsberechtigten:
   100 New Oxford Street
   London WC1A 1HB
   UK
   Kontakt:
   infouk@outbrain.com
   © Outbrain UK Limited 2017
   Allgemeine Nutzungsbedingungen
   1. EINLEITUNG.
   Die folgenden Nutzungsbedingungen (diese „Nutzungsbedingungen“) regeln
   Ihre (im Folgenden Sie, Ihr, Benutzer) Benutzung der Produkte, Dienste
   und Leistungen, die über die Website mit der URL www.outbrain.com (die
   „Website“) zur Verfügung gestellt werden. Diese Website wurde und wird
   von Outbrain Inc. („Outbrain“) erstellt, kontrolliert und betrieben.
   Wie weiter unten näher beschrieben, enthält die Website Outbrains
   firmeneigene und geschützte Empfehlungstechnologie in ihren diversen
   Ausformungen (insgesamt der „Service“). Der Service kann auf der
   Website oder auf Ihrer Website bzw. denen Ihrer Partner mittels eines
   Programmcodes genutzt werden, den wir Ihnen in seiner jeweils aktuellen
   Form zur Verfügung stellen (ein solcher Benutzer wird im Folgenden als
   „Partner“ bezeichnet) und den Sie gemäß vorliegenden
   Nutzungsbedingungen verwenden dürfen. Indem Sie auf diese Website gehen
   oder einen beliebigen Teil des Services nutzen, erklären Sie Ihr
   Einverständnis damit, dass diese Nutzungsbedingungen für Sie
   verbindlich sind. Wenn Sie mit diesen Nutzungsbedingungen nicht
   einverstanden sind, dann dürfen Sie nicht auf die Website zugreifen
   oder den Service nutzen. Ihr Recht zur Benutzung der Website und des
   Services ist ausdrücklich an Ihre Zustimmung zu allen Regelungen aus
   vorliegenden Nutzungsbedingungen gebunden und schließt jegliche
   sonstigen Regelungen aus. Dieser Service steht nur Personen im Alter
   von mindestens 18 Jahren zur Verfügung, egal ob sie im eigenen Namen
   oder als bevollmächtigte Angestellte oder Vertreter eines Unternehmens
   oder einer anders gearteten geschäftlichen Einheit handeln. Wenn Sie
   diese Voraussetzung nicht erfüllen, dann versuchen Sie bitte nicht,
   sich für die Nutzung des Services zu registrieren.
   2. ÄNDERUNGEN DER NUTZUNGSBEDINGUNGEN.
   Outbrain behält sich das Recht vor, diese Nutzungsbedingungen jederzeit
   nach alleinigem Ermessen zu verändern oder durch andere zu ersetzen.
   Sie sollten diese Nutzungsbedingungen von Zeit zu Zeit wieder aufrufen
   und durchsehen, denn Sie sind alleinverantwortlich für die
   Kenntnisnahme und Berücksichtigung eventueller Änderungen. Die Nutzung
   des Services durch Sie bringt gemäß vorliegender Mitteilung Ihr
   Einverständnis mit den jeweils modifizierten Nutzungsbedingungen zum
   Ausdruck. Dies gilt auch dann, wenn Sie sich bereits zuvor für die
   Nutzung des Services für Ihre Website registriert hatten und diese
   Website fortgesetzt nicht erneut besuchen.
   3. BESCHREIBUNG DES SERVICES.
   Der Service liefert Ihnen Empfehlungen („Empfehlungen“) für neue
   Artikel, Grafiken, Fotografien, Bilder, Illustrationen und Software
   sowie Audio- und Videoclips („Content“). Manche Empfehlungen können
   Content betreffen, für den wir gegen Bezahlung seitens unserer Kunden
   werben („Promoteter Content“). Diese Empfehlungen generieren Einnahmen
   („Werbeeinnahmen“) für die Websites solcher Kunden, die Outbrain nach
   alleinigem Ermessen dafür auswählt. Wenn Sie den Service nutzen, ohne
   sich auf der Website zu registrieren, wird diese Empfehlungs-Funktion
   automatisch als Teil des Services zur Verfügung gestellt. Wenn Sie sich
   auf der Website registrieren, können Sie die Einstellungen für die
   Empfehlungs-Funktion festlegen, so wie auf Outbrains Dashboard und
   weiter unten in Abschnitt 6 beschrieben.
   4. LIZENZ FÜR DEN SERVICE VON OUTBRAIN.
   A. LIZENZGEWÄHRUNG. Unter der Voraussetzung Ihrer uneingeschränkten
   Zustimmung zu allen Klauseln und Bedingungen aus diesen
   Nutzungsbedingungen gewährt Ihnen Outbrain eine begrenzte,
   nicht-exklusive, widerrufbare, nicht unterlizenzierbare und nicht
   übertragbare Lizenz zur Nutzung (i) des Services; (ii) sämtlicher
   Programmierschnittstellen der Anwendung oder anderer Programmcodes, die
   wir jeweils zum gegebenen Zeitpunkt seitens Outbrains zur Verfügung
   stellen (zusammengefasst das „Programm“); (iii) jeglicher Dokumentation
   Outbrains für Endanwender, wenn diese mit dem Service einhergeht; (iv)
   sämtlicher Upgrades, Aktualisierungen und neuer Versionen des Services,
   so wie weiter unten ausgeführt. Eine solche Lizenz umfasst das Recht
   zur Nutzung sämtlicher Schutz- und Urheberrechte Outbrains, die mit der
   Verwendung des Programms in Verbindung stehen oder mit anderen Aspekten
   einhergehen, die mit dem Service zusammenhängen. Ebenso umfasst sie die
   Benutzung der Schutz- und Urheberrechte für die Dokumentation Outbrains
   für Endanwender, doch ausschließlich in Verbindung mit der in den FAQ
   erläuterten Nutzung des Services.
   B. BERECHTIGUNG ZUR VERGABE VON UNTERLIZENZEN. In Anknüpfung an
   obenstehenden Abschnitt 4.A. sind Sie dazu berechtigt, (i) Berater und
   Auftragnehmer unter Vertrag zu nehmen, die dem alleinigen Zweck dienen,
   für die Benutzung des Services und des Programms durch Sie die
   notwendige Entwicklungsarbeit, Herstellung von Komponenten und
   Durchführung von Testaufgaben für Sie zu leisten sowie den Support der
   Anwendung für Sie zu übernehmen; (ii) Ihren Endanwendern gemäß den
   Regelungen aus untenstehendem Abschnitt 4.H. Unterlizenzen zu gewähren.
   Ausgenommen wie in Abschnitt 4.B. vorgesehen, sind Sie nicht dazu
   berechtigt, irgendwelche der Ihnen von diesen Nutzungsbedingungen
   zugestandenen Rechte an Berater, Auftragnehmer oder sonstige Dritte
   unterzulizenzieren.
   C. LIZENZBESCHRÄNKUNGEN. Sie dürfen das Programm nicht in Verbindung
   mit oder zum Bewerben von Produkten, Leistungen, Diensten oder Material
   verwenden die in einen der folgenden Bereiche fallen, dafür werben oder
   vorwiegend dafür verwendet werden, um in diesen Bereichen tätig zu
   sein: Spyware, Adware oder sonstige Schadprogramme, gefälschte Waren
   und Produkte, einem U.S.-Embargo unterliegende Produkte,
   unaufgeforderte und massive Verbreitung von E-Mails („Spam“),
   Multi-Level-Marketingangebote, hetzerisches Material, Material für das
   Hacking oder die Überwachung von Systemen, das Abfangen von Daten oder
   das Entschlüsseln von Codes, beleidigende, diffamierende, obszöne,
   pornografische, mit sexuellem Missbrauch in Verbindung stehende oder
   sonst wie anstößige Inhalte, Prostitution, Körperteile, Organe oder
   Körperflüssigkeiten, gestohlene Produkte und Gegenstände, die für
   Diebstahl und Raub verwendet werden, Feuerwerkskörper, Sprengstoff,
   Gefahrenstoffe, Ausweispapiere, Gegenstände für den polizeilichen
   Gebrauch, Glücksspiel, im Rahmen staatlicher Lizenzierungen regulierte
   Bereiche, Waffen und Waffenzubehör. Sie müssen den Service fristgerecht
   gemäß allen vertretbaren Anweisungen zur Anwendung bringen, die
   Outbrain Ihnen zum gegebenen Zeitpunkt vorgibt.
   D. PLATZIERUNG, OPTIK UND HAPTIK DES SERVICE. Sie werden den Service
   direkt unterhalb der Hauptinhalte auf allen Seiten Ihrer Website
   platzieren, auf denen der Service installiert ist. Kein anderer Service
   zur Content-Empfehlung darf parallel zu oder über Outbrains Service auf
   den Seiten Ihrer Website erscheinen, auf denen der Service installiert
   ist. Zudem müssen Sie den Service so zur Anwendung bringen, dass sein
   Aussehen und der erweckte Eindruck nicht zu Verwechslungen mit
   ähnlichen Content-Empfehlungsdiensten anderer Anbieter auf Ihrer
   Website führen kann.
   E. WEITERE EINSCHRÄNKUNGEN. Sofern in diesen Nutzungsbedingungen nicht
   ausdrücklich und eindeutig gestattet, sind Sie zu Folgendem nicht
   befugt: (i) Kopieren, Vermieten, Leasen, Verkaufen, Übertragen,
   Übereignen, Unterlizenzieren, Zerlegen, Rückentwickeln oder
   Dekompilieren (ausgenommen in dem begrenzten Maße, das vom anwendbaren
   Gesetzesrecht ausdrücklich zugelassen wird), Modifizieren oder
   Manipulieren von Teilen von (a) gemeinschaftlich erhobenen Daten und
   den zugehörigen Berichten (zusammengefasst „Daten“), die Outbrain Ihnen
   in verschiedenen Formaten zur Verfügung stellen kann, oder des (b)
   Programms; (ii) zur Benutzung des Programms oder des Services im
   Auftrag Dritter. Ausgenommen wie weiter unten in Abschnitt 4.G.
   dargelegt, geben Ihnen diese Nutzungsbedingungen keinerlei Anrecht auf
   die Benutzung von Markenzeichen, Dienstleistungsmarken, Handelsnamen
   oder andere markenrechtlich geschützte Elemente Outbrains oder anderer
   Lizenzgeber. Außer den ausdrücklich hier festgelegten Rechten und
   Lizenzen werden keine sonstigen Rechte und Lizenzen gewährt. Wenn Sie
   gegen eine der vorgenannten Einschränkungen verstoßen, ist Outbrain der
   Eigentümer aller Rechte, Ansprüche und Anteile, die mit jeglichen/m
   abgeleiteten Werken, Erfindungen und Entwicklungen, Werken mit
   Autorenrechten, Designs, Know-how, Ideen und Informationen in
   Verbindung stehen, die ganz oder teilweise mit der Nutzung des Services
   oder des Programms entstanden sind bzw. erworben, in die Praxis
   umgesetzt oder entwickelt wurden. Sie erklären sich hiermit dazu
   bereit, alle notwendigen Anweisungen zu geben, um die Erfüllung der
   vorgenannten, eigentumsrechtlichen Bedingungen zu gewährleisten.
   F. NEUE VERSIONEN UND UPGRADES. Outbrain kann Aktualisierungen,
   Upgrades und neue Versionen des Services oder des Programms
   herausbringen. Gleiches gilt für mit dem Service in Verbindung stehende
   Software. Die Einführung erfolgt jeweils gemäß den Anleitungen in den
   FAQ. Sie stimmen zu, dass jeglicher Zugriff auf oder Zugang zu
   Software, der Ihnen im Rahmen dieser Nutzungsbedingungen gewährt wird,
   nicht Outbrains Recht einschränkt, solcherlei Software in künftigen
   Versionen des Services zu verändern oder zu ersetzen. Die Ihnen hier
   gewährte Lizenz beinhaltet solcherlei Elemente.
   G. MARKENRECHTLICHE LIZENZ. Outbrain gewährt Ihnen hiermit eine
   persönliche, begrenzte, nicht-exklusive, nicht übertragbare und
   kostenpflichtige Lizenz zur Benutzung der Marken Outbrains (wie weiter
   unten in Abschnitt 18 definiert). Sie können Outbrains Marken in
   Verbindung mit Ihrer Nutzung des Programms, der Daten oder des Services
   auf jeder Ihrer Websites oder den Websites Ihrer Partner nutzen, über
   die Teile des Services abgewickelt werden. Sie können jederzeit und
   ohne Outbrains zusätzliche Genehmigung Blog-Beiträge in Ihrem Blog oder
   denen Ihrer Partner veröffentlichen, bei denen Outbrains Marken
   verwendet werden. Dies jedoch unter der Voraussetzung, dass Sie
   vernünftig vertretbare Anstrengungen unternehmen, Outbrain die
   Blog-Beiträge vor ihrer Veröffentlichung oder zeitgleich mit ihr
   zuzusenden. Nichts in vorliegender Vereinbarung gewährt Ihnen
   Eigentumsrechte oder sonstige Rechte bezüglich des Gebrauchs der Marken
   Outbrains, die nicht ausdrücklich aus vorliegender Lizenzgewährung
   hervorgehen. Unter keinerlei Umständen dürfen Sie die Marken Outbrains
   in Verruf bringen oder auf andere Art missbrauchen. Ebenso dürfen Sie
   unter keinen Umständen gegen die Verhaltensregeln für Benutzer
   verstoßen, die weiter unten in Abschnitt 5 dargelegt werden. Die Ihnen
   im Rahmen vorliegender Lizenzgewährung gewährten Rechte erlöschen mit
   vorliegenden Nutzungsbedingungen. Sollten diese gekündigt oder außer
   Kraft gesetzt werden, stellen Sie die Nutzung der Marken Outbrains ein.
   H. KEINE SONSTIGEN LIZENZEN. Alle im Rahmen dieser Vereinbarung
   gewährten Lizenzen sind ausdrücklich hier erwähnt. Es werden keine
   sonstigen Lizenzen oder Rechte eingeräumt, weder stillschweigend noch
   durch Rechtsverwirkung.
   I. ENDBENUTZER-LIZENZEN. Sie erklären sich damit einverstanden, dass
   jede Ihrer Websites und/oder jedes Ihrer Softwareprodukte, für die oder
   mit denen die in vorliegender Vereinbarung gewährten Rechte genutzt
   werden, allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen enthalten muss, die Folgendes
   sicherstellen: (i) Der Service, die Daten und das Programm müssen
   mindestens gleichwertig geschützt sein, wie Ihre firmeneigenen
   Softwareanwendungen, und (ii) solcherlei firmeneigene
   Softwareanwendungen Outbrains sind durch die Nutzungsbedingungen Ihrer
   Website ebenfalls geschützt. Darüber hinaus muss die
   Datenschutzrichtlinie der betreffenden Website und/oder der
   betreffenden Softwareprodukte erklären, dass die Daten zu einer dritten
   Partei geroutet werden, die der Eigentümer der betreffenden Daten ist,
   dass dieses Routing jedoch keinerlei die Person identifizierende
   Informationen enthält. Sie erklären sich damit einverstanden, dass Sie
   in solcherlei allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen für die Nutzung des
   Services außerhalb der Vereinigten Staaten jegliche erforderlichen,
   landesspezifischen Regelungen aufnehmen werden, die notwendig sind, um
   die vorgenannten Regelungen wirksam zu machen. Sie erklären sich
   weiterhin damit einverstanden, dass Sie die allgemeinen
   Geschäftsbedingungen für die unter dieser Lizenz gewährte Nutzung des
   Services, der Daten und des Programms auch durchsetzen werden.
   5. VERHALTENSREGELN FÜR BENUTZER.
   Als Bedingung für die Benutzung verpflichten Sie sich dazu, den Service
   oder die Daten zu keinerlei ungesetzlichen, zu von diesen
   Nutzungsbedingungen ausgeschlossenen oder solchen Zwecken zu verwenden,
   die von Outbrain nach vernünftigem Ermessen nicht beabsichtigt sind.
   Hier ohne Anspruch auf Vollständigkeit einige Beispiele für Nutzungen,
   von denen Sie gemäß dieser Vereinbarung Abstand nehmen:
     * Missbrauch, Belästigung, Bedrohung, Vortäuschung einer fremden
       Indetität oder Einschüchterung anderer Benutzer von Outbrain oder
       von Content-Anbietern;
     * auf in irgendeiner Form verletzende, beleidigende, diffamierende,
       obszöne, pornografische, missbräuchliche, anstößige oder auf andere
       Art die Gesetze oder die Rechte Dritter verletzende Art und Weise;
     * für illegale oder unerlaubte Zwecke. Sie versichern, dass Sie alle
       vor Ort geltenden Gesetze hinsichtlich des Verhaltens im Internet
       und zulässiger Inhalte beachten werden;
     * zum Posten oder zur Weitergabe von Mitteilungen oder
       Aufforderungen, die dazu bestimmt oder entwickelt sind, Passwörter
       bzw. Kontoinformation oder private Angaben von Outbrain-Benutzern
       zu beschaffen. Ebenso sind Handlungen zu unterlassen, die das
       Posten oder die Weitergabe solcher Mitteilungen veranlassen;
     * das Erstellen oder Versenden von Spam an andere Outbrain-Benutzer
       oder URLs;
     * gesetzliche Vorschriften in Ihrer Gerichtsbarkeit zu verletzen
       (darunter zum Beispiel auch Gesetze zum Urheberrechtsschutz);
     * das Einsenden von Texten oder Kommentaren, die zu Partnerprogrammen
       verlinken, zu Angeboten im Bereich Multi-Level-Marketing,
       Websites/Blogs zur Wiederverwertung von Content und Geschichten
       (sogenannte Source-Hops) oder zu nicht zum Thema gehörenden
       Inhalten;
     * der Zugang zur Website unter Verwendung von Robotersystemen,
       Webcrawlern, Scrapern oder anderen automatisierten Funktionen,
       ausgenommen dies wurde ausdrücklich und schriftlich genehmigt;
     * solche Tätigkeiten ausführen, die nach unserem alleinigen
       Dafürhalten eine unangemessene und überdimensional große Belastung
       für die Infrastruktur des Services bedeuten oder bedeuten könnten;
     * das einwandfreie Funktionieren der Website oder anderer Funktionen
       und über die Website abgewickelter Aktivitäten beeinträchtigen oder
       zu beeinträchtigen versuchen;
     * das Umgehen jeglicher Art von Maßnahmen, mit deren Hilfe wir den
       Zugang zur Website verhindern oder einschränken;
     * Handlungen mit der Absicht, die Empfehlungen oder sonstige Dienste
       Outbrains künstlich zu verändern oder zu manipulieren. Dazu zählt
       etwa auch das Einrichten mehrerer Benutzerkonten, um die Dienste
       Outbrains künstlich zu verfälschen, das vorsätzliche Aufblähen von
       Klick-Zahlen oder Empfehlungen zu promotetem Content sowie die
       Beteiligung an jeglicher sonstigen Art von organisierten
       Bemühungen, die darauf abzielen, die Ergebnisse und Funktionsweise
       des Services zu verfälschen.

   Den folgenden Websites ist die Benutzung des Services streng verboten
   und Outbrain wird die Benutzung des Services durch solche Sites aktiv
   unterbinden, von denen das Unternehmen der Ansicht ist, dass sie gegen
   dieses Verbot verstoßen: Websites, die nur für Erwachsene bestimmte,
   obszöne, pornografische, beleidigende, verletzende, zum Missbrauch
   auffordernde oder diffamierende Inhalte zeigen oder daran beteiligt
   sind. Gleiches gilt für solche Websites, die illegale Aktivitäten
   fördern oder begünstigen, zu Hass und Diskriminierung aufrufen oder
   diese fördern sowie dem Verkauf von Feuerwaffen oder illegalen Drogen
   dienen oder diesen Verkauf fördern. Zusätzlich behält sich Outbrain das
   Recht vor, den Service auf jeglicher Site im alleinigen Ermessen zu
   deaktivieren.
   Outbrain kann jederzeit nach alleinigem Ermessen und aus beliebigen
   Gründen Content von der Website entfernen (darunter unter anderem etwa
   auf Beschwerden hin oder bei Einwänden Dritter oder von Behörden
   hinsichtlich solcher Inhalte). Wenn Sie Verstöße gegen diese
   Nutzungsbedingungen melden möchten, wenden Sie sich bitte per E-Mail an
   abuse@outbrain.com.
   6. REGISTRIERUNG.
   Zur Nutzung des Services ist es nicht notwendig, dass Sie sich auf der
   Website registrieren. Diese Nutzungsbedingungen sind für Sie jedoch
   auch dann verbindlich, wenn Sie sich nicht registrieren und den Service
   in Anspruch nehmen und nutzen. Wenn Sie sich auf der Website
   registrieren, haben Sie Zugang zu Online-Berichten und zum
   Outbrain-Dashboard, welches Ihnen die Kontrolle über eine Reihe von
   Einstellungen des Services ermöglicht. Um sich zu registrieren, müssen
   Sie bestimmte Angaben machen. Wenn Sie Blogger sind, müssen Sie zudem
   eine gültige Blog-URL angeben. Wenn Sie Partner sind, müssen Sie
   zusätzliche Kontaktangaben machen, darunter unter anderem auch Namen,
   Anschrift und eine gültige E-Mail-Adresse und weitere Kontaktangaben.
   Bevor Sie Ihre Registrierung abschließen, senden wir Ihnen an Ihre
   E-Mail-Adresse einen Link, den Sie anklicken müssen, um Ihr
   Outbrain-Konto zu aktivieren.
   7. PROMOTETER CONTENT.
   Durch Ihre Registrierung auf der Website haben Sie die Möglichkeit, das
   Outbrain-Dashboard zu benutzen und darüber neben weiteren Einstellungen
   diejenigen für die Empfehlungs-Funktion festzulegen. Wenn Sie die
   Option wählen, promoteten Content zuzulassen, können Sie zudem eine
   gemeinnützige Einrichtung oder Organisation wählen (aus einer Liste im
   Outbrain-Dashboard), der ein Teil Ihrer Einnahmen aus Werbung auf Ihrer
   Website und durch die Nutzung des Services zukommen soll. Outbrain
   zahlt nur dann einen Anteil an Werbeeinnahmen an Partner, wenn eine
   schriftliche, von vorliegenden Nutzungsbedingungen getrennte
   Einverständniserklärung Outbrains vorliegt.
   8. EIGENTUMSRECHTE.
   Sämtliche Rechte an, Ansprüche auf und Beteiligungen an der Website,
   dem Service, Zusammenstellungen, digitalen Speicherungen bzw.
   Umwandlungen, Software und sonstigem mit dem Service in Verbindung
   stehendem Material sind und bleiben stets exklusives Eigentum Outbrains
   und stehen unter dem Schutz der anwendbaren Gesetze und Abkommen zum
   geistigen Eigentum und Urheberrecht. Sämtliche im Zusammenhang mit der
   Website stehenden oder durch den Service über jede beliebige Website
   erhobenen Daten sind stets alleiniges Eigentum Outbrains. Sie nehmen
   zur Kenntnis, dass Sie keinerlei Eigentumsrechte am Service oder den
   über den Service gewonnenen und vermittelten Daten erwerben.
   Outbrain behält sich sämtliche Rechte vor, die Ihnen im Rahmen
   vorliegender Nutzungsbedingungen nicht ausdrücklich gewährt werden.
   9. EINGESANDTER UND ÜBER DEN SERVICE VERFÜGBAR GEMACHTER CONTENT.
   Eingeschränkte Lizenz zur Nutzung von Content. Wenn Sie Partner sind
   und Content einsenden, gewähren Sie Outbrain hiermit ein beschränktes,
   nicht-exklusives, in voller Höhe beglichenes, lizenzfreies und
   weltweites Recht zur Nutzung besagten Contents sowie Ihrer
   registrierten und nicht registrierten Markenzeichen,
   Dienstleistungsmarken, Handelsaufmachungen, Grafiken oder Logos
   („Partner-Marken“) für alle folgenden Bereiche: (i) auf der Website
   sowie in sämtlichen Blogs und Newslettern Outbrains; (ii) im Rahmen
   jeder Geschäftsentwicklung, in Verkaufsmaterialien oder
   Pressemitteilungen; (iii) als beliebiger Bestandteil des Services; (iv)
   in jeder sonstigen, vernünftig vertretbaren Art und Weise, von der ein
   Partner ausgehen kann, dass Outbrain die Partner-Marken entsprechend
   verwendet.
   10. GEWÄHRLEISTUNGSAUSSCHLUSS.
   Sie bestätigen, dass Outbrain über Folgendes keinerlei Kontrolle hat
   und hinsichtlich folgender Aspekte in keiner Weise tätig werden muss:
   welche Benutzer auf den Service zugreifen; welche Auswirkungen der
   Service für Sie, Ihre Website oder Ihre Geräte und Systeme haben kann;
   die Richtigkeit des Services oder der Daten bzw. wie Sie diese
   interpretieren, sich auf sie verlassen oder diese verwenden. Dazu
   gehören zum Beispiel auch ein eventueller Ansehensverlust oder
   Rückgänge bei den Besucherzahlen Ihrer Website oder irgendwelcher
   Websites Ihrer Partner; Handlungen und Maßnahmen, die Sie in Folge
   Ihrer Nutzung des Services tätigen oder ergreifen. Sie bestätigen
   darüber hinaus und stimmen zu, dass Outbrain weder direkt oder indirekt
   verantwortlich oder haftbar ist für Schäden oder Verluste, die faktisch
   oder vorgeblich im Zusammenhang stehen mit der Benutzung von oder der
   Berücksichtigung von Content, Gütern oder Leistungen, die auf solchen
   Websites Dritter zugänglich sind, die mit dem Service verlinkt sind
   oder auf die über den Service oder über mit dem Service in Zusammenhang
   stehenden Daten hingewiesen wird. Sie stellen Outbrain von jeglicher
   Haftung hinsichtlich des Services sowie jeglicher Inhalte oder Daten
   frei, die über den Service oder die Website verfügbar gemacht werden
   oder zugänglich sind. Die Website kann Informationen oder Content
   enthalten, die von manchen Personen als beleidigend, anstößig oder
   unangebracht empfunden werden können, bzw. die Website kann zu Websites
   weiterleiten, die solcherlei Informationen oder Content enthalten.
   Outbrain enthält sich jeglicher Stellungnahme zu Daten oder Content,
   die über den Service oder die Website zugänglich oder in/auf ihnen
   erhältlich sind, darunter unter anderem auch promoteter Content.
   Outbrain ist weder verantwortlich noch haftbar für die Inhalte, ihre
   Richtigkeit, urheberrechtliche Gesetzmäßigkeit, Legalität oder
   Schicklichkeit des Contents Dritter oder der Dienste und Leistungen,
   die über den Service oder die Website zugänglich sind. Ebenso ist
   Outbrain nicht verantwortlich oder haftbar, wenn Sie sich auf solchen
   Content verlassen. DER SERVICE, DAS PROGRAMM UND DIE DATEN WERDEN IHNEN
   „IN VORLIEGENDER FORM“ ZUR VERFÜGUNG GESTELLT, OHNE JEGLICHE
   GEWÄHRLEISTUNG AUSGENOMMEN DERJENIGEN, DASS OUTBRAIN GEWÄHRLEISTET, IM
   BESITZ ALLER NOTWENDIGEN RECHTE, ANRECHTE UND BETEILIGUNGEN
   HINSICHTLICH SERVICE, WEBSITE UND PROGRAMM ZU SEIN, UM IHNEN DIE RECHTE
   UND LIZENZEN ZU GEWÄHREN, DIE GEGENSTAND VORLIEGENDER
   NUTZUNGSBEDINGUNGEN SIND. WENN IN VORLIEGENDER VEREINBARUNG NICHT
   ANDERSLAUTEND FESTGELEGT UND IM GESETZLICH ZULÄSSIGEN MASSE ÜBERNEHMEN
   OUTBRAIN UND SEINE VERTRETER KEINERLEI AUSDRÜCKLICHE, STILLSCHWEIGENDE
   ODER GESETZLICHE GEWÄHRLEISTUNGEN HINSICHTLICH DES SERVICES, DES
   PROGRAMMS ODER DER DATEN. DIESER GEWÄHRLEISTUNGSAUSSCHLUSS BETRIFFT
   UNTER ANDEREM AUCH ALLE IMPLIZITEN GEWÄHRLEISTUNGEN HINSICHTLICH
   MARKTGÄNGIGKEIT, RICHTIGKEIT, NUTZUNGSERGEBNISSEN, VERLÄSSLICHKEIT,
   EIGNUNG FÜR BESTIMMTE ZWECKE, BESITZANSPRÜCHEN, BEEINTRÄCHTIGUNGEN DER
   UNGESTÖRTEN NUTZUNG UND NICHTVERLETZUNG DER RECHTE DRITTER. OUTBRAIN
   ÜBERNIMMT KEINE GEWÄHRLEISTUNG DAFÜR, DASS IHRE NUTZUNG DES SERVICE,
   DES CODES ODER DER DATEN STETS UNUNTERBROCHEN UND FEHLERFREI SEIN WIRD.
   EINIGE STAATEN GESTATTEN DIE EINSCHRÄNKUNG DES ZEITRAUMS FÜR
   STILLSCHWEIGENDE GARANTIEN NICHT, SO DASS DIE OBENSTEHENDEN
   EINSCHRÄNKUNGEN EVENTUELL NICHT AUF SIE ZUTREFFEN.
   11. HAFTUNGSBESCHRÄNKUNG.
   UNABHÄNGIG DAVON, OB ANDERE HIER FESTGELEGTE RECHTSMITTEL IHREN ZWECK
   VERFEHLEN ODER OB ANDERE UNVORHERGESEHENE FÄLLE EINTRETEN, UND
   AUSGENOMMEN IM FALL VON KÖRPERVERLETZUNG, SIND OUTBRAIN ODER SEINE
   VERTRETER IHNEN ODER DRITTEN GEGENÜBER UNTER KEINEN UMSTÄNDEN IM RAHMEN
   VON SCHADENSERSATZRECHT ODER VERTRAGSANGELEGENHEITEN, WEGEN
   FAHRLÄSSIGKEIT ODER GEFÄHRDUNGSHAFTUNG ODER UNTER SONSTIGEN
   RECHTSTHEORETISCHEN BZW. VERGLEICHBAREN KONZEPTEN HAFTBAR FÜR (I)
   GEWINNEINBUSSEN, DATENVERLUST ODER BESCHÄDIGUNG VON DATEN,
   COMPUTERAUSFÄLLE ODER FUNKTIONSSTÖRUNGEN VON COMPUTERN, UNTERBRECHUNGEN
   DER GESCHÄFTSTÄTIGKEIT ODER ANDERE SPEZIFISCHE ODER INDIREKTE NEBEN-
   ODER FOLGESCHÄDEN JEDWEDER ART, DIE SICH AUS DER NUTZUNG ODER
   NICHTVERFÜGBARKEIT DER WEBSITE, DES SERVICES ODER DER DATEN ERGEBEN.
   DAS GILT AUCH DANN, WENN OUTBRAIN ÜBER DIE MÖGLICHKEIT INFORMIERT
   WURDE, DASS SOLCHE VERLUSTE ODER SCHÄDEN ENTSTEHEN KÖNNEN, UND ES GILT
   UNABHÄNGIG DAVON, OB SOLCHE VERLUSTE ODER SCHÄDEN VORHERSEHBAR WAREN,
   ODER (II) FÜR JEGLICHE ART VON DIREKTEN SCHÄDEN IM WERT VON MEHR ALS
   (ZUSAMMENGEFASST) 1.000 $. FORDERUNGEN IM ZUSAMMENHANG MIT DIESEN
   NUTZUNGSBEDINGUNGEN MÜSSEN VOR ABLAUF EINES (1) JAHRES NACH DEM MOMENT
   ERFOLGEN, IN DEM DER ENTSPRECHENDE VORFALL STATTGEFUNDEN HAT. OUTBRAIN
   ÜBERNIMMT KEINE HAFTUNG FÜR VERTRETER OUTBRAINS EGAL WELCHER ART.
   MANCHE STAATEN ERLAUBEN KEINEN HAFTUNGSAUSSCHLUSS FÜR NEBENSCHÄDEN ODER
   FOLGESCHÄDEN. IN DIESEM FALL KOMMEN DIE ENTSPRECHENDEN DER
   OBENSTEHENDEN HAFTUNGSAUSSCHLÜSSE NICHT ZUR ANWENDUNG.
   SIE HABEN VERSTANDEN UND STIMMEN ZU, DASS IHR EINZIGES RECHT GEGENÜBER
   UND GEGEN OUTBRAIN DARIN BESTEHT, DIE NUTZUNG DES SERVICES ZU BEENDEN.
   12. SCHADLOSHALTUNG.
   Sie erklären sich damit einverstanden, Outbrain, seine
   Dachgesellschaften, Filialen, Partner, Kunden und Verkäufer sowie die
   jeweiligen Führungskräfte, Geschäftsführer und Angestellten gegen jede
   Art von Haftung, Schäden, Kosten oder Gebühren (darunter auch
   Anwaltskosten) schadlos zu halten, die sich folgendermaßen ergeben
   können: (i) Ansprüche oder Forderungen Dritter, die sich aus Ihrem
   Zugriff auf und Zugang zur Website ergeben; (ii) durch Ihre Nutzung des
   Services, des Programms oder der Daten sowie einen durch Sie begangenen
   Verstoß gegen die Nutzungsbedingungen; (iii) durch einen durch Sie oder
   Dritte begangenen Verstoß bei der Benutzung Ihres Outbrain-Kontos,
   einen Verstoß gegen Urheberrechte oder andere Rechte von Personen oder
   Rechtspersonen. Dies gilt allerdings unter der Voraussetzung, dass Sie
   nicht versucht haben, einen solchen Verstoß durch die Anwendung von
   Outbrains Datenschutzrichtlinie zu berichtigen und abzustellen, so wie
   in Abschnitt 19 weiter unten beschrieben.
   13. GELTUNGSDAUER UND BEENDIGUNG.
   Die Geltungsdauer der Nutzungsbedingungen und das Ende dieser
   Geltungsdauer werden in diesem Abschnitt festgelegt. Outbrain kann
   Benutzerkonten nach alleinigem Ermessen jederzeit, aus jedem beliebigen
   Grund oder auch ohne Grund und ohne Vorankündigung stornieren oder
   kündigen, ohne dass Ihnen daraus ein Haftungsanspruch erwächst. Mit der
   Kündigung Ihres Kontos erlöschen augenblicklich Ihre Nutzungsrechte für
   den Service. Wenn diese Nutzungsbedingungen aus beliebigem Grund
   gekündigt oder außer Kraft gesetzt werden, müssen Sie sämtliche Kopien
   des Services und des Programms sowie alle Daten umgehend von allen
   Ihren Computern und Festplatten, aus Ihren Netzwerken und von allen
   sonstigen Speichermedien löschen. Auf Wunsch Outbrains müssen Sie
   Outbrain bestätigen, dass dies erfolgt ist. Wenn Sie Ihr Konto bei
   Outbrain kündigen wollen, können Sie einfach die Nutzung des Services
   einstellen. All diejenigen Regelungen aus vorliegenden
   Nutzungsbedingungen, die ob ihres Inhalts über die Kündigung/Beendigung
   der Vereinbarung hinaus Bestand haben müssen, haben über die Beendigung
   der Vereinbarung hinaus uneingeschränkt Bestand. Dazu gehören unter
   anderem sämtliche Eigentumsregelungen, Haftungsausschlüsse,
   Schadloshaltungsklauseln und Haftungsbeschränkungen.
   14. BENUTZUNG DURCH REGIERUNG UND BEHÖRDEN.
   Wenn Sie einer Behörde, Abteilung oder Einrichtung der Regierung der
   Vereinigten Staaten („Regierung“) angehören, ist das Kopieren,
   Reproduzieren, Veröffentlichen, Modifizieren, Weitergeben oder
   Übertragen des Services bei zivilen Behörden entsprechend den Federal
   Acquisition Regulations eingeschränkt, und bei militärischen
   Einrichtungen und Behörden gemäß dem Defense Federal Acquisition
   Regulation Supplement. Der Service und die Daten sind jedes für sich
   „Handelsartikel“, „gewerbliche Computersoftware“ und „Dokumentation zu
   gewerblicher Computersoftware“. In Übereinstimmung mit diesen
   Regelungen richtet sich die Verwendung solcher Artikel durch die
   Regierung ausnahmslos nach diesen Nutzungsbedingungen.
   15. EXPORTKONTROLLEN.
   Sie müssen sämtliche für den Export maßgeblichen Gesetze und
   Beschränkungen sowie die Vorschriften des Department of Commerce
   (Handelsministerium), des United States Department of Treasury Office
   of Foreign Assets Control („OFAC“) oder sonstiger Behörden der
   Vereinigten Staaten bzw. anderer Länder befolgen und einhalten. Sie
   dürfen den Service nicht unter Verstoß gegen irgendeine/s solcher
   Handelsbeschränkungen, Gesetze oder Vorschriften exportieren oder
   seinen Export zulassen. Durch das Herunterladen oder die Nutzung des
   Services oder von Daten stimmen Sie dem Vorangehenden zu, und darüber
   hinaus erklären und gewährleisten Sie, dass Sie nicht in einem Land
   ansässig sind oder unter dessen Kontrolle stehen, das Beschränkungen
   irgendwelcher Art unterliegt, und dass Sie kein Bürger oder Bewohner
   eines solchen Landes sind.
   16. VERSCHIEDENES.
   Diese Nutzungsbedingungen sind den Vertragsgegenstand betreffend die
   vollständige und ungeteilte Vereinbarung zwischen Ihnen und Outbrain.
   Sie ersetzen jegliche schriftlichen und mündlichen Vereinbarungen
   hinsichtlich des Vertragsgegenstands. Im Rahmen dieser
   Nutzungsvereinbarung wird keinerlei Filiale, Partnerschaft, Joint
   Venture oder Angestelltenverhältnis begründet und Sie haben keinerlei
   Vollmachten oder Zuständigkeiten irgendwelcher Art, die Outbrain zu
   irgendetwas verpflichten könnten. Diese Nutzungsbedingungen und
   jegliche Streitfälle, die daraus oder hinsichtlich ihrer Auslegung
   erwachsen können, sind gemäß den Gesetzen des Bundesstaats New York zu
   entscheiden und zu interpretieren, so wie diese Gesetze bei Verträgen
   und Vereinbarungen zwischen Anwohnern New Yorks zur Anwendung kommen,
   die dort ihren Gerichtsstand haben. Kollisionsrechtlich bleiben dabei
   Konflikte mit anderen Gesetzen und Gerichtsbarkeiten unberücksichtigt
   und auch die Regelungen aus dem UN-Kaufrecht (United Nations
   Conventions for the International Sale of Goods) bleiben
   unberücksichtigt. Ausgenommen Outbrain legt an anderer Stelle
   Abweichendes fest, sind sämtliche Klagen oder Verfahren, die sich aus
   oder im Zusammenhang mit dieser Vereinbarung ergeben, bei einem
   Bundesgericht im Southern District of New York oder einem
   bundesstaatlichen Gericht in New York County, New York, vorzubringen.
   Beide Parteien unterstellen sich für Klagen, Verfahren und gerichtliche
   oder rechtliche Schritte jedweder Art unwiderruflich der
   Gerichtsbarkeit und dem Gerichtsstand der genannten Gerichte. Bei
   rechtlichen oder gerichtlichen Auseinandersetzungen im Zusammenhang mit
   dieser Vereinbarung hat die obsiegende Partei das Recht auf Erstattung
   der Anwaltshonorare und Kosten. Diese Nutzungsbedingungen können nur
   schriftlich und durch Outbrain verändert werden. Sollte eine Regelung
   aus vorliegender Vereinbarung sich aus beliebigem Grund als
   undurchsetzbar erweisen, so wird diese Regelung nur in dem Maße
   abgeändert, das notwendig ist, um sie durchsetzbar zu machen. Wenn
   Outbrain bei einem durch Sie oder Dritte begangenen Verstoß gegen diese
   Nutzungsbedingungen nicht tätig wird, so impliziert dies keinen
   Verzicht auf den betreffenden Anspruch und schränkt in keiner Weise
   Outbrains Rechte ein, die sich aus einem solchen Verstoß oder
   eventuellen neuen Verstößen ergeben. Diese Nutzungsbedingungen gelten
   für Sie persönlich und können aus keinerlei Gründen abgetreten oder
   übertragen werden (unter anderem auch nicht wegen, durch oder bei
   Abtretung kraft Gesetz, Fusionen, Unternehmenssanierungen, in Folge
   einer Geschäftsübernahme oder wegen eines Sie betreffenden
   Führungswechsels), es sei denn, Outbrain habe dies vorab schriftlich
   genehmigt. Jegliche Handlungen oder Verhaltensweisen, die
   Voranstehendem zuwiderhandeln, gelten als ungültig und bleiben
   unwirksam. Outbrain behält sich ausdrücklich das Recht vor, die
   vorliegenden Nutzungsbedingungen abzutreten und seine sich aus ihnen
   ergebenden Verpflichtungen zu übertragen.
   17. DATENSCHUTZRICHTLINIE OUTBRAIN.
   Outbrains geltende Datenschutzrichtlinie ist verfügbar unter
   https://www.outbrain.com/legal/privacy, und Sie gilt kraft vorliegender
   Erwähnung als in vorliegende Vereinbarung aufgenommen.
   18. HANDELSMARKEN.
   OUTBRAIN und Outbrains sonstige Marken, Grafiken, Logos, Designs,
   Seitenköpfe, Buttons-Icons, Scripts und Bezeichnungen von Diensten und
   Leistungen umfassen registrierte und nicht-registrierte Handelsmarken,
   Dienstleistungsmarken und Handelsaufmachungen Outbrains in den USA
   und/oder anderen Ländern („Outbrains Marken“). Sonstige Handelsmarken,
   Dienstleistungsmarken und Handelsnamen, die im Service verwendet
   werden, sind Eigentum ihrer jeweiligen Eigentümer. Sie erklären sich
   damit einverstanden, Outbrains Marken ohne Outbrains vorherige
   schriftliche Genehmigung nicht wiederzugeben oder in anderer Art und
   Weise zu verwenden. Ein Partner darf jedoch über seine Benutzung des
   Services jederzeit bloggen, ohne dafür eine solche Genehmigung zu
   benötigen, sofern der Partner den Blog-Eintrag Outbrain vorab oder im
   Moment der Veröffentlichung zukommen lässt.
   19. URHEBERRECHTLICHE BESCHWERDEN.
   Wir respektieren die Urheberrechte anderer und erwarten dasselbe von
   denjenigen, die den Service nutzen. Wenn Sie der Meinung sind, dass
   Ihre urheberrechtlich geschützte Arbeit auf eine Art und Weise kopiert
   oder wiedergegeben wurde, die eine Urheberrechtsverletzung darstellt,
   dann informieren Sie darüber bitte Outbrains weiter unten aufgeführten,
   gemäß Digital Millennium Copyright Act, 17 U.S.C. Section 512(c)(2)
   benannten Urheberrechts-Beauftragten und machen Sie dabei die folgenden
   Angaben:
     * die Unterschrift der Person, die ermächtigt ist, im Namen des
       Urheberrechtsinhabers zu handeln;
     * eine Beschreibung der urheberrechtlich geschützten Arbeit, von der
       Sie behaupten, Ihre Rechte seien verletzt worden;
     * eine Beschreibung, wo im Service das Ihrer Ansicht nach das
       Urheberrecht verletzende Material zu finden ist;
     * Ihre Anschrift, Telefonnummer und E-Mail-Adresse;
     * eine Erklärung Ihrerseits, dass Sie nach Treu und Glauben der
       Ansicht sind, dass die beanstandete Verwendung nicht vom Inhaber
       der Urheberrechte genehmigt wurde, die entsprechende Begründung
       oder das zugrundeliegende Gesetz;
     * eine eidesstattliche Erklärung Ihrerseits, dass die oben genannten,
       Ihre Eingabe begleitenden Angaben korrekt sind und dass Sie der
       Eigentümer der Urheberrechte oder dazu befugt sind, im Namen des
       Eigentümers der Urheberrechte zu handeln.

   Copyright-Beauftragter:
   Outbrain Inc., c/o legal counsel, 39 West 13th Street, New York, New
   York 10011, USA; legal@outbrain.com
   FRAGEN UND ANMERKUNGEN
   Mit Fragen oder Anmerkungen zum oder Problemen mit dem Service wenden
   Sie sich bitte an den Website-Administrator unter admin@outbrain.com.

Outbrain Terms of Use

Version 1.3

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   Welcome to Outbrain’s Terms of Use (the “Terms”). These Terms govern
   your (hereafter “ you”, “your” or “user ”) use of this website and the
   products and services available at this website, www.outbrain.com, and
   any related website linked to this URL address, including pages related
   to Outbrain’s Engage and Amplify services (collectively the “ Site”)
   and/or created, controlled or operated by Outbrain Inc. (hereafter
   “Outbrain ”, “we” “us ” or “our”). The Site features Outbrain's
   proprietary recommendation technology in its various forms and other
   services Outbrain may make available from time to time (collectively,
   the “Service"). By accessing the Site or using any part of the Service,
   you agree to be bound by these Terms. If you do not agree to these
   Terms, then you may not access the Site or use the Service.
   1. General Use.
   Subject to these Terms, Outbrain hereby grants you a limited,
   non-exclusive, and non-transferable license to use the Site. You can
   simply visit and use the Site and you do not need to register with
   Outbrain to do so. We reserve the right to modify these Terms at any
   time. By continuing to access or use the Site or Service, you agree to
   such modifications.
   2. Intellectual Property, Digital Millennium Copyright Act (DMCA) and
   Takedown Notice.
   2.1 Intellectual Property Ownership and Use. You acknowledge and agree
   that all of our trademarks, logos, copyrights, and all other
   intellectual property rights in all material or content contained
   within the Site shall remain at all times vested in us. You may not
   modify, edit, copy, reproduce, create derivative works of, reverse
   engineer, alter, enhance or in any way exploit any of the Site or its
   materials in any manner. In cases where we use material or content
   under authority from a third party, such rights remain vested in the
   owner of such material or content. All Site content and all materials
   contained within the Site are owned by Outbrain or used by Outbrain
   under authorization, and are protected by applicable trademark and
   copyright laws.
   2.2. DMCA. If you believe that your work has been copied and posted on
   the Site or through Outbrain’s Service in a way that constitutes
   copyright infringement, please provide us with the following
   information:
   (a) an electronic or physical signature of the person authorized to act
   on behalf of the owner of the copyright interest;
   (b) a description of the copyrighted work that you claim has been
   infringed;
   (c) a description of where the material that you claim is infringing is
   located on the Site or in our Service;
   (d) your address, telephone number, and email address;
   (e) a written statement by you that you have a good faith belief that
   the disputed use is not authorized by the copyright owner, its agent,
   or the law; and
   (f) a statement by you, made under penalty of perjury, that the above
   information in your notice is accurate and that you are the copyright
   owner or authorized to act on the copyright owner's behalf.
   Please send all of the above information to:
   By e-mail: dmca@outbrain.com
   By mail: Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, New York, NY 10011; ATTN:
   DMCA Agent and Legal Department
   If you do not send us all of the required information, your
   notice/request may not be valid.
   2.3. If you believe any of your other intellectual property rights,
   have been violated, please follow the same information and a takedown
   request sent to: ipviolations@outbrain.com.
   2.4 Notice and Takedown. Outbrain does not control the content on its
   network however, we require our advertisers to comply with our
   Advertiser Guidelines. Despite various safeguards, Outbrain recognises
   that from time to time advertiser content may be in breach of relevant
   copyright laws, contain references which may be regarded as defamatory,
   promote fake news and/or contain fraudulent or misleading information
   or links. If you have identified content of this nature, please email
   ipviolations@outbrain.com with the following information (i) your
   contact details (ii) the full details of the material in question (iii)
   the URL where you found the material and; (iv) the reason for your
   request e.g. complaint about defamatory content. Upon receipt of your
   notification, Outbrain will comply with the following Notice and
   Takedown procedure: (a) Outbrain will endeavour to acknowledge receipt
   of your complain by email and within 48 hours of receipt. (b) Following
   confirmation of receipt, Outbrain will commence an investigation to
   access the validity and plausibility of the complaint. If Outbrain
   determines that the initial complain may be valid pending further
   investigation, Outbrain may temporarily suspend or remove a particular
   campaign from its network. (c) Outbrain may contact the relevant
   advertiser who is responsible for the content, it relevant. If Outbrain
   does so, the advertiser will be notified that their content is subject
   to a complaint, under what grounds and will be encouraged to address
   the complaints concerned. If relevant, the complaint and the advertiser
   will be encouraged to resolve the issue swiftly and amicably and to the
   satisfaction of both parties. (d) Following the finalization of
   Outbrain's investigation, Outbrain may: - allow the advertiser to
   continue to display the content unchanged; or - allow the advertiser to
   continue to display the content with changes; or - permanently remove
   the content from its network permanently and usually within 48 hours of
   Outbrain determining this is the appropriate course of action.
   3. Privacy and Cookie Policy; Other Terms.
   Your use of the Site or Service is also governed by Outbrain’s Privacy
   Policy. By using the Site or Service, you agree to the terms set forth
   in that policy. Your use of Outbrain’s Engage or Amplify services will
   further be subject to other terms specific to those services.
   In addition, we may use cookies or other automated means of data
   collection. Please read our Privacy Policy and Cookie Glossary for more
   information.
   4. Disclaimer of Warranties and Limitation of Liability.
   OUTBRAIN EXPRESSLY DISCLAIMS ANY AND ALL LIABILITY IN CONNECTION WITH
   THE SITE. EXCEPT FOR BODILY INJURY, IN NO EVENT WILL OUTBRAIN OR ITS
   AGENTS BE LIABLE TO YOU OR TO ANY THIRD PARTY UNDER ANY TORT, CONTRACT,
   NEGLIGENCE, STRICT LIABILITY OR OTHER LEGAL OR EQUITABLE THEORY (I) FOR
   ANY LOST PROFITS, LOST OR CORRUPTED DATA, COMPUTER FAILURE OR
   MALFUNCTION, INTERRUPTION OF BUSINESS, OR OTHER SPECIAL, INDIRECT,
   INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES OF ANY KIND ARISING OUT OF THE USE
   OR INABILITY TO USE THE SITE, THE SERVICE, AND THE DATA, WHETHER OR NOT
   SUCH LOSS OR DAMAGES ARE FORESEEABLE; (II) ANY UNAUTHORIZED ACCESS TO
   OR USE OF THE SITES; OR (III) FOR ANY DIRECT DAMAGES IN EXCESS OF (IN
   THE AGGREGATE) $1,000. ANY CLAIM ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THESE
   TERMS MUST BE BROUGHT WITHIN ONE (1) YEAR AFTER THE OCCURRENCE OF THE
   EVENT GIVING RISE TO SUCH CLAIM. OUTBRAIN DISCLAIMS ALL LIABILITY OF
   ANY KIND OF OUTBRAIN'S AGENTS. SOME STATES DO NOT ALLOW THE EXCLUSION
   OR LIMITATION OF INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES, SO THE ABOVE
   LIMITATIONS AND EXCLUSIONS MAY NOT APPLY TO YOU. YOU UNDERSTAND AND
   AGREE THAT YOUR SOLE RIGHT AND REMEDY AGAINST OUTBRAIN IS TO
   DISCONTINUE USE OF THE SITE.
   5. Indemnity.
   You agree to indemnify, defend and hold harmless Outbrain, its parents,
   subsidiaries, affiliates, customers and vendors, and their respective
   officers, directors and employees from any liability, damage, cost, or
   fees (including reasonable attorneys' fees) arising from: (i) any claim
   or demand made by any third party due to or arising out of your access
   to the Site; (ii) your use of the Service or Site, and/or violation of
   the Terms; (iii) or the infringement by you, or any third party using
   your Outbrain account, of any intellectual property or other right of
   any person or entity.
   6. Governing Law.
   6.1. These Terms shall be governed by and construed in accordance with
   the laws of the State of New York in the United States, without regard
   to its choice of law provisions. You agree to submit to personal
   jurisdiction in the State of New York and further agree that any cause
   of action arising from or relating to the use of the Site or these
   Terms shall be brought exclusively in the Federal or State Courts
   residing in New York, New York.
   To the fullest extent of the law, you agree that any claim or cause of
   action arising from or relating to use of the Site or these Terms must
   be filed within one (1) year after such claim or cause of action arose,
   or be forever barred.
   6.2. Und er California Civil Code Section 1789.3, residents of
   California who use the Site are entitled to know that they may file
   grievances and complaints with: Complaint Assistance Unit of the
   Division of Consumer Services of the California Department of Consumer
   Affairs, in writing at 400 R Street, Suite 1080, Sacramento, California
   95814, or by telephone at (916) 445-1254 or (800) 952-5210, or by email
   at dca@dca.ca.gov.
   7. Termination.
   Outbrain, in its sole discretion, may terminate or suspend use of the
   Sites at any time for any reason or for no reason at all, without prior
   notice or liability to you. All provisions of these Terms which by
   their nature should survive termination shall survive termination,
   including, without limitation, ownership provisions, warranty
   disclaimers, indemnity, and limitations of liability.
   8. Miscellaneous.
   8.1. We are not responsible for the availability of any websites,
   applications, or other offerings owned or controlled by third-parties.
   We do not endorse and are not responsible or liable for, directly or
   indirectly, the operation of such third-party websites, their privacy
   practices and/or the content (including misrepresentative or defamatory
   content), including (without limitation) any advertising, products, or
   other materials or services on or available from such websites or
   resources; nor for any damage, loss, or offense caused or alleged to be
   caused by, or in connection with, the use of or reliance on any such
   content, goods, or services available on such third-party external
   sites or resources.
   8.2 When using the Site, you agree to comply with all laws in your
   jurisdiction (including but not limited to copyright laws) and not use
   the Site for any purpose that is unlawful or prohibited by these Terms.
   By way of example, you shall not: (i) post or transmit any
   communication or solicitation intended to obtain password, account, or
   private information from any Outbrain user; (ii) create or submit spam
   to any Outbrain users or any URL; (iii) use any robot, spider, scraper
   or other automated means to access the Site for any purpose without our
   express written permission; (iv) interfere or attempt to interfere with
   the proper working of the Site or any activities conducted on the Site
   or Service; and (v) bypass any measures we may use to prevent or
   restrict access to the Site.
   8.3. If any part of these Terms shall be deemed unlawful, void, or for
   any reason unenforceable, then that provision shall be deemed to be
   severable from these Terms and shall not affect the validity and
   enforceability of any of the remaining provisions of the Terms.
   9. Electronic Communications.
   Please send any questions or concerns regarding these Terms to
   legal@outbrain.com . By communicating with us electronically you
   acknowledge that communications by email are not considered
   confidential.

LiveRamp Terms

Version 1.0

Effective November 26, 2018

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   By accepting these terms you agree that:
     * You and/or the company you represent ("Customer") has opted to use
       certain services provided by LiveRamp Inc. (the " LiveRamp
       Services") via the Outbrain dashboard. Pursuant to Customer's use
       of the LiveRamp Services, the customer may use the LiveRamp Quick
       Onboard API Service ("Quick Onboard Services") which allows a
       Customer to upload personal data associated with a particular
       audience ("Customer Data") into the Outbrain dashboard to be passed
       on to LiveRamp by Outbrain. You are authorized to act on behalf of
       the bind Customer.
     * Customer acknowledges and agrees that:
          + Customer is prohibited from the further resale or providing
            access to third parties of the LiveRamp Services;
          + Customer is prohibited from sending the following data to
            LiveRamp pursuant to the LiveRamp Services including (i) a
            government issued identification number (ii) a financial or
            customer account number, including financial institution or
            bank account number or a credit or debit card number; (iii)
            information regarding an individual’s sexual orientation,
            religion, or health or medical condition (iv) unique biometric
            data or digital representation of biometric data; (v) an
            individual’s full date of birth; (vi) maiden name of the
            individual's mother; (vii) individual's digitized or other
            electronic signature; (viii) a user name, email address or
            other unique electronic identifier or routing code, which is
            sent in combination with a personal identification code,
            password, or security question and answer that would permit
            access to an online account, (ix) any data associated with an
            individual’s status as a person under the age of eighteen, or
            (x) any information that would permit Client to uniquely
            re-identify (a) specific individuals, (b) specific households
            or (c) groups smaller than 25 individuals or values. If
            Customer does transfer any of the aforementioned data,
            Customer shall promptly notify Outbrain in writing.
          + LiveRamp is the intended third party beneficiary with respect
            to the Customer Data and accordingly has the right to enforce
            its term (Insert link to terms) directly against Customer. ;
            and
          + Customer may only use the Quick Onboard Services for the
            purposes of ad targeting, suppression and measures on the
            Customer’s platform and no other purposes.In order for the
            Customer to use the LiveRamp Services, LiveRamp requires that
            the Customer grant Outbrain a non-exclusive, recoverable,
            sub-licensable license to Outbrain to (a) access, download and
            receive Customer Data (b) store, reproduce, modify and use
            Customer Data in connection with the LiveRamp Services. Any
            Customer Data received by Outbrain, and passed by Outbrain to
            LiveRamp, will be encrypted so that Outbrain will not be able
            to identify the Customer Data once uploaded by the Customer
            via the dashboard. Customer represents, warrants and
            undertakes that it has (a) all necessary consents, licenses
            and/or authority to grant Outbrain the aforementioned license
            in respect of the Customer Data and; (b) has the appropriate
            lawful basis and/or consents to allow Outbrain and LiveRamp to
            access and/or use such Customer Data.

     * In order for the Customer to use the LiveRamp Services, LiveRamp
       requires that the Customer grant Outbrain a non-exclusive,
       recoverable, sub-licensable license to Outbrain to (a) access,
       download and receive Customer Data (b) store, reproduce, modify and
       use Customer Data in connection with the LiveRamp Services. Any
       Customer Data received by Outbrain, and passed by Outbrain to
       LiveRamp, will be encrypted so that Outbrain will not be able to
       identify the Customer Data once uploaded by the Customer via the
       dashboard. Customer represents, warrants and undertakes that it has
       (a) all necessary consents, licenses and/or authority to grant
       Outbrain the aforementioned license in respect of the Customer Data
       and; (b) has the appropriate lawful basis and/or consents to allow
       Outbrain and LiveRamp to access and/or use such Customer Data.
     * The Customer provides such Customer Data to Outbrain at its own
       risk and shall indemnify, keep indemnified and hold harmless
       Outbrain in respect of any loss and/or damage which arises as a
       result of the Customer’s breach of the terms set out herein and/or
       in respect of any third party claim (whether by an individual,
       government authority or otherwise) which arises pursuant to the
       Customer’s use of the LiveRamp Services via the Outbrain dashboard.
     * Outbrain has the right, by providing at least 10 business days
       written notice and at its own expense, to audit the Customer’s
       compliance with these terms.

Outbrain Health Segment

Version 1.0

Effective December 12, 2018

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   Outbrain:
     * Health/Aging
     * Health/Allergies
     * Health/Beauty
     * Health/Cold_and_Flu
     * Health/Dentistry
     * Health/Fitness
     * Health/Nutrition
     * Health/Weight_Loss
     * Health/Womens_Health
     * Health/Men's Health

   Currently Outbrain also utilizes Crossix segments. (more information on
   Crossix available via their website: https://www.crossix.com/)

Gambling Terms (United States)

Version 1.1

Effective January 8, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   Gambling Content (United States)
   “Acceptable Gambling Content” means: (i) Content related to sports
   betting or casino gaming; (ii) Content providing sports betting or
   casino gaming related tutorials, information, or tips; and (iii))
   online fantasy sports Content.
   Customer acknowledges and agrees that:
   1) Customer has and will maintain the necessary and valid gambling
   license or authorization which permits Customer to operate its business
   and promote the Acceptable Gambling Content in the states or countries
   in which Customer operates and runs Acceptable Gambling Content(the
   “Gambling License”). Customer shall provide a copy of its Gambling
   License or other materials necessary for Outbrain to evaluate
   Customer’s ability to market with Outbrain, prior to running
   campaign(s) relating to Acceptable Gambling Content. Outbrain may
   refuse Acceptable Gambling Content for any reason, including if it is
   not satisfied of the validity of the Gambling License provided by the
   Customer; and
   2) the Customer represents and warrants that it is not currently
   subject to any consent decree, regulatory investigation, or other legal
   action relating to the legality of Customer’s services and/or
   practices, and that its Gambling License will remain valid for the
   duration of its campaign(s) and all other agreements entered into
   between Outbrain and Customer relating to Acceptable Gambling Content;
   and
   3) During the term of any campaign(s) relating to Acceptable Gambling
   Content, Customer must notify Outbrain of any a) expiration,
   revocation, change in status, or other actual or threatened invalidity
   of Customer’s Gambling License, or b) regulatory or government
   investigation, or legislative or legal action relating to the current
   or future legality of Customer’s business and/or practices or Content.
   Upon notification of any of the preceding events, Outbrain shall be
   permitted to immediately terminate or suspend any such active
   campaign(s) and immediately taken down any Content. In the event of
   such termination, Customer will remain responsible for all fees due
   pursuant to the agreement governing its campaign(s)and
   4) Customer shall only provide Outbrain with Acceptable Gambling
   Content. Customer shall not promote or provide or make available
   Content that a) is false or misleading, including, without limitation,
   the advertising of overstated, inaccurate, or unrepresentative odds,
   prizes, or winnings; c) depicts minors or anyone appearing to be under
   21; d) contains any other content which is likely to be determined as
   sensitive or controversial gambling content; and
   5) all Acceptable Gambling Content provided by the Customer shall
   comply with all applicable laws, regulations, and industry guidelines;
   and
   6) it shall at all times display responsible gambling information on
   its online properties including the properties to which the Acceptable
   Gambling Content links to; and
   7) Outbrain reserves the right in its sole discretion to remove any
   Acceptable Gambling Content for any reason.
   8) Approval of Content or administration of any campaign or Insertion
   Order by Outbrain does not warrant compliance with any law, regulation,
   industry guideline, or these terms. Customer shall remain fully
   responsible at all times for its Content and campaign, including with
   respect to any geographic, age, or demographic targeting.
   9) Customer shall defend, indemnify and hold harmless Outbrain and its
   respective agents, affiliates, subsidiaries, directors, officers,
   employees, contractors, and Network partners (as applicable) against
   any and all third party claims arising from or relating to Customer’s
   business or the nature of its gaming services; Customer’s Content or
   Campaign, including without limitation the delivery of Content in
   violation of applicable laws or regulations; or the breach or alleged
   breach of any of these terms.

Gambling Terms (United Kingdom Only)

Version 1.0

Effective January 7, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   Gambling Content (United Kingdom Only)
   “Acceptable Gambling Content” means: (i) Content related to sports
   betting; (ii) lottery related Content; (iii) Content providing gambling
   related tutorials and tips; (iv) gambling related Content such as odds
   and tips; and (iv) online fantasy sports Content.
   Customer acknowledges and agrees that:
   1) the validity of this Insertion Order is conditional on the Customer
   having and maintaining the necessary and valid gambling licence which
   permits Customer to operate its business and promote the Acceptable
   Gambling Content in accordance with this Insertion Order (and more
   particularly regarding targeting UK) (the “Gambling Licence”). Customer
   shall provide a copy of its Gambling Licence prior to signing an
   Outbrain insertion order relating to Acceptable Gambling Content.
   Outbrain may refuse to sign any insertion order relating to Acceptable
   Gambling Content if it is not satisfied of the validity of the Gambling
   Licence provided by the Customer; and
   2) the Customer is solely responsible for ensuring that its Gambling
   Licence remains valid for the duration of this Insertion Order and all
   other insertion orders entered into between Outbrain and Customer
   relating to Acceptable Gambling Content; and
   3) Customer shall only provide Outbrain with Acceptable Gambling
   Content. Customer shall not promote or provide or make available
   Content related to “free bets” or “free money”, content related to
   fixed odds betting terminals or any other Content which is likely to be
   classed as sensitive or controversial gambling content; and
   4) all Acceptable Gambling Content provided by the Customer shall
   comply with all applicable laws and regulations (including without
   limitation the CAP code and the Gambling Commission’s National Gambling
   Industry Code for Socially Responsible Advertising); and
   5) it shall at all times display responsible gambling information on
   its online properties including the properties to which the Acceptable
   Gambling Content links to; and
   6) Outbrain reserves the right in its sole discretion to remove any
   Acceptable Gambling Content for any reason.

LiveRamp Terms

Version 1.0

Effective January 7, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   LiveRamp Terms
     * You and/or the company you represent ("Customer") has opted to use
       certain services provided by LiveRamp Inc. (the " LiveRamp Services
       ") via the Outbrain dashboard. Pursuant to Customer's use of the
       LiveRamp Services, the customer may use the LiveRamp Quick Onboard
       API Service ("Quick Onboard Services") which allows a Customer to
       upload personal data associated with a particular audience
       ("Customer Data") into the Outbrain dashboard to be passed on to
       LiveRamp by Outbrain. You are authorized to act on behalf of the
       bind Customer.
     * Customer acknowledges and agrees that:
          + Customer is prohibited from the further resale or providing
            access to third parties of the LiveRamp Services;
          + Customer is prohibited from sending the following data to
            LiveRamp pursuant to the LiveRamp Services including (i) a
            government issued identification number (ii) a financial or
            customer account number, including financial institution or
            bank account number or a credit or debit card number; (iii)
            information regarding an individual’s sexual orientation,
            religion, or health or medical condition (iv) unique biometric
            data or digital representation of biometric data; (v) an
            individual’s full date of birth; (vi) maiden name of the
            individual's mother; (vii) individual's digitized or other
            electronic signature; (viii) a user name, email address or
            other unique electronic identifier or routing code, which is
            sent in combination with a personal identification code,
            password, or security question and answer that would permit
            access to an online account, (ix) any data associated with an
            individual’s status as a person under the age of eighteen, or
            (x) any information that would permit Client to uniquely
            re-identify (a) specific individuals, (b) specific households
            or (c) groups smaller than 25 individuals or values. If
            Customer does transfer any of the aforementioned data,
            Customer shall promptly notify Outbrain in writing.
          + LiveRamp is the intended third party beneficiary with respect
            to the Customer Data and accordingly has the right to enforce
            these terms directly against Customer; and
          + Customer may only use the Quick Onboard Services for the
            purposes of ad targeting, suppression and measures on the
            Customer’s platform and no other purposes.In order for the
            Customer to use the LiveRamp Services, LiveRamp requires that
            the Customer grant Outbrain a non-exclusive, recoverable,
            sub-licensable license to Outbrain to (a) access, download and
            receive Customer Data (b) store, reproduce, modify and use
            Customer Data in connection with the LiveRamp Services. Any
            Customer Data received by Outbrain, and passed by Outbrain to
            LiveRamp, will be encrypted so that Outbrain will not be able
            to identify the Customer Data once uploaded by the Customer
            via the dashboard. Customer represents, warrants and
            undertakes that it has (a) all necessary consents, licenses
            and/or authority to grant Outbrain the aforementioned license
            in respect of the Customer Data and; (b) has the appropriate
            lawful basis and/or consents to allow Outbrain and LiveRamp to
            access and/or use such Customer Data.

     * In order for the Customer to use the LiveRamp Services, LiveRamp
       requires that the Customer grant Outbrain a non-exclusive,
       recoverable, sub-licensable license to Outbrain to (a) access,
       download and receive Customer Data (b) store, reproduce, modify and
       use Customer Data in connection with the LiveRamp Services. Any
       Customer Data received by Outbrain, and passed by Outbrain to
       LiveRamp, will be encrypted so that Outbrain will not be able to
       identify the Customer Data once uploaded by the Customer via the
       dashboard. Customer represents, warrants and undertakes that it has
       (a) all necessary consents, licenses and/or authority to grant
       Outbrain the aforementioned license in respect of the Customer Data
       and; (b) has the appropriate lawful basis and/or consents to allow
       Outbrain and LiveRamp to access and/or use such Customer Data.
     * The Customer provides such Customer Data to Outbrain at its own
       risk and shall indemnify, keep indemnified and hold harmless
       Outbrain in respect of any loss and/or damage which arises as a
       result of the Customer’s breach of the terms set out herein and/or
       in respect of any third party claim (whether by an individual,
       government authority or otherwise) which arises pursuant to the
       Customer’s use of the LiveRamp Services via the Outbrain dashboard.
     * Outbrain has the right, by providing at least 10 business days
       written notice and at its own expense, to audit the Customer’s
       compliance with these terms.

Data Processing Agreement

Version 1.2

Effective September 11, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   DATA PROCESSING AGREEMENT
   This Data Processing Agreement (“DPA”) is entered into by the Outbrain
   entity (“Outbrain”) and the individual or company (the “Partner”)
   identified in the Partner Enrollment Form and governs the processing of
   personal data pursuant to the provision of services by Outbrain. From
   the Effective Date stipulated on the Partner Enrollment Form, this DPA
   shall apply to any and all agreements between the parties and their
   Affiliates from time to time.
   This DPA is incorporated into the Engage Terms (as amended from time to
   time) and constitutes a legally binding agreement between the parties.
   Collectively, the DPA, the Partner Enrolment Form and the Engage Terms
   are referred to as the “Agreement”. In the event of any conflict or
   inconsistency between any of the terms of the Agreement the following
   order of preference shall prevail: (i) the Partner Enrollment Form (ii)
   the DPA; and (iii) the Engage Terms.
    1. Definitions and Interpretation. The following definitions apply to
       this DPA:

   1.1 “Affiliate(s)” means in respect of either party at any time, any
   person or legal entity controlled by or controlling or under the common
   control of that party. Any reference to the parties shall include
   reference to their Affiliates;
   1.2 “Data Subject” means the individual to whom the Personal Data
   relates;
   1.3 “Data Protection Laws” means any applicable Data Protection Laws.
   It shall include ePrivacy Directive 2002/58/EC as implemented by
   countries within the EEA, (b) the General Data Protection Regulation
   (EU) 2016/679 (“GDPR”) and/or (c) other laws or subordinate legislation
   that implement or amend the laws that are identified in (a) and (b)
   above from time to time;
   1.4 “EEA” means the European Economic Areas;
   1.5 “End User” means individual human end users who interact with the
   Outbrain widget on the Partner sites;
   1.6 “End User Personal Data” means information about an End User which
   Outbrain collects from End Users directly via the Outbrain widget,
   including Outbrain’s own UUID, IP address (which Outbrain translates
   into geo-location and deletes the last octet) and some other user agent
   data (for example, information about which device and browser the End
   User is using to access the widget);
   1.7 “Partner Personal Data” means the personal data (such as the
   Partner’s employee’s name and email address) which the Partner provides
   to Outbrain in order to use the Outbrain services and which Outbrain
   requires in order to service the Partner’s account.
   1.8 "Partner Sites" means the web properties, applications or platforms
   identified in the Partner Enrolment Form;
   1.9 “Personal Data” means any information about an identified and/or
   identifiable natural person which Outbrain processes pursuant to the
   Agreement and which may include the End User Personal Data and/or the
   Customer Personal Data (as applicable);
   1.10 “Personal Data Breach” means a breach of security leading to the
   accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorized
   disclosure of, or access to, End User Persona Data or Partner Personal
   Data transmitted, stored or otherwise processed by Outbrain;
   1.11 “Sub-processor” means sub-contractors and/or replacement
   sub-contractors (as the case may be) which process personal data on
   behalf of Outbrain from time to time; and
   1.12 The terms “Data Controller”, “Data Processor”, “Data Subject”,
   “Personal Data”, and “Processing” shall have the same meaning ascribed
   to them under the GDPR.
    2. Nature and Scope of Processing. The parties agree to process
       Personal Data pursuant to the purposes set forth in this DPA and
       per applicable laws. Outbrain shall process Personal Data for the
       following purposes:

   2.1 End User Personal Data to provide online recommendations to End
   Users who interact with the Outbrain’s Partner Sites; and
   2.2 Partner Personal Data to provide the services to the Partner
   pursuant to the Agreement.
    3. Role of Parties. The parties acknowledge and agree that they are
       each independent controllers in respect of End User Personal Data
       and Partner Personal Data. Each Party shall be individually and
       separately responsible for complying with the obligations that
       apply to it as an independent Controller under Data Protection
       Laws.
    4. Lawful Basis.

   4.1 End User Personal Data. Partner acknowledges that Outbrain relies
   on Partner’s lawful basis for processing End User Personal Data as
   Outbrain does not have a direct relationship with an End User.
   Accordingly, Partner warrants that: (i) if Partner relies on legitimate
   interest, it has completed a legitimate interest assessment which has
   considered Outbrain’s provision of the services; and (ii) if the
   Partner relies on consent, the Partner shall disclose Outbrain to an
   End User via a consent management platform per the IAB methodology and
   must pass Outbrain a clear consent or no consent signal (i.e. the
   Partner must not send Outbrain a null or invalid signal if a consent
   management platform is implemented).
   4.2 Partner Personal Data. Partner acknowledges that Outbrain’s lawful
   basis for processing Partner Personal Data is contractual, as the
   Partner Personal Data is required in order for Outbrain to perform its
   obligations under the Agreement.
    5. Data Subject Rights. As independent controllers, the parties
       acknowledge and agree that each party shall promptly inform the
       other if it receives a request from a Data Subject exercising its
       rights under the Data Protection Laws. To the extent applicable,
       each party shall direct the Data Subject to the other party in
       order to enable such party to respond directly to such Data
       Subject’s request. Taking into account the nature of the
       processing, each party shall (if requested in writing and at the
       requesting party’s sole cost and expense) provide reasonable
       assistance to the other party, to fulfil the Data Subject’s request
       and/or in relation to any mandatory obligations applicable to the
       other party as an independent controller under Data Protection
       Laws.
    6. Transparency Obligations The parties acknowledge their respective
       transparency obligations where Personal Data being processed is
       obtained directly from the Data Subject or where such Personal Data
       is obtained from a third party. To that effect, the parties shall
       display appropriate privacy notices to Data Subjects (as required
       by applicable laws) or at the minimum comply with the requirements
       under Art 13 and/or 14 GDPR. The contact email for Outbrain for
       matters relating to Data Subject rights is
       privacyquestions@outbrain.com.
    7. Personnel. Outbrain agrees that any Outbrain personnel engaged in
       the processing of Personal Data shall be informed of the
       confidential nature of the Personal Data, receive appropriate
       training and have executed confidentiality agreements. In addition,
       Outbrain shall restrict personnel’s access to Personal Data to only
       those who require access to such data in order to provide the
       services pursuant to the Agreement.
    8. Sub-processors. Outbrain shall ensure that (i) each of its
       Sub-processors enter into a written agreement subjecting such
       sub-processor to equivalent obligations with respect to Personal
       Data as imposed under this DPA and Data Protection Laws; and (ii)
       the foregoing written agreement shall contain terms which require
       the Sub-processor to put in place appropriate technical and
       organisational measures. Partner acknowledges that Outbrain may
       engage third parties (including its Affiliates) in connection with
       the provision of the services pursuant to the Agreement.
    9. Sharing of Personal Data. In respect of the Personal Data, the
       Partner agrees that it shall not share personal data with Outbrain
       which (i) except for Partner Personal Data, allows Data Subjects to
       be directly identified (for example, name and e-mail address)
       and/or (ii) contains any Special Categories of Personal Data.
   10. Data Security. Outbrain shall maintain appropriate technical and
       organisational measures for the protection of the security,
       confidentiality and integrity of the Personal Data. The security
       measures Outbrain uses to protect Personal Data are outlined in our
       Security Statement. If Outbrain becomes aware of a Personal Data
       Breach in respect of the Personal Data it shall notify the Partner
       in writing as soon as reasonably practicable (and no later than 48
       hours after discovery), and Outbrain shall take such steps as it
       deems necessary and reasonable in order to remediate the cause of
       the Personal Data Breach.
   11. Data Retention. Outbrain shall delete Partner Personal Data when
       requested by the Partner. In respect of End User Personal Data, the
       retention period for each of the cookies Outbrain uses (whether its
       own or on our behalf by third parties) is stated on the Cookie
       Table. Outbrain shall not retain an individual data point for more
       than 13 months.
   12. Compliance. At the Partner’s sole cost and expense, Outbrain shall
       upon prior written request, make available to the Partner such
       information reasonably necessary to demonstrate Outbrain’s
       compliance with the obligations under this DPA. In addition the
       parties shall notify the other party in writing (i) if, in its
       opinion, an instruction from the other party infringes Data
       Protection Laws; and (ii) if a party receives a complaint, notice
       or allegation from any data protection authority or similar body
       alleging non-compliance with Data Protection Laws in relation to
       this DPA or services rendered under the Agreement.
   13. International Transfers. Outbrain may transfer or otherwise process
       Personal Data outside of the EEA (including via a Sub-processor)
       provided that such transfer is made in compliance with Data
       Protection Laws, including, if applicable, EU Standard Contractual
       Clauses, certification under the EU-US Privacy Shield or a European
       Commission positive adequacy decision under Article 45 of the GDPR.
       Outbrain is EU-US Privacy Shield certified and has in place the EU
       Standard Contractual Clauses for inter-company transfers.
   14. Term and Termination. This DPA shall commence on the Effective Date
       and shall continue as long as the Technology is implemented on the
       Partner Site(s).
   15. Miscellaneous.

   15.1 Neither Party shall be in breach of this DPA nor liable for delay
   in performing, or failure to perform, any of its obligations under the
   Agreement if such delay or failure results from events, circumstances
   or causes beyond its reasonable control.
   15.2 Failure or delay in exercising any right or remedy under this DPA
   shall not constitute a waiver of such (or any other) right or remedy.
   15.3 The Partner shall not assign or otherwise transfer its rights or
   its obligations under this Agreement, in whole or in part, without the
   prior written consent of Outbrain.
   15.4 Except as expressly stated otherwise, nothing in this DPA shall
   create or confer any rights or other benefits in favor of any person
   other than a party to this DPA.
   15.5 The invalidity, illegality, or unenforceability of any term of
   this DPA shall not affect the remainder of the DPA.
   15.6 This DPA shall be governed by the laws specified in the Engage
   Terms.

   Interest-Based Ads (and Opt-Out Preferences)Advertising
   GuidelinesPrivacy PolicySecurityPatentsTerms of Use

   Copyright © 2019 Outbrain Inc. All rights reserved.
   Outbrain is a trademark of Outbrain Inc. - IMPRESSUM
     __________________________________________________________________

   Legal Center powered by PactSafe

   Copyright © 2019, Outbrain Inc.
[outbrain-logo.png] Privacy Center

   Error

Contracts

     * Privacy Policy
     * Cookies

   [English (United States)  ]

          Privacy Policy
          Cookie Table

Privacy Policy

Version 2.3

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   Last Updated May 24, 2018
   Outbrain is committed to protecting your personal data. This privacy
   policy (“Privacy Policy ”) governs Outbrain’s use of data collected by
   us, including any and all personal data. Personal data is information
   that relates to you and may identify you as an individual. We use your
   personal data in line with all applicable laws. To ensure compliance
   and to align with Outbrain’s values around Trust & Transparency, we
   have a team of privacy champions responsible for continuously
   implementing our global privacy program.
   + EXPAND ALL
   – COLLAPSE ALL
   1. Who we are, What we do, How you can contact Outbrain, our DPO or the
   relevant authorities
   +
   Who we are:
   Outbrain means Outbrain Inc., a Delaware, USA corporation with
   headquarters in New York; and its affiliated subsidiaries
   (collectively, “Outbrain,” or “we“, “us“, “our“). We operate out of 12
   global offices and we partner with publishers and marketers across the
   globe.
   What we do:
   Outbrain’s mission is to serve interesting recommendations to its Users
   based on their interests. To achieve our mission we enter into
   agreements with:
     * online publishers and partners who want to recommend relevant
       content to their readers (this is Outbrain Engage); and
     * advertisers who want readers to view their content (this is
       Outbrain Amplify).

   How to contact us:
   We regularly review our compliance with this Privacy Policy. Questions,
   comments and requests regarding this Privacy Policy are welcomed and
   should be addressed to PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com or by mail to
   Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011,
   Attn: Privacy Questions.
   If Outbrain does not satisfactorily answers your questions or concerns,
   you may also contact the following for advice, support or complaints:
     * Outbrain’s external Data Protection Officer (“DPO”): ePrivacy GmbH,
       represented by Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. ePrivacy GmbH can be
       reached directly at privacy@eprivacy.eu ; and/or
     * the Information Commissioner’s Officer, which is Outbrain’s lead
       supervisory service within the European Territories.

   Self-Regulatory Bodies
   Outbrain adheres to the Self-Regulatory Principles set forth by the
   Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) and the European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). We are members in good standing of the
   Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), an association dedicated to
   responsible data collection and its use for digital advertising. We
   adhere to the NAI Code of Conduct for Web and Mobile. Outbrain also
   adheres to the Interactive Advertising Bureau’s (IAB) Self-Regulatory
   Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising, and the IAB Europe OBA
   Framework.
   2. Outbrain User Types (including Opt Out Options)
   +
   Much of this Privacy Policy is divided into sections based on the way
   you may interact with Outbrain. Please determine what user type you
   are. For each user type we’ve explained what information we collect and
   why, what cookies and other similar technologies we use, how we share
   such information, and your rights.
   Site Visitors: You are a Site Visitor when you visit and interact with
   our web sites, web pages, interactive features, blogs and their
   respective contents at Outbrain.com (or any derivation, such as
   Outbrain.co.uk; Outbrain.fr; outbrain.de etc.) and MyOutbrain.com (“Our
   Sites“). See more here.
   (a) What information we collect and why
   We want to understand what services on Our Sites interest you and we
   want to remind you about the services we offer when you are not on Our
   Sites. To do this, we collect the following information from you: (i)
   IP address; (ii) User Agent data: device type (e.g., iPhone), browser
   type (e.g., Chrome), operating system (e.g., iOS); (iii) the pages
   visited on Our Site (e.g., the Outbrain “About” page); (iv) the time of
   visit (and corresponding timezone); and (v) referring URLs and other
   information normally transmitted in HTTP requests (e.g., this
   information tells us how you arrived on Our Sites).
   (b) What cookies and other similar technologies we use
   Please see this Cookie Table under “Site Visitors” for a detailed list
   of the cookies (and their corresponding retention periods) we use when
   you visit Our Sites.
   (c) How we may share information
     * Sharing Information we learn about you on Our Sites.

   In general, we do not share personal data about you with third parties
   for third party marketing or advertising purposes. However, we use
   various third parties (each listed on this Cookie Table) to help us
   market or advertise to you. For example, some of the cookies we use on
   Our Sites belong to third parties that will help Outbrain market or
   advertise to you. We require that these third parties and companies
   agree to keep all information shared with them confidential and to use
   the information only to perform their obligations to us. We do this by
   entering into agreements with all third parties who process personal
   data on our behalf to ensure that they process your personal data in
   accordance with our strict instructions and all applicable data
   protection laws. If you post on our blog, your comment and information
   will be publicly available. Please contact support@outbrain.com to
   remove your comment.
     * Using Third Party Services on Our Sites.

   Our Sites contain links to other websites that we do not own or
   operate. We do not control, recommend or endorse the content, products,
   services, privacy policies or practices of these third party websites.
   For example, on Our Sites you will notice clickable icons which take
   you to the Outbrain Facebook page or the Outbrain LinkedIn page. If you
   choose to click on these links, you should know that Facebook and
   Linkedin may send their own cookies to your device and they may
   independently collect personal data. It is therefore important that you
   read the Facebook and/or LinkedIn privacy policies.
     * Also see the Sharing section of this Privacy Policy.

   (d) Your rights
   The Terms of Use on Our Site govern the use of Our Site and also apply
   to you. You can stop using Our Site at any time. If you do, you may
   also want to remove any cookies that we have placed on any device used
   to access Our Site. If during your use of Our Sites you provided your
   email address, any email you receive from Outbrain includes an
   “unsubscribe” option.
   For European Territory Visitors, Outbrain has implemented a consent
   management platform (powered by One Trust) on Our Sites that provide
   visitors the opportunity to consent, or not consent, to cookies and
   similar tracking technologies on Our Sites. Upon accessing Our Sites,
   you will see a banner on the bottom of the page with information about
   the cookies we use. You may click the banner to reject any cookies that
   are not strictly necessary. Pressing “accept” on the banner or
   scrolling/clicking on Our Sites is an indication of your acceptance.
   Accordingly, Outbrain’s lawful basis for processing personal data on
   Our Sites is consent. You may withdraw your consent at any time here.
   Users: You are an User when you visit a page of a website or
   application of one of Outbrain’s partners where the Outbrain widget is
   installed (“Partner Sites”). For example, if you visit
   https://news.sky.com/uk, www.spiegel.de or www.cnn.com, the Outbrain
   widget is implemented on those websites. You know you are engaging with
   an Outbrain widget when you see text referencing Outbrain (e.g.,
   “Recommended by Outbrain”, “by Outbrain” near recommendations). If you
   click on the hyperlinked reference to Outbrain you will see a detailed
   notice that enables you to navigate to Outbrain’s Interest Portal,
   which provides a general visualization of the types of Outbrain data
   categories that may be used to make its recommendations. It also gives
   you the ablity to opt out of personalized recommendations. See more
   here.
   Example of an Outbrain Widget.
   Outbrain Example Recommendations
   (a) What information we collect and why
   We use UUIDs, IP Address and other Usage Information so that we can
   serve interesting recommendations. Outbrain’s recommendations may be
   paid for by an advertiser linking you to a new website or they may be
   organic such that the link is to another page on the same publisher’s
   website.
     * UUID.

   When as a User you first visit a Partner Site (e.g., CNN.com), Outbrain
   drops a cookie on your device in order to generate a UUID (a Unique
   User Identifier). We catalog and analyze the content you consume across
   Partner Sites. Our recommendations are based on: (i) browsing history;
   (ii) similar browsing patterns of other Users; (ii) recommendations
   that are generally popular with Outbrain’s audience at this time; (iv)
   some randomness, and (v) targeting requirements that may be provided or
   requested by our Amplify clients. As an example, Outbrain may know that
   UUID 123 (which could be you on your iPhone X on the Guardian using
   Chrome as your browser) likes to read about far away holiday
   destinations and that people who like to read about far away holiday
   destinations also like to read about exotic food.
   The UUID is a sequence of numbers and/or letters. This UUID attaches
   itself to your device and varies depending on which browser you use. In
   other words, Outbrain records a different UUID depending on which
   device and/or which browser you use when accessing the Partner Sites.
   For example, this means that you will have one UUID when you visit a
   Partner Site from your mobile phone using the browser Safari, and a
   different UUID when you visit a Partner Site from your iPad using the
   browser Safari. Outbrain will combine and consolidate a UUID from a
   mobile device (handheld or tablet) from a browser that then accesses an
   application (or vice versa) from the that same device.
   Assigning a UUID allows Outbrain to associate the page views visited
   and clicks on Outbrain’s recommendations from such UUID – all with the
   goal of providing interesting recommendations.
     * IP Address and Other Usage Information.

   We collect a UUID as explained above, we also collect the following
   information from you: (i) IP address; (ii) User Agent data: device type
   (e.g., iphone) , browser type (e.g., chrome), operating system e.g
   iOS); (iii) the pages visited; (iv) the time of visit; and (v)
   referring URLs and other information normally transmitted in HTTP
   requests .
   The above statistical information provides us with information about
   how many Users visited a specific page on our Partner Sites on which
   the Outbrain widget is installed, how long each User stayed on that
   page, the type of content on that page they clicked on and how they
   generally engaged with that page. This information is only personal
   data when it is associated to a UUID.
   (b) What cookies and other similar technologies we use
   Please see this Cookie Table under “Users” for a detailed list of the
   first party cookies we use when you interact with Partner Sites where
   the Outbrain technology is implemented.
   If you click on a link to one of our recommendations, the Amplify
   advertiser sponsoring the recommendation may place cookies on your
   device through redirects prior to arriving on the destination page of
   the recommendations or upon reaching the destination page. In such
   cases you will be subject to that advertiser’s privacy policy.
   In addition to Outbrain’s visible widget on Partner Sites, certain
   Outbrain advertisers may implement the Outbrain pixel on their
   websites. The Outbrain pixel determines whether the user reaching the
   page where the pixel is installed has an Outbrain UUID. If there is a
   UUID associated with such end user, Outbrain allows advertisers to
   retarget those UUIDs and/or provides advertisers with the total number
   of UUIDs that reached such page. If there was no Outbrain UUID on the
   page, the Outbrain pixel does not collect any information about the
   user.
   We encourage advertisers to disclose use of the Outbrain pixel on their
   own websites. Outbrain does not combine pixel information with a UUID’s
   profile.
   Data points such as page views and clicks are connected to a particular
   UUID are retained for 13 months. For example, if UUID 123 read an
   article on December 31, 2017, on February 1, 2018 that article will no
   longer be part of UUID 123’s profile.
   (c) How we may share information
   Outbrain does not share User profiles with any third parties. However,
   we may share the UUID with certain partners for the purpose of cookie
   syncing, or based on technical requirements. Also see the Sharing
   section of this Privacy Policy.
   (d) Your rights
     * Outbrain Opt Out.

   You may opt out of Outbrain’s personalized recommendations at any time.
   Please see Outbrain’s Interest Profile for a general visualization the
   data Outbrain knows about you and may use to make its recommendations.
   The Interest Profile also gives you the ability to opt out of
   personalized recommendations. Note that opting out of browsers is
   through the Outbrain Interest Profile , but opting out of personalized
   recommendations in applications is through the settings on your device
   (examples of steps are in the Interest Profile ).
   IMPORTANT – even though you have opted out of Outbrain:
     * You will still see Outbrain recommendations. Opting out of Outbrain
       personalization tracking does not mean you will no longer receive
       recommendations from Outbrain. Instead, it means that Outbrain’s
       recommendations will not be personalized. The recommendations will
       still use information about the document you are viewing (i.e.,
       contextual information) to provide you recommendations on that
       page.
     * The opt out is cookie based and device/browser specific. If you
       browse the web from several devices and/or browsers, you will need
       to opt out from each device and/or browser to ensure that we
       prevent personalization tracking on all of them. For the same
       reason, if you buy a new device, change browsers or delete (or
       clear) the opt out cookie, you will need to opt-out again. Opting
       out of personalization tracking is not the same as blocking
       cookies.
     * To ensure deletion of the profile tied to your UUID, do not opt in
       to Outbrain for at least 21 days. Your opt out from Outbrain’s
       personalized recommendations is effective immediately. However, if
       your browser permits local storage and you opt into Outbrain’s
       personalized recommendations within 21 days of your opt out, it is
       possible your prior profile will be reconnected to your UUID. If
       you do not opt in within 21 days, your profile will be deleted and
       cannot be recovered.
     * As with most opt out cookies, the Outbrain browser opt out relies
       upon a cookie. The opt-out cookie is intended to be persistent to
       honor the user’s preferences. However, the "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention" feature in iOS11 may impact the persistence of cookies
       across websites post a 24 hour window. We suggest using another
       browser or considering blocking all 3rd party cookies from the
       browser so that you are "opted out" without needing to rely on any
       company's actual opt out methodology.

     * Additional Opt-Out Options.

   You may also opt out of receiving personalized ads served by us or
   other advertising companies through industry powered tools such as the
   NAI or the various DAA-based pages (DAA,
   http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC, www.youradchoices.ca/choices ,
   and/or EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu) . Visiting the NAI, DAA, DAAC, or
   EDAA consumer choice pages allows you to opt out of all some or all of
   the participating members’ services. Like Outbrain’s opt out, these opt
   outs do not mean you will no longer receive any advertising – the
   advertisements will just not be tailored to you. You may continue to
   receive advertisements, for example, based on the particular website
   that you are viewing (i.e., contextually based ads). Also, if your
   browsers are configured to reject cookies when you visit the DAA, DAAC
   or EDAA consumer choice pages, your opt out may not be effective.
   • Lawful Basis. Outbrain’s lawful basis for processing a User’s
   personal data is based on the lawful basis determined by each of our
   Partner Sites. Each Partner Site will rely on consent or legitimate
   interest. Please consult the applicable Partner Sites’ privacy policy
   for more information about their lawful basis. If a Partner is relying
   on consent, Outbrain will not drop a cookie on you if you have not
   provided consent on such Partner Site.
   Business Partners: You are a Business Partner when you register (or
   email with Outbrain) on behalf of the company you work for to use the
   Outbrain Amplify or Outbrain Engage Services. See more here.
   (a) What information we collect and why
   You may provide certain personal data (such as email address) when you
   sign up for the Amplify or Engage services or otherwise communicate or
   interact with us. If you apply to become a Business Partner, we may
   request additional information from you via advertiser application
   forms, insertion orders and other forms. We automatically collect
   information about your username’s actions in the Outbrain dashboard. As
   an example, as an Amplify Business Partner if you change the
   cost-per-click for one your campaigns, Outbrain’s audit trail will have
   a record of all those actions.
   We collect and process the personal data above in order to perform our
   obligations under our agreement as a Business Partner (or prospective
   Business Partner) with you including to:
     * respond to your questions and requests;
     * to provide you with access to certain functions and features of our
       Amplify or Engage services (e.g., to provide and maintain your
       dashboard account);
     * verify your identity;
     * communicate with you about your account, our products, and
       available promotions relevant to your use of the Amplify or Engage
       service.

   (b) What cookies and other similar technologies we use
   Please see this Cookie Table under “Business Partners” for a detailed
   list of the cookies (and their corresponding retention periods) we use
   with Business Partners.
   (c) How we may share information with anyone
   We may disclose certain Business Partner information to vendors,
   contractors, or others who assist Outbrain in delivering the services
   (e.g., credit card processing). Also see the Sharing section of this
   Privacy Policy.
   (d) Your rights
   If as a Business Partner you wish to verify, correct, update or request
   the deactivation of your information, you may go the to the Outbrain
   dashboard edit your profile preferences or contact us at
   support@outbrain.com. If you are receiving Outbrain emails, you may
   “unsubscribe” using a link in the email. Note unsubscribing shall not
   opt you out notifications critical to providing the Amplify or Engage
   services (e.g., email invoices).
   Outbrain’s lawful basis for processing personal data of Business
   Partners is legitimate interest.
   3. How We Keep Information Safe, Transfers Outside the EEA, Sharing and
   Retention
   +
   Security
   Outbrain has a dedicated security team. We maintain tight controls over
   the personal data we collect, retaining it in firewalled and secured
   databases with strictly limited and controlled access rights, to ensure
   it is secure. Please see our security standards for more information.
   Business Partners have access to certain password-protected features of
   the Amplify or Engage service. They are responsible for keeping this
   password confidential. Please remember that unfortunately, the
   transmission of information via the internet is not completely secure.
   A common Internet scam is known as "spoofing" or "phishing." This
   occurs when you receive an email from what appears to be a legitimate
   source requesting personal data from you. Please be aware that we will
   not send you any emails requesting you to verify credit card, bank
   information, or any other personal data. If you ever receive an email
   that appears to be from us requesting such information from you, do not
   respond to it, and do not click on any links appearing in the email.
   Instead, please forward the email to us at legal@outbrain.com, as we
   will investigate instances of possible Internet fraud.
   Data Transfers Outside the EU/EEA
   When we transfer personal data from the European Economic Area to other
   countries in which applicable laws do not offer the same level of data
   privacy protection as in the European Territories, we take measures to
   provide an appropriate level of data privacy protection. In other
   words, your rights and protections remain with your data. For example,
   we use approved contractual clauses and other measures designed to
   ensure that the recipients of your personal data protect it.
   Sharing
   In addition to the description of how we may disclose your personal
   data for each user type, we may also disclose personal data as follows:
     * Within the family of companies controlled by Outbrain for internal
       reasons, primarily for business and operational purposes;
     * If we go through a business transition, such as a merger,
       acquisition by another company, or sale of all or a portion of our
       assets, your personal data will likely be among the assets
       transferred;
     * When legally required to do so (e.g., to cooperate with law
       enforcement investigations or other legal proceedings); and/or
     * To respond to a genuine emergency.

   In addition, we combine your personal data with those of other users in
   order to share trend information and aggregate user statistics with
   third parties, always in aggregated and anonymized form.
   Data Retention
   The retention period for each of the cookies Outbrain uses (whether its
   own or on our behalf by third parties) is stated on the Cookie Table.
   Outbrain also maintains a Data Retention Policy that details the
   retention period for personal data based on our analysis of how long
   the specific data is reasonably required for legal or business
   purposes. When we no longer need personal data, we securely delete or
   destroy it. Aggregated data, which cannot identify a device/browser (or
   individual) and is used for purposes of reporting and analysis, is
   maintained for as long as commercially necessary.
   4. Children
   +
   None of our services are directed to children under 16. We do not
   knowingly collect personal data from anyone under 16 years of age. If
   we determine upon collection that a Site Visitor, a User or a Business
   Partner is under 16, we will not use or maintain his/her personal data.
   If we become aware that we have unknowingly collected personal data
   from a child under the age of 16, we will make reasonable efforts to
   delete such information from our records. If you’re a kid, please go
   play in the yard, don’t use or interact with Outbrain!
   5. European Territory Citizens
   +
   In compliance with European privacy laws, in particular the European
   General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), Outbrain provides specific
   additional rights for citizens of the European Territories such as the
   right to access, rectification, right to object, to complaint, erasure
   and blockage. More specifically:
     * the right to request information about whether and which personal
       data is processed by us, and the right to demand that personal data
       is rectified or amended.
     * under certain circumstances, the right to request that personal
       data should be deleted.
     * under certain circumstances, the right to demand that the
       processing of personal data should be restricted.
     * withdraw your consent to the processing and use of your data
       completely or partially at any time with future application.
     * have the right to obtain your personal data in a common, structured
       and mechanically readable format.
     * contact our data protection officer if there are any questions,
       comments, complaints or requests in connection with our statement
       on data protection and the processing of your personal data.
     * the right to complain to the responsible supervisory authority if
       believed that the processing of your personal data is in violation
       of the legislation.

   In addition to the above, we reference certain rights for European
   Territory citizens throughout this Privacy Policy. Pursuant to the
   GDPR, citizens from "European Territories" mean the European Economic
   Area (EEA) and Switzerland. For the purpose of this Privacy Policy, the
   term "European Territories" shall continue to include the United
   Kingdom, even after the United Kingdom leaves the European Economic
   Area following Brexit.
   Please email PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com with any questions about
   exercising any of the above rights.
   6. California Privacy Rights
   +
   Under California Civil Code sections 1798.83-1798.84, California
   residents are entitled to ask us for a notice describing what
   categories of personal information we share with third parties or
   corporate affiliates for those third parties or corporate affiliates'
   direct marketing purposes. That notice will identify the categories of
   information shared and will include a list of the third parties and
   affiliates with which it was shared, along with their names and
   addresses. If you are a California resident and would like a copy of
   this notice, please submit a written request to
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com or send to the following address:
   Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011.
   Please allow 30 days for a response.
   7. “Do Not Track” Disclosure
   +
   Some browsers transmit Do Not Track (DNT) signals to websites. Because
   there is no common understanding of how to interpret the DNT signal,
   Outbrain does not currently alter, change, or respond to DNT requests
   or signals from these browsers. We will continue to monitor industry
   activity in this area and reassess our DNT practices as necessary. In
   the meantime, you can use the range of other tools we provide to
   control data collection and use, including the ability to opt out of
   receiving personalized recommendations in the Users section.
   8. How This Privacy Policy May Change
   +
   We may change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will place a
   prominent notice that will be visible to you as a Site Visitor or
   Business Partner, but we do not have a means of advising Users of an
   update. You should check back here periodically to see if the Privacy
   Policy has been updated. We will always show the date of the latest
   modification of the Privacy Policy at the top of the page so you can
   tell when it was last revised.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Letzte Aktualisierung: 23. Mai 2018
   Outbrain ist dem Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten verpflichtet.
   Diese Datenschutzbestimmungen („Datenschutzbestimmungen“) gelten für
   die Verwendung durch Outbrain der von uns erfassten Daten,
   einschließlich aller personenbezogenen Daten, durch Outbrain.
   Personenbezogene Daten sind Informationen, die sich auf Sie beziehen
   und Sie persönlich identifizieren können. Wir verwenden Ihre
   personenbezogenen Daten entsprechend den geltenden Gesetzen. Im Sinne
   der Compliance und der Übereinstimmung mit Outbrains Werten rund um
   Vertrauen und Transparenz verfügt Outbrain über ein Team von
   Datenschutz-Champions, die für die kontinuierliche Umsetzung unseres
   weltweit gültigen Maßnahmenkatalogs zum Datenschutz verantwortlich
   sind.

                                                          + ALLE ERWEITERN

                                                 – ALLEX ZUSAMMENBRECHEN

   1. Wer wir sind, Was wir tun, Wie Sie Outbrain kontaktieren können,
   unser Datenschutzbeauftragter oder die zuständigen Behörden

                                      +

   Wer wir sind:
   Outbrain bedeutet Outbrain Inc., ein Unternehmen nach dem Recht von
   Delaware, USA, mit Hauptsitz in New York, und dessen verbundene
   Tochterunternehmen (zusammen bezeichnet als: „Outbrain“ oder „wir“,
   „uns“, „unser“). Wir haben Niederlassungen in zwölf Ländern weltweit
   und arbeiten mit Publishern und Vermarktern auf der ganzen Welt
   zusammen.
   Was wir tun:
   Outbrains Mission ist es, für Nutzer relevante Empfehlungen anhand
   ihrer Interessen bereitzustellen. Zu diesem Zweck schließen wir
   Vereinbarungen mit:
     * Online-Publishern und Partnern, die ihren Lesern relevanten Content
       empfehlen wollen (dabei handelt es sich um Outbrain Engage); und

     * Werbetreibenden, die erreichen wollen, dass Leser ihren Content
       ansehen (hierbei handelt es sich um Outbrain Amplify).

   Wie Sie Kontakt mit uns aufnehmen:
   Unsere Compliance bezüglich dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen überprüfen
   wir regelmäßig. Wir freuen uns über Ihre Fragen, Anmerkungen und
   Anfragen zu diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen. Richten Sie diese bitte an
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oder auf postalischem Weg an Outbrain
   Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, Attn: Privacy
   Questions / Datenschutzanfrage.
   Sollte Outbrain Ihre Fragen oder Anliegen nicht zu Ihrer Zufriedenheit
   beantworten, können Sie sich auch an folgende Ansprechpartner wenden,
   um Rat oder Unterstützung zu erhalten bzw. Beschwerden vorzubringen:
     * Outbrains externen Datenschutzbeauftragten: ePrivacy GmbH,
       vertreten durch Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. Die ePrivacy GmbH können
       Sie direkt erreichen unter privacy@eprivacy.eu und/oder
     * den Information Commissioner’s Officer, die für Outbrain zuständige
       federführende Aufsichtsbehörde in den europäischen Ländern.

   Selbstkontrollgremien
   Outbrain befolgt die im Rahmen der Selbstverpflichtung formulierten
   Grundsätze der Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) und der European
   Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Wir sind
   vollberechtigte Mitglieder der Network Advertising Initiative (NAI),
   eines Verbands, der sich der verantwortungsvollen Erfassung von Daten
   und deren Verwendung in der Digitalwerbung verpflichtet hat. Wir
   befolgen die Verhaltensregeln der NAI für Web- und Mobilwerbung.
   Outbrain befolgt ebenfalls die im Rahmen der Selbstverpflichtung
   formulierten Grundsätze für die verhaltensgesteuerte Online-Werbung des
   Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) sowie die Rahmenbedingungen für
   die verhaltensgesteuerte Online-Werbung des IAB Europe.
   2. Outbrain-Nutzertypen (inklusive Deaktivierung/Opt-Out)

                                      +

   Ein Großteil dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen ist in einzelne Abschnitte
   unterteilt, die sich daran orientieren, wie Sie mit Outbrain
   interagieren. Bitte entscheiden Sie, welcher Nutzertyp Sie sind.
   Entsprechend den einzelnen Nutzertypen erläutern wir, welche
   Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun, welche Cookies und
   andere vergleichbare Technologien wir nutzen, wie wir diese
   Informationen weitergeben und über welche Rechte Sie verfügen.
   Websitebesucher: Sie sind ein Websitebesucher, wenn Sie unsere
   Websites, Internetseiten, interaktiven Funktionen, Blogs und deren
   jeweiligen Content auf Outbrain.com (oder einer darauf basierenden
   Ableitung wie Outbrain.co.uk, Outbrain.fr, Outbrain.de usw.) und
   MyOutbrain.com („unsere Websites“) besuchen und mit diesen
   interagieren. Sehen Sie hier mehr.
   (a) Welche Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun
   Wir möchten wissen, welche Dienstleistungen auf unseren Websites Sie
   interessieren, und Sie an die von uns angebotenen Services erinnern,
   wenn Sie nicht auf unseren Websites sind. Zu diesem Zweck erfassen wird
   folgende Informationen von Ihnen: (i) IP-Adresse; (ii)
   User-Agent-Daten: Gerätetyp (z.B. iPhone), Browsertyp (z.B. Chrome),
   Betriebssystem (z.B. iOS); (iii) die auf unserer Website besuchten
   Seiten (z.B. die Seite „Über Outbrain“); (iv) den Zeitpunkt des Besuchs
   (und die entsprechende Zeitzone); und (v) die verweisenden URLs und
   andere normalerweise bei HTTP-Anfragen übertragenen Informationen (z.B.
   wissen wir durch diese Information, wie Sie auf unsere Websites gelangt
   sind).
   (b) Cookies und andere vergleichbare Technologien, die wir nutzen
   In der Cookie-Tabelle unter „Site Visitors (Websitebesucher)“ erhalten
   Sie eine detaillierte Liste der Cookies (und ihrer jeweiligen
   Speicherfristen), die wir bei Ihrem Besuch unserer Websites verwenden.
   (c) So geben wir unter Umständen Informationen weiter
     * Weitergabe von Informationen, die wir auf unseren Websites von
       Ihnen erhalten.

   Im Allgemeinen geben wir keine personenbezogenen Daten über Sie an
   Dritte für deren Marketing- oder Werbezwecke weiter. Wir nutzen jedoch
   verschiedene Dritte (jeweils in der Cookie-Tabelle aufgeführt) zur
   Unterstützung unserer Marketing- oder Werbetätigkeit Ihnen gegenüber.
   So gehören einige der Cookies, die wir auf unseren Websites verwenden,
   Dritten, die Outbrain bei unserer Marketing- oder Werbetätigkeit Ihnen
   gegenüber unterstützen. Wir verlangen, dass diese Dritten und externen
   Unternehmen einwilligen, sämtliche an sie weitergegebenen Informationen
   vertraulich zu behandeln und nur zur Erfüllung ihrer Pflichten uns
   gegenüber zu verwenden. Zu diesem Zweck schließen wir Vereinbarungen
   mit allen Dritten, die für uns personenbezogene Daten verarbeiten,
   damit gewährleistet ist, dass sie Ihre personenbezogenen Daten in
   Übereinstimmung mit unseren strengen Anweisungen und allen geltenden
   Datenschutzgesetzen verarbeiten. Wenn Sie einen Post auf unserem Blog
   hinterlassen, sind Ihr Kommentar und Ihre Informationen öffentlich
   zugänglich. Bitte wenden Sie sich an support@outbrain.com, um Ihren
   Kommentar zu entfernen.
     * Verwendung von Dienstleistungen Dritter auf unseren Websites.

   Unsere Websites enthalten Links zu anderen Websites, die uns nicht
   gehören und die wir nicht betreiben. Wir kontrollieren, empfehlen oder
   billigen den Content, die Produkte, Dienstleistungen,
   Datenschutzbestimmungen oder -maßnahmen dieser Websites Dritter nicht.
   Auf unseren Websites sehen Sie beispielsweise anklickbare Symbole, über
   die Sie auf die Facebook-Seite von Outbrain oder die LinkedIn-Seite von
   Outbrain gelangen. Sofern Sie entscheiden, diese Links anzuklicken,
   sollten Sie sich dessen bewusst sein, dass Facebook und LinkedIn unter
   Umständen ihre eigenen Cookies auf Ihr Gerät senden und unabhängig
   personenbezogene Daten erfassen. Daher ist es wichtig, dass Sie die
   Datenschutzbestimmungen von Facebook und/oder LinkedIn lesen.
     * Beachten Sie auch den Abschnitt dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen über
       die Weitergabe von Daten.

   (d) Ihre Rechte
   Die Nutzungsbedingungen auf unserer Website regeln die Nutzung unserer
   Website und gelten auch für Sie. Sie können die Nutzung unserer Website
   jederzeit beenden. In diesem Fall können Sie auch die Cookies
   entfernen, die wir auf jedem für den Zugriff auf unsere Website
   verwendeten Gerät gesetzt haben. Falls Sie während Ihrer Nutzung
   unserer Websites Ihre E-Mail-Adresse übermitteln, enthält jede E-Mail,
   die Sie von Outbrain erhalten, eine Option zum Abbestellen des
   E-Mail-Empfangs.
   Für Besucher aus dem europäischen Gebiet hat Outbrain auf unseren
   Websites eine Plattform für das Zustimmungs-Management eingerichtet
   (betrieben durch One Trust), über die Nutzer die Möglichkeit haben,
   ihre Zustimmung zu Cookies und vergleichbaren Trackingtechnologien auf
   unseren Websites zu geben oder zu verweigern. Wenn Sie auf unsere
   Website zugreifen, sehen Sie einen Banner am unteren Ende der Seite,
   das Informationen über die Cookies, die wir einsetzen, enthält. Sie
   können auf das Banner klicken und sämtliche Cookies verweigern, die
   nicht absolut notwendig sind. Der Klick auf "Akzeptieren"/"Accept" auf
   dem Banner oder das Scrollen/Klicken auf unseren Seiten ist ein Zeichen
   Ihres Einverständnisses. Entsprechend basiert Outbrains Rechtmäßigkeit
   der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten auf unseren Websites auf
   Zustimmung. Sie können Ihre Zustimmung jederzeit widerrufen.
   Nutzer: Sie sind ein Nutzer, wenn Sie eine Seite einer Website oder
   Anwendung eines Partners von Outbrain besuchen, auf der das
   Outbrain-Widget installiert ist („Partner-Websites“). Falls Sie
   beispielsweise die Seiten https://news.sky.com/uk, www.spiegel.de oder
   www.cnn.com besuchen, wird das Outbrain-Widget in diese Websites
   eingebunden. Dass Sie mit einem Outbrain-Widget verbunden sind,
   erkennen Sie an dem Text, der auf Outbrain verweist (z.B. „Empfohlen
   von Outbrain“, „von Outbrain“ neben den Empfehlungen). Wenn Sie auf die
   Verlinkung zu Outbrain klicken, sehen Sie einen detaillierten Hinweis ,
   der Ihnen erlaubt, zum Interessenprofil von Outbrain zu navigieren, wo
   Sie eine allgemeine Darstellung der Arten von Datenkategorien finden,
   die Outbrain für die Abgabe seiner Empfehlungen verwendet. Sie haben an
   dieser Stelle auch die Möglichkeit, personalisierte Empfehlungen zu
   deaktivieren. Sehen Sie hier mehr.
   Beispiel eines Outbrain-Widgets
   Outbrain Example Recommendations
   (a) Welche Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun
   Wir verwenden UUIDs, IP-Adressen und andere Nutzungsdaten, damit wir
   Ihnen interessante Empfehlungen unterbreiten können. Outbrains
   Empfehlungen werden unter Umständen von einem Werbetreibenden bezahlt,
   der Sie auf eine neue Website leitet, oder es handelt sich um eigene
   Empfehlungen des Publishers, sodass der Link auf eine andere Seite
   desselben Publishers führt.
     * UUID.

   Wenn Sie als Nutzer erstmalig eine Partner-Website (z.B. CNN.com)
   besuchen, setzt Outbrain zur Erzeugung einer eindeutigen Nutzerkennung,
   UUID (Unique User Identifier), ein Cookie auf Ihrem Gerät. Wir
   katalogisieren und analysieren den Content, den Sie auf
   Partner-Websites konsumieren. Unsere Empfehlungen basieren auf: (i) dem
   Browserverlauf; (ii) ähnlichen Surfmustern anderer Nutzer; (ii)
   Empfehlungen, die bei Outbrains Adressaten zur gegebenen Zeit beliebt
   sind; (iv) einem gewissen Maß an Zufälligkeit und (v)
   Zielanforderungen, die durch unsere Amplify-Kunden bereitgestellt oder
   von ihnen verlangt werden. Beispielsweise weiß Outbrain, dass UUID 123
   (wobei es sich um Sie handeln kann, während Sie mit Ihrem iPhone X und
   dem Chrome-Browser auf der Spiegel-Website surfen) gern Texte über
   ferne Reiseziele liest und dass Personen, die gern von fernen
   Reisezielen lesen, sich auch für Artikel über exotisches Essen
   interessieren.
   Die UUID stellt eine Abfolge von Ziffern und/oder Buchstaben dar. Diese
   UUID ist an Ihr Gerät gebunden und variiert je nach verwendetem
   Browser. Mit anderen Worten: Outbrain erfasst verschiedene UUIDs
   abhängig davon, welches Gerät und/oder welchen Browser Sie für den
   Zugriff auf die Websites des Partners verwenden. Dies bedeutet
   beispielsweise, dass Sie eine UUID haben, wenn Sie eine Partner-Website
   von Ihrem Mobiltelefon aus mit dem Safari-Browser besuchen, und eine
   andere UUID, wenn Sie eine Partner-Website von Ihrem iPad aus mit dem
   Safari-Browser besuchen. Outbrain kombiniert und konsolidiert eine UUID
   von einem Mobilgerät (Handgerät oder Tablet) von einem Browser, der
   dann von demselben Gerät auf eine Anwendung (oder umgekehrt) zugreift.
   Durch die Zuweisung einer UUID kann Outbrain die besuchten Seiten und
   die Klicks auf Outbrains Empfehlungen von dieser UUID kombinieren, was
   alles dem Ziel dient, interessante Empfehlungen bereitzustellen.
     * IP-Adressen und andere Nutzungsdaten.

   Wir erfassen eine UUID wie oben erläutert, und wir erfassen auch die
   folgenden Daten: (i) IP-Adresse (wird nach Industriestandards
   anonymisiert); (ii) User-Agent-Daten: Gerätetyp (z.B. iPhone),
   Browsertyp (z.B. Chrome), Betriebssystem, z.B. iOS); (iii) die
   besuchten Seiten; (iv) den Zeitpunkt des Besuchs und (v) die
   verweisenden URLs und andere normalerweise bei HTTP-Anfragen
   übertragenen Informationen.
   Durch die oben genannten statistischen Daten erhalten wir Informationen
   darüber, wie viele Nutzer eine bestimmte Seite auf unseren
   Partner-Websites, auf denen das Outbrain-Widget installiert ist,
   besucht haben, wie lange jeder Nutzer auf der Seite blieb, die Art des
   Contents auf der Seite, die er angeklickt hat, und wie der Nutzer sich
   auf der Seite allgemein verhalten hat. Diese Informationen sind nur
   dann personenbezogene Daten, wenn sie mit einer UUID verbunden sind.
   (b) Cookies und andere vergleichbare Technologien, die wir nutzen
   Diese Cookie-Tabelle enthält unter „Nutzer“ eine detaillierte Liste der
   Erstanbieter-Cookies, die wir bei Ihrer Interaktion mit
   Partner-Websites, auf denen die Outbrain-Technologie implementiert ist,
   verwenden.
   Wenn Sie auf einen Link zu einer unserer Empfehlungen klicken, setzt
   der Amplify-Werbetreibende, der die Empfehlung finanziert, unter
   Umständen durch Weiterleitungen vor der Ankunft auf der Zielseite der
   Empfehlungen oder bei Erreichen der Zielseite Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät.
   In diesen Fällen gelten für Sie die Datenschutzbestimmungen des
   Werbetreibenden.
   Zusätzlich zu Outbrains sichtbarem Widget auf Partner-Websites
   implementieren bestimmte Outbrain-Werbetreibende gegebenenfalls das
   Outbrain-Pixel auf ihren Websites. Das Outbrain-Pixel ermittelt, ob der
   Nutzer, der auf die Seite mit dem installierten Pixel gelangt, über
   eine Outbrain-UUID verfügt. Falls es eine mit diesem Endnutzer
   verbundene UUID gibt, kann Outbrain den Werbetreibenden erlauben, diese
   UUIDs erneut anzusprechen, und/oder den Werbetreibenden die Gesamtzahl
   der UUIDs, die diese Seite erreicht haben, übermitteln. Sofern es auf
   der Seite keine Outbrain-UUID gab, erfasst das Outbrain-Pixel keine
   Daten über den Nutzer.
   Wir legen Werbetreibenden nahe, die Verwendung des Outbrain-Pixels auf
   ihren eigenen Websites offenzulegen. Outbrain kombiniert keine
   Pixelinformationen mit dem Profil einer UUID.
   Datenpunkte wie Seitenaufrufe und Klicks sind mit einer bestimmten UUID
   verbunden und werden 13 Monate lang gespeichert. Falls beispielsweise
   UUID 123 am 31. Dezember 2017 einen Artikel gelesen hat, ist dieser
   Artikel am 1. Februar 2018 nicht mehr Teil des Profils von UUID 123.
   (c) So geben wir unter Umständen Informationen weiter
   Outbrain leitet keine Nutzerprofile an Dritte weiter. Wir geben jedoch
   unter Umständen die UUID an bestimmte Partner zum Zweck der
   Cookie-Synchronisierung oder aufgrund technischer Anforderungen weiter.
   Beachten Sie bitte auch den Abschnitt dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen
   über die Weitergabe von Daten.
   (d) Ihre Rechte
     * Outbrain-Deaktivierung/Opt-Out. Sie können Outbrains
       personalisierte Empfehlungen jederzeit deaktivieren. In Outbrains
       Interessenprofil finden Sie eine allgemeine Darstellung, welche
       Ihrer Daten Outbrain kennt und gegebenenfalls für Empfehlungen
       nutzt. Über das Interessenprofil haben Sie auch die Möglichkeit,
       personalisierte Empfehlungen zu deaktivieren (Sie können ein
       solches Opt-Out auch hier vornehmen). Bitte beachten Sie, dass die
       Deaktivierung von Browsern über Outbrains Interessenprofil
       stattfindet, die Deaktivierung von personalisierten Empfehlungen in
       Anwendungen jedoch über die Einstellungen in Ihrem Gerät (Beispiele
       für die Schritte erhalten Sie im Interessenprofil).

   WICHTIG – obwohl Sie Outbrain deaktiviert haben:
     * Sie sehen weiterhin Outbrains Empfehlungen. Die Deaktivierung von
       Outbrains Personalisierungsverfolgung bedeutet nicht, dass Sie
       keine weiteren Empfehlungen von Outbrain erhalten. Stattdessen
       bedeutet es, dass Outbrains Empfehlungen nicht mehr personalisiert
       sind. Die Empfehlungen nutzen nach wie vor Informationen über das
       von Ihnen betrachtete Dokument (z.B. Kontextinformationen), um
       Ihnen auf dieser Seite Empfehlungen zu unterbreiten.

     * Die Deaktivierung basiert auf Cookies und ist spezifisch für das
       Gerät/den Browser. Sofern Sie im Web von verschiedenen Geräten
       und/oder Browsern aus surfen, müssen Sie eine Deaktivierung von
       jedem Gerät und/oder Browser aus vornehmen, damit dafür gesorgt
       ist, dass wir auf allen die Personalisierungsverfolgung verhindern.
       Aus demselben Grund müssen Sie, wenn Sie ein neues Gerät kaufen,
       den Browser wechseln oder das Deaktivierungs-Cookie löschen, eine
       erneute Deaktivierung vornehmen. Die Deaktivierung der
       Personalisierungsverfolgung ist nicht dasselbe wie die Blockierung
       von Cookies.

     * Um die Löschung des mit Ihrer UUID verbundenen Profils
       sicherzustellen, sollten Sie Outbrain über mindestens 21 Tage nicht
       aktivieren. Ihre Deaktivierung der personalisierten Empfehlungen
       durch Outbrain ist sofort wirksam. Falls Ihr Browser jedoch die
       lokale Speicherung zulässt und Sie innerhalb von 21 Tagen nach
       Ihrer Deaktivierung Outbrains personalisierte Empfehlungen
       aktivieren, wird Ihr vorheriges Profil möglicherweise wieder mit
       Ihrer UUID verbunden. Sofern Sie nicht innerhalb von 21 Tagen eine
       neue Aktivierung vornehmen, wird Ihr Profil gelöscht und kann nicht
       wiederhergestellt werden.

     * Wie bei den meisten Opt-Outs basiert auch der Outbrain
       Browser-Opt-Out auf einem Cookie. Das Cookie ist dazu bestimmt,
       bestehen zu bleiben, damit die Präferenz des Nutzers durchgesetzt
       werden kann. Allerdings kann die „Intelligent Tracking Prevention“
       (das Verhindern von Aufzeichnungen) für Safari in iOS 11 das
       Fortbestehen von Cookies über ein 24-Stunden-Zeitfenster hinaus
       beeinträchtigen. Wir empfehlen die Nutzung eines anderen Browsers
       oder das Blockieren aller 3rd-Party-Cookies in dem Browser, sodass
       Ihr Opt-Out-Wunsch berücksichtigt wird, ohne dass Sie sich auf die
       Opt-Out-Methodik eines einzelnen Unternehmens verlassen müssen.

     * Zusätzliche Deaktivierungsoptionen. Sie können auch den Erhalt
       personalisierter Werbung durch uns oder andere Werbeunternehmen
       über branchenbetriebene Tools deaktivieren, beispielsweise NAI oder
       die verschiedenen DAA-basierten Seiten (DAA,
       http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices, und/oder EDAA
       www.youronlinechoices.eu). Durch den Besuch der Seiten für
       Verbraucherwahlmöglichkeiten NAI, DAA, DAAC oder EDAA können Sie
       einige oder alle Leistungen der teilnehmenden Mitglieder
       deaktivieren. Wie auch die Deaktivierung von Outbrain bedeuten auch
       diese Deaktivierungen nicht, dass Sie gar keine Werbung mehr
       erhalten, sondern lediglich, dass die Werbung nicht mehr auf Sie
       zugeschnitten ist. Möglicherweise erhalten Sie weiterhin Werbung,
       beispielsweise anhand der speziellen Website, die Sie betrachten
       (d. h. kontextbasierte Werbung). Falls durch die Einstellungen
       Ihrer Browser zudem Cookies abgewiesen werden, wenn Sie die
       Verbraucherseiten DAA, DAAC oder EDAA besuchen, ist Ihre
       Deaktivierung unter Umständen nicht wirksam.
     * Rechtsgrundlage. Outbrains Rechtmäßigkeit der Verarbeitung
       personenbezogener Daten eines Nutzers gründet auf der durch unsere
       Partner-Websites festgelegten Rechtmäßigkeit. Jeder Partner-Website
       liegt Zustimmung oder berechtigtes Interesse zugrunde. Bitte lesen
       Sie die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen der Partner-Websites, um
       weitere Informationen über deren Rechtmäßigkeit zu erhalten. Falls
       bei einem Partner eine Zustimmung erforderlich ist, setzt Outbrain
       kein Cookie bei Ihnen, wenn Sie der Partner-Website keine
       Zustimmung erteilt haben.

   Geschäftspartner: Sie sind ein Geschäftspartner, wenn Sie sich im Namen
   des Unternehmens, für das Sie arbeiten, registrieren (oder Outbrain per
   E-Mail kontaktieren), um die Dienstleistungen Outbrain Amplify oder
   Outbrain Engage zu nutzen. Sehen Sie hier mehr.
   (a) Welche Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun
   Womöglich übermitteln Sie bestimmte personenbezogene Daten (wie die
   E-Mail-Adresse), wenn Sie sich für die Amplify- oder
   Engage-Dienstleistungen registrieren oder anderweitig mit uns
   kommunizieren oder interagieren. Wenn Sie sich bei uns als
   Geschäftspartner bewerben, benötigen wir gegebenenfalls weitere Daten
   von Ihnen über Anmeldebögen für Werbetreibende, Werbeaufträge und
   andere Formulare. Wir erfassen automatisch Informationen über die
   Aktivitäten Ihres Nutzernamens im Outbrain-Dashboard. Wenn Sie
   beispielsweise als Amplify-Geschäftspartner die Kosten pro Klick für
   eine Ihrer Kampagnen ändern, findet sich im Audit Trail von Outbrain
   eine Aufzeichnung all dieser Maßnahmen.
   Wir erfassen und verarbeiten die oben genannten personenbezogenen
   Daten, um unsere Verpflichtungen aus unserem Vertrag mit Ihnen als
   Geschäftspartner (oder zukünftiger Geschäftspartner) zu erfüllen, unter
   anderem:
     * Beantwortung Ihrer Fragen und Anforderungen;

     * Gewährung Ihres Zugriffs auf bestimmte Funktionen und Eigenschaften
       der Amplify- und Engage-Dienstleistungen (z.B. Bereitstellung und
       Pflege Ihres Dashboard-Kontos);

     * Verifizierung Ihrer Identität;

     * Kommunikation mit Ihnen über Ihr Konto, unsere Produkte und die für
       Ihre Nutzung der Amplify- oder Engage-Dienstleistung relevanten
       Werbeaktionen.

   (b) Cookies und andere vergleichbare Technologien, die wir nutzen
   In der Cookie-Tabelle unter „Geschäftspartner“ erhalten Sie eine
   detaillierte Liste der Cookies (und ihrer jeweiligen Speicherfristen),
   die wir für Geschäftspartner verwenden.
   (c) So geben wir unter Umständen Informationen weiter
   Wir legen bestimmte Informationen über Geschäftspartner gegenüber
   Anbietern, Auftragnehmern oder anderen offen, die Outbrain bei der
   Erbringung der Dienstleistungen unterstützen (z.B.
   Kreditkartenabwicklung). Beachten Sie bitte auch den Abschnitt dieser
   Datenschutzbestimmungen über die Weitergabe von Daten.
   (d) Ihre Rechte
   Sofern Sie als Geschäftspartner Ihre Daten verifizieren, berichtigen,
   aktualisieren oder deren Deaktivierung veranlassen möchten, können Sie
   Ihre Profileinstellungen im Outbrain-Dashboard editieren oder uns unter
   support@outbrain.com kontaktieren. Falls Sie von Outbrain E-Mails
   erhalten, können Sie den Empfang über einen Link in der E-Mail
   abbestellen. Bitte beachten Sie, dass Sie durch das Abbestellen nicht
   den Erhalt von Benachrichtigungen deaktivieren, die kritisch für die
   Erbringung der Amplify- oder Engage-Dienstleistungen sind (z.B.
   E-Mail-Rechnungen).
   Outbrains Rechtmäßigkeit der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten von
   Geschäftspartnern gründet in berechtigtem Interesse.
   3. Datensicherheit, Übertragungen außerhalb des EWR, Weitergabe und
   Speicherfristen

                                      +

   Sicherheit
   Outbrain verfügt über ein dezidiertes Sicherheitsteam. Wir führen eine
   strenge Kontrolle der durch uns erfassten Daten durch und speichern
   diese in durch Firewalls geschützten und sicheren Datenbanken mit
   streng begrenzten und kontrollierten Zugriffsrechten, damit deren
   Sicherheit gewährleistet ist. Weitere Informationen können Sie unseren
   Sicherheitsstandards entnehmen.
   Geschäftspartner haben Zugang zu bestimmten passwortgeschützten
   Funktionen der Dienstleistungen Amplify oder Engage. Sie sind für die
   Geheimhaltung dieses Passworts verantwortlich. Bitte denken Sie daran,
   dass die Informationsübertragung über das Internet leider nicht
   vollständig sicher ist. Ein häufig vorkommender Internetbetrug wird als
   „Spoofing“ oder „Phishing“ bezeichnet. Dabei erhalten Sie eine E-Mail,
   die von einer vertrauenswürdigen Quelle zu stammen scheint und in der
   Ihre personenbezogenen Daten erfragt werden. Bitte beachten Sie, dass
   wir Ihnen keine E-Mails senden, in denen wir Sie um die Überprüfung
   Ihrer Kreditkarten- oder Bankdaten oder anderer personenbezogener Daten
   bitten. Sollten Sie jemals eine E-Mail erhalten, die den Anschein
   erweckt, von uns zu sein, und in der derartige Daten von Ihnen
   angefordert werden, antworten Sie nicht darauf und klicken Sie auch auf
   keine Links in dieser E-Mail. Leiten Sie stattdessen diese E-Mail an
   uns unter legal@outbrain.com weiter, da wir Fälle möglichen
   Internetbetrugs untersuchen.
   Datenübertragungen außerhalb der EU/des EWR
   Wenn wir personenbezogene Daten aus dem Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum in
   andere Länder übertragen, deren geltende Gesetze nicht über dasselbe
   Datenschutzniveau wie in den europäischen Gebieten verfügen, sorgen wir
   durch eigene Maßnahmen für ein geeignetes Datenschutzniveau. Für Ihre
   Daten gelten somit weiterhin Ihre Rechte und Ihr Datenschutz.
   Beispielsweise verwenden wir anerkannte Vertragsklauseln und weitere
   Maßnahmen, durch die für den Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten durch
   die Empfänger gesorgt ist.
   Weitergabe von Daten
   Zusätzlich zu der beschriebenen Offenlegung Ihrer personenbezogenen
   Daten der einzelnen Nutzerarten legen wir personenbezogene Daten unter
   Umständen wie folgt offen:
     * Innerhalb der durch Outbrain kontrollierten Unternehmensgruppe aus
       internen Gründen, vorrangig für geschäftliche und betriebliche
       Zwecke;

     * Bei einem Geschäftsübergang, wie einer Fusion, dem Erwerb durch ein
       anderes Unternehmen oder dem teilweisen oder vollständigen Verkauf
       unserer Vermögenswerte, gehören Ihre personenbezogenen Daten
       wahrscheinlich zu den übertragenen Vermögenswerten;

     * Bei entsprechenden rechtlichen Anforderungen (z.B. zur
       Unterstützung strafrechtlicher Ermittlungen oder anderer
       Rechtsverfahren); und/oder

     * Als Reaktion auf einen echten Notfall.

   Außerdem kombinieren wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten mit denen anderer
   Nutzer, um Trendinformationen weiterzugeben und Nutzerstatistiken mit
   Dritten zu verbinden, jedoch stets in zusammengefasster und
   anonymisierter Form.
   Datenspeicherung
   Die Speicherfrist für jedes durch Outbrain verwendete Cookie (gleich ob
   unser eigenes oder für uns durch Dritte) ist in der Cookie-Tabelle
   genannt.
   Outbrain verfügt zudem über eine Richtlinie zur Datenspeicherung, in
   der die Speicherfrist für personenbezogene Daten aufgeführt ist, die
   auf unserer Analyse basiert, welche Speicherfrist für bestimmte Daten
   aus rechtlichen oder geschäftlichen Gründen angemessen ist. Wenn wir
   personenbezogene Daten nicht mehr benötigen, löschen oder vernichten
   wir diese auf sichere Weise. Zusammengefasste Daten, durch die kein
   Gerät/Browser (oder keine Person) identifiziert werden kann und die für
   die Berichterstattung und Analyse benötigt werden, behalten wir so
   lange, wie dies wirtschaftlich nötig ist.
   4. Kinder

                                      +

   Keine unserer Dienstleistungen richtet sich an Kinder unter 16 Jahren.
   Wir erfassen wissentlich keine personenbezogenen Daten von Personen
   unter 16 Jahren. Stellen wir bei der Datenerfassung fest, dass ein
   Websitebesucher, ein Nutzer oder ein Geschäftspartner unter 16 ist,
   verwenden oder behalten wir seine/ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht.
   Wenn wir davon Kenntnis erlangen, dass wir unwissentlich
   personenbezogene Daten von einem Kind im Alter von unter 16 erfasst
   haben, ergreifen wir angemessene Anstrengungen zur Löschung dieser
   Daten aus unseren Verzeichnissen. Wenn du ein Kind bist, nutze Outbrain
   nicht, verlasse diese Seite und geh lieber spielen!
   5. Bürger des europäischen Gebiets

                                      +

   In Übereinstimmung mit europäischen Datenschutzgesetzen, insbesondere
   der europäischen Datenschutz-Grundverordnung (DSGVO), gewährt Outbrain
   Bürgern der europäischen Gebiete bestimmte zusätzliche Rechte wie das
   Recht auf Zugriff, Berichtigung, Einspruch, Beschwerde, Löschung und
   Blockierung. Insbesondere:
     * das Recht auf Auskunft darüber, ob und welche personenbezogenen
       Daten von uns verarbeitet werden, sowie das Recht, die Berichtigung
       oder Änderung personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen.
     * unter bestimmten Umständen das Recht, die Löschung
       personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen.
     * unter bestimmten Umständen das Recht, die Einschränkung der
       Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen.
     * den jederzeitigen vollständigen oder teilweisen Widerruf Ihrer
       Zustimmung zur Verarbeitung und Nutzung Ihrer Daten mit zukünftiger
       Gültigkeit.
     * das Recht auf Erhalt Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten in einem
       üblichen, strukturierten und mechanisch lesbaren Format.
     * Kontaktaufnahme mit Ihrem Datenschutzbeauftragten bei Fragen,
       Anmerkungen, Beschwerden oder Anfragen im Zusammenhang mit unserer
       Datenschutzerklärung und der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen
       Daten.
     * das Recht auf Beschwerde bei der zuständigen Aufsichtsbehörde,
       falls Sie der Auffassung sind, dass die Verarbeitung Ihrer
       personenbezogenen Daten gesetzeswidrig ist.

   Neben dem oben Genannten weisen wir in diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen
   auf bestimmte Rechte für Bürger des europäischen Gebiets hin. Laut der
   DSGVO bezeichnet die Formulierung „Bürger aus europäischen Gebieten“
   den Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum (EWR) und die Schweiz. Im Sinne dieser
   Datenschutzbestimmungen umfasst der Begriff „europäische Gebiete“
   weiterhin das Vereinigte Königreich, auch nachdem dieses den
   Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum im Anschluss an den Austritt (Brexit)
   verlässt.
   Bitte senden Sie eine Nachricht an PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com, wenn
   Sie Fragen zur Ausübung dieser Rechte haben.
   6. Datenschutzrechte in Kalifornien

                                      +

   Laut dem California Civil Code, Abschnitte 1798.83-1798.84, sind
   Einwohner Kaliforniens berechtigt, von uns darüber Auskunft zu
   erhalten, welche Kategorien personenbezogener Daten wir an Dritte oder
   verbundene Unternehmen für diese Dritten oder für direkte
   Marketingzwecke verbundener Unternehmen weiterleiten. In dieser
   Auskunft werden die Kategorien der weitergeleiteten Daten
   identifiziert, einschließlich einer Liste der Dritten und verbundenen
   Unternehmen, an die die Daten weitergeleitet wurden, und deren Namen
   und Adressen. Falls Sie Ihren Wohnsitz in Kalifornien unterhalten und
   Sie diese Auskunft einholen möchten, senden Sie bitte eine schriftliche
   Anforderung an PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oder an die folgende
   Anschrift: Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY
   10011. Sie erhalten eine Antwort innerhalb von 30 Tagen.
   7. „Do Not Track“-Angabe

                                      +

   Einige Browser senden an Websites „Do Not Track (DNT)“-Signale, mit
   denen der Website mitgeteilt wird, dass die Aktivitäten des Nutzers
   nicht verfolgt werden sollen. Es besteht jedoch kein allgemeingültiges
   Verständnis darüber, wie DNT-Signale zu interpretieren sind, und daher
   findet durch Outbrain derzeit keine Modifizierung, Änderung oder
   Reaktion auf die DNT-Anforderungen oder -Signale von diesen Browsern
   statt. Wir beobachten weiterhin die Branchenaktivitäten in diesem
   Bereich und bewerten unsere DNT-Verfahren bei Bedarf neu.
   Zwischenzeitlich können Sie eine Reihe anderer durch uns
   bereitgestellter Tools zur Kontrolle der Datenerfassung und -nutzung
   einsetzen, unter anderem die Möglichkeit, im Nutzerbereich den Erhalt
   personalisierter Empfehlungen zu deaktivieren.
   8. Mögliche Änderungen dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen

                                      +

   Wir ändern diese Datenschutzbestimmungen zu gegebener Zeit. Darüber
   informieren wir durch einen deutlichen Hinweis, der für Sie als
   Websitebesucher oder Geschäftspartner erkennbar ist. Wir haben jedoch
   keine Möglichkeit, Nutzern gegenüber eine Aktualisierung anzukündigen.
   Sie sollten diesen Bereich regelmäßig daraufhin überprüfen, ob die
   Datenschutzbestimmungen aktualisiert worden sind. Wir zeigen stets das
   Datum der letzten Änderung der Datenschutzbestimmungen oben auf der
   Seite an, damit Sie wissen, wann diese zuletzt überarbeitet wurden.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                Última actualización: 23 de mayo de 2018

   Outbrain se compromete a proteger tus datos personales. Esta Política
   de privacidad («Política de privacidad») rige el uso por parte de
   Outbrain de los datos recopilados por nosotros, incluyendo todos y cada
   uno de los datos personales. Los datos personales son información que
   se relaciona contigo y que puede identificarte como individuo.
   Utilizamos tus datos personales de conformidad con todas las leyes
   aplicables. Para garantizar el cumplimiento y estar en sintonía con los
   valores de Outbrain en materia de confianza y transparencia, contamos
   con un equipo de defensores de la privacidad responsables de la
   implementación continua de nuestro programa de privacidad global.

                                                           + EXPANDIR TODO

   1. Quiénes somos, qué hacemos, cómo ponerse en contacto con Outbrain,
   nuestro RPD o las autoridades competentes

                                      +

   Quiénes somos:
   Outbrain significa Outbrain Inc, una sociedad de Delaware (EE.UU.) con
   sede en Nueva York y sus filiales (colectivamente, «Outbrain», o
   «nosotros», «nos», «nuestro»). Operamos desde 12 oficinas globales y
   colaboramos con editores y vendedores de todo el mundo.
   Qué hacemos:
   La misión de Outbrain es facilitar recomendaciones interesantes a sus
   usuarios basadas en sus intereses. Para lograr nuestra misión firmamos
   acuerdos con:
     * editores y socios en línea que desean recomendar contenido
       relevante a sus lectores (Outbrain Engage), y
     * anunciantes que quieren que los lectores vean su contenido
       (Outbrain Amplify).

   Cómo ponerse en contacto con nosotros:
   Revisamos regularmente nuestro cumplimiento de la presente Política de
   privacidad. Las preguntas, comentarios y solicitudes relacionadas con
   esta Política de privacidad son bienvenidas y deben dirigirse a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com o por correo postal a Outbrain Inc. 39
   West 13th Street, 3rd floor, Nueva York, NY 10011, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Si Outbrain no responde satisfactoriamente a tus preguntas o
   inquietudes, también puede ponerte en contacto con las siguientes
   personas para obtener asesoramiento, apoyo o realizar reclamaciones:
     * El Responsable de Protección de Datos externo de Outbrain («RPD»):
       ePrivacy GmbH, representada por D. Christoph Bauer. Se puede
       contactar con ePrivacy GmbH directamente en privacy@eprivacy.eu.
     * El Information Commissioner’s Officer, que es el principal servicio
       de supervisión de Outbrain en Europa.

   Órganos de autorregulación
   Outbrain se adhiere a los principios de autorregulación establecidos
   por la Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) y la European Interactive
   Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Somos miembros activos de la
   Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), una asociación dedicada a la
   recopilación responsable de datos y su uso para la publicidad digital.
   Nos adherimos al Código de conducta de NAI para sitios web y móviles.
   Outbrain también se adhiere a los Principios de autorregulación de la
   Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) para la Publicidad conductual en
   línea y al Marco OBA de IAB de Europa.
   2. Tipos de usuarios de Outbrain (incluyendo la gestión del Opt Out)

                                      +

   Gran parte de esta Política de privacidad está dividida en apartados en
   función de la manera en que puedes interactuar con Outbrain. Por favor,
   determina qué tipo de usuario eres. Para cada tipo de usuario hemos
   explicado qué información recopilamos y por qué, qué cookies y otras
   tecnologías similares utilizamos, cómo compartimos dicha información y
   sus derechos.
   Visitantes del sitio: Eres un Visitante del Sitio cuando visitas e
   interactúas con nuestros sitios, páginas web, funciones interactivas,
   blogs y tus respectivos contenidos en Outbrain.com (o cualquier
   derivación, como Outbrain.co.uk, Outbrain.fr, Outbrain.de, etc.) y
   MyOutbrain.com («Nuestros sitios»). Ver más aquí.
   (a) Qué información recopilamos y por qué
   Queremos entender qué servicios te interesan de Nuestros sitios y
   queremos recordarte los servicios que ofrecemos cuando no estés
   visitando Nuestros sitios. Para ello, recopilamos la siguiente
   información sobre ti: (i) dirección IP, (ii) datos del Agente usuario:
   tipo de dispositivo (por ejemplo, iPhone), tipo de navegador (por
   ejemplo, Chrome), sistema operativo (por ejemplo, iOS), (iii) las
   páginas visitadas en Nuestro sitios (por ejemplo, la página «Acerca de»
   de Outbrain), (iv) la hora de la visita (y la zona horaria
   correspondiente) y (v) las URL de referencia y otra información que
   normalmente se transmite en las solicitudes HTTP (por ejemplo, esta
   información nos dice cómo llegaste a Nuestros sitios).
   (b) Qué cookies y otras tecnologías similares utilizamos
   Consulta esta Tabla de cookies en «Visitantes del sitio» para obtener
   una lista detallada de las cookies (y sus correspondientes períodos de
   retención) que utilizamos cuando visitas Nuestros sitios web.
   (c) Cómo podemos intercambiar información
     * Intercambio de información sobre ti en Nuestros sitios.

   En general, no compartimos tus datos personales con terceros para fines
   de marketing o publicidad. Sin embargo, utilizamos varios terceros
   (cada uno de los cuales aparece en esta Tabla de cookies) para
   ayudarnos a vender o a enviarte publicidad. Por ejemplo, algunas de las
   cookies que utilizamos en Nuestros sitios pertenecen a terceros que
   ayudarán a Outbrain a vender o a enviarte publicidad. Exigimos que
   estos terceros y empresas se comprometan a mantener toda la información
   compartida con ellos de manera confidencial y a utilizar la información
   sólo para cumplir con sus obligaciones para con nosotros. Lo anterior
   se logra mediante acuerdos con todos los terceros que tratan datos
   personales en nuestro nombre para asegurarnos de que tratan tus datos
   personales de conformidad con nuestras estrictas instrucciones y todas
   las leyes de protección de datos aplicables. Si realizas una
   publicación en nuestro blog, tu comentario e información estarán
   disponibles públicamente. Póngate en contacto con support@outbrain.com
   para eliminar tu comentario.
     * Uso de servicios de terceros en Nuestros sitios.

   Nuestros sitios contienen enlaces a otras webs que no operamos ni son
   de nuestra propiedad. No controlamos, recomendamos ni respaldamos el
   contenido, los productos, los servicios, las políticas ni las prácticas
   de privacidad de estas webs de terceros. Por ejemplo, en Nuestros
   sitios encontrará iconos en los que podrá hacer clic y que te llevarán
   a la página de Facebook de Outbrain o a la página de LinkedIn de
   Outbrain. Si decides hacer clic en estos enlaces, debes saber que
   Facebook y LinkedIn podrán enviar sus propias cookies a tu dispositivo
   y que podrán recopilar datos personales de forma independiente. Por lo
   tanto, es importante que leas las políticas de privacidad de Facebook o
   LinkedIn.
     * Consulta también el apartado Intercambio de esta Política de
       privacidad.

   (d) Tus derechos
   Los Términos de uso en Nuestro site rigen el uso de Nuestro site y
   también se aplican a ti. Puedes dejar de usar Nuestro site en cualquier
   momento. Si lo haces, es posible que también desees eliminar las
   cookies que hayamos colocado en cualquier dispositivo utilizado para
   acceder a Nuestro site. Si durante tu uso de Nuestros site proporcionas
   tu dirección de correo electrónico, cualquier correo electrónico que
   recibas de Outbrain incluirá la opción «darse de baja».
   Para los usarios del territorio europeo, Outbrain ha implementado una
   plataforma de administración de consentimiento en nuestro site (con la
   tecnología de One Trust), que brinda al usuario la oportunidad de dar
   su aprobación, o no, a cookies y tecnologías de seguimiento similares
   en nuestros sites. Al acceder a nuestros sites, verás un banner en la
   parte inferior de la página con información sobre las cookies que
   utilizamos. Puedes hacer clic en el banner para rechazar cualquier
   cookie que no sea estrictamente necesaria. Aceptar en el banner o hacer
   scrolling/clic en nuestros sites se interpreta como una indicación de
   aceptación. En consecuencia, la base legal de Outbrain para procesar
   datos personales en nuestros sites es el consentimiento. El usuario
   puede retirar su consentimiento en cualquier momento aquí.
   Usuarios: Eres un Usuario cuando visitas una página de un site o
   aplicación de uno de los socios de Outbrain donde esté instalado el
   complemento (widget) de Outbrain («Sitios asociados»). Por ejemplo, si
   visitas https://news.sky.com/uk o www.elpais.com se implementará el
   complemento Outbrain en esas webs. Sabrás que estás interactuando con
   un complemento de Outbrain cuando veas un texto que haga referencia a
   Outbrain (por ejemplo, «Recomendado por Outbrain», «por Outbrain» cerca
   de las recomendaciones). Si hace clic en la referencia con hipervínculo
   a Outbrain, verás un aviso detallado que te permitirá navegar hasta el
   Perfil de intereses de Outbrain, que proporciona una visualización
   general de los tipos de categorías de datos de Outbrain que se pueden
   utilizar para hacer tus recomendaciones. También te ofrece la
   posibilidad de inhabilitar las recomendaciones personalizadas. Ver más
   aquí.
   Ejemplo de un complemento Outbrain
   [rydw687kQ.png]
   (a) Qué información recopilamos y por qué
   Utilizamos identificadores únicos de usuario (UUID, por sus siglas en
   inglés), direcciones IP y otra información de uso para poder ofrecer
   recomendaciones interesantes. Las recomendaciones de Outbrain podrán
   ser pagadas por un anunciante que las vincule a un nuevo sitio web o
   podrán ser orgánicas de tal manera que el enlace sea a otra página en
   el mismo sitio web del editor.
     * UUID.

   Cuando como Usuario visita por primera vez un Sitio asociado (por
   ejemplo, CNN.com), Outbrain introducirá una cookie en tu dispositivo
   para generar un UUID. Catalogamos y analizamos el contenido que
   consumas en los Sitios asociados. Nuestras recomendaciones se basan en:
   (i) el historial de navegación, (ii) los patrones de navegación
   similares de otros Usuarios, (ii) las recomendaciones que son
   generalmente populares entre la audiencia de Outbrain en ese momento,
   (iv) cierta aleatoriedad y (v) los requisitos de orientación que puedan
   ser proporcionados o solicitados por nuestros clientes de Amplify. Como
   ejemplo, Outbrain puede saber que a UUID 123 (que podrías ser tú en su
   iPhone X en el periódico The Guardian usando Chrome como tu navegador)
   le gusta leer sobre destinos vacacionales lejanos y que a la gente que
   le gusta leer sobre destinos vacacionales lejanos también le gusta leer
   sobre comida exótica.
   El UUID es una secuencia de números o letras. Este UUID se vincula tu
   dispositivo y varía dependiendo del navegador que utilices. En otras
   palabras, Outbrain registra un UUID diferente dependiendo del
   dispositivo o navegador que utilices para acceder a los Sitios
   asociados. Por ejemplo, esto significa que tendrás un UUID cuando
   visites un Sitio asociado desde tu teléfono móvil usando el navegador
   Safari y un UUID diferente cuando visites un Sitio asociado desde tu
   iPad usando el navegador Safari. Outbrain combinará y unificará el UUID
   de un dispositivo móvil (portátil o tableta) y el del navegador que
   acceda posteriormente a una aplicación (o viceversa) desde el mismo
   dispositivo.
   Asignar un UUID permite a Outbrain asociar las páginas visitadas y los
   clics realizados en las recomendaciones de Outbrain desde dicho UUID,
   todo ello con el objetivo de proporcionar recomendaciones interesantes.
     * Dirección IP y otra información de uso.

   Recopilamos UUID como se explicó anteriormente y también recopilamos la
   siguiente información sobre ti: (i) dirección IP (y luego anonimizado
   en base a los estándares de la industria); (ii) datos del Agente
   usuario: tipo de dispositivo (por ejemplo, Iphone), tipo de navegador
   (por ejemplo, Chrome), sistema operativo (por ejemplo, iOS), (iii) las
   páginas visitadas, (iv) el momento de la visita y (v) las URL de
   referencia y otra información que normalmente se transmite en las
   solicitudes HTTP.
   La información estadística anterior nos proporciona información sobre
   cuántos Usuarios visitaron una página específica de nuestros Sitios
   asociados en los que está instalado el complemento de Outbrain, cuánto
   tiempo permaneció cada Usuario en esa página, el tipo de contenido en
   esa página sobre el que hicieron clic y cómo interactuaron en general
   con esa página. Esta información sólo son datos personales cuando están
   asociados a un UUID.
   (b) Qué cookies y otras tecnologías similares utilizamos
   Por favor, consulta esta Tabla de cookies en el apartado «Usuarios»
   para obtener una lista detallada de las primeras cookies que utilizamos
   cuando interactúas con Sitios asociados en los que se implementa la
   tecnología de Outbrain.
   Si haces clic en un enlace a una de nuestras recomendaciones, el
   anunciante de Amplify que patrocina la recomendación puede colocar
   cookies en tu dispositivo a través de redirecciones antes de llegar a
   la página de destino de las recomendaciones o al llegar a la página de
   destino. En tales casos, estarás sujeto a la Política de privacidad de
   ese anunciante.
   Además del complemento visible de Outbrain en los Sitios asociados,
   algunos anunciantes de Outbrain podrán implementar el píxel de Outbrain
   en sus sitios web. El píxel de Outbrain determina si el usuario que
   llega a la página donde está instalado el píxel tiene un UUID de
   Outbrain. Si existe un UUID asociado con dicho usuario final, Outbrain
   permitirá a los anunciantes reorientar esos UUID o proporcionará a los
   anunciantes el número total de UUID que llegaron a dicha página. Si no
   había ningún UUID de Outbrain en la página, el píxel de Outbrain no
   recopilará ninguna información sobre el usuario.
   Animamos a los anunciantes a informar sobre el uso del píxel de
   Outbrain en sus propios sitios web. Outbrain no combina información de
   píxeles con el perfil de un UUID.
   Los puntos de datos como las páginas vistas y los clics están
   conectados a un UUID en particular y se retienen durante 13 meses. Por
   ejemplo, si UUID 123 leyó un artículo el 31 de diciembre de 2017, el 1
   de febrero de 2018 ese artículo ya no formará parte del perfil de UUID
   123.
   (c) Cómo podemos intercambiar información
   Outbrain no comparte perfiles de usuario con terceros. Sin embargo, es
   posible que compartamos el UUID con determinados socios con el fin de
   sincronizar las cookies o en función de los requisitos técnicos.
   Consulta también el apartado «Intercambio» de la presente Política de
   privacidad.
   (d) Tus derechos
     * Inhabilitación voluntaria de Outbrain

   Podrás inhabilitar las recomendaciones personalizadas de Outbrain en
   cualquier momento. Por favor, consulta el Perfil de intereses de
   Outbrain para una visualización general de los datos que Outbrain
   conoce sobre ti y que puede utilizar para hacer sus recomendaciones. El
   Perfil de intereses también te ofrece la posibilidad de inhabilitar las
   recomendaciones personalizadas (puedes también hacer opt-out aquí). Ten
   en cuenta que la inhabilitación de los navegadores se realiza a través
   del Perfil de intereses de Outbrain, pero que la inhabilitación de las
   recomendaciones personalizadas en las aplicaciones se realiza a través
   de la configuración de tu dispositivo (hay ejemplos de los pasos a
   seguir en el Perfil de intereses).
   IMPORTANTE – a pesar de que hayas inhabilitado el seguimiento
   personalizado de Outbrain,
     * seguirás viendo las recomendaciones de Outbrain. Inhabilitar el
       seguimiento personalizado de Outbrain no significa que vayas a
       dejar de recibir recomendaciones de Outbrain. Por el contrario,
       significa que las recomendaciones de Outbrain no serán
       personalizadas. Las recomendaciones seguirán utilizando información
       sobre el documento que estás consultando (es decir, información
       contextual) para proporcionarte recomendaciones en esa página.

     * La inhabilitación voluntaria está basada en las cookies y es
       específica del dispositivo/navegador. Si navegas por la página web
       desde varios dispositivos o navegadores, deberás inhabilitar cada
       dispositivo o navegador para asegurarte de que no realizamos el
       seguimiento personalizado en ninguno ellos. Por la misma razón, si
       compras un dispositivo nuevo, cambias de navegador o borra (o
       limpia) la cookie de inhabilitación tendrás que inhabilitarla de
       nuevo. Inhabilitar el seguimiento personalizado no es lo mismo que
       bloquear las cookies.

     * Para garantizar la eliminación del perfil vinculado a su UUID, no
       habilites Outbrain durante al menos 21 días. Tu inhabilitación de
       las recomendaciones personalizadas de Outbrain será efectiva de
       manera inmediata. Sin embargo, si tu navegador permite el
       almacenamiento local y habilitas las recomendaciones personalizadas
       de Outbrain dentro de los 21 días siguientes a tu inhabilitación,
       es posible que tu perfil anterior se vincule de nuevo a su UUID. Si
       no habilitas Outbrain en un plazo de 21 días, se eliminará tu
       perfil y no podrás recuperarse.

     * Al igual que con la mayoría de los opt-out, también la opción de
       opt-out del navegador de Outbrain se basa en una cookie. La cookie
       de opt-out voluntaria persiste para cumplir con las preferencias
       del usuario. Sin embargo, la función de "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention " en iOS11 puede afectar la persistencia de las cookies
       en los sitios web después de una ventana de 24 horas. Sugerimos
       usar otro navegador o considerar bloquear todas las cookies de
       terceros desde el navegador para que se efectúe el“opt-out" sin
       tener que depender de la metodología de exclusión voluntaria de
       ninguna empresa.

     * Opciones adicionales de inhabilitación voluntaria. También podrás
       inhabilitar los anuncios personalizados que te ofrecemos nosotros u
       otras compañías de publicidad a través de herramientas impulsadas
       por la industria, como la NAI o las diversas páginas basadas en la
       DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices ; o EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
       Visitar las páginas de elección del consumidor de la NAI, DAA, DAAC
       o EDAA te permitirá inhabilitar todos o algunos de los servicios de
       los miembros participantes. Al igual que la inhabilitación de
       Outbrain, estas inhabilitaciones no significan que ya no recibirás
       ninguna publicidad, sino que los anuncios simplemente no serán
       personalizados. Podrás continuar recibiendo anuncios, por ejemplo,
       basados en el sitio web en particular que estás viendo (es decir,
       anuncios basados en el contexto). Además, si tus navegadores están
       configurados para rechazar las cookies cuando visitas las páginas
       de elección del consumidor de la DAA, DAAC o EDAA, es posible que
       no se lleve a cabo la inhabilitación.

     * Base legal. La base legal de Outbrain para el tratamiento de los
       datos personales de un Usuario reside en la base legal determinada
       para cada uno de nuestros Sitios asociados. Cada Sitio asociado se
       basará en el consentimiento o interés legítimo. Consulta la
       Política de privacidad de los Sitios asociados para obtener más
       información sobre su base legal. Si un socio se basa en el
       consentimiento, Outbrain no introducirá ninguna cookie si tu no has
       proporcionado el consentimiento en dicho Sitio asociado.

   Socios comerciales: te conviertes en Socio comercial cuando te
   registras (o envías un correo electrónico a Outbrain) en nombre de la
   compañía para la que trabajas para utilizar los Servicios Outbrain
   Amplify o Outbrain Engage. Ver más aquí.
   (a) Qué información recopilamos y por qué
   Puede que proporciones ciertos datos personales (como la dirección de
   correo electrónico) cuando te suscribas a los servicios de Amplify o
   Engage o alternativamente cuando te pongas en contacto o interactúes
   con nosotros. Si solicitas convertirte en Socio comercial, es posible
   que te solicitemos información adicional a través de formularios de
   solicitud de anunciantes, órdenes de inserción y otros formularios.
   Recopilamos automáticamente información acerca de las acciones de tu
   nombre de usuario en el panel de control de Outbrain. Por ejemplo, como
   un Socio comercial de Amplify, si cambias el coste por clic para una de
   tus campañas, el registro de auditoría de Outbrain tendrá un registro
   de todas esas acciones.
     * Recopilamos y tratamos los datos personales anteriores con el fin
       de cumplir nuestras obligaciones en virtud de nuestro acuerdo como
       Socio comercial (o posible Socio comercial) con usted, incluido
       para:

     * responder a tus preguntas y solicitudes;

     * proporcionarte acceso a ciertas funciones y características de
       nuestros servicios Amplify o Engage (por ejemplo, para proporcionar
       y mantener tu cuenta del panel de control);

     * verificar tu identidad;

     * informarte sobre tu cuenta, nuestros productos y promociones
       disponibles que puedan ser relevantes para tu uso del servicio
       Amplify o Engage.

   (b) Qué cookies y otras tecnologías similares utilizamos
   Consulta esta Tabla de cookies en el apartado «Socios comerciales» para
   obtener una lista detallada de las cookies (y sus correspondientes
   períodos de retención) que empleamos con los Socios comerciales.
   (c) Cómo podemos compartir información con cualquier persona
   Podemos revelar cierta información de los Socios comerciales a
   proveedores, contratistas u otros que ayuden a Outbrain a prestar los
   servicios (por ejemplo, procesamiento de tarjetas de crédito). Consulta
   también el apartado Intercambio de esta Política de privacidad.
   (d) Tus derechos
   Si como Socio comercial deseas verificar, corregir, actualizar o
   solicitar la desactivación de tu información, puedes ir al panel de
   control de Outbrain para editar tus preferencias de perfil o ponerte en
   contacto con nosotros en support@outbrain.com. Si estás recibiendo
   correos electrónicos de Outbrain, puedes «darte de baja» haciendo uso
   del enlace en el correo electrónico. Ten en cuenta que la cancelación
   de la suscripción no inhabilitará las notificaciones que sean críticas
   para proporcionar los servicios de Amplify o Engage (por ejemplo,
   facturas por correo electrónico).
   La base legal de Outbrain para tratar los datos personales de los
   Socios comerciales es el interés legítimo.
   3. Cómo protegemos la información, las transmisiones fuera del EEE, el
   intercambio y la retención

                                      +

   Seguridad
   Outbrain tiene un equipo de seguridad específico. Mantenemos un
   estricto control de los datos que recopilamos y los retenemos en bases
   de datos seguras y protegidas por cortafuegos con derechos de acceso
   estrictamente limitados y controlados, para garantizar su seguridad.
   Consulta nuestras normas de seguridad para obtener más información.
   Los socios comerciales tienen acceso a determinadas funciones
   protegidas por contraseña del servicio Amplify o Engage. Ellos son
   responsables de mantener la confidencialidad de la contraseña. Por
   favor, recuerda que, lamentablemente, la transmisión de información a
   través de Internet no es completamente segura. El «spoofing» o
   «phishing» son algunas de las estafas más comunes en Internet. Esto se
   produce cuando recibes un correo electrónico que parece proceder de una
   fuente legítima que te solicita datos personales. Ten en cuenta que no
   te enviaremos ningún correo electrónico solicitándote que verifiques la
   información de tu tarjeta de crédito, bancaria o cualquier otro dato
   personal. Si alguna vez recibes un correo electrónico que parece ser de
   nuestra parte solicitándote dicha información, no respondas a él y no
   haga clic en ninguno de los enlaces que aparecen en el correo
   electrónico. En su lugar, reenvíenos el correo electrónico a
   legal@outbrain.com, ya que investigaremos casos de posible fraude en
   Internet.
   Transferencias de datos fuera de la UE/EEE
   Cuando transferimos datos personales desde el Espacio Económico Europeo
   a otros países en los que las leyes aplicables no ofrecen el mismo
   nivel de protección de la privacidad de los datos que en el territorio
   europeo, adoptamos medidas para proporcionar un nivel adecuado de
   protección de los datos. En otras palabras, tus derechos y niveles de
   protección se mantienen con tus datos. Por ejemplo, utilizamos
   cláusulas contractuales aprobadas y otras medidas diseñadas para
   asegurar que los destinatarios de tus datos personales los protejan.
   Intercambio
   Además de la descripción de cómo podemos revelar tus datos personales
   en función de cada tipo de usuario, también podemos revelar datos
   personales de la siguiente manera:
     * Dentro de la familia de empresas controladas por Outbrain por
       razones internas, principalmente con fines comerciales y
       operativos.

     * Si pasamos por una transición de negocios, como una fusión,
       adquisición por otra compañía o venta de todos o parte de nuestros
       activos, es probable que tus datos personales se encuentren entre
       los activos transferidos.

     * Cuando la ley así lo requiera (por ejemplo, para cooperar con
       investigaciones de las fuerzas del orden u otros procedimientos
       legales).

     * Para responder a una verdadera emergencia.

   Además, combinamos tus datos personales con los de otros usuarios para
   compartir información de tendencias y agregar estadísticas de usuarios
   con terceros, siempre de forma agregada y anónima.
   Retención de datos
   El período de retención para cada una de las cookies que utiliza
   Outbrain (ya sea por su cuenta o en nuestro nombre por parte de
   terceros) se indica en la Tabla de cookies.
   Outbrain también mantiene una Política de Retención de Datos que
   detalla el período de retención de datos personales sobre la base de
   nuestro análisis sobre cuánto tiempo es necesario retener
   razonablemente los datos específicos para fines legales o comerciales.
   Cuando ya no necesitamos datos personales, los borraremos o
   destruiremos de forma segura. Los datos agregados, que no puedan
   identificar un dispositivo/navegador (o a una persona) y se utilicen
   con fines de información y análisis, se mantendrán durante el tiempo
   que sea necesario desde el punto de vista comercial.
   4. Niños

                                      +

   Ninguno de nuestros servicios está dirigido a niños menores de 16 años.
   No recopilamos de manera consciente datos personales de ninguna persona
   menor de 16 años de edad. Si en el momento de la recopilación
   determinamos que un Visitante del sitio, un Usuario o un Socio
   comercial es menor de 16 años, no utilizaremos ni mantendremos tus
   datos personales. Si tenemos constancia de que sin saberlo hemos
   recopilado datos personales de un menor de 16 años, haremos todos los
   esfuerzos razonables para eliminar dicha información de nuestros
   registros. ¡Si eres un niño, ve a jugar al patio, no uses ni
   interactúes con Outbrain!
   5. Ciudadanos del territorio europeo

                                      +

   En cumplimiento de la legislación europea en materia de privacidad, en
   particular el Reglamento General de Protección de Datos de la Unión
   Europea (RGPD), Outbrain proporciona derechos adicionales específicos a
   los ciudadanos del territorio europeo, tales como el derecho de acceso,
   rectificación, oposición, reclamación, supresión y bloqueo. En
   concreto:
     * El derecho a solicitar información sobre si nosotros tratamos tus
       datos personales y, en caso afirmativo, qué datos personales son
       tratados, y el derecho a exigir que los datos personales sean
       rectificados o modificados.
     * En determinadas circunstancias, el derecho a solicitar la supresión
       de los datos personales.
     * En determinadas circunstancias, el derecho a exigir que se
       restrinja el tratamiento de datos personales.
     * El derecho a retirar tu consentimiento para el tratamiento y uso de
       sus datos total o parcialmente en cualquier momento a través de una
       solicitud en el futuro.
     * El derecho a obtener tus datos personales en un formato común,
       estructurado y legible mecánicamente.
     * El derecho a ponerte en contacto con nuestro responsable de
       protección de datos si tienes alguna pregunta, comentario,
       reclamación o solicitud en relación con nuestra declaración sobre
       la protección de datos y el tratamiento de tus datos personales.
     * El derecho a presentar una reclamación ante la autoridad
       supervisora responsable si crees que el tratamiento de tus datos
       personales infringe la legislación.

   Envía un correo electrónico a privacyquestions@outbrain.com con
   cualquier pregunta sobre el ejercicio de cualquiera de los derechos
   anteriores.
   Además de lo anterior, hacemos referencia a ciertos derechos de los
   ciudadanos del territorio europeo a través de la presente Política de
   Privacidad. De conformidad con el RGPD, por ciudadanos del «territorio
   europeo» se entenderán los ciudadanos del Espacio Económico Europeo
   (EEE) y Suiza. A los efectos de la presente Política de privacidad, el
   término «territorio europeo» seguirá incluyendo al Reino Unido, incluso
   después de que el Reino Unido abandone el Espacio Económico Europeo
   tras el Brexit.
   6. Derechos de Privacidad de California

                                      +

   En virtud de los artículos 1798.83-1798.84 del Código Civil de
   California, los residentes de California tienen derecho a solicitarnos
   un aviso que describa las categorías de información personal que
   compartimos con terceros o filiales corporativas para los propósitos de
   marketing directo de dichos terceros o filiales corporativas. Ese aviso
   identificará las categorías de información compartida e incluirá una
   lista de los terceros y filiales con los que se compartió, junto con
   tus nombres y direcciones. Si eres residente de California y deseas una
   copia de este aviso, por favor envía una solicitud por escrito a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com o envíala a la siguiente dirección:
   Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, Nueva York, NY 10011.
   Por favor, espera 30 días para recibir una respuesta.
   7. Declaración de «no rastreo» (Do Not Track)

                                      +

   Algunos navegadores transmiten señales de «no rastreo» (DNT, por sus
   siglas en inglés) a webs. Debido a que no existe una idea común de cómo
   interpretar la señal DNT, Outbrain no altera, cambia ni responde
   actualmente a las peticiones o señales DNT de estos navegadores.
   Seguiremos supervisando la actividad del sector en esta área y
   volveremos a evaluar nuestras prácticas de DNT según sea necesario.
   Mientras tanto, puedes utilizar el resto de las herramientas que
   ofrecemos para controlar la recopilación y el uso de datos, incluida la
   posibilidad de inhabilitar las recomendaciones personalizadas en el
   apartado «Usuarios».
   8. Cómo puede cambiar esta Política de privacidad

                                      +

   Podemos cambiar esta Política de privacidad cada cierto tiempo.
   Colocaremos un aviso que podrás ver claramente como Visitante del Sitio
   o Socio comercial, pero no disponemos de ningún medio para avisar a los
   Usuarios de las actualizaciones. Deberás comprobar, periódicamente, si
   se ha actualizado la Política de privacidad. Siempre mostraremos la
   fecha de la última modificación de la Política de privacidad en la
   parte superior de la página para que puedas saber cuándo se revisó por
   última vez.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                      Dernière mise à jour : 23 mai 2018

   Outbrain s’engage à protéger vos données personnelles. Cette politique
   de confidentialité (la « Politique de confidentialité ») régit
   l’utilisation des données collectées par Outbrain, notamment les
   données personnelles, quelles qu’elles soient. Par données
   personnelles, nous entendons les informations qui vous concernent et
   permettent éventuellement de vous identifier. Nous utilisons vos
   données personnelles conformément aux lois en vigueur. Afin de garantir
   la conformité et de nous aligner sur les valeurs d’Outbrain en matière
   de confiance et de transparence, nous disposons d’une équipe de «
   privacy champions » chargée de mettre en œuvre en continu notre
   programme mondial de respect de la vie privée.

                                                        + DÉVELOPPER TOUT

   1. Qui sommes-nous, que faisons-nous, comment contacter Outbrain, notre
   DPO ou les autorités compétentes

                                      +

   Qui sommes-nous ?
   Outbrain fait référence à Outbrain Inc., une société du Delaware
   (États-Unis) dont le siège se trouve à New York, et à ses succursales
   affiliées (collectivement désignées par les termes « Outbrain », ou «
   nous », « notre », « nos »). Nous exerçons nos activités à partir de 12
   bureaux internationaux et travaillons en partenariat avec des éditeurs
   et des annonceurs dans le monde entier.
   Que faisons-nous ?
   La mission d’Outbrain est de proposer des recommandations intéressantes
   et pertinentes aux utilisateurs en fonction de leurs centres d’intérêt.
   Pour remplir cette mission, nous concluons des accords avec :
     * des éditeurs en ligne et des partenaires qui souhaitent recommander
       des contenus pertinents à leurs utilisateurs (il s’agit d’Outbrain
       Engage) ; et

     * des annonceurs qui souhaitent que les utilisateurs visualisent
       leurs contenus (il s’agit d’Outbrain Amplify).

   Comment nous contacter ?
   Les questions, commentaires et demandes concernant cette Politique de
   confidentialité sont les bienvenus. Ils doivent être adressés à
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou par courrier à Outbrain Inc., 39 West
   13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, USA, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Si Outbrain ne répond pas de manière satisfaisante à vos questions ou
   inquiétudes, vous pouvez également contacter, pour des conseils, une
   assistance ou des réclamations :
     * le DPO ou délégué à la protection des données externe d’Outbrain :
       ePrivacy GmbH, représenté par Christoph Bauer. ePrivacy GmbH peut
       être contacté directement à l’adresse suivante privacy@eprivacy.eu
       ; et/ou
     * l’Information Commissioner’s Officer, le service de supervision
       principal d’Outbrain pour les pays européens.

   Les organismes d’autorégulation
   Outbrain adhère aux principes d’autorégulation définis par la Digital
   Advertising Alliance (DAA) et l’European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Nous sommes membres de plein droit de la
   Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), une association dédiée à une
   collecte et une utilisation responsable des données à des fins de
   publicité numérique. Nous adhérons au code de bonne conduite de la NAI
   pour le Web et les appareils mobiles. Outbrain adhère également aux
   principes d’autorégulation de l’Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB)
   pour la publicité comportementale en ligne et à l’OBA Framework de
   l’IAB Europe.
   2. Types d’utilisateurs Outbrain (et gestion d'exclusion "opt-out")

                                      +

   La majeure partie de cette Politique de confidentialité est divisée en
   sections basées sur la manière dont vous interagissez avec Outbrain.
   Veuillez déterminer quel type d’utilisateur vous êtes. Pour chaque type
   d’utilisateur, nous détaillons quelles informations nous collectons et
   pourquoi, quels témoins de connexion ou « cookies » et autres
   technologies similaires nous utilisons, comment nous partageons ces
   informations, et vos droits.
   Visiteurs du site: Vous êtes un Visiteur du site quand vous consultez
   et interagissez avec nos sites et pages Web, nos fonctionnalités
   interactives, nos blogs et leurs contenus sur Outbrain.com (ou tout
   autre site dérivé comme Outbrain.co.uk ; Outbrain.fr ; outbrain.de
   etc.) et MyOutbrain.com (« Nos Sites »). Voir plus ici.
   (a) Quelles informations collectons-nous et pourquoi ?
   Nous souhaitons comprendre quels services sur nos Sites vous
   intéressent et vous rappeler les services que nous proposons quand vous
   n’êtes pas sur nos Sites. Pour ce faire, nous collectons auprès de vous
   les informations suivantes : (i) l’adresse IP; (ii) les données agent
   utilisateur : le type d’appareil (ex : iPhone), le type de navigateur
   (ex : Chrome), le système d’exploitation (ex : iOS) ; (iii) les pages
   visitées sur notre Site (ex : la page « À propos » d’Outbrain ») ; (iv)
   l’heure de visite (et le fuseau horaire correspondant) ; et (v) les URL
   correspondantes et autres informations normalement transmises dans les
   requêtes HTTP (par exemple ces informations nous indiquent comment vous
   êtes arrivé sur nos Sites).
   (b) Quels cookies et autres technologies similaires utilisons-nous ?
   Veuillez consulter la Table des cookies sous « Visiteurs du site » pour
   une liste détaillée des cookies (et leurs durées de conservation
   associées) que nous utilisons quand vous visitez nos Sites.
   (c) Comment sommes-nous susceptibles de partager les informations ?
     * Le partage des informations que nous obtenons sur vous sur nos
       Sites.

   De manière générale, nous ne partageons pas les données personnelles
   vous concernant avec des tiers à des fins de marketing ou de publicité.
   Toutefois, nous faisons appel à divers tiers (chacun d’entre eux étant
   listé dans la Table de cookies) pour nous aider dans nos démarches
   commerciales et publicitaires envers vous. Certains des cookies que
   nous utilisons sur nos Sites appartiennent ainsi à des tiers qui
   aideront Outbrain à vous proposer des services ou des publicités. Nous
   demandons à ces tiers et entreprises d’accepter de préserver la
   confidentialité de toutes les informations que nous partageons avec eux
   et de ne les utiliser que pour remplir leurs obligations envers nous.
   Pour ce faire, nous concluons des accords avec tous les tiers qui
   traitent les données personnelles en notre nom afin de garantir qu’ils
   le font en conformité avec nos instructions rigoureuses et toutes les
   lois de protection des données applicables. Si vous publiez un post sur
   notre blog, vos commentaires et informations seront disponibles
   publiquement. Veuillez contacter support@outbrain.com pour supprimer
   vos commentaires.
     * Utilisation de services de tiers sur nos Sites.

   Nos Sites contiennent des liens vers d’autres sites Web dont nous ne
   sommes ni propriétaires, ni opérateurs. Nous ne contrôlons, ne
   recommandons et ne cautionnons pas le contenu, les produits, les
   services, les politiques de confidentialité ou les pratiques de ces
   sites Web tiers. Vous noterez par exemple sur nos Sites la présence
   d’icônes que vous pouvez cliquer pour accéder à la page Facebook ou
   LinkedIn d’Outbrain. Si vous choisissez de cliquer sur ces liens, vous
   devez savoir que Facebook et LinkedIn peuvent déposer leurs propres
   cookies sur votre appareil et collecter indépendamment des données
   personnelles. Il est donc important que vous lisiez les politiques de
   confidentialité de Facebook et/ou de LinkedIn.
     * Veuillez aussi consulter la section Partage de la présente
       Politique de confidentialité.

   (d) Vos droits
   Les Conditions d’utilisation sur notre Site régissent l’utilisation de
   notre Site et s’appliquent également à vous. Vous pouvez cesser
   d’utiliser notre Site à tout moment. Dans ce cas, vous souhaiterez
   peut-être aussi supprimer tout cookie placé sur les appareils, quels
   qu’ils soient, utilisés pour accéder à notre Site. Si, en cours
   d’utilisation de nos Sites vous avez fourni une adresse e-mail, chaque
   e-mail que vous recevez de la part d’Outbrain comporte une option de
   désabonnement (« unsubscribe »).
   Pour les visiteurs provenant des pays Européens, Outbrain a installé
   sur ses sites une CMP - plateforme de gestion du consentement - opérée
   par One Trust, qui donne aux utilisateurs la possibilité de consentir,
   ou non, à la dépose de cookies et autres technologies de ciblage. En
   accédant à nos sites, vous verrez une bannière située en bas de page
   donnant des informations sur les cookies que nous utilisons. Vous
   pouvez cliquer sur cette bannière pour supprimer les cookies, à
   l’exception de ceux strictement nécessaires. Le fait de cliquer sur
   “Accept” dans la bannière, de poursuivre votre navigation ou de cliquer
   dans un lien sur nos sites est une indication de votre consentement.
   Utilisateurs: Vous êtes un Utilisateur si vous visitez la page d’un
   site ou une application d’un des partenaires d’Outbrain sur laquelle
   est installée le widget Outbrain (les « Sites de partenaires »). Si
   vous vous rendez par exemple sur https://news.sky.com/uk,
   www.spiegel.de ou www.cnn.com, le widget Outbrain est installé sur ces
   sites Web. Les mentions référençant Outbrain (ex : « Recommandé par
   Outbrain », « by Outbrain » à côté des recommandations) vous indiquent
   la présence d’un widget Outbrain. Si vous cliquez sur le lien de la
   référence Outbrain, vous visualiserez une notification détaillée qui
   vous permettra de vous rendre sur le Portail des Centres d’Intérêt
   Outbrain, qui vous donne une vision globale des types de catégories de
   données que nous pouvons utiliser pour faire les recommandations. Ce
   portail vous donne également la possibilité d’opter pour une demande
   d’exclusion des recommandations personnalisées (« opt-out »). Voir plus
   ici.
   Exemple de widget Outbrain
   [SJ4v1w7y7.png]
   (a) Quelles informations collectons-nous et pourquoi ?
   Nous utilisons les UUID, l’adresse IP et autres informations d’usage
   afin de proposer des recommandations intéressantes aux utilisateurs.
   Les recommandations d’Outbrain peuvent être payées par un annonceur
   pour vous mettre en relation avec un nouveau site Web. Elles peuvent
   également être organiques avec un lien vers une autre page du site Web
   du même éditeur.
     * UUID.

   Quand vous consultez un Site de Partenaire (ex : CNN.com) en tant
   qu’Utilisateur pour la première fois, Outbrain dépose un cookie sur
   votre appareil afin de générer un UUID (identifiant utilisateur
   unique). Nous cataloguons et analysons le contenu que vous parcourez
   sur les Sites de Partenaires. Nos recommandations se basent sur : (i)
   l’historique de navigation ; (ii) les profils de consommation
   similaires d’autres Utilisateurs ; (ii) les recommandations
   généralement populaires auprès des utilisateurs d’Outbrain ; (iv)
   quelques données aléatoires, et (v) les exigences de ciblage
   éventuellement fournies ou demandées par nos clients Amplify. À titre
   d’exemple, Outbrain peut savoir que l’UUID 123 (cela pourrait être vous
   sur votre iPhone X lisant le Guardian en utilisant Chrome comme
   navigateur) aime lire des articles sur les voyages et que les personnes
   qui aiment lire ce type d’article aiment aussi les contenus sur la
   nourriture exotique.
   L’UUID est une séquence de chiffres et/ou de lettres. Cet UUID est
   associé à votre appareil et varie en fonction du navigateur que vous
   utilisez. Autrement dit, Outbrain enregistre un UUID différent selon le
   navigateur et/ou appareil que vous utilisez pour accéder aux Sites de
   Partenaires. Ceci signifie que vous aurez par exemple un UUID quand
   vous consultez un Site de Partenaire depuis votre téléphone portable
   avec le navigateur Safari et un autre UUID pour la consultation d’un
   Site de Partenaire depuis votre iPad avec le navigateur Safari.
   Outbrain va combiner et consolider l’UUID depuis un appareil mobile
   (portatif ou tablette) et un navigateur qui accède ensuite à
   l’application (ou vice versa) à partir du même appareil.
   L’affectation d’un UUID permet à Outbrain d’associer les pages vues et
   les clics sur les recommandations d’Outbrain à partir de cet UUID, avec
   pour objectif de vous proposer des recommandations intéressantes et
   pertinentes en fonction de vos centres d’intérêt.
     * Adresse IP et autres informations d’usage.

   Nous recueillons l’UUID comme expliqué précédemment, nous collectons
   également les informations suivantes : (i) l’adresse IP (puis rendus
   anonymes selon les normes de l'industrie); ; (ii) les données agent
   utilisateur : le type d’appareil (ex : iPhone) ; le type de navigateur
   (ex : Chrome), le système d’exploitation (ex : iOS) ; (iii) les pages
   visitées ; (iv) l’heure de visite ; et (v) les URL correspondantes et
   autres informations normalement transmises dans les requêtes HTTP.
   Les informations statistiques ci-dessus nous donnent des informations
   sur le nombre d’Utilisateurs consultant une page spécifique sur les
   Sites de Partenaires sur lesquels le widget Outbrain est installé, le
   temps que chaque Utilisateur a passé sur cette page, le type de contenu
   sur lequel ils ont cliqué et la manière générale dont ils ont interagi
   avec cette page. Ces informations ne constituent des informations
   personnelles que quand elles sont associées à un UUID.
   (b) Quels cookies et autres technologies similaires utilisons-nous ?
   Veuillez consulter la Table des cookies sous « Utilisateurs » pour une
   liste détaillée des cookies propriétaires que nous utilisons quand vous
   interagissez avec des Sites de Partenaires où la technologie Outbrain
   est mise en œuvre.
   Si vous cliquez sur le lien d’une de nos recommandations, l’annonceur
   Amplify qui sponsorise la recommandation est susceptible de placer des
   cookies sur votre appareil lors de la redirection avant d’arriver sur
   la page de destination ou en atteignant la page de destination. Dans de
   tels cas, vous serez soumis à la politique de confidentialité de
   l’annonceur.
   En complément du widget visible d’Outbrain sur nos Sites de
   Partenaires, certains annonceurs Outbrain peuvent installer le pixel
   Outbrain sur leurs sites Web. Le pixel Outbrain détermine si
   l’utilisateur qui atteint la page où le pixel est installé a un UUID
   Outbrain. S’il existe un UUID associé avec un utilisateur final,
   Outbrain permet aux annonceurs de recibler ces UUID et/ou leur donne le
   nombre total d’UUID ayant atteint cette page. S’il n’existe pas d’UUID
   Outbrain sur la page, le pixel Outbrain ne collecte aucune information
   sur l’utilisateur.
   Nous encourageons les annonceurs à divulguer l’utilisation du pixel
   Outbrain sur leurs propres sites Web. Outbrain ne combine aucune
   information pixel avec le profil d’un UUID.
   Les indicateurs sur la visualisation des pages ou les clics reliés à un
   UUID en particulier sont conservés pour une durée de 13 mois. Par
   exemple, si l’UUID 123 lit un article le 31 décembre 2017, cet article
   ne fera plus partie du profil de l’UUID 123 le 1 ^er février 2018.
   (c) Comment sommes-nous susceptibles de partager les informations ?
   Outbrain ne partage pas de profils d’Utilisateurs avec des tiers, quels
   qu’ils soient. Cependant, nous sommes susceptibles de partager l’UUID
   avec certains partenaires à des fins de synchronisation des cookies ou
   en raison d’exigences techniques. Veuillez également consulter la
   section Partage de la présente Politique de confidentialité.
   (d) Vos droits
   Demande d’exclusion (« opt-out ») d’Outbrain. Vous pouvez demander
   votre exclusion des recommandations personnalisées à tout moment.
   Veuillez consulter également le Profil d’intérêts d’Outbrain pour une
   vue générale des données qu’Outbrain connaît à votre sujet et peut
   utiliser pour faire ses recommandations. Le Profil d’intérêts vous
   donne également la possibilité d’ opter pour une exclusion des
   recommandations personnalisées (vous pouvez également demander une
   exclusion (“opt-out”) en cliquant ici). Veuillez noter que cette
   demande d’exclusion pour les navigateurs se fait par le Profil
   d’intérêts d’Outbrain, mais qu’elle se fait via les paramètres de votre
   appareil pour les applications (vous trouverez des exemples d’étapes à
   suivre dans le Profil d’intérêts).
   REMARQUE IMPORTANTE – même si vous avez opté pour une exclusion
   d’Outbrain,
     * vous continuerez à voir des recommandations Outbrain. Le fait de
       demander votre exclusion du suivi personnalisé d’Outbrain ne
       signifie pas que vous cesserez de recevoir des recommandations
       d’Outbrain. Cela signifie que les recommandations d’Outbrain ne
       seront pas personnalisées. Les recommandations continueront à
       utiliser les informations sur la page que vous êtes en train de
       parcourir (c.-à-d. les informations contextuelles) pour vous
       proposer des recommandations sur cette page.

     * L’exclusion de recommandations personnalisées est fondée sur les
       cookies et spécifique à un appareil/navigateur. Si vous naviguez
       sur Internet depuis plusieurs appareils et/ou navigateurs, vous
       devrez demander l’exclusion pour chaque appareil et/ou navigateur
       pour garantir que nous empêchons un suivi de personnalisation sur
       tous. Pour la même raison, si vous achetez un nouvel appareil,
       changez de navigateurs ou supprimez (ou effacez) le cookie
       d’exclusion, vous devrez procéder de nouveau à votre demande
       d’exclusion. Demander l’exclusion du suivi de personnalisation
       n’est pas la même chose que bloquer les cookies.

     * Pour garantir la suppression du profil lié à votre UUID, ne
       procédez pas à l’opération inverse (demande d’inclusion ou « opt-in
       » d’Outbrain) pendant au moins 21 jours. Votre demande d’exclusion
       des recommandations personnalisées d’Outbrain prend effet
       immédiatement. Cependant, si votre navigateur autorise un stockage
       local, et si vous demandez votre inclusion des recommandations
       personnalisées dans les 21 jours suivant votre demande d’exclusion,
       il est possible que votre profil antérieur soit reconnecté à votre
       UUID. Si vous ne procédez pas à une nouvelle demande d’inclusion
       dans les 21 jours, votre profil sera supprimé et ne pourra pas être
       récupéré.

     * Comme pour la plupart des cookies opt-out, le processus d’opt-out
       Outbrain sur navigateur s'appuie sur un cookie. Le cookie opt-out
       est destiné à être persistant afin d'honorer les préférences de
       l'utilisateur. Cependant, la fonction "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention" pour IPhone de l'iOS11 peut avoir un impact sur la
       persistance des cookies sur les sites Web qui affichent une fenêtre
       de 24 heures. Nous vous suggérons d'utiliser un autre navigateur ou
       d'envisager de bloquer tous les cookies d'une tierce partie du
       navigateur afin que vous soyez « désactivés » sans avoir besoin de
       vous fier à la méthode d'exclusion d’autres entreprises.

     * Options complémentaires d’exclusion. Vous pouvez également demander
       votre exclusion de la réception de publicités personnalisées de
       notre part ou de celle d’autres sociétés publicitaires à l’aide
       d’outils fournis par l’industrie comme la NAI ou des pages basées
       sur la DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices ; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices, et/ou EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
       En vous rendant sur les pages dédiées à la gestion des préférences
       consommateur de la NAI, la DAA, la DACC (Alliance de la publicité
       numérique du Canada) ou de l’EDAA, vous pourrez refuser tout ou
       partie des services de leurs membres. Comme dans le cas de
       l’exclusion pour Outbrain, ces retraits ne signifient pas que vous
       ne recevrez plus aucune publicité, mais les publicités que vous
       recevrez ne seront plus personnalisées. Vous êtes susceptible de
       continuer à recevoir des publicités, par exemple basées sur le site
       Web en particulier que vous êtes en train de consulter (c.-à-d. des
       publicités liées au contexte). Par ailleurs, si vos navigateurs
       sont configurés pour rejeter les cookies quand vous visitez les
       pages du consommateur de la DAA, de la DAAC ou de l’EDAA, votre
       exclusion (ou retrait) peut ne pas être effective.

     * Base juridique. La base juridique d’Outbrain pour le traitement des
       données personnelles d’un Utilisateur se fonde sur la base
       juridique déterminée par chacun des Sites de Partenaires. Chaque
       Site de Partenaire s’appuiera sur le consentement ou l’intérêt
       légitime. Veuillez consulter la politique de confidentialité
       applicable des Sites de Partenaires pour plus d’informations sur
       leurs bases juridiques. Si un Partenaire s’appuie sur le
       consentement, Outbrain ne déposera pas de cookie sur votre appareil
       si vous n’avez pas donné votre consentement sur le Site de
       Partenaire concerné.

   Partenaires commerciaux: Vous êtes un Partenaire commercial si vous
   vous inscrivez (ou échangez des e-mails avec Outbrain) au nom de la
   société dans laquelle vous travaillez pour l’utilisation des services
   Outbrain Amplify ou Outbrain Engage. Voir plus ici.
   (a) Quelles informations collectons-nous et pourquoi ?
   Vous êtes susceptible de fournir certaines données personnelles (par
   exemple une adresse e-mail) quand vous signez pour des services Amplify
   ou Engage, ou communiquez ou interagissez avec nous d’une autre
   manière. Si vous demandez à devenir Partenaire, nous sommes
   susceptibles de vous demander des informations complémentaires sous
   forme de formulaires de candidature annonceur, d’ordres d’insertion ou
   autres. Nous collectons automatiquement les informations sur vos
   actions liées à votre nom d’utilisateur dans le tableau de bord
   Outbrain. Par exemple, si vous changez, en tant que Partenaire Amplify,
   le coût-par-clic d’une de vos campagnes, la piste d’audit d’Outbrain
   gardera un enregistrement de toutes ces actions.
   Nous collectons et traitons les données personnelles ci-dessus afin de
   remplir nos obligations au titre de notre accord avec un Partenaire (ou
   Partenaire potentiel), notamment pour :
     * Répondre à vos questions et demandes.

     * Donner accès à certaines fonctions et fonctionnalités de nos
       services Amplify et Engage (par exemple pour fournir et tenir à
       jour le compte de votre tableau de bord).

     * Vérifier votre identité.

     * Communiquer avec vous sur votre compte, nos produits et les
       promotions disponibles compte tenu de votre utilisation du service
       Amplify ou Engage.

   (b) Quels cookies et autres technologies similaires utilisons-nous ?
   Veuillez consulter la Table des cookies sous « Partenaires commerciaux
   » pour une liste détaillée des cookies (et de leurs périodes de
   conservation associées) que nous utilisons avec les Partenaires.
   (c) Comment sommes-nous susceptibles de partager les informations ?
   Nous sommes susceptibles de divulguer certaines informations de
   Partenaires aux prestataires, sous-traitants ou autres, contribuant à
   la prestation des services Outbrain (ex : traitement des cartes de
   crédit). Veuillez aussi consulter la section Partage de la présente
   Politique de confidentialité.
   (d) Vos droits
   Si, en tant que Partenaire, vous souhaitez vérifier, corriger, mettre à
   jour ou demander la désactivation de vos informations, rendez-vous sur
   le tableau de bord Outbrain pour modifier vos préférences de profil ou
   contactez-nous à l’adresse support@outbrain.com. Si vous recevez des
   e-mails Outbrain, vous pouvez vous « désabonner » en utilisant le lien
   présent dans chaque e-mail. Veuillez noter que le désabonnement ne vous
   exclura pas de recevoir des notifications considérées comme critiques
   dans la fourniture de services Amplify ou Engage (ex : factures par
   e-mail).
   La base juridique du traitement des données personnelles de nos
   Partenaires commerciaux est l’intérêt légitime.
   3. Comment sécurisons-nous les informations ; les transferts en dehors
   de l’EEE ; le partage et les durées de conservation

                                      +

   Sécurité
   Outbrain dispose d’une équipe de sécurité dédiée. Nous mettons en œuvre
   des contrôles stricts sur les données que nous collectons, en les
   conservant dans des bases de données sécurisées et protégées par des
   pare-feu avec des droits d’accès contrôlés et limités afin de garantir
   leur sécurité. Veuillez consulter nos normes de sécurité pour de plus
   amples informations.
   Les Partenaires commerciaux ont un accès protégé par mot de passe à
   certaines fonctionnalités du service Amplify ou Engage. Ils ont la
   responsabilité de préserver la confidentialité de ce mot de passe. Il
   est néanmoins nécessaire de rappeler que la transmission d’informations
   par Internet n’est malheureusement pas complètement sécurisée. Une des
   fraudes classiques sur Internet est connue sous le nom d’usurpation
   d’identité électronique (« spoofing ») ou hameçonnage (« phishing »).
   Ceci se produit quand vous recevez un e-mail d’une source apparemment
   légitime vous demandant de lui fournir des données personnelles. Sachez
   que nous ne vous enverrons aucun e-mail vous demandant de vérifier un
   numéro de carte de crédit, des informations bancaires ou toutes autres
   données personnelles. S’il vous arrivait de recevoir un e-mail
   apparemment de notre part et vous demandant de nous fournir de telles
   informations, n’y répondez pas et ne cliquez sur aucun lien
   apparaissant dans ce message électronique. Veuillez plutôt nous
   transférer l’e-mail à l’adresse legal@outbrain.com, et nous mènerons
   des enquêtes sur d’éventuelles fraudes sur Internet.
   Transferts des données en dehors de l’UE/EEE
   Lorsque nous transférons des données personnelles de l’Espace
   économique européen vers d’autres pays dans lesquels les lois
   applicables n’offrent pas le même niveau de protection de
   confidentialité des données que les pays européens, nous prenons des
   mesures pour fournir un niveau approprié de protection de la
   confidentialité des données. En d’autres termes, vos droits et
   protections perdurent avec vos données. Nous utilisons par exemple des
   clauses contractuelles approuvées et d’autres mesures conçues pour
   garantir que les destinataires de vos données personnelles les
   protègent.
   Partage
   En complément de la description de la manière dont nous sommes
   susceptibles de divulguer vos données personnelles pour chaque type
   d’utilisateur, nous pouvons également divulguer les données
   personnelles comme suit :
     * Au sein de la famille des sociétés contrôlées par Outbrain pour des
       raisons internes, particulièrement pour des objectifs liés aux
       activités et au fonctionnement de l’entreprise ;

     * Si nous faisons face à une évolution de notre entreprise, comme une
       fusion, l’acquisition d’une autre société, ou la vente de tout ou
       partie de nos actifs, vos données personnelles sont susceptibles de
       faire partie des actifs transférés ;

     * En cas d’exigences légales le demandant (par exemple pour coopérer
       dans le cadre d’investigations sur la mise en application de la
       législation ou autres procédures légales) ; et/ou

     * Pour répondre à une urgence qualifiée.

   Par ailleurs, nous combinons vos données personnelles avec celles
   d’autres utilisateurs afin de partager des informations sur les
   tendances et agréger des statistiques d’utilisation avec des tiers,
   toujours sous forme agrégée et anonyme.
   Conservation des données
   La période de conservation pour chacun des cookies qu’Outbrain utilise
   (les siens propres ou au nom de tiers) est définie dans la Table des
   cookies.
   Outbrain tient également à jour une Politique de conservation des
   données qui détaille la période de conservation pour les données
   personnelles sur la base de notre analyse de la durée raisonnable de
   conservation nécessaire de données particulières pour des raisons
   légales ou opérationnelles. Quand nous n’avons plus besoin des données
   personnelles, nous les effaçons ou les supprimons de manière sécurisée.
   Les données agrégées, qui ne permettent pas d’identifier un
   appareil/navigateur (ou un individu) et sont utilisées pour des
   objectifs de reporting et d’analyse, sont conservées aussi longtemps
   que commercialement nécessaire.
   4. Enfants

                                      +

   Aucun de nos services n’est destiné à des enfants de moins de 16 ans.
   Nous ne recueillons pas sciemment de données personnelles auprès
   d’enfants âgés de moins de 16 ans. Si nous réalisons en cours de
   collecte qu’un Visiteur du site, un Utilisateur ou un Partenaire
   commercial a moins de 16 ans, nous n’utiliserons ni ne conserverons ses
   données personnelles. Si nous réalisons que nous avons involontairement
   collecté des données personnelles auprès d’un enfant de moins de 16
   ans, nous prendrons alors les mesures raisonnables pour supprimer ces
   informations de nos registres.
   5. Citoyens européens

                                      +

   Conformément aux lois européennes sur le respect de la vie privée, en
   particulier le Règlement général sur la protection des données (RGPD),
   Outbrain octroie des droits particuliers complémentaires aux citoyens
   des pays européens, comme le droit d’accès aux données, le droit de
   rectification, le droit d’opposition, le droit de porter réclamation,
   le droit à l’effacement et le droit de blocage. Plus spécifiquement :
     * Le droit de demander des informations sur l’utilisation ou non que
       nous faisons de données personnelles, et si oui, lesquelles, et le
       droit de demander la rectification ou la modification de ces
       données personnelles.
     * Dans certaines conditions, le droit de demander la suppression de
       données personnelles.
     * Dans certaines conditions, le droit de demander la limitation du
       traitement des données personnelles.
     * Le droit de retirer votre consentement à l’utilisation et au
       traitement de vos données, intégralement ou partiellement, à tout
       moment, avec effet futur.
     * Le droit d’obtenir vos données personnelles dans un format
       compréhensible, structuré et lisible.
     * La possibilité de contacter le délégué à la protection des données
       (« DPO ») pour toute question, commentaire, réclamation ou demande
       en lien avec notre déclaration sur la protection des données et le
       traitement de vos données personnelles.
     * Le droit de vous plaindre auprès de l’autorité de contrôle si vous
       êtes persuadé que le traitement de vos données personnelles
       constitue une violation de la législation.

   En complément des droits ci-dessus, nous référençons certains droits
   pour les citoyens des pays européens dans cette Politique de
   confidentialité. Conformément au RGPD, nous entendons par citoyens des
   « pays européens » les citoyens de l’Espace économique européen (EEE)
   et de la Suisse. Aux fins de cette Politique de confidentialité, le
   terme « pays européens » continuera d’inclure le Royaume-Uni, même
   après son départ de l’Espace économique européen suite au Brexit.
   Merci d’envoyer un mail à privacyquestions@outbrain.com pour toutes
   questions relatives à l’exercice des droits mentionnés ci-dessus.
   6. Droits au respect de la vie privée en Californie

                                      +

   Conformément au Code civil de Californie, articles 1798.83-1798.84, les
   résidents californiens ont le droit de nous demander une note décrivant
   les catégories d’informations personnelles que nous partageons avec des
   tiers et sociétés affiliées à des fins de marketing direct desdits
   tiers ou sociétés. Cette note indiquera les catégories d’informations
   partagées et inclura la liste des tiers et sociétés affiliées avec
   lesquels nous les partageons, avec leur nom et adresse. Si vous résidez
   en Californie et souhaitez une copie de cette note, veuillez en faire
   la demande par écrit à PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou l’envoyer à
   l’adresse suivante : Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New
   York, NY 10011, USA. Veuillez nous accorder 30 jours pour vous
   répondre.
   7. Dispositions « Do Not Track » (non-traçage)

                                      +

   Certains navigateurs transmettent des signaux refusant le traçage de
   données (« do not track ») aux sites Web. Outbrain ne procède
   actuellement à aucune altération, modification ou réponse aux demandes
   ou signaux de non-traçage de ces navigateurs car il n’existe pas de
   compréhension commune sur la manière d’interpréter les signaux de
   non-traçage. Nous continuerons de suivre l’activité du secteur dans ce
   domaine et réévaluerons nos pratiques de non-traçage si nécessaire. En
   attendant, vous pouvez utiliser la gamme d’autres outils que nous vous
   proposons pour contrôler la collecte et l’utilisation des données,
   notamment la possibilité de demander l’exclusion de la réception de
   recommandations personnalisées (« opt-out ») dans la section
   Utilisateurs.
   8. Les modifications qui pourraient être apportées à cette Politique de
   confidentialité

                                      +

   Nous sommes susceptibles de modifier cette Politique de confidentialité
   de manière ponctuelle. Nous afficherons clairement une notification que
   vous pourrez voir en tant que Visiteur du site ou Partenaire
   commercial, mais nous n’avons pas de moyen d’informer les Utilisateurs
   d’une mise à jour. Nous vous conseillons de régulièrement vérifier ici
   si la Politique de confidentialité a été mise à jour. Nous indiquerons
   toujours la date de dernière modification de la Politique de
   confidentialité en haut de la page afin que vous puissiez savoir quand
   elle a été révisée pour la dernière fois.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                      Ultimo aggiornamento: 23 maggio 2018

   Outbrain si impegna a proteggere i tuoi dati personali. La presente
   politica sulla privacy (“Politica sulla privacy ”) disciplina
   l'utilizzo da parte di Outbrain dei dati raccolti da noi, ivi inclusi
   tutti i dati personali. I dati personali sono informazioni che si
   riferiscono a te e possono identificarti come individuo. Utilizziamo i
   tuoi dati personali in linea con tutte le leggi applicabili. Al fine di
   garantire il rispetto e l'allineamento con i valori di Outbrain in
   materia di fiducia e trasparenza, disponiamo di team di esperti di
   privacy responsabili dell'implementazione continua del nostro programma
   di privacy globale.

                                                           + ESPANDI TUTTO

   1. Chi siamo, Cosa facciamo, Come contattare Outbrain, il nostro RPD o
   le autorità competenti

                                      +

   Chi siamo:
   Outbrain indica Outbrain Inc., un'azienda del Delaware (USA) con sede a
   New York; e le sue partecipate (collettivamente, “Outbrain,” o "noi",
   "ci", "nostro"). Operiamo da 12 uffici a livello globale e collaboriamo
   con editori e operatori di mercato in tutto il mondo.
   Cosa facciamo:
   La mission di Outbrain consiste nel fornire ai suoi utenti contenuti
   interessanti basati sui loro interessi. Per realizzare la nostra
   mission stipuliamo accordi con:
     * editori e partner online che desiderano raccomandare contenuti
       pertinenti ai loro lettori (si tratta del servizio Outbrain
       Engage); e

     * inserzionisti che desiderano che i lettori visualizzino i loro
       contenuti (si tratta del servizio Outbrain Amplify).

   Come contattarci
   Esaminiamo regolarmente il nostro rispetto della presente politica
   sulla privacy. Domande, commenti e richieste riguardanti la presente
   politica sulla privacy sono apprezzati e vanno indirizzati a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oppure all'indirizzo postale: Outbrain
   Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Qualora Outbrain non risponda in maniera soddisfacente alle tue domande
   o preoccupazioni, puoi altresì contattare i seguenti riferimenti per
   informazioni, supporto o reclami:
     * Responsabile esterno della protezione dei dati di Outbrain ("RPD"):
       ePrivacy GmbH, rappresentata dal Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. È
       possibile contattare direttamente ePrivacy GmbH all'indirizzo:
       privacy@eprivacy.eu; e/o
     * l'Information Commissioner’s Officer, che è la principale autorità
       di controllo su Outbrain all'interno dei Territori europei.

   Organismi di autoregolamentazione
   Outbrain aderisce ai principi di autoregolamentazione stabiliti da
   Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) e da European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Siamo soci in regola della Network
   Advertising Initiative (NAI), un'associazione dedicata alla raccolta
   responsabile di dati e al loro utilizzo per la pubblicità digitale.
   Aderiamo al Codice di condotta NAI per il settore Web e Mobile.
   Outbrain aderisce altresì ai principi di autoregolamentazione
   dell'Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) per la pubblicità
   comportamentale online e al framework di IAB Europa per la pubblicità
   comportamentale online.
   2. Tipi di utente Outbrain (compresa la gestione delle opzioni di Opt
   Out)

                                      +

   Gran parte della presente politica sulla privacy è suddivisa in sezioni
   in base al modo in cui è possibile interagire con Outbrain. Ti
   preghiamo di stabilire quale tipo di utente sei, in quanto, per ogni
   tipo di utente abbiamo spiegato quali informazioni raccogliamo e
   perché, quali cookie e altre tecnologie analoghe utilizziamo, come
   condividiamo tali informazioni e i tuoi diritti.
   Visitatori del sito: Sei un visitatore del sito quando visiti e
   interagisci con i nostri siti web, le nostre pagine web, le funzioni
   interattive, i blog e i loro rispettivi contenuti disponibili
   all'indirizzo Outbrain.com (o qualsiasi sua derivazione, come
   Outbrain.co.uk; Outbrain.fr; outbrain.de, ecc.) e MyOutbrain.com (“I
   nostri siti“). Vedi di più qui.
   (a) Quali informazioni raccogliamo e perché
   Desideriamo capire quali servizi sui nostri siti ti interessino e
   desideriamo ricordarti i servizi che offriamo quando non sei sui nostri
   siti. Per fare questo, raccogliamo le seguenti informazioni su di te:
   (i) indirizzo IP; (ii) dati dell'agente utente: tipo di dispositivo (ad
   es. iPhone), tipo di browser (ad es. Chrome), sistema operativo (ad es.
   iOS); (iii) le pagine visitate sul nostro sito (ad es. la pagina "Chi
   siamo" di Outbrain); (iv) l'orario della visita (e il fuso orario
   corrispondente); nonché (v) le URL di riferimento e altre informazioni
   normalmente trasmesse nelle richieste HTTP (ad esempio, queste
   informazioni ci dicono come sei arrivato sui nostri siti).
   (b) Quali cookie e altre tecnologie simili utilizziamo
   Ti rimandiamo a questa Tabella dei cookie alla sezione "Visitatori del
   sito" per un elenco dettagliato dei cookie (e dei relativi periodi di
   conservazione) che utilizziamo quando visiti i nostri siti.
   (c) Come possiamo condividere le informazioni
     * Condivisione delle informazioni che acquisiamo su di te sui nostri
       siti.

   In generale, non condividiamo i tuoi dati personali con terzi per
   finalità di pubblicità o marketing di terzi. Tuttavia, ricorriamo a
   vari terzi (ciascuno elencato nella Tabella dei cookie) affinché ci
   aiutino a svolgere attività di commercializzazione o pubblicità nei
   tuoi confronti. Ad esempio, alcuni dei cookie che utilizziamo sui
   nostri siti appartengono a terzi che aiuteranno Outbrain a svolgere
   attività di commercializzazione o pubblicità nei tuoi confronti.
   Richiediamo a tali parti e società terze di acconsentire a mantenere
   riservate tutte le informazioni condivise con loro e a utilizzare tali
   informazioni esclusivamente per adempiere ai loro obblighi nei nostri
   confronti. Facciamo ciò stipulando accordi con tutti i terzi che
   trattano dati personali per nostro conto in maniera da garantire che
   trattino i tuoi dati personali in conformità con le nostre severe
   istruzioni e tutte le leggi applicabili in materia di protezione dei
   dati. Se pubblichi un post sul nostro blog, i tuoi commenti e le tue
   informazioni saranno disponibili al pubblico. Contatta
   support@outbrain.com per rimuovere il tuo commento.
     * Utilizzo di servizi di terzi sui nostri siti.

   I nostri siti contengono collegamenti ad altri siti web che non sono di
   nostra proprietà o gestiti da noi. Non controlliamo, raccomandiamo o
   approviamo il contenuto, i prodotti, i servizi, le politiche sulla
   privacy o le pratiche di tali siti web di terzi. Ad esempio, sui nostri
   siti noterai icone cliccabili che ti condurranno alla pagina Facebook
   di Outbrain o alla pagina LinkedIn di Outbrain. Se scegli di fare click
   su tali collegamenti, devi sapere che Facebook e LinkedIn potrebbero
   inviare i propri cookie al tuo dispositivo e potrebbero raccogliere
   dati personali in maniera indipendente. Di conseguenza è importante che
   tu legga le politiche sulla privacy di Facebook e/o LinkedIn.
     * Consulta anche la sezione Condivisione della presente politica
       sulla privacy.

   (d) I tuoi diritti
   Le Condizioni d'uso presenti sul nostro sito disciplinano l'uso del
   nostro sito e si applicano anche a te. Puoi smettere di usare il nostro
   sito in qualsiasi momento. Se lo fai, puoi altresì desiderare rimuovere
   tutti i cookie che abbiamo inserito su qualsiasi dispositivo utilizzato
   per accedere al nostro sito. Se durante l'utilizzo dei nostri siti hai
   fornito il tuo indirizzo e-mail, qualsiasi e-mail che ricevi da
   Outbrain include un'opzione di "annullamento dell'iscrizione"
   (unsubscribe).
   Per gli utenti dei Territori europei, Outbrain ha implementato una
   piattaforma di gestione del consenso (gestita da One Trust ) sui nostri
   siti che offre ai visitatori l'opportunità di acconsentire, o meno, a
   cookie e tecnologie di tracciamento simili sui nostri siti. Accedendo
   ai nostri siti, vedrai un banner nella parte inferiore della pagina con
   informazioni sui cookie che utilizziamo. È possibile fare click sul
   banner per rifiutare tutti i cookie che non sono strettamente
   necessari. Premendo "accetta" sul banner o scorrendo / facendo click
   sui nostri siti è un'indicazione della tua accettazione. Di
   conseguenza, la base legale di Outbrain per il trattamento dei dati
   personali sui nostri siti è il consenso. Puoi ritirare il tuo consenso
   in qualsiasi momento cliccando qui.
   Utenti: Sei un utente se visiti una pagina di un sito web o di
   un'applicazione di uno dei partner di Outbrain nelle quali è installato
   il widget Outbrain (“Siti partner”). Ad esempio, se visiti
   https://news.sky.com/uk, www.corriere.it il widget Outbrain è
   implementato su tali siti web. Sai che stai interagendo con un widget
   Outbrain quando vedi del testo che fa riferimento a Outbrain (ad
   esempio "Recommended by Outbrain", "by Outbrain" accanto ai contenuti).
   Se fai click sul riferimento contenente il collegamento ipertestuale a
   Outbrain, visualizzerai una informativa dettagliata che ti consentirà
   di raggiungere il Profilo di interesse di Outbrain, che fornisce una
   visualizzazione generale dei tipi di categorie di dati di Outbrain che
   quest'ultima può utilizzare per formulare le sue raccomandazioni.
   Inoltre, ti dà la possibilità di rinunciare a ricevere contenuti
   personalizzati. Vedi di più qui.
   Esempio di un widget Outbrain
   [S1q4BIXJQ.png]
   (a) Quali informazioni raccogliamo e perché
   Usiamo UUID, indirizzo IP e altre informazioni di utilizzo in maniera
   da poter offrire contenuti interessanti. Le raccomandazioni di Outbrain
   possono essere pagate da un inserzionista che ti collega a un nuovo
   sito web oppure possono essere organiche, nel qual caso il collegamento
   rinvia a un'altra pagina sullo stesso sito web dell'editore.
     * UUID.

   Quando in veste di Utente visiti per la prima volta un Sito partner (ad
   esempio, CNN.com), Outbrain deposita un cookie sul dispositivo al fine
   di generare un UUID (un identificativo utente univoco). Cataloghiamo e
   analizziamo i contenuti che consumi attraverso i Siti partner. Le
   nostre raccomandazioni si basano su: (i) cronologia di navigazione;
   (ii) modelli di navigazione simili di altri Utenti; (ii)
   raccomandazioni di contenuto che sono in genere popolari presso il
   pubblico di Outbrain in quel dato momento; (iv) un pizzico di casualità
   e (v) requisiti di targeting che possono essere forniti o richiesti dai
   nostri clienti Amplify. Ad esempio, Outbrain potrebbe sapere che l'UUID
   123 (che potresti essere tu che sul tuo iPhone X stai visitando il
   Guardian usando Chrome come browser) ama leggere di destinazioni di
   vacanza lontane e che alle persone che amano leggere delle medesime
   destinazioni di vacanza lontane piace leggere di cibi esotici.
   L'UUID è una sequenza di numeri e/o lettere. L'UUID viene associato al
   tuo dispositivo e varia in base al browser che utilizzi. In altre
   parole, Outbrain registra un UUID diverso a seconda del dispositivo e/o
   del browser che utilizzi per accedere ai Siti partner. Ad esempio, ciò
   significa che avrai un UUID quando visiti un Sito partner dal tuo
   telefono cellulare utilizzando Safari come browser e un UUID diverso
   quando visiti un Sito partner dal tuo iPad utilizzando Safari come
   browser. Outbrain combinerà e consoliderà un UUID da un dispositivo
   mobile (palmare o tablet) da un browser che accede quindi a
   un'applicazione (o viceversa) da quel medesimo dispositivo.
   L'assegnazione di un UUID consente a Outbrain di associare le
   visualizzazioni di pagina visitate e i click sulle raccomandazioni di
   Outbrain provenienti da tale UUID, il tutto con l'obiettivo di fornire
   contenuti interessanti.
     * Indirizzo IP e altre informazioni sull'utilizzo.

   Raccogliamo un UUID come spiegato sopra, inoltre raccogliamo le
   seguenti informazioni da te: (i) indirizzo IP (reso anonimo in base
   agli standard di settore) (ii) dati dell'agente utente: tipo di
   dispositivo (ad es. iPhone), tipo di browser (ad es. Chrome), sistema
   operativo (ad es. iOS); (iii) le pagine visitate; (iv) l'orario della
   visita; e (v) gli URL di riferimento e altre informazioni normalmente
   trasmesse nelle richieste HTTP.
   Le suddette informazioni statistiche ci forniscono informazioni su
   quanti Utenti hanno visitato una pagina specifica sui nostri Siti
   partner sui quali è installato il widget Outbrain, per quanto tempo
   ciascun Utente è rimasto su quella pagina, il tipo di contenuto su
   quella pagina sul quale hanno fatto click e, in generale, come hanno
   interagito con tale pagina. Queste informazioni costituiscono dati
   personali soltanto quando sono associati a un UUID.
   (b) Quali cookie e altre tecnologie simili utilizziamo
   Visita questa Tabella dei cookie nella sezione "Utenti" per un elenco
   dettagliato dei cookie proprietari che utilizziamo quando interagisci
   con i Siti partner nei quali è implementata la tecnologia Outbrain.
   Se fai click su un collegamento verso una delle nostre raccomndazioni,
   l'inserzionista Amplify che sponsorizza tale contenuto può installare
   cookie sul tuo dispositivo tramite reindirizzamenti prima che tu giunga
   alla pagina di destinazione della raccomandazione di contenuto o nel
   momento in cui raggiungi la pagina di destinazione. In tali casi sarai
   soggetto alla politica sulla privacy di tale inserzionista.
   Oltre al widget Outbrain visibile su Siti partner, alcuni inserzionisti
   di Outbrain possono implementare il pixel Outbrain sui loro siti web.
   Il pixel Outbrain determina se l'utente che raggiunge la pagina nella
   quale è installato il pixel dispone di un UUID Outbrain. Se esiste un
   UUID associato a tale utente finale, Outbrain consente agli
   inserzionisti di reindirizzare tali UUID e/o fornisce agli
   inserzionisti il numero totale di UUID che hanno raggiunto tale pagina.
   Se nessun UUID Outbrain ha visitato la pagina, il pixel Outbrain non
   raccoglie alcuna informazione sull'utente.
   Invitiamo gli inserzionisti a divulgare l'uso di pixel Outbrain sui
   propri siti web. Outbrain non combina le informazioni ottenute dal
   pixel con il profilo di un UUID.
   I punti dati come le visualizzazioni delle pagine e i click che sono
   collegati a un UUID specifico sono conservati per 13 mesi. Ad esempio,
   se l'UUID 123 legge un articolo il 31 dicembre 2017, il 1° febbraio
   2018 quell'articolo non farà più parte del profilo dell'UUID 123.
   (c) Come possiamo condividere le informazioni
   Outbrain non condivide i profili Utente con terzi. Tuttavia, potremmo
   condividere l'UUID con taluni partner per fini di sincronizzazione dei
   cookie oppure in base a requisiti tecnici. Consulta anche la sezione
   Condivisione della presente politica sulla privacy.
   (d) I tuoi diritti
     * Opt Out di Outbrain. Puoi rinunciare (opt-out) alle raccomandazioni
       di contenuto personalizzate di Outbrain in qualsiasi momento.
       Consulta il Profilo di interesse di Outbrain per una panoramica
       generale dei dati che Outbrain conosce su di te e può utilizzare
       per formulare le sue raccomandazioni. Il Profilo di interesse ti dà
       altresì la possibilità di decidere di rinunciare alle
       raccomandazioni personalizzate (puoi anche effettuare l’opt-out
       cliccando qui). Tieni presente che l'esclusione dei browser avviene
       tramite il Profilo di interesse di Outbrain, ma la rinuncia ai
       contenuti personalizzati nelle applicazioni avviene attraverso le
       impostazioni presenti sul tuo dispositivo (esempi di passaggi sono
       disponibili nel Profilo di interesse).

   IMPORTANTE – anche se hai rinunciato a usufruire di Outbrain:
     * Continuerai a visualizzare le raccomandazioni di Outbrain. La
       disattivazione del tracking per la personalizzazione di Outbrain
       non significa che non riceverai più raccomandazioni di contenuto da
       Outbrain. Piuttosto significa che non saranno personalizzate. Tali
       raccomandazioni continueranno a utilizzare le informazioni relative
       al documento che stai visualizzando (ad esempio informazioni
       contestuali) per fornirti consigli su quella pagina.

     * La rinuncia (opt-out) è basata su cookie ed è specifica del
       dispositivo/browser. Se navighi sul web da dispositivi e/o browser
       diversi, dovrai esprimere la rinuncia da ciascun dispositivo e/o
       browser per assicurarti di impedire il tracking per la
       personalizzazione su ciascuno di loro. Per lo stesso motivo, se
       acquisti un nuovo dispositivo, cambi browser o cancelli (o annulli)
       il cookie di rinuncia, dovrai esprimere nuovamente tale rinuncia.
       Rinunciare al tracking per la personalizzazione non equivale a
       bloccare i cookie.

     * Per garantire la cancellazione del profilo legato al tuo UUID, non
       attivare Outbrain per almeno 21 giorni. La tua rinuncia alle
       raccomandazioni personalizzate di Outbrain è efficace
       immediatamente. Tuttavia, se il tuo browser consente
       l'archiviazione locale e attivi le raccomandazioni di contenuto
       personalizzate di Outbrain entro 21 giorni dalla rinuncia, è
       possibile che il tuo profilo precedente venga riconnesso al tuo
       UUID. Se non effettui l'attivazione entro 21 giorni, il profilo
       verrà eliminato e non potrà essere ripristinato.

     * Come con la maggior parte dei casi di opt-out, anche l’opzione di
       opt-out del browser Outbrain si basa su un cookie. Il cookie di
       opt-out è inteso come persistente per rispettare le preferenze
       dell'utente. Tuttavia, la funzionalità di "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention" in iOS11 potrebbe avere un impatto sulla persistenza
       dei cookie nei siti web nelle 24 ore successive. Ti suggeriamo di
       utilizzare un altro browser o di bloccare tutti i cookie di terze
       parti dal browser in modo da essere "disattivato" senza dover
       ricorrere all'effettiva metodologia di opt-out di qualsiasi
       azienda.

     * Ulteriori opzioni di rinuncia (opt-out). Puoi anche esprimere la
       tua rinuncia a ricevere contenuti personalizzati offerti da noi o
       da altre agenzie pubblicitarie attraverso strumenti messi a
       disposizione dal settore come la NAI o le varie pagine basate su
       DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices, e/o EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
       Visitare le pagine delle scelte dei consumatori di NAI, DAA, DAAC o
       EDAA ti consente di rinunciare a tutti o parte dei servizi dei
       membri partecipanti. Come la funzione di opt out di Outbrain,
       queste rinunce non fanno sì che non riceverai più alcuna
       pubblicità, semplicemente gli annunci pubblicitari non saranno
       personalizzati per te. Puoi continuare a ricevere annunci
       pubblicitari, ad esempio, in base al sito web specifico che stai
       visualizzando (ossia annunci basati sul contesto). Inoltre, se i
       tuoi browser sono configurati per rifiutare i cookie quando visiti
       le pagine delle scelte dei consumatori DAA, DAAC o EDAA, la tua
       rinuncia potrebbe non essere efficace.

     * Base giuridica. La base giuridica di Outbrain per il trattamento
       dei dati personali dell'Utente si fonda sulla base giuridica
       determinata da ciascuno dei nostri Siti partner. Ciascun Sito
       partner si baserà sul consenso o sul legittimo interesse. Consulta
       la politica sulla privacy dei Siti partner per ulteriori
       informazioni sulla loro base giuridica. Se un Partner fa
       affidamento sul consenso, Outbrain non depositerà un cookie sul tuo
       dispositivo se non hai fornito il consenso su tale Sito partner.

   Partner commerciali: Sei un Partner commerciale quando ti registri (o
   invii un'e-mail a Outbrain) per conto dell'azienda per la quale lavori
   per utilizzare i servizi Outbrain Amplify o Outbrain Engage. Vedi di
   più qui.
   (a) Quali informazioni raccogliamo e perché
   Puoi fornire determinati dati personali (quali ad esempio indirizzo
   e-mail) quando ti registri per i servizi Amplify o Engage o altrimenti
   quando comunichi o interagisci con noi. Se presenti domanda per
   diventare un Partner commerciale, potremmo richiederti ulteriori
   informazioni tramite moduli di domanda dell'inserzionista, ordini di
   inserzione e altri moduli. Raccogliamo automaticamente informazioni in
   merito alle azioni del tuo nome utente nella dashboard di Outbrain. Ad
   esempio, in qualità di Partner commerciale Amplify, se modifichi il
   costo per click per una delle tue campagne, la traccia di controllo di
   Outbrain registrerà tutte queste azioni.
   Raccogliamo e trattiamo i dati personali di cui sopra al fine di
   adempiere ai nostri obblighi ai sensi del nostro accordo come Partner
   commerciale (o potenziale Partner commerciale) stipulato con voi, ivi
   incluso per:
     * rispondere alle tue domande e richieste;

     * fornirti accesso a determinate funzioni e caratteristiche dei
       nostri servizi Amplify o Engage (ad esempio per fornirti e
       mantenere il tuo account dashboard);

     * verificare la tua identità;

     * comunicare con te in merito al tuo account, ai nostri prodotti e
       alle promozioni disponibili pertinenti al tuo utilizzo del servizio
       Amplify o Engage.

   (b) Quali cookie e altre tecnologie simili utilizziamo
   Ti rimandiamo a questa Tabella dei cookie nella sezione "Partner
   commerciali" per un elenco dettagliato dei cookie (e dei relativi
   periodi di conservazione) che utilizziamo con i Partner commerciali.
   (c) Come possiamo condividere le informazioni con chiunque
   Potremmo divulgare determinate informazioni dei Business Partner a
   venditori, contraenti o altri soggetti che assistono Outbrain
   nell'erogazione dei servizi (ad es. trattamento delle carte di
   credito). Consulta anche la sezione Condivisione della presente
   politica sulla privacy.
   (d) I tuoi diritti
   Se in veste di Partner commerciale desideri verificare, correggere,
   aggiornare o richiedere la disattivazione delle tue informazioni, puoi
   accedere alla dashboard di Outbrain e modificare le preferenze del tuo
   profilo oppure contattarci all'indirizzo: support@outbrain.com. Se stai
   ricevendo e-mail di Outbrain, puoi "annullare l'iscrizione" a tale
   invio utilizzando un collegamento presente nell'e-mail. Nota:
   l'annullamento dell'iscrizione non comporta la rinuncia a ricevere
   notifiche critiche all'erogazione dei servizi Amplify o Engage (ad es.
   fatture inviate via e-mail).
   La base giuridica di Outbrain per il trattamento dei dati personali dei
   Partner commerciali è il legittimo interesse.
   3. Come manteniamo le informazioni al sicuro, Trasferimenti al di fuori
   del SEE, Condivisione e conservazione

                                      +

   Sicurezza
   Outbrain dispone di un team dedicato per la sicurezza. Manteniamo
   rigorosi controlli sui dati che raccogliamo, conservandoli in database
   protetti e soggetti a firewall con diritti di accesso rigorosamente
   limitati e controllati, per garantirne la sicurezza. Consulta le nostre
   norme sulla sicurezza per maggiori informazioni.
   I partner commerciali hanno accesso a determinate funzionalità protette
   da password del servizio Amplify o Engage. Loro sono responsabili del
   mantenimento della riservatezza di tale password. Ricorda che,
   sfortunatamente, la trasmissione di informazioni tramite Internet non è
   completamente sicura. Una truffa comune su Internet è nota come
   "spoofing" o "phishing" e si verifica quando ricevi un'email
   proveniente da quella che sembra essere una fonte legittima che
   richiede i tuoi dati personali. Ti preghiamo di osservare che non ti
   invieremo alcuna e-mail che ti chieda di verificare la carta di
   credito, le coordinate bancarie o eventuali altri dati personali.
   Qualora dovessi ricevere un'e-mail che sembra provenire da noi e ti
   chiede tali informazioni ti preghiamo di non rispondere e non fare
   click su nessun link presente nell'e-mail. Al contrario, inoltraci
   l'e-mail all'indirizzo legal@outbrain.com, in quanto esamineremo
   possibili casi di frodi su Internet.
   Trasferimento dei dati al di fuori dell'UE/del SEE
   Quando trasferiamo i dati personali dallo Spazio economico europeo ad
   altri paesi nei quali le leggi applicabili non offrono il medesimo
   livello di protezione della privacy dei dati offerto nei Territori
   europei, adottiamo misure atte a fornire un livello appropriato di
   protezione della privacy dei dati. In altre parole, i tuoi diritti e le
   protezioni che ti spettano rimangono associati ai tuoi dati. Ad
   esempio, utilizziamo clausole contrattuali approvate e altre misure
   studiate per garantire che i destinatari dei tuoi dati personali li
   proteggano.
   Condivisione
   Oltre alla descrizione di come possiamo divulgare i tuoi dati personali
   per ciascun tipo di utente, possiamo altresì divulgare dati personali
   nei seguenti casi:
     * all'interno della famiglia di società controllate da Outbrain per
       ragioni interne, principalmente per scopi aziendali e operativi;

     * qualora dovessimo attraversare una transizione aziendale, quale una
       fusione, un'acquisizione da parte di un'altra società oppure una
       vendita di tutte o di parte delle nostre attività, i tuoi dati
       personali saranno probabilmente inclusi tra le attività trasferite;

     * laddove ciò sia richiesto dalla legge (ad esempio, per collaborare
       con indagini delle forze dell'ordine oppure con altri procedimenti
       giudiziari); e/o

     * per rispondere a un'emergenza effettiva.

   Inoltre, combiniamo i tuoi dati personali con quelli di altri utenti al
   fine di condividere informazioni sulle tendenze e aggregare le
   statistiche degli utenti con terze parti, sempre in forma aggregata e
   anonimizzata.
   Conservazione dei dati
   Il periodo di conservazione per ciascuno dei cookie utilizzati da
   Outbrain (sia per quelli propri sia per quelli usati da terzi per
   nostro conto) è indicato nella Tabella dei cookie.
   Outbrain mantiene altresì una politica di conservazione dei dati che
   dettaglia il periodo di conservazione dei dati personali in base alla
   nostra analisi della durata ragionevolmente necessaria di tale
   conservazione, rispetto a dati specifici, tenuto conto delle finalità
   legali o commerciali. Nel momento in cui non necessitiamo più dei dati
   personali, li cancelliamo o li distruggiamo in maniera sicura. I dati
   aggregati, che non consentono di identificare un dispositivo/browser (o
   una singola persona) e sono utilizzati per finalità di reporting e
   analisi vengono conservati per tutto il tempo necessario dal punto di
   vista commerciale.
   4. Minori

                                      +

   Nessuno dei nostri servizi si rivolge a minori di 16 anni. Non
   raccogliamo consapevolmente dati personali da minori di 16 anni. Se al
   momento della raccolta dovessimo stabilire che un Visitatore del sito,
   un Utente o un Partner commerciale ha meno di 16 anni, non useremo né
   conserveremo i suoi dati personali. Qualora dovessimo venire a
   conoscenza del fatto che abbiamo raccolto inconsapevolmente dati
   personali da un minore di età inferiore ai 16 anni, attueremo ogni
   ragionevole sforzo per eliminare tali informazioni dai nostri archivi.
   Se sei un bambino, vai a giocare in giardino, non usare o interagire
   con Outbrain!
   5. Cittadini dei territori europei

                                      +

   In conformità con le leggi europee in materia di tutela della vita
   privata (privacy), in particolare con il regolamento generale europeo
   sulla protezione dei dati (GDPR), Outbrain riconosce specifici diritti
   aggiuntivi ai cittadini dei Territori europei quali il diritto di
   accesso, di rettifica, di opposizione, di reclamo, di cancellazione e
   di blocco. Più specificamente:
     * il diritto di richiedere informazioni sull'eventualità del
       trattamento in atto e su quali dati personali siano trattati da
       noi, nonché il diritto di richiedere la rettifica o la modifica di
       tali dati personali.
     * in determinate circostanze, il diritto di richiedere che i dati
       personali siano cancellati.
     * in determinate circostanze, il diritto di chiedere che il
       trattamento dei dati personali sia soggetto a limitazioni.
     * il diritto alla revoca del proprio consenso al trattamento e
       all'utilizzo dei propri dati, in tutto o in parte, in qualsiasi
       momento con applicazione per il futuro.
     * il diritto di ottenere i propri dati personali in un formato
       comune, strutturato e leggibile da un dispositivo automatico.
     * il diritto di contattare il nostro responsabile della protezione
       dei dati nel caso in cui vi siano domande, commenti, reclami o
       richieste in relazione alla nostra dichiarazione sulla protezione
       dei dati e sul trattamento dei dati personali.
     * il diritto di sporgere reclamo presso l'autorità di controllo
       responsabile qualora si ritenga che il trattamento dei propri dati
       personali avvenga in violazione della legislazione.

   In aggiunta a quanto sopra, facciamo riferimento a determinati diritti
   per i cittadini dei Territori europei nel corso della presente politica
   sulla privacy. Ai sensi del GDPR, con il termine cittadini dei
   "Territori europei" si intendono i cittadini dello Spazio economico
   europeo (SEE) e della Svizzera. Ai fini della presente Informativa
   sulla privacy, il termine "Territori europei" continuerà a includere il
   Regno Unito, anche dopo che il Regno Unito avrà lasciato lo Spazio
   economico europeo in seguito alla Brexit.
   Nel caso avessi domande su come esercitare qualsiasi dei diritti
   descritti qui sopra, scrivici al seguente indirizzo e-mail:
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com.
   6. Diritti in materia di privacy della California

                                      +

   Ai sensi degli articoli 1798.83-1798.84 del Codice Civile della
   California, i residenti californiani hanno il diritto di richiederci
   un'informativa che descriva le categorie di informazioni personali che
   condividiamo con terzi o società affiliate per finalità di marketing
   diretto di tali terzi o società affiliate. Tale informativa individuerà
   le categorie di informazioni condivise e includerà un elenco dei terzi
   e delle società affiliate con le quali sono state condivise, unitamente
   ai loro nomi e indirizzi. Se sei residente in California e desideri una
   copia di tale informativa, invia una richiesta scritta a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oppure inviala al seguente indirizzo
   postale: Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY
   10011. Si prega di consentire 30 giorni per la risposta.
   7. Comunicazione antitracciamento (“Do Not Track”)

                                      +

   Alcuni browser trasmettono segnali antitracciamento, denominati "Do Not
   Track" (DNT), ai siti web. Poiché non esiste una comprensione comune su
   come interpretare il segnale DNT, al momento Outbrain non altera,
   modifica o risponde alle richieste o ai segnali DNT di tali browser.
   Continueremo a monitorare l'attività del settore in questo contesto e
   rivaluteremo le nostre pratiche DNT se necessario. Nel frattempo, puoi
   utilizzare la gamma di altri strumenti che mettiamo a disposizione per
   controllare la raccolta e l'utilizzo dei dati, ivi inclusa la capacità
   di rinunciare a ricevere raccomandazioni personalizzate consultando la
   sezione Utenti.
   8. Come può variare la presente politica sulla privacy

                                      +

   Occasionalmente potremmo modificare la presente politica sulla privacy.
   Inseriremo un avviso in evidenza che ti sarà visibile in qualità di
   Visitatore del sito o Partner commerciale, tuttavia non disponiamo di
   mezzi per avvertire gli Utenti in merito a un aggiornamento. In tal
   caso si raccomanda di verificare periodicamente questa pagina per
   sapere se la politica sulla privacy è stata aggiornata. Visualizzeremo
   sempre la data dell'ultima modifica della politica sulla privacy nella
   parte alta della pagina affinché tu possa sapere quando è stata rivista
   l'ultima volta.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   2018年5月24日
   アウトブレインはお客様の個人データを大切に保護します。このプライバシー ポリシーは（以下「プライバシー
   ポリシー」といいます。）、アウトブレインが収集する全ての個人データも含めた情報の利用方法を定めるものです。個人データは、お客様に関わる情報であ
   って、個人を特定できる情報です。アウトブレインは、お客様の個人データを利用に際しては、適用されるすべての法令を遵守します。プライバシーチャンピ
   オンチームのもと信頼と透明性というアウトブレインの価値を守ります
   + ＋全てを広げる
   – COLLAPSE ALL
   １．私たちについて、私たちのミッション、及びアウトブレイン・アウトブレインのDPO・又は関係部署へのお問い合わせ方法
   +
   アウトブレインについて
   私たちは、米国のデラウェア州で設立された株式会社及びその関連子会社（以下合わせて「アウトブレイン」又は「私たち」といいます。）であり、本社はニ
   ューヨークにあります。アウトブレインは、12 個のグローバルオフィスを有し、世界中のパブリッシャー及びマーケッターと提携関係を組んでいます。
   アウトブレインのミッション
   アウトブレインのミッションは、ユーザーの関心に基づいて、ユーザーの興味関心に基づいてレコメンデーションを提供することです。そのミッションのため
   、次のようなパートナーと提携しています。
     * 読者に価値があるコンテンツを勧めたいオンラインパブリッシャ及びパートナー（こちらの契約をOutbrain Engageといいます。）

     * コンテンツを読者に配信することを希望するアドバタイザー（こちらの契約を Outbrain Amplifyといいます。）

   アウトブレインへのお問い合わせ
   アウトブレインはプライバシーポリシーを遵守していることを定期的に確認しております。プライバシーポリシーに関するご質問、コメント、又は他のお問い
   合わせは次の連絡先までお願いします。
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com 又は
   Attn: Privacy Questions
   Outbrain Inc.
   39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor
   New York, NY 10011
   また上記のお問い合わせ以外にもご質問がございましたら、次の連絡先までご連絡下さい。
     * 外部のData Protection Officer （以下「DPO」と言う）：ePrivacy GmbH
       担当者：クリストフ・バウワー博士
       ePrivacy GmbHには privacy@eprivacy.eu 宛てご連絡ください。

     * 欧州内のアウトブレインの担当部署である Information Commissioner’s Officer

   自主規制機関
   アウトブレインは、Digital Advertising Alliance （以下「DAA」という）及び European
   Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance（以下「EDAA
   」という）において自主規制の原則を遵守します。アウトブレインは、責任あるデータの収集とデジタル広告におけるデータの使用を定める社団Networ
   k Advertising Initiative
   (NAI)の優良メンバーであり、そのウェブとモバイルのための行動規範を遵守します。アウトブレインは、オンライン行動アドバタイジング(OAB)
   に関するInteractive Advertising Bureau (IAB)の自主規制原則及びIAB の欧州OBA原則を遵守します。
   ２．アウトブレインのユーザータイプ（オプトアウトも含む）)
   +
   このプライバシーポリシーにおいては、様々な場面ごとに、お客さまのユーザータイプに応じて、どの情報を収集し、なぜ収集するのか、なぜ、どのクッキー
   を使うのか、またどのような類似の技術を用いるのか、私たちがどのようにその情報を共有するのか、またお客様にはどのような権利があるのかということを
   ご説明します。
   ウェブサイトの訪問者：お客様はアウトブレインのOutbrain.com （又は国によるアドレス、例えばOutbrain.co.uk、
   Outbrain.fr 、Outbrain.de 、など）及び MyOutbrain.com
   のウェブサイト、ウェブページ、相互作用機能（以下すべて合わせて「アウトブレインのサイト」という）を訪問、及び相互作用する場合、サイトの訪問者に
   なります。 詳しくは こちらへ。
   ア）収集する情報及びその理由
   アウトブレインは、アウトブレインのサイトにおいてお客様がどのコンテンツに興味を持つかを理解し、且つお客様がアウトブレインのサイトを訪問しない時
   にもアウトブレインが提供するサービスを認識していただきたいと考えています。このために、お客様から（１）IP
   アドレス、（２）ユーザーエージェントデータ、あるいはデバイスの種類（例えばiPhone など）、ブラウザの種類（例えばGoogle
   Chromeなど）、オペレーティングシステム（例えばiOS など）、（３）アウトブレインのサイト のどのページを閲覧したか
   （例えば、「アウトブレインについて」のページ）、（４）閲覧した時間（対応する時差）、（５）URL のリファーラル及びHTTP
   リクエストにおいて通常に通信される情報（例えば、この情報でお客様がアウトブレインのサイトにどの経由でいらしたのかを知ることができます）の情報を
   収集します。
   イ）利用するクッキー、又は使用する技術
   お客様がアウトブレインのサイトを訪問する際に使用されるクッキー（及びその有効期間）に関する詳細については、こちらの クッキーテーブル
   のウェッブサイト訪問者の部分をご参照ください。
   ウ）情報の共有
   アウトブレインのサイトにおいて収集したお客様の情報の共有
   原則として、アウトブレインはお客様の個人データを第三者に対しそのマーケティング活動のために共有することはいたしません。しかし、アウトブレインが
   お客様に対してマーケティング及び広告配信ができるように第三者のサービス（こちらの クッキーテーブル
   に表示されます）を利用することがあります。例えば、アウトブレインのサイトにおいて、アウトブレインがお客様にマーケティング及び広告配信を行うため
   に使用するクッキーの一部は、第三者のクッキーです。アウトブレインはこれら第三者に対して、共有された情報を機密情報として取り扱わせるとともに、こ
   れらの情報をアウトブレインに対する義務の履行のためにのみ使用させるものとします。私たちは、私たちのために個人データを処理するあらゆる第三者との
   間で、個人データを私たちの指示及び適用されるデータ保護に関するあらゆる法令を遵守して処理することを義務付ける契約を締結しております。又、お客様
   がアウトブレインのブログにコメントする場合、そのコメント及び情報は開示されます。コメントを削除するためには、
   support@outbrain.comまでご連絡ください。
   アウトブレインのサイトにおける第三者のサービスの利用
   アウトブレインのサイト上には、アウトブレインが所有又は管理しないウェブサイトへのリンクがあります。アウトブレインは、他の第三者のウェブサイトの
   コンテンツ、商品、サービス、プライバシーポリシー、又はデータ処理方法を管理又は保証することができません。例えば、アウトブレインのサイトにおいて
   、アウトブレインのFacebook のページ、又はLinkedin
   のページへのクリックできるアイコンがあります。お客様がこのリンクをクリックする際にFacebook 及びLinkedin
   がお客様のデバイスに自らのクッキーを送信し、個別に個人データを収集する可能性があります。従って、お客様にはFacebook やLinkedin
   のプライバシーポリシーもご確認いただきますようお願いいたします。
   エ）お客様の権利
   アウトブレインのサイトの利用は、アウトブレインのサイトの 利用条件
   にしたがうこととされ、お客様にも適用されます。お客様は、アウトブレインのサイトを利用することをいつでもやめることができます。お客様は利用するこ
   とをやめる場合に、お客様のデバイスに送信されたクッキーを削除することもできます。お客様はアウトブレインのサイトを利用する際にお客様のメールアド
   レスを提供している場合、アウトブレインから送信されるメールの「配信停止」のオプションを利用することもできます。
   アウトブレインは、 欧州
   からのサイト訪問者のために、お客様がアウトブレインのサイトで使用されるクッキー又は他の技術に同意・不同意を表明することを可能にする同意管理プラ
   ットフォーム（「 One
   Trust」を使用する）をアウトブレインのサイトおいて実施します。アウトブレインはお客様が同意しない限りクッキーを送信しません。したがって、ア
   ウトブレインが個人データを処理するための法的根拠は、「同意」となります。お客様はいつでも同意を撤回することができます。
   ユーザー：お客様は
   、アウトブレインのウィジェットがインストールされるアウトブレインのパートナーのウェブサイトのページ（以下「パートナーサイト」といいます。）を訪
   問者をユーザーといいます。例えば、お客様はhttps://news.sky.com/uk 、www.spiegel.de、又は
   www.cnn.com
   を訪問する場合、そのウェブサイトにおいてアウトブレインのウィジェットが表示されます。アウトブレインのウィジェットにおいて、アウトブレインに言及
   するテキスト（例えばレコメンデーションの近くに「アウトブレインのおすすめ」や「アウトブレインからの」といったテキスト）があります。お客様がアウ
   トブレインに言及するリンクをクリックする場合、アウトブレインがレコメンデーションにおいて利用するデータカテゴリーを提供する
   アウトブレインのInterest プロファイルへリンクする通知
   が表示されます。お客様はプロファイルにおいてパーソナルレコメンデーションからオプトアウトすることもできます。詳しくは こちらへ.
   アウトブレインのウィジェットの例
   Outbrain Example Recommendations
   ア）収集する情報及びその理由
   アウトブレインは、価値があるレコメンデーションを提供するために、UUID、IPアドレス、及び他の情報を利用します。アウトブレインのレコメンデー
   ションは、費用を払う広告社から新しいサイトへリンクするもの、又は同じパブリッシャのページへリンクするものです。
     * UUID

   お客様は最初にパートナーサイト（例えば、CNN.com）を訪問する際に、アウトブレインがUUID（一意なユーザー識別子）を割り当てることができ
   るよう、お客様のデバイスにクッキーが送信されます。アウトブレインは、お客様がパートナーサイトにおいて表示又は閲覧するコンテンツをカテゴライズし
   、分析します。アウトブレインのレコメンデーションは、（１）ブラウザの履歴、（２）他のユーザーの類似ブラウジングパータン、（３）アウトブレインの
   ユーザーにおけるその時に人気のコンテンツ、（４）ランダム、及び（５）Amplifyの顧客が提供する又は求めるターゲット条件に基づいて提供されま
   す。例えば、アウトブレインは、UUID123（例えばiPhoneXにおいてChromeのブラウザを使用してガーディアン新聞を訪問するお客様）が
   遠い外国の旅行先について読むことが好きだということ、且つ遠い外国の旅行先について読むことが好きな人は面白い外国の食べ物についても読むことが好き
   だということを知っている可能性があります。
   UUIDは数字又は文字の配列です。UUIDはお客様のデバイスに対応し、ブラウザによって変更されます。言い換えれば、アウトブレインは、お客様がパ
   ートナーサイトを訪問する毎に、お客様のデバイス又はブラウザごとに個別のUUIDを保存します。例えば、お客様がモバイルデバイスにおいてサファリと
   いうブラウザを使用してパートナーサイトを訪問する場合にあるひとつのUUIDが割り当てられ、iPadにおいてサファリというブラウザを使用してパー
   トナーサイトを訪問する場合にまた別のUUIDが割り当てられます。アウトブレインは、モバイルデバイス（携帯端末かタブレット）上のブラウザのUUI
   Dが同じデバイスにおいてアプリにアクセスする（逆も含む）場合、そのUUIDを結合します。
   アウトブレインは、デバイス又はブラウザにUUIDを割り当てることにより、お客様に対してお客様の関心に基づくレコメンデーションを提供することがで
   きるため、そのUUIDと訪問されたページ及びアウトブレインのレコメンデーションのクリックを対応させることができます。
   IPアドレス及び他の使用情報
   アウトブレインは、上記のようにUUIDを収集し、また、（１）IPアドレス、（２）ユーザーエージェントデータ；デバイスの種類（例えば携帯電話）、
   ブラウザの種類（例えばChrome）、オペレーティングシステム（例えばiOS）、（３）訪問したページ、（４）訪問時間、及び（５）リファラURL
   及びHTTP要求において通常に通信される情報を収集します。
   この統計情報は、アウトブレインのウィジェットがインストールされるパートナーサイトのページに何人が訪問しているのかということに関する情報、そのペ
   ージの訪問時間、ユーザーにクリックされたコンテンツ、及び一般的な訪問方法に関する情報をアウトブレインに提供するものです。この情報は、UUIDと
   対応しないため、個人データには該当しません。
   イ）利用するクッキー、又は使用する技術
   アウトブレインの技術が実施されるパートナーサイトを利用する際に使用するクッキーについては、こちらのクッキーテーブルの「ユーザー」の部分をご参照
   くだい。
   お客様がアウトブレインがレコメンドしたコンテンツのリンクをクリックする場合、そのレコメンデーションの遷移先ページが表示される前に、又は遷移先ペ
   ージが表示された際に、レコメンデーションのスポンサーをするAmplifyのアドバタイザーからリダイレクトを使用してお客様のデバイスにクッキーが
   送信される可能性があります。その場合、アドバタイザーのプライバシーポリシーが適用されます。
   アウトブレインのアドバタイザーは 、 表示されるアウトブレインのウィジェットに加えて
   アウトブレインピクセルを使用する可能性があります。アウトブレインピクセルは、ピクセルが実施されるページを訪問するユーザーに対応するアウトブレイ
   ン UUIDが存在するかどうか判断します。アウトブレインはエンドユーザーに対応するアウトブレインUUID が存在する場合、アドバタイザーがその
   UUIDをリターゲットすることができる機能やページを訪問する合計の UUID
   を提供します。アウトブレインピクセルは、ページへの訪問者がアウトブレイン UUID を保持しない場合にはユーザーの情報を収集しません。
   アウトブレインは、アドバタイザーが自らのウェブサイトにおいてアウトブレインピクセルが実施されている旨を開示するよう推奨しています。アウトブレイ
   ンはピクセルから収集した情報とUUIDのプロフィールを結合しません。
   各UUIDに対応するページの閲覧、及びクリック数のようなデータポイントは 13ヶ月間保存されます。例えば、UUID123が 2017年12月
   31日に記事を閲覧したという場合、その記事は2018年 2月1日にその UUIDのプロフィールから削除されます。
   ウ）情報の共有
   アウトブレインはいかなる第三者に対してもユーザーのプロフィールを共有しません。しかし、アウトブレインはクッキーの突合又は技術的に必要となる範囲
   で第三者にUUID を共有する可能性があります。
   詳しくはこのプライバシーポリシーのデータ共有の 部分もご参照ください。
   エ）お客様の権利
     * アウトブレインのオプトアウト

   お客様は、いつでもアウトブレインのパーソナルレコメンデーションからオプトアウトすることができます。お客様の個人データ及びその個人データに基づい
   てお客様にレコメンデーションをすることに関しては、アウトブレインのinterest プロファイル
   をご参照ください。お客様は、興味プロフィールからパーソナルレコメンデーションをオプトアウトすることもできます。ブラウザ上で行うオプトアウトはア
   ウトブレインのinterest プロファイル
   上で行われるものであり、アプリ上でのパーソナルレコメンデーションのオプトアウトはお客様のデバイスの設定を通して行われるものであることにご注意く
   ださい（interest プロファイル にオプトアウトの際のステップの例があります）。
   ご注意ください アウトブレインからオプトアウトしても：
     * お客様に対してまだアウトブレインのレコメンデーションが表示されます。
       アウトブレインのパーソナルトラッキングからオプトアウトをしてもアウトブレインからのレコメンデーションが表示されなくなるわけではありませ
       ん。以降表示されるレコメンデーションはお客様に特化していないだけのものとなります。レコメンデーションは、そのページに関するレコメンデー
       ションを提供するために、お客様が閲覧している文書に関する情報を利用します。
     * オプトアウトはクッキーベースであって、デバイス及びブラウザに特有される
       ものです。お客様が複数のデバイス又はブラウザからウェブサイトを訪問する場合、お客様のすべてのデバイス又はブラウザにおいてパーソナルトラ
       ッキングがなされないようにするため、お客様ご自身ですべてのデバイス又はブラウザにおいてオプトアウトをしていただく必要があります。また、
       お客様は新しいデバイスを買い、ブラウザを変更し、又はオプトアウトのクッキーを削除する場合、再度オプトアウトしなければなりません。また、
       パーソナルトラッキングからオプトアウトすることと、クッキー自体をブロックすることとは異なりますのでご注意ください。
     * お客様は、お客様のUUID
       と対応するプロフィールの削除を保証するために、最低２１日間の間はアウトブレインをオプトインしないようにご注意ください。
       お客様のアウトブレインのパーソナルレコメンデーションからのオプトアウトは直ちに実施されます。しかし、お客様のブラウザがローカル保存をす
       る設定となっており、オプトアウトから２１日以内にアウトブレインのパーソナルレコメンデーションにオプトインする場合、お客様のUUID
       にお客様の従前のプロフィールが再接続される可能性があります。お客様が２１日間以内にオプトインしない場合、お客様のプロフィールは削除され
       、回復することができなくなります。
     * アウトブレインのオプトアウト機能はクッキーに基づくものであり、ユーザーの希望を遵守するように作成されます。しかし、iOS11の
       Intelligent Tracking
       Preventionという機能は、２４時間の範囲を超える場合にウェブサイトのクッキーに影響を与える可能性があります。アウトブレインは、
       お客様が他の会社のオプトアウト方法に依存しなくてもいいように、他のブラウザを使用し、又はブラウザから第三者のクッキーをすべてブロックす
       ることをお勧めします。
     * オプトアウトの追加のオプション

   お客様は、NAI又はDAA のページ（DAA：http://www.aboutads.info/choices 、 DAAC：
   www.youradchoices.ca/choices、及び／又は EDAA
   www.youronlinechoices.eu）のような業界のツールを通してアウトブレイン又は他のアドバタイザーからのパーソナルアドバタイジ
   ングをオプトアウトすることもできます。お客様は、 NAI 、DAA、 DAAC、又は
   EDAAのページを訪問することにより、参加するメンバーのサービスから全体的、又は部分的にオプトアウトすることができます。こちらにもオプトアウト
   することで、アウトブレインのオプトアウトと同じように、お客様に広告が表示されないようになるという意味ではなく、ただお客様にパーソナルな広告が表
   示されないという意味になります。お客様が訪問するウェブサイトに基づく広告（例えば、内容に基づく広告）はまだお客様に対して表示されます。また、お
   客様は、 DAA、DAAC、又は
   EDAAコンスマーチョイスのウェブサイトを訪問する際にブラウザがクッキーを却下するように設定される場合、お客様のオプトアウトが実施されない可能
   性があります。
     * 法的根拠：
       ユーザーの個人データを処理することに関する法的根拠は、アウトブレインの各パートナーサイトの法的根拠に基づくものです。各パートナーサイト
       は、「同意」又は「正当な利益」に基づく法的根拠があります。各パートナーサイトの法的根拠の詳細については、各パートナーサイトのプライバシ
       ーポリシーをご参照ください。アウトブレインは、パートナーが「同意」という法的根拠を採用している場合、パートナーサイトにおいてお客様が同
       意しない限りクッキーを送信しません。

   ビジネスパートナー： お客様は、会社の役割としてアウトブレインの Amplify又はEngage
   のサービスを利用できるようにに登録する（又はアウトブレインとメールのやり取りを行う）場合、ビジネスパートナーとなります。詳しくは こちらへ.
   ア）収集する情報及びその理由
   お客様は、Amplify又はEngage
   のサービスに登録又はアウトブレインとのやり取りを行う際に個人データ（例えばメールアドレスなど）をアウトブレインに提供する可能性があります。お客
   様がビジネスパートナーとなることを希望される際には、アドバタイザーの申込書、広告掲載申込書、又は他の申込書において追加の情報が要求される可能性
   があります。アウトブレインは、アウトブレインダッシュボードにおいて、お客様に対応するユーザーネームの行動に関する情報を自動的に収集します。例え
   ば、お客様がキャンペーンの CPCを変更する場合、アウトブレインの監査証跡に全てのCPCの変更に対応する行動の記録が残ります。
   アウトブレインは、お客様とのビジネスパートナー（又はなり得るビジネスパートナー）としての契約条件を遵守するために例えば下記のような目的のため上
   記のようなデータを収集し、処理します。
     * お客様からのご質問及びお問い合わせに対応すること
     * お客様にAmplify及び
       Engageサービスが提供する機能へのアクセスを提供すること（例えばお客様のダッシュボードアカウントを提供、管理すること）
     * お客様のアイデンティティーを確認すること
     * お客様にお客様のアカウント、アウトブレインのサービス、又はAmplify及び
       Engageのサービスに関するプロモーションについてご連絡すること

   イ）利用するクッキー、又は使用する技術
   アウトブレインがビジネスパートナーに対して使用するクッキー（及びその有効期間）に関する詳細については、こちらのクッキーテーブル
   の「ビジネスパートナー」の部分をご参照ください。
   ウ）情報の共有
   アウトブレインは、ベンダー、コントラクター、又はアウトブレインのサービスをサポートする他の第三者（例えば、クレジットカード処理）にビジネスパー
   トナーの情報を開示する可能性があります。詳しくはこのプライバシーポリシーの データ共有 の部分をご参照ください。
   エ）お客様の権利
   お客様がビジネスパートナーとして、個人データを確認、修正、更新、又は削除を希望する場合、アウトブレインのダッシュボードの「プロフィール設定」か
   ら行っていただくことができます。あるいは、support@outbrain.com
   までご連絡ください。お客様は、お客様にアウトブレインのメールが送信されている場合、そのメールに記載されているリンクを通して配信停止をすることも
   できます。「配信停止」によっても、アウトブレインのサービスを提供するために必要な連絡又は通知にはオプトアウトの効果は生じません（例えば、請求書
   など）。
   アウトブレインがビジネスパートナーの個人データを処理する法的根拠は「正当な利益」です。
   ３．アウトブレインの情報保持、欧州経済領域外への移転、共有及び保存
   +
   セキュリティー
   アウトブレインには専門のセキュリティーチームがあります。アウトブレインは個人データの厳密な管理体制を整備し、その個人データは、ファイアウォール
   が設けられた安全なサーバーに保存され、且つ、アクセス権が限定されます。詳しくはアウトブレインのセキュリティー規定 をご参照ください。
   ビジネスパートナーは、Amply又はEngage
   のサービスにおいてパスワードによって保護される機能に対するアクセス権が有します。ビジネスパートナーはこのパスワードを秘密情報として扱う責任があ
   ります。お客様はインターネットを通じた情報通信は完全に安全ではないということにご注意ください。「スプーフィング」又は「フィッシング」と呼ばれる
   詐欺行為もあります。「スプーフィング」又は「フィッシング」とは、信頼されている主体になりすまして個人データを求める電子メールです。アウトブレイ
   ンが、クレジットカード、銀行情報、又は他の個人データを求めるメールを送信することはありません。もしお客様が、アウトブレインになりすました個人デ
   ータを求めるメールを受信したような場合には、これに対し返事すること、又は表示されたリンクをクリックすることのないようにご注意ください。アウトブ
   レインがそのインターネットを通じた詐欺行為を確認できるように、何かありましたら、 legal@outbrain.comまでにご連絡ください。
   欧州／欧州経済領域外のデータ移転
   アウトブレインは、欧州又は欧州経済領域から、欧州と同等のデータプライバシー保護がなされていない国にデータを移転する場合、適切なデータプライバシ
   ー保護を提供できるような措置を実施します。つまり、お客様のデータはお客様の権利と一緒に移転します。例えば、私たちは承認された契約条項（標準契約
   条項）の使用やその他の個人データの受領者がお客様のデータを保護するための措置を実施します。
   共有
   以上のユーザータイプ別の個人データの開示に加えて、次の方法で個人データが開示される可能性もあります。
     * ビジネス及び業務遂行を目的として、アウトブレインの関連子会社間における開示
     * アウトブレインが合併、買収、又は事業譲渡の対象となることにより、個人データも移転対象となることによる開示
     * 法令、規則、管轄官庁の求めに応じた開示（例えば、法律の執行の又は他の訴訟手続きの協力を目的とする開示）
     * 緊急事態下における開示

   上記に加えて、アウトブレインは、傾向情報及び集合体のユーザー情報を第三者に共有できるようにお客様の個人データと他のユーザー情報を結合します。結
   合される情報は常に集合体及び匿名扱いの状態にあります。
   データ保持
   アウトブレインが使用するクッキー（自らのクッキー及び第三者のも含む）の有効期間はクッキーテーブル に記載されます。
   アウトブレインは、個人データが法律上及び取引上どの程度の期間必要とされるかという分析を踏まえて、データの保存期間を定めるデータ保持ポリシーを整
   備します。
   個人データの必要性がなくなった場合、アウトブレインは確実に個人情報を削除、又は消去します。デバイス、ブラウザ、又は個人を特定しない集合体データ
   は、報告又は分析のため、商業的な必要性がある限り保持されます。
   ４．未成年に対して
   +
   アウトブレインは16歳未満の未成年を対象とするサービスを提供しません。また、アウトブレインは、
   16歳未満の未成年の個人データを意図的に収集することは行いません。データを取集する際にサイト訪問者、ユーザー、又はビジネスパートナーが16
   歳未満の未成年であることが判明した場合、その個人データが利用され、又は保存されることはありません。アウトブレインは、意図せず
   16歳未満の未成年者の個人データを収集したことを知った場合、その個人データを削除するために必要となる合理的な対応を行います。アウトブレインは、
   未成年者はアウトブレインを利用するよりも、外で遊ぶ方が望ましいと考えています。
   ５．欧州市民
   +
   欧州の市民には、欧州のプライバシーに関する法律、特に欧州の個人データ保護規則（General Data Protection
   Regulation）（以下「
   GDPR」という）に基づいた個人データに関するアクセス、訂正、拒否、削除、ブロック、及び苦情申し立ての権利があります。具体的には、
     * お客様の個人データが処理されているか否か、されているとすれば、どの情報についてであるのかについての情報を求める権利及び個人データの修正
       あるいは訂正を求める権利
     * 状況により、自己の個人データの削除を求める権利
     * 状況により、自己の個人データの処理の限定を求める権利
     * お客様の個人データの処理及び利用に対する同意の全部または一部を撤回する権利
     * 一般的に、整理された、機械的に読み取ることができる方法で事故の個人データのコピーを取得する権利
     * アウトブレインのデータ保持及びお客様の個人データの処理に関する質問、コメント、要求、又は苦情がある場合に、アウトブレインのData
       Protection Officerと連絡する権利
     * 規則に違反した個人データの処理が行われていると信じる場合の監督機関に対する苦情申し立ての権利

   上記に加えてこのプライバシーポリシーに欧州市民の権利が参照されます。GDPRに応じて、「欧州市民」とは、欧州経済領域及びスイス連邦を意味します
   。このプライバシーポリシーにおいては、「欧州」とは、ブレグジット以降イギリスが欧州連合から脱退した後でもイギリスを含むものとします。
   上記の権利についてお問い合わせがある場合、PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com までご連絡ください。
   ６．カリフォルニア州のプライバシーポリシー
   +
   カリフォルニア州住民は、カリフォルニア州の民法1798.83
   及び1798.84号により、アウトブレインに、アウトブレインがダイレクトマーケティングできるように第三者又は関連会社と共有する個人データのカテ
   ゴリーが記載された通知書の発行を求める権利があります。その通知書には共有される情報が特定され、また共有する第三者及び関連会社、その第三者及び関
   連会社の住所が含まれます。お客様がカリフォルニア州住民の場合、この通知書を取得するためには
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.comまでご連絡ください。又は次の住所までご連絡ください。
   Outbrain Inc.
   39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor
   New York, NY 10011
   応答のために30日間かかりますのでご了承ください。
   ７．「Do Not Track」の開示
   +
   ブラウザによって「Do Not Track」（以下「DNT
   」という）の信号が通信されます。アウトブレインは、DNT信号に関して一般的な解読がないため、現在ブラウザからの DNT
   信号に対応していません。アウトブレインは、DNT 信号に関する業界活動を監視し、必要性に応じて DNT 活動を更新します。
   お客様は、アウトブレインがユーザーのところにおいて パーソナルレコメンデーションからオプトアウトすること
   も含む他の提供されるツールを利用してデータ収集及び利用を管理することができます。
   ８．プライバシーポリシーの更新
   +
   アウトブレインはこのプライバシーポリシーを随時更新します。アウトブレインはサイト訪問者又はビジネスパートナーがこれを明確に知ることができるよう
   変更のお知らせをサイト上で表示しますが、ユーザーに対し個別に通知をする方法を有していません。アウトブレインは、お客様ご自身でプライバシーポリシ
   ーの更新を確認するため、このページを定期的に閲覧されるようお願いいたします。プライバシーポリシーの更新日付は、お客様にこのプライバシーポリシー
   がいつ更新されたのかをご確認いただけるように、常にこのページの上において表示されます。

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                 Última atualização: 23 de maio de 2018

   A Outbrain tem o compromisso de proteger seus dados pessoais. Esta
   política de privacidade (“Política de Privacidade”) rege o uso pela
   Outbrain dos dados coletados por nós, incluindo todos e quaisquer dados
   pessoais. Dados pessoais são informações relacionadas a você e que
   podem identificá-lo como indivíduo. Usamos seus dados pessoais
   cumprindo todas as leis aplicáveis. Para garantir a conformidade e o
   alinhamento aos valores da Outbrain de confiança e transparência, temos
   uma equipe de especialistas responsável por implementar continuamente o
   nosso programa global de privacidade.

                                                              + EXPAND ALL

   1. Quem somos, o que fazemos, como contatar a Outbrain, nosso DPO ou as
   autoridades competentes

                                      +

   Quem somos:
   Outbrain representa a Outbrain Inc., empresa de Delaware, EUA com sede
   em Nova York; e suas subsidiárias afiliadas (coletivamente denominadas
   “Outbrain” ou “nós”, “nos”, “nosso(as)”). Operamos a partir de 12
   escritórios globalmente e trabalhamos em parceria com editores de
   conteúdo e marketing do mundo todo.
   O que fazemos:
   A missão da Outbrain é oferecer recomendações interessantes aos seus
   Usuários com base nos seus interesses. Para cumprir nossa missão,
   firmamos acordos com:
     * Produtores e editores de conteúdo on-line e parceiros que desejam
       recomendar conteúdo relevante aos seus leitores (no Outbrain
       Engage); e
     * anunciantes que desejam que leitores visualizem seu conteúdo (no
       Outbrain Amplify).

   Como nos contatar:
   Fazemos verificações regulares de conformidade com base nesta Política
   de Privacidade. Perguntas, comentários e solicitações relacionados a
   esta Política de Privacidade são bem-vindos e devem ser encaminhados a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou via correio a Outbrain Inc., 39 West
   13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, USA, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Caso a Outbrain não forneça resposta satisfatória para suas perguntas
   ou preocupações, também é possível contatar o seguinte departamento
   para orientações, suporte ou reclamações:
     * responsável externa Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) da Outbrain:
       ePrivacy GmbH, representada pelo Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. A
       ePrivacy GmbH pode ser contatada diretamente via
       privacy@eprivacy.eu; e/ou
     * o órgão público britânico Information Commissioner’s Officer, que é
       o principal serviço supervisor da Outbrain nos Territórios
       Europeus.

   Órgãos de autorregulação
   A Outbrain segue os Princípios de Autorregulação definidos pela Digital
   Advertising Alliance (DAA) e pela European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Somos membros conceituados da Network
   Advertising Initiative (NAI), associação dedicada à coleta responsável
   de dados e ao seu uso para publicidade digital. Seguimos o Code of
   Conduct for Web and Mobile (Código de Conduta para Web e Internet
   Móvel) da NAI. A Outbrain também segue os Self-Regulatory Principles
   for Online Behavioral Advertising (Princípios de Autorregulação para
   Publicidade Comportamental On-line) e o Europe OBA Framework do
   Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB).
   2. Tipos de usuários da Outbrain

                                      +

   Parte desta Política de Privacidade está dividida em seções baseadas no
   seu modo de interagir com a Outbrain portanto é necessário definir em
   qual tipo de usuário você se encaixa. Para cada tipo de usuário,
   explicamos que tipo de informação coletamos e por que, quais cookies e
   outras tecnologias similares usamos, como compartilhamos essas
   informações e quais são os seus direitos.
   Visitantes do Site: Você é um “Visitante do Site” ao visitar e
   interagir com nossos websites, páginas na web, recursos interativos,
   blogs e seus respectivos conteúdos no Outbrain.com (ou qualquer página
   derivada, como Outbrain.co.uk; Outbrain.fr; Outbrain.de, etc.) e no
   MyOutbrain.com (“Nossos Sites“). Veja mais aqui.
   (a)&Tab;Quais informações coletamos e por quê
   Queremos entender quais serviços nos Nossos Sites interessam a você e
   lembrá-lo dos serviços que oferecemos quando você não está nos Nossos
   Sites. Para fazê-lo, coletamos as seguintes informações suas: (i)
   endereço IP; (ii) dados do Agente do Usuário: tipo de dispositivo (ex.:
   iPhone), tipo de navegador (ex.: Chrome), sistema operacional (ex.:
   iOS); (iii) páginas visitadas no Nosso Site (ex.: página “Sobre nós” da
   Outbrain); (iv) horário da visita (e respectivo fuso horário); e (v)
   URLs de encaminhamento e outras informações normalmente transmitidas em
   solicitações HTTP (ex.: essas informações nos dizem como você chegou
   aos Nossos Sites).
   (b)&Tab;Quais cookies e outras tecnologias similares utilizamos
   Consulte esta Tabela de Cookies em “Visitantes do Site” para uma lista
   detalhada dos cookies (e os respectivos períodos de retenção) que
   usamos quando você visita os Nossos Sites.
   (c)&Tab;Como podemos compartilhar informações
     * Compartilhamento de informações que coletamos sobre você nos Nossos
       Sites.

   De maneira geral, não compartilhamos dados pessoais seus com terceiros
   para fins de marketing ou publicidade de terceiros. No entanto,
   recorremos a vários terceiros (todos listados nesta Tabela de Cookies)
   para nos ajudar a vender ou fazer publicidade para você. Por exemplo:
   alguns dos cookies que usamos nos Nossos Sites pertencem a terceiros
   que ajudarão a Outbrain a vender ou fazer publicidade para você.
   Exigimos que esses terceiros e empresas se comprometam a manter
   confidenciais todas as informações compartilhadas com eles e a usar as
   informações somente para cumprir suas obrigações conosco. Fazemos isso
   firmando acordos com todos os terceiros que processam dados pessoais em
   nosso nome para garantir que eles processem seus dados pessoais em
   conformidade com nossas instruções exatas e com todas as leis de
   proteção de dados aplicáveis. Se você publicar em nosso blog, seu
   comentário e suas informações ficarão visíveis publicamente. Entre em
   contato com support@outbrain.com para solicitar a remoção do seu
   comentário.
     * Usando serviços de terceiros nos Nossos Sites.

   Nossos Sites contêm links para outros websites que não operamos nem são
   de nossa propriedade. Não controlamos, recomendamos ou endossamos o
   conteúdo, os produtos, serviços, políticas de privacidade ou práticas
   desses websites de terceiros. Por exemplo: nos Nossos Sites, você
   notará ícones clicáveis que o levam à página da Outbrain no Facebook ou
   no LinkedIn. Ao escolher clicar nesses links, você deve estar ciente de
   que Facebook e LinkedIn podem enviar seus próprios cookies ao seu
   aparelho, que podem coletar dados pessoais de maneira independente. Por
   isso, é importante que você leia as políticas de privacidade do
   Facebook e/ou LinkedIn.
     * Consulte também a seção de Compartilhamento desta Política de
       Privacidade.

   (d)&Tab;Seus direitos
   Os Termos de Uso no Nosso Site regem o uso do Nosso Site e também se
   aplicam a você. Você pode interromper o uso do Nosso Site a qualquer
   momento. Ao fazê-lo, também tem a opção de remover quaisquer cookies
   que tenhamos colocado em qualquer dispositivo usado para acessar o
   Nosso Site. Se você forneceu seu endereço de e-mail durante o uso dos
   Nossos Sites, todos os e-mails que você receber da Outbrain incluirão a
   opção de se “descadastrar”.
   Para Visitantes no Território Europeu, a Outbrain implementou uma
   plataforma de gestão de consentimento (operada pela One Trust) nos
   Nossos Sites que dá aos visitantes a oportunidade de autorizar ou não
   cookies e tecnologias similares de rastreamento nos Nossos Sites. Se
   você não deu seu consentimento (especificamente em “aceitar”), a
   Outbrain não permitirá que Nosso Site instale cookies. A base legal da
   Outbrain para processar dados pessoais em Nossos Sites é o
   consentimento. Você pode retirar seu consentimento a qualquer momento
   aqui.
   Usuários: Você é um “Usuário” ao visitar uma página de um website ou
   aplicativo de um dos parceiros da Outbrain onde o widget da Outbrain
   esteja instalado (“Sites Parceiros”). Por exemplo, ao visitar
   https://news.sky.com/uk, www.spiegel.de ou www.cnn.com, o widget
   Outbrain está implementado nesses sites. Ao interagir com um widget da
   Outbrain, você é informado por um texto que faz referência à Outbrain
   (ex.: “Recomendado pela Outbrain” ou “by Outbrain” ao lado das
   recomendações). Ao clicar no link que faz referência à Outbrain, você
   verá um aviso detalhado que permite acessar o Perfil de Interesse da
   Outbrain, que fornece uma visualização geral dos tipos de categorias de
   dados da Outbrain que podem ser usados para fazer suas recomendações.
   Ele também permite optar por recusar recomendações personalizadas. Veja
   mais aqui.
   Exemplo de widget da Outbrain
   [S1q4BIXJQ.png]
   (a) Quais informações coletamos e por quê
   Usamos UUIDs, endereço IP e outras Informações de Uso para poder lhe
   oferecer recomendações interessantes. As recomendações da Outbrain
   podem ser pagas por um anunciante que redireciona você para um novo
   website ou podem ser orgânicas, com link para outra página no site do
   mesmo anunciante.
     * UUID.

   Quando, como usuário, você visita pela primeira vez um Site Parceiro
   (ex.: CNN.com), a Outbrain instala um cookie no seu dispositivo para
   gerar um UUID (identificador único de usuário). Nós catalogamos e
   analisamos o conteúdo que você consome nos Sites Parceiros. Nossas
   recomendações baseiam-se em: (i) histórico de navegação; (ii) padrões
   de navegação similares de outros Usuários; (ii) recomendações
   geralmente populares entre o público da Outbrain atualmente; (iv) um
   certo grau de aleatoriedade; e (v) requisitos de público-alvo que podem
   ser fornecidos ou solicitados por nossos clientes Amplify. Por exemplo,
   a Outbrain pode saber que o UUID 123 (que poderia ser você no seu
   iPhone X acessando o jornal Guardian usando o Chrome como navegador)
   gosta de ler sobre destinos de férias remotos e que pessoas que gostam
   de ler sobre destinos de férias remotos também gostam de ler sobre
   comida exótica.
   O UUID é uma sequência de números e/ou letras. Esse UUID vincula-se ao
   seu dispositivo e varia conforme o navegador que você usa. Em outras
   palavras, a Outbrain registra um UUID diferente dependendo do aparelho
   e/ou navegador que você está usando ao acessar os Sites Parceiros. Por
   exemplo, isso significa que você terá um UUID quando visitar um Site
   Parceiro a partir do seu celular usando o navegador Safari e outro UUID
   ao visitar um Site Parceiro do seu iPad usando o navegador Safari. A
   Outbrain combinará e consolidará o UUID de um aparelho móvel (celular
   ou tablet) por um navegador que depois acessa um aplicativo (ou
   vice-versa) a partir do mesmo dispositivo.
   Atribuir um UUID permite à Outbrain associar as visualizações das
   páginas visitadas e cliques nas recomendações da Outbrain desse UUID –
   tudo com o objetivo de fornecer recomendações interessantes.
     * Endereço IP e outras Informações de Uso.

   Coletamos um UUID conforme explicado acima e ainda as seguintes
   informações: (i) endereço IP (depois anonimizado com base nos padrões
   do setor); (ii) dados do Agente do Usuário: tipo de dispositivo (ex.:
   iPhone), tipo de navegador (ex.: Chrome), sistema operacional (ex.:
   iOS); (iii) páginas visitadas; (iv) horário da visita; e (v) URLs de
   encaminhamento e outras informações normalmente transmitidas em
   solicitações HTTP.
   As informações estatísticas acima nos fornecem dados de como muitos
   Usuários visitaram determinada página dos nossos Sites Parceiros que
   tem o widget da Outbrain instalado, quanto tempo cada Usuário ficou
   nessa página, o tipo de conteúdo na página em que clicou e como foi seu
   engajamento geral com a página em questão. Essas informações só são
   dados pessoais quando associadas a um UUID.
   (b) Quais cookies e outras tecnologias similares utilizamos
   Consulte esta Tabela de Cookies em “Usuários” para uma lista detalhada
   dos cookies internos que usamos quando você interage com Sites
   Parceiros que tenham a tecnologia Outbrain implementada.
   Ao clicar no link para uma das nossas recomendações, o anunciante
   Amplify que patrocina a recomendação pode instalar cookies no seu
   aparelho via redirecionamentos antes da chegada à página de destino das
   recomendações ou ao chegar à página de destino. Nesses casos, você
   estará sujeito à política de privacidade desse anunciante.
   Além do widget visível em Sites Parceiros da Outbrain, determinados
   anunciantes Outbrain podem implementar o pixel Outbrain nos seus
   websites. O pixel Outbrain determina se o usuário que acessa a página
   na qual o pixel está instalado possui um UUID Outbrain. Se houver um
   UUID associado a esse usuário final, a Outbrain permitirá que
   anunciantes redirecionem sua publicidade a esses UUIDs e/ou fornecerá
   aos anunciantes o número total de UUIDs que acessaram a página em
   questão. Se não houver UUID Outbrain associado ao usuário que visitou a
   página, o pixel Outbrain não coletará nenhuma informação sobre o
   usuário. Encorajamos anunciantes a comunicar o uso do pixel Outbrain
   nos seus próprios websites. A Outbrain não combina informações do pixel
   a perfis UUID.
   Pontos de dados como visualizações de páginas e cliques são vinculados
   a um UUID particular e mantidos por 13 meses. Por exemplo: se o UUID
   123 leu um artigo em 31 de dezembro de 2017, em 1º de fevereiro de 2018
   esse artigo deixará de fazer parte do perfil UUID 123.
   (c) Como podemos compartilhar informações
   A Outbrain não compartilha perfis de Usuário com nenhum terceiro.
   Contudo, podemos compartilhar o UUID com determinados parceiros para
   fins de sincronização de cookies ou com base em requisitos técnicos.
   Consulte também a seção de Compartilhamento desta Política de
   Privacidade.
   (d) Seus direitos
     * Recusa à Outbrain.

   Você pode optar por recusar as recomendações personalizadas da Outbrain
   a qualquer momento. Consulte o Perfil de Interesse da Outbrain para uma
   visualização geral dos dados que a Outbrain conhece a seu respeito e
   pode usar para fazer suas recomendações. O Perfil de Interesse também
   permite optar por recusar recomendações personalizadas (você também
   pode fazer a recusa simplesmente clicando aqui). Note que a recusa nos
   navegadores é feita pelo Perfil de Interesse da Outbrain, mas que a
   recusa de recomendações personalizadas em aplicativos é feita pelas
   configurações do seu dispositivo (veja exemplos de passo a passo no
   Perfil de Interesse).
   IMPORTANTE – mesmo fazendo a recusa à Outbrain:
     * Você ainda verá recomendações da Outbrain. Recusar o rastreamento
       para personalização da Outbrain não significa que você deixará de
       receber recomendações da Outbrain. Em vez disso, significa que as
       recomendações da Outbrain não serão personalizadas. As
       recomendações ainda usarão informações sobre o documento que você
       está visualizando (ou seja, informações contextuais) para lhe
       fornecer recomendações na página em questão.
     * A recusa baseia-se em cookies e é específica para cada
       dispositivo/navegador. Se você navegar na internet em diferentes
       dispositivos e/ou navegadores, você precisará fazer a recusa em
       cada aparelho e/ou navegador para que possamos impedir o
       rastreamento para personalização em todos eles. Pela mesma razão,
       se você comprar um novo dispositivo, mudar de navegador ou excluir
       (ou limpar) o cookie de recusa, será necessário fazer a recusa
       novamente. Recusar o rastreamento para personalização não significa
       bloquear cookies.
     * Para garantir a exclusão do perfil vinculado ao seu UUID, não
       exclua seu cookie de recusa da Outbrain por ao menos 21 dias. Sua
       recusa às recomendações personalizadas da Outbrain entra em vigor
       imediatamente. No entanto, se o seu navegador permite armazenamento
       local e você aceitar novamente as recomendações personalizadas da
       Outbrain dentro de 21 dias após sua recusa, é possível que seu
       perfil anterior seja revinculado ao seu UUID. Se você não fizer
       nova aceitação dentro de 21 dias, seu perfil será excluído e não
       poderá ser recuperado.
     * Como acontece na maioria das recusas, a recusa à Outbrain no
       navegador é feita usando um cookie. O cookie de recusa é feito para
       ser mantido, a fim de cumprir as preferências do usuário. No
       entanto, o recurso de “Prevenção de Rastreamento Inteligente” do
       Safari no iOS 11 pode impactar na persistência dos cookies entre
       websites após uma janela de 24 horas. Sugerimos usar outro
       navegador ou bloquear todos os cookies de terceiros do navegador
       para que você faça a recusa sem precisar depender de nenhuma
       metodologia de recusa de nenhuma empresa.
     * Opções adicionais de recusa.

   Você também pode optar por recusar receber anúncios personalizados
   oferecidos por nós ou outras empresas de publicidade usando ferramentas
   de entidades do setor, como as páginas da NAI ou as diversas páginas
   baseadas na DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
   www.youradchoices.ca/choices e/ou EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
   Visitando as páginas da NAI, DAA, DAAC ou EDAA pró-escolha do
   consumidor permite recusar todos ou alguns dos serviços dos membros
   participantes. Como ocorre na recusa junto à Outbrain, essas recusas
   não significam que você deixará de receber todos os anúncios: eles só
   deixarão de ser sob medida para você. Você pode continuar a receber
   anúncios; por exemplo, com base no website específico que você está
   visualizando (ou seja, anúncios baseados no contexto). E se os seus
   navegadores estiverem configurados para rejeitar cookies quando você
   visitar as páginas pró-escolha do consumidor da DAA, DAAC ou EDAA, a
   recusa também pode não funcionar corretamente.
     * Bases legais.

   Os fundamentos legais da Outbrain para processar dados pessoais de
   Usuários apoiam-se nas bases legais determinadas por cada um dos nossos
   Sites Parceiros. Cada Site Parceiro baseia-se em consentimento ou
   interesse legítimo. Consulte a política de privacidade aplicável dos
   Sites Parceiros para mais informações sobre as bases legais utilizadas.
   Se um Parceiro se basear no seu consentimento, a Outbrain não instalará
   um cookie nos seus aparelhos sem que você tenha dado seu consentimento
   no respectivo Site Parceiro.
   Parceiros Comerciais: Você é um “Parceiro Comercial” ao se cadastrar
   (ou trocar e-mails com a Outbrain) em nome da empresa para a qual
   trabalha para utilizar os serviços Outbrain Amplify ou Outbrain Engage.
   Veja mais aqui.
   (a) Quais informações coletamos e por quê
   Você pode fornecer determinados dados pessoais (como endereço de
   e-mail) ao se inscrever para os serviços Amplify ou Engage ou se
   comunicar ou interagir conosco por outros meios. Se você se inscrever
   para se tornar Parceiro Comercial, podemos solicitar informações
   adicionais suas via formulários de inscrição para anunciante, pedidos
   de inserção e outros meios. Coletamos informações automaticamente sobre
   as ações do seu nome de usuário no painel da Outbrain. Por exemplo, se
   como Parceiro Comercial Amplify você alterar o custo por clique de uma
   de suas campanhas, o registro de auditoria da Outbrain terá o histórico
   de todas essas ações.
   Coletamos e processamos os dados pessoais acima para cumprir nossas
   obrigações nos termos do nosso acordo como Parceiro Comercial (ou
   potencial Parceiro Comercial) seu, inclusive para:
   responder às suas perguntas e solicitações;
   fornecer acesso a determinadas funções e recursos dos nossos serviços
   Amplify ou Engage (ex.: para fornecimento e manutenção da sua conta no
   painel);
   verificar sua identidade;
   nos comunicar com você sobre sua conta, nossos produtos e promoções
   disponíveis relevantes para o seu uso do serviço Amplify ou Engage.
   (b) Quais cookies e outras tecnologias similares utilizamos
   Consulte esta Tabela de Cookies em “Parceiros Comerciais” para uma
   lista detalhada dos cookies (e os respectivos períodos de retenção) que
   usamos com Parceiros Comerciais.
   (c) Como podemos compartilhar informações
   Podemos revelar determinadas informações de Parceiros Comerciais a
   fornecedores, prestadores de serviços ou outros que auxiliem a Outbrain
   na prestação dos seus serviços (ex.: processamento de cartões de
   crédito). Consulte também a seção de Compartilhamento desta Política de
   Privacidade.
   (d) Seus direitos
   Se, como Parceiro Comercial, você deseja verificar, corrigir, atualizar
   ou solicitar desativação das suas informações, você pode acessar o
   painel da Outbrain para editar suas preferências de perfil ou nos
   contatar em support@outbrain.com. Se você está recebendo e-mails da
   Outbrain, você pode se “descadastrar” acessando o link nos e-mails.
   Observe que o descadastramento pode não desativar o recebimento de
   notificações importantes para o fornecimento dos serviços Amplify ou
   Engage (ex.: faturas por e-mail).
   A base legal da Outbrain para processar dados pessoais dos Parceiros
   Comerciais é o seu interesse legítimo.
   3. Como mantemos a segurança das informações, transferências fora do
   EEE, compartilhamento e períodos de retenção

                                      +

   Segurança
   A Outbrain possui uma equipe de segurança dedicada. Mantemos rigorosos
   controles sobre os dados que coletamos, mantendo-os em bancos de dados
   protegidos com firewall e permissões de acesso estritamente limitadas e
   controladas, para garantir sua segurança. Verifique nossos padrões de
   segurança para mais informações.
   Parceiros Comerciais têm acesso a certos recursos protegidos por senha
   dos serviços Amplify ou Engage. Eles são responsáveis por manter sua
   senha confidencial. Lembre-se que, infelizmente, a transmissão de
   informações via internet não é totalmente segura. Um tipo de fraude
   comum na internet é conhecido como spoofing ou phishing. Ele ocorre
   quando você recebe um e-mail de uma fonte que parece legítima
   solicitando dados pessoais seus. Tenha em mente que não lhe mandaremos
   nenhum e-mail solicitando a verificação de cartão de crédito,
   informações bancárias ou quaisquer outros dados pessoais. Se você vier
   a receber um e-mail que pareça ser nosso solicitando essas informações
   suas, não responda e não clique em nenhum link constante no e-mail. Em
   vez disso, pedimos que nos encaminhe o e-mail para legal@outbrain.com
   para que possamos investigar possíveis casos de fraude pela internet.
   Transferências de dados fora da UE/do EEE
   Quando transferimos dados pessoais do Espaço Econômico Europeu a outros
   países nos quais as leis aplicáveis não oferecem o mesmo nível de
   proteção à privacidade dos dados que nos Territórios Europeus, tomamos
   medidas para fornecer um nível adequado de proteção à privacidade dos
   dados. Em outras palavras, seus direitos e proteções são conservados
   com seus dados. Por exemplo: usamos cláusulas contratuais aprovadas e
   outras medidas criadas para garantir que os receptores dos seus dados
   pessoais os protejam.
   Compartilhamento
   Adicionalmente à descrição de como podemos revelar seus dados pessoais
   para cada tipo de usuário, também podemos divulgar dados pessoais nos
   seguintes casos:
     * Dentro do grupo de empresas controladas pela Outbrain, por razões
       internas, principalmente para fins comerciais e operacionais;
     * Se passarmos por uma transição comercial, como uma fusão, aquisição
       por outra empresa ou venda total ou parcial dos nossos ativos, seus
       dados pessoais provavelmente estarão entre os ativos transferidos;
     * Quando legalmente exigido (ex.: para cooperar com investigações
       para aplicação da lei ou outros procedimentos legais); e/ou
     * Para reagir a emergências reais.

   Adicionalmente, combinamos seus dados pessoais aos dos outros usuários
   para compartilhar informações sobre tendências e reunir estatísticas de
   usuários com terceiros, sempre de forma agregada e anonimizada.
   Retenção de dados
   O período de retenção para cada um dos cookies usados pela Outbrain
   (seja por ela mesma ou em nosso nome por terceiros) está descrito na
   Tabela de Cookies.
   A Outbrain também mantém uma Política de Retenção de Dados que detalha
   o período de retenção de dados pessoais com base em nossa análise do
   prazo razoável em que é necessário manter cada dado específico para
   fins legais ou comerciais. Quando não precisamos mais dos dados
   pessoais, os excluímos ou destruímos com segurança. Dados agregados,
   que não são capazes de identificar um dispositivo/navegador (ou
   indivíduo) e são usados para fins de relatórios e análise, são mantidos
   enquanto comercialmente necessários.
   4. Crianças

                                      +

   Nenhum dos nossos serviços é destinado a crianças menores de 16 anos.
   Não coletamos deliberadamente dados pessoais de menores de 16 anos de
   idade. Se durante a coleta constatarmos que um Visitante do Site,
   Usuário ou Parceiro Comercial é menor de 16 anos, não usaremos ou
   manteremos seus dados pessoais. Se tomarmos ciência de que
   involuntariamente coletamos dados pessoais de uma criança menor de 16
   anos, tomaremos medidas razoáveis para excluir tais informações dos
   nossos registros. Se você é criança, pedimos que vá brincar no quintal
   em vez de usar ou interagir com a Outbrain!
   5. Cidadãos do Território Europeu

                                      +

   Em conformidade com as leis de privacidade europeias, especialmente com
   o Regulamento Geral de Proteção de Dados da União Europeia (RGPD), a
   Outbrain fornece direitos adicionais específicos a cidadãos dos
   Territórios Europeus, como o direito de acesso, retificação,
   contestação, reclamação, exclusão e bloqueio. Mais especificamente:
     * o direito de perguntar se ou quais dados pessoais estão sendo
       processados por nós e o direito de solicitar que os dados pessoais
       sejam corrigidos ou alterados;
     * em determinadas circunstâncias, o direito de solicitar a exclusão
       de dados pessoais;
     * em determinadas circunstâncias, o direito de exigir restrições no
       processamento de dados pessoais;
     * o direito de cancelar seu consentimento para processamento e uso
       dos seus dados, total ou parcialmente e a qualquer momento, com
       validade para o futuro;
     * o direito de receber seus dados pessoais em formato comum,
       estruturado e mecanicamente legível;
     * o direito de contatar nosso responsável pela proteção dos dados se
       tiver perguntas, comentários, reclamações ou solicitações
       relacionadas à nossa declaração sobre proteção de dados e o
       processamento dos seus dados pessoais;
     * o direito de reclamar à autoridade supervisora responsável caso
       acredite que o processamento dos seus dados pessoais está violando
       a legislação.

   Além dos itens acima, relacionamos determinados direitos para cdadãos
   do Território Europeu ao longo desta Política de Privacidade. Nos
   termos do RGPD, são considerados “Territórios Europeus” o Espaço
   Econômico Europeu (EEE) e a Suíça. Para os fins desta Política de
   Privacidade, o termo “Territórios Europeus” deve continuar a incluir o
   Reino Unido mesmo após sua retirada do Espaço Econômico Europeu em
   decorrência do Brexit.
   Em caso de perguntas sobre o exercício de quaisquer dos direitos acima,
   envie um e-mail a privacyquestions@outbrain.com.
   6. Direitos de privacidade da Califórnia

                                      +

   Conforme o Código Civil da Califórnia, EUA, nos termos das seções
   1798.83–1798.84, os residentes da Califórnia têm direito de nos
   solicitar uma notificação que descreva quais categorias de informações
   pessoais compartilhamos com terceiros ou afiliados corporativos para os
   fins de marketing direto desses terceiros ou afiliados corporativos.
   Essa notificação identificará as categorias de informações
   compartilhadas e incluirá uma lista dos terceiros e afiliados com os
   quais foram compartilhadas, junto com os respectivos nomes e endereços.
   Se você é residente da Califórnia e gostaria de receber uma cópia dessa
   notificação, envie sua solicitação por escrito a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou ao seguinte endereço: Outbrain Inc.,
   39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, USA. Pedimos que
   aguarde 30 dias para a resposta.
   7. Comunicazione antitracciamento (“Do Not Track”)

                                      +

   Alguns navegadores transmitem sinais Do Not Track (DNT), ou Não
   Rastrear, aos websites. Como não há consenso sobre como interpretar o
   sinal DNT, a Outbrain atualmente não altera, modifica ou responde a
   solicitações ou sinais DNT desses navegadores. Continuaremos a
   monitorar a atuação do setor nesse âmbito e reavaliaremos nossas
   práticas relacionadas a DNT se necessário. Enquanto isso, você pode
   utilizar as várias outras ferramentas que fornecemos para controlar a
   coleta e o uso de dados, incluindo a possibilidade de optar por recusar
   o recebimento de recomendações personalizadas na seção Usuários.
   8. Como esta Política de Privacidade pode mudar

                                      +

   De tempos em tempos, podemos fazer alterações nesta Política de
   Privacidade. Nesse caso, colocaremos um aviso em destaque, visível para
   você como Visitante do Site ou Parceiro Comercial. Contudo, não temos
   meios para alertar Usuários sobre atualizações. Recomendamos que você
   verifique aqui periodicamente se a Política de Privacidade foi
   atualizada. Sempre exibiremos a data da última alteração da Política de
   Privacidade no topo da página, para que você saiba a última vez em que
   foi revisada.

Cookies

Version 4.4

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   OUTBRAIN'S COOKIE TABLE
   This Cookie Table provides you with information about the cookies and
   other similar technologies Outbrain and/or its partners may use, their
   purpose and the retention period associated with such cookie. Where a
   third party partner drops a cookie, they determine the purpose for
   which that cookie is dropped and the relevant retention period.
   We may place cookies or similar files such as pixel tags and web
   beacons on the devices you use to engage with Outbrain for security
   purposes, to facilitate site navigation and to personalize your
   experience when you engage with Outbrain as a Site Vistior, a User or a
   Business Partner. Cookies allow us to collect technical and
   navigational information, such as browser type, time spent by you
   engaging with Outbrain and pages visited. Please read the Privacy
   Policy to further understand how we use data collected by these
   cookies.
   For even more information about cookies, we recommend visiting:
   https://cookies.insites.com/about-cookies/
   Users
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same page
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Site Visitors
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Unbounce

     Ubvt

     Ubvs

     ubpv
   These cookies are associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.

     3 days

     3 days

     5 months
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It is variation of the _gat cookie
   which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by Google on high
   traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Google Univesral Analytics
     * _ga
     * _gid

     This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports.

     This cookie is associated with Google Universal Analytics. No
   information is available from Google however, it appears to store and
   update a unique value for each page visited.
     * 2 years
     * a day

   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar. It uniquely identifies a visitor during a single browser
   session and indicates they are included in an audience sample.
   Session
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Piwik
     * _pk_id*
     * _pk_ses*

   These cookies are set by Piwiki and are used to help website owners
   track visitor behaviour and measure site performance. They are a
   pattern type cookie, where the prefix is followed by a short series of
   numbers and letters, which is believed to be a reference code for the
   domain setting the cookie.
     * 1 year
     * 24 minutes

   Kissmetrics

     km_lv

     km_uq

     km_ai
   These cookies are set by Kissmetrics analytics service. They are used
   to provide site owners with information about how visitors use the
   site.
   5 years
   Bing
     * MUIDB
     * MUID

   This domain is owned by Mircosoft - it is the site for the search
   engine Bing.
   a year
   JSESSIONID
   This domain is controlled by New Relic, which provides a platform for
   monitoring the performance of web and mobile applications.
   Session
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   obuid
   This cookie is used to hold an anonymous user's ID. IT is used for
   tracking user actions.
   3 months
   c
   This domain is owned by IPONWEB and is used to provide a real time
   bidding platform for online advertising.
   1 year
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   1 year
   TheTradeDesk
     * TDID
     * TDCPM

   This domain is owned by TheTradeDesk. The main business activity is: Ad
   Serving Platform
   1 year
   _uv_id
   This domain is owned by LinkedIn. It is used to provide services for
   embedding slide presentations into websites. Information collected via
   cookies on this domain can also be used for targeted advertising
   purposes.
   2 years
   YouTube
     * HSID
     * Demographics
     * VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
     * PREF
     * LOGIN_INFO
     * GPS
     * YSC

   YouTube collects user data through videos embedded in websites, which
   is aggregated with profile data from other Google services in order to
   display targeted advertising to web visitors. These cookies are:
     * Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user
       account and most recent login time
     * Used for demographic profiling and targeting for advertising
     * This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of
       videos
     * Stores user preference, can be used to personalise ads on google
       searches
     * Used for targeted advertising to web visitors across a broad range
       of their own and other websites.

     1 year

     1 year

     1 month

     5 years

     2 years

     a month

     Session
   Linkedin
     * BizoID
     * Lidc
     * __utmv
     * __utmz
     * __utmb
     * __utmt
     * Bcookie
     * Lang
     * __utma
     * SERVERID
     * language
     * bscookie__qca
     * __qca
     * __utmc
     * UserMatchHistory
     * visit

   These cookies are associated with Linkedin It typically acts as a third
   party host where website owners have placed one of its content sharing
   buttons in their pages, although its content and services can be
   embedded in other ways. Although such buttons add functionality to the
   website they are on, cookies are set regardless of whether or not the
   visitor has an active Linkedin profile, or agreed to their terms and
   conditions. For this reason it is classified as a primarily
   tracking/targeting domain.

     30 days

     1 month

     8 months

     6 months

     21 minutes

     a few seconds

     8 months

     Session

     2 years

     Session

     Session

     8 months

     2 months

     Session

     2 days

     8 months

   Facebook

     datr

     fr

     lu
   These cookies are owned by Facebook:

     It is not directly tied to individual Facebook the user. It is used
   to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially around
   detection of bots trying to access the service. This cookie is also
   read via Like and other Facebook buttons and tags placed on many
   different websites.

     This is used to serve targeted advertising to its users when logged
   into its services. In 2014 it also started serving up behaviourally
   targeted advertising on other websites, similar to most dedicated
   online marketing companies. Contains browser and user unique ID
   combination, used for targeted advertising.

     This is used to serve targeted advertising to its users when logged
   into its services. In 2014 it also started serving up behaviourally
   targeted advertising on other websites, similar to most dedicated
   online marketing companies. Contains browser and user unique ID
   combination, used for targeted advertising

     1 year

     3 months

     1 year
   Twitter
     * auth_token
     * twll
     * secure_session
     * guest_id
     * personalization_id
     * remember_checked
     * remember_checked_on
     * lang

   This domain is owned by Twitter. The main business activity is: Social
   Networking Services. Where twitter acts as a third party host, it
   collects data through a range of plug-ins and integrations, that is
   primarily used for tracking and targeting.

     15 years

     5 years

     15 years

     a year

     2 years

     5 years

     4 years

     session
   Google
     * APISID
     * SSID
     * NID
     * SAPISID

   This cookies are owned by Google Inc. It uses the data gathered from
   most of these services to profile the interests of web users and sell
   advertising space to organisations based on such interest profiles as
   well as aligning adverts to the content on the pages where its
   customer's adverts appear.

     2 years

     8 months

     5 months

     2 years
   AA003
   This domain is owned by Atlas Solutions which is in turn owned by
   Facebook. Atlas is an online advertising business, targeting users
   through tracking their web activity. From September 2014 the company
   re-launched under the ownership of Facebook, promising the ability to
   reach known users and target adverts based on profiles generated using
   Facebook's user data.
   2 months
   u
   This domain is owned by Aggregate Knowledge, which has been acquired by
   Neustar Inc. Aggregate Knowledge provides a data management platform
   which enables real time targeting and consumer profiling functionality.
   a month
   __cfduid
   This domain is owned by AddToAny. The main business activity is: Social
   Sharing Services and Tracking
   1 year
   rlas3
   This domain is owned by Live Ramp Inc, providers of a platform for
   targeted marketing and profiling.
   1 year
   Bluekai
     * bku
     * bkdc
     * bkpa

   This domain is owned by Blue Kai. The main business activity is:
   Advertising/Audience Targeting
   5 months
   d
   This domain is owned by Quantcast. The main business activity is:
   Market and Audience Segmentation, Targeted advertising services
   2 months
   Adobe Audience Manager
     * demdex
     * dpm

   This domain is owned by Adobe - Audience Manager.
   The main business activity is: Online profiling for targeted marketing
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
     * 6 months
     * 5 months

   tuuid_lu
   This domain is owned by IPONWEB and is used to provide a real time
   bidding platform for online advertising.
   1 year
   Amazon
     * ad-id
     * ad-privacy

   This domain is owned by online retailer Amazon and is used as part of
   its affiliate marketing programme.
     * 8 months
     * 8 months

   Doubleclick
     * id
     * IDE

   This domain is owned by Doubleclick (Google). The main business
   activity is: Doubleclick is Googles real time bidding advertising
   exchange
     * 8 months
     * 2 years

   OnAudience
     * cookie
     * done_redirects161

   This domain is owned by OnAudience. The company provides a range of
   marketing and advertising services.
     * a year
     * a month

   uuid2
   This domain is owned by AppNexus Inc. The company provides a range of
   online advertising technology and services.
   2 months
   pxcr
   This domain is owned by Live Ramp Inc, providers of a platform for
   targeted marketing and profiling.
   a month
   MediaMath
     * uuidc
     * uuid

   This domain is owned by MediaMath Inc. a US based digital advertising
   business.
   a year
   comScore
     * UID
     * UIDR

   This domain is owned by ScorecardResearch (comScore). The main business
   activity is: Advertising. The cookies in this domain have lifespans of
   2 years.
     * a month
     * 2 years

   ruds
   This domain is owned by Rocketfuel. The main business activity is:
   Advertising
   Session
   ab
   This domain is owned by Aggregate Knowledge, which has been acquired by
   Neustar Inc. Aggregate Knowledge provides a data management platform
   which enables real time targeting and consumer profiling functionality.
   Session
   ATN
   This domain is owned by Atlas Solutions which is in turn owned by
   Facebook. Atlas is an online advertising business, targeting users
   through tracking their web activity. From September 2014 the company
   re-launched under the ownership of Facebook, promising the ability to
   reach known users and target adverts based on profiles generated using
   Facebook's user data.
   2 years
   uvc
   This domain is owned by AddToAny. The main business activity is: Social
   Sharing Services and Tracking
   a month
   custom_data
   This domain is owned by BidSwitch. The company provides a range of
   marketing and advertising services.
   10+ years
   eud
   This domain is owned by Rocketfuel. The main business activity is:
   Advertising
   a year
   EE
   This domain is owned by Exelate. The main business activity is:
   Advertising Data Aggregation
   3 months
   _kuid_
   This domain is owned by Krux Digital, a US company providing a data
   management platform which enables real time profiling of visitor
   interests.
   5 months
   pi
   This domain appears to be connected to a company called Bombora, a USA
   based audience targeting and intelligence business.
   a year
   uid
   This domain is owned by Adform. The main business activity is: Real
   time bidding for display advertising to targeted audiences.
   a month
   ud
   This domain is owned by Exelate. The main business activity is:
   Advertising Data Aggregation
   3 months
   tuuid
   This domain is owned by IPONWEB and is used to provide a real time
   bidding platform for online advertising.
   a year
   Quantcast
     * mc
     * d

   This domain is owned by Quantcast. The main business activity is:
   Market and Audience Segmentation, Targeted advertising services
   2 months
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   recs_xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
   This is a pattern type cookie with the root being recs_ and the rest of
   the name being a unique, 32-length alphanumeric string. This cookie is
   used to store recommended documents so that the same document isn't
   recommended twice.
   1 minute or refresh
   ___distillery
   This cookie may be set by the website itself, or by Wistia, to support
   video functionality that may be found throughot the website. In
   addition to keeping track of the website visitor's position in a video
   should playback be interrupted, this cookie also notes user behavior
   regarding the video itself.
   1 year
   Vimeo
     * player
     * vuid

   This domain is owned by Vimeo. The main business activity is: Video
   Hosting/Sharing
     * 1 year
     * 2 years

   Business Partners
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Outbrains Cookie-Tabelle
   In dieser Cookie-Tabelle erhalten Sie verständliche und umfassende
   Informationen über die Cookies und ähnliche Technologien, die wir
   verwenden.
   Gegebenenfalls setzen wir auf den Geräten, die Sie zur Interaktion mit
   Outbrain verwenden, Cookies oder ähnliche Dateien wie Pixel-Tags und
   Web-Beacons, und zwar aus Sicherheitsgründen, zur leichteren
   Website-Navigation und zur Personalisierung Ihrer Erfahrung bei der
   Interaktion mit Outbrain als Websitebesucher, Nutzer oder
   Geschäftspartner. Cookies ermöglichen uns, technische oder für die
   Navigation erforderliche Informationen zu erfassen, beispielsweise
   Browsertyp, die Zeit, die Sie mit der Interaktion mit Outbrain
   verbracht haben, oder die besuchten Seiten. Bitte lesen Sie die
   Datenschutzbestimmungen, damit Sie genauer verstehen, wie wir Daten
   verwenden.
   Nutzer
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Websitebesucher
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Geschäftspartner
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Tabla de cookies de Outbrain
   La presente Tabla de cookies te facilita información clara y completa
   sobre las cookies y otras tecnologías similares que utilizamos.
   Es posible que introduzcamos cookies o archivos similares, como
   etiquetas de píxel y balizas web (web beacons), en los dispositivos que
   utilices para interactuar con Outbrain por motivos de seguridad, para
   facilitar la navegación por el sitio y para personalizar tu experiencia
   cuando interactúes con Outbrain como Visitante del Sitio, Usuario o
   Socio comercial. Las cookies nos permiten recopilar información técnica
   y de navegación, como el tipo de navegador, el tiempo que interactúas
   con Outbrain y las páginas visitadas. Por favor, lee la Política de
   privacidad para entender mejor cómo utilizamos los datos.
   Utenti
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visitantes del sitio
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Socios comerciales
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Table des cookies d’Outbrain
   Cette Table des cookies vous donne des informations claires et
   détaillées sur les cookies et autres technologies similaires que nous
   utilisons.
   Nous sommes susceptibles de déposer des cookies ou autres fichiers
   similaires comme des balises pixel ou des balises Web sur les appareils
   que vous utilisez en lien avec Outbrain pour des raisons de sécurité,
   pour faciliter la navigation dans le site, ou personnaliser votre
   expérience quand vous interagissez avec Outbrain en tant que Visiteur
   du Site, Utilisateur ou Partenaire commercial. Les cookies nous
   permettent de collecter des données techniques et de navigation, comme
   le type de navigateur, le temps passé à interagir avec Outbrain et les
   pages visitées. Veuillez lire la Politique de confidentialité pour
   mieux comprendre comment nous utilisons les cookies suivants.
   Utilisateurs
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visiteurs du site
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Partenaires commerciaux
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Tabella dei cookie di Outbrain
   La presente tabella dei cookie fornisce informazioni chiare complete
   sui cookie e su altre tecnologie simili che utilizziamo.
   Possiamo installare cookie o file analoghi quali pixel tag e web beacon
   sui dispositivi che utilizzi per interagire con Outbrain per finalità
   di sicurezza, per facilitare la navigazione sul sito e per
   personalizzare la tua esperienza quando interagisci con Outbrain in
   veste di Visitatore del sito, Utente o Partner commerciale. I cookie ci
   consentono di raccogliere informazioni tecniche e sulla navigazione,
   quali il tipo di browser, il tempo che hai trascorso interagendo con
   Outbrain e le pagine visitate. Si raccomanda di leggere la politica
   sulla privacy per capire meglio come utilizziamo i dati.
   Utenti
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visitatori del sito
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Partner commerciali
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   TABELA DE COOKIES DA OUTBRAIN
   Esta tabela de cookies fornece informações claras e completas sobre os
   cookies e outras tecnologias similares usadas por nós.
   Podemos instalar cookies ou arquivos similares como pixel tags ou web
   beacons nos aparelhos que você usa para interagir com a Outbrain, por
   fins de segurança, para facilitar a navegação no site e para
   personalizar sua experiência ao interagir com a Outbrain como Visitante
   do Site, Usuário ou Parceiro Comercial. Cookies nos permitem coletar
   informações técnicas e relacionadas à navegação, como tipo de
   navegador, tempo gasto por você na interação com a Outbrain e páginas
   visitadas. Leia a Política de Privacidade para compreender melhor como
   usamos os dados.
   Usuários
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visitantes do Site
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Parceiros Comercials
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

   Interest-Based Ads (and Opt-Out Preferences)Advertising
   GuidelinesPrivacy PolicySecurityPatentsTerms of Use

   Copyright © 2019 Outbrain Inc. All rights reserved.
   Outbrain is a trademark of Outbrain Inc. - IMPRESSUM
     __________________________________________________________________

   Legal Center powered by PactSafe

   Copyright © 2019, Outbrain Inc.
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MNMBTC

     * Advertising Overview
     * Publishers Overview
     * Contact Us
     * Resources
          + Case Studies
          + Trust & Transparency
          + Native Advertising
          + Content Marketing
          + Blog
          + Tech Blog
     * About Us
     * Careers
     * Help Center

     * Advertisers
     * Publishers
     * About Us
     * |
     * Help Center
     * Blog
     * Careers
     * Contact Us

   RegisterLogin

The Open Web's

Discovery & Native Advertising Feed

   Advertise with UsPublishers, Let's Talk

   Outbrain helps over 1 billion people discover content, products and
   services that may be of interest to them.

290B

   Monthly Discoveries

55+

   Countries in the Network

The World's Top Media Companies & Brands Trust Outbrain

   See all
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *

   [ld+json]

Outbrain for Advertisers

   Connect with consumers engaging with content on the open web.
   Learn more

Outbrain for Media Companies

   Our technology powers the core tech stack of publishers who want to
   better manage, control and monetize their content by personalizing
   their editorial experience for consumers.
   Learn more

Outbrain Smartfeedfeed

   See how the open web's preferred discovery feed is turning visitors
   into engaged audiences.
   Learn more

Outbrain Company News

   Recommended Content
   [ld+json]
   Outbrain's Reach Surpasses Facebook, Google & Others in Key Global
   MarketsOutbrain NewsOutbrain Acquires Ligatus, the Leading Native
   Advertising Platform in EuropeOutbrain News
   Performance Hacks, Part I: Take Control of Your Ad PlacementsOutbrain
   Blog
   Top WordPress Plugins You Should Be TestingOutbrain Blog[Quiz] How Much
   Do You Really Know About Programmatic Advertising?Outbrain Blog
   Visit Our Press Center

     * Advertisers
     * Advertising Overview
     * Advertisers Solutions
     * Advertiser Guidelines
     * Case Studies
     * Launch A Campaign
     * Advertising FAQ

     * Publishers
     * Publisher Overview
     * Publishers Solutions
     * Request a Demo
     * Publishers FAQ

     * About Us
     * Company Overview
     * Leadership
     * News
     * Careers
     * Offices
     * Contact

     * Resources
     * Trust & Transparency
     * Help Center
     * Blog
     * Tech Blog
     * Native Advertising Overview
     * Content Marketing Overview

   RegisterLogin

   English (US)GermanFrenchSpanishPortugueseJapaneseItalian
   Copyright © 2019 Outbrain Inc. All rights reserved. Outbrain is a
   trademark of Outbrain Inc.
     * Interest-Based Ads
     * Advertiser Guidelines
     * Privacy Policy
     * Security
     * Patents
     * Terms of Use
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MNMBTC

     * Outbrain für Werbetreibende
     * Publishers Overview
     * Kontaktieren Sie uns
     * Weitere Informationen
          + Case Studies
          + Vertrauen & Transparenz
          + Programmatisches Native Advertising
          + Content-Marketing
          + Blog
          + Tech-Blog
     * Über uns
     * Karriere
     * Hilfe

     * Werbetreibende
     * Publisher
     * Über uns
     * |
     * Hilfe
     * Blog
     * Karriere
     * Kontaktieren Sie uns

   RegistrierenEinloggen

Der Discovery & Native Advertising Feed im Open Web

   Werben Sie mit unsOutbrain für Publisher

   Mit Outbrain entdecken über eine Milliarde Menschen Inhalte, Produkte
   und Dienste, die sie wirklich interessieren.

290 Mrd.

   Monatliche Entdeckungen

55+

   Länder im Netzwerk

Die weltweit führenden Medienunternehmen & Marken vertrauen Outbrain

   Alle sehen
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *

   [ld+json]

Outbrain für Werbetreibende

   Verbinden Sie sich mit Verbrauchern, die sich mit Inhalten im Open web.
   Mehr erfahren

Outbrain für Medienunternehmen

   Mit unserer Technologie managen, steuern und monetarisieren Publisher
   ihre Inhalte besser und personalisieren das Erlebnis ihrer Leser.
   Mehr erfahren

Outbrain Smartfeedfeed

   Sehen Sie, wie der führende Discovery Feed im Open Web das Engagement
   Ihrer Besucher erhöht.
   Mehr erfahren

     * Werbetreibende
     * Outbrain für Werbetreibende
     * Lösungen
     * Richtlinien
     * Case Studies
     * Kampagne starten
     * FAQ

     * Publisher
     * Outbrain für Publisher
     * Lösungen für Publisher
     * Demo anfordern
     * FAQ

     * Über uns
     * Unser Unternehmen
     * Management
     * Neuigkeiten
     * Karriere
     * Standorte
     * Kontakt

     * Weitere Informationen
     * Vertrauen & Transparenz
     * Hilfe
     * Blog
     * Tech-Blog
     * Native Advertising
     * Content Marketing

   RegistrierenEinloggen

   English (US)GermanFrenchSpanishPortugueseJapaneseItalian
   Copyright © 2019 Outbrain Inc. All rights reserved. Outbrain is a
   trademark of Outbrain Inc.
     * Interessenbezogene Anzeigen
     * Richtlinien
     * Datenschutzrichtlinie
     * Sicherheit
     * Patents
     * Nutzungsbedingungen
[outbrain-logo.png] Privacy Center

   Error

Contracts

     * Privacy Policy
     * Cookies

   [English (United States)  ]

          Privacy Policy
          Cookie Table

Privacy Policy

Version 2.3

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   Last Updated May 24, 2018
   Outbrain is committed to protecting your personal data. This privacy
   policy (“Privacy Policy ”) governs Outbrain’s use of data collected by
   us, including any and all personal data. Personal data is information
   that relates to you and may identify you as an individual. We use your
   personal data in line with all applicable laws. To ensure compliance
   and to align with Outbrain’s values around Trust & Transparency, we
   have a team of privacy champions responsible for continuously
   implementing our global privacy program.
   + EXPAND ALL
   – COLLAPSE ALL
   1. Who we are, What we do, How you can contact Outbrain, our DPO or the
   relevant authorities
   +
   Who we are:
   Outbrain means Outbrain Inc., a Delaware, USA corporation with
   headquarters in New York; and its affiliated subsidiaries
   (collectively, “Outbrain,” or “we“, “us“, “our“). We operate out of 12
   global offices and we partner with publishers and marketers across the
   globe.
   What we do:
   Outbrain’s mission is to serve interesting recommendations to its Users
   based on their interests. To achieve our mission we enter into
   agreements with:
     * online publishers and partners who want to recommend relevant
       content to their readers (this is Outbrain Engage); and
     * advertisers who want readers to view their content (this is
       Outbrain Amplify).

   How to contact us:
   We regularly review our compliance with this Privacy Policy. Questions,
   comments and requests regarding this Privacy Policy are welcomed and
   should be addressed to PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com or by mail to
   Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011,
   Attn: Privacy Questions.
   If Outbrain does not satisfactorily answers your questions or concerns,
   you may also contact the following for advice, support or complaints:
     * Outbrain’s external Data Protection Officer (“DPO”): ePrivacy GmbH,
       represented by Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. ePrivacy GmbH can be
       reached directly at privacy@eprivacy.eu ; and/or
     * the Information Commissioner’s Officer, which is Outbrain’s lead
       supervisory service within the European Territories.

   Self-Regulatory Bodies
   Outbrain adheres to the Self-Regulatory Principles set forth by the
   Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) and the European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). We are members in good standing of the
   Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), an association dedicated to
   responsible data collection and its use for digital advertising. We
   adhere to the NAI Code of Conduct for Web and Mobile. Outbrain also
   adheres to the Interactive Advertising Bureau’s (IAB) Self-Regulatory
   Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising, and the IAB Europe OBA
   Framework.
   2. Outbrain User Types (including Opt Out Options)
   +
   Much of this Privacy Policy is divided into sections based on the way
   you may interact with Outbrain. Please determine what user type you
   are. For each user type we’ve explained what information we collect and
   why, what cookies and other similar technologies we use, how we share
   such information, and your rights.
   Site Visitors: You are a Site Visitor when you visit and interact with
   our web sites, web pages, interactive features, blogs and their
   respective contents at Outbrain.com (or any derivation, such as
   Outbrain.co.uk; Outbrain.fr; outbrain.de etc.) and MyOutbrain.com (“Our
   Sites“). See more here.
   (a) What information we collect and why
   We want to understand what services on Our Sites interest you and we
   want to remind you about the services we offer when you are not on Our
   Sites. To do this, we collect the following information from you: (i)
   IP address; (ii) User Agent data: device type (e.g., iPhone), browser
   type (e.g., Chrome), operating system (e.g., iOS); (iii) the pages
   visited on Our Site (e.g., the Outbrain “About” page); (iv) the time of
   visit (and corresponding timezone); and (v) referring URLs and other
   information normally transmitted in HTTP requests (e.g., this
   information tells us how you arrived on Our Sites).
   (b) What cookies and other similar technologies we use
   Please see this Cookie Table under “Site Visitors” for a detailed list
   of the cookies (and their corresponding retention periods) we use when
   you visit Our Sites.
   (c) How we may share information
     * Sharing Information we learn about you on Our Sites.

   In general, we do not share personal data about you with third parties
   for third party marketing or advertising purposes. However, we use
   various third parties (each listed on this Cookie Table) to help us
   market or advertise to you. For example, some of the cookies we use on
   Our Sites belong to third parties that will help Outbrain market or
   advertise to you. We require that these third parties and companies
   agree to keep all information shared with them confidential and to use
   the information only to perform their obligations to us. We do this by
   entering into agreements with all third parties who process personal
   data on our behalf to ensure that they process your personal data in
   accordance with our strict instructions and all applicable data
   protection laws. If you post on our blog, your comment and information
   will be publicly available. Please contact support@outbrain.com to
   remove your comment.
     * Using Third Party Services on Our Sites.

   Our Sites contain links to other websites that we do not own or
   operate. We do not control, recommend or endorse the content, products,
   services, privacy policies or practices of these third party websites.
   For example, on Our Sites you will notice clickable icons which take
   you to the Outbrain Facebook page or the Outbrain LinkedIn page. If you
   choose to click on these links, you should know that Facebook and
   Linkedin may send their own cookies to your device and they may
   independently collect personal data. It is therefore important that you
   read the Facebook and/or LinkedIn privacy policies.
     * Also see the Sharing section of this Privacy Policy.

   (d) Your rights
   The Terms of Use on Our Site govern the use of Our Site and also apply
   to you. You can stop using Our Site at any time. If you do, you may
   also want to remove any cookies that we have placed on any device used
   to access Our Site. If during your use of Our Sites you provided your
   email address, any email you receive from Outbrain includes an
   “unsubscribe” option.
   For European Territory Visitors, Outbrain has implemented a consent
   management platform (powered by One Trust) on Our Sites that provide
   visitors the opportunity to consent, or not consent, to cookies and
   similar tracking technologies on Our Sites. Upon accessing Our Sites,
   you will see a banner on the bottom of the page with information about
   the cookies we use. You may click the banner to reject any cookies that
   are not strictly necessary. Pressing “accept” on the banner or
   scrolling/clicking on Our Sites is an indication of your acceptance.
   Accordingly, Outbrain’s lawful basis for processing personal data on
   Our Sites is consent. You may withdraw your consent at any time here.
   Users: You are an User when you visit a page of a website or
   application of one of Outbrain’s partners where the Outbrain widget is
   installed (“Partner Sites”). For example, if you visit
   https://news.sky.com/uk, www.spiegel.de or www.cnn.com, the Outbrain
   widget is implemented on those websites. You know you are engaging with
   an Outbrain widget when you see text referencing Outbrain (e.g.,
   “Recommended by Outbrain”, “by Outbrain” near recommendations). If you
   click on the hyperlinked reference to Outbrain you will see a detailed
   notice that enables you to navigate to Outbrain’s Interest Portal,
   which provides a general visualization of the types of Outbrain data
   categories that may be used to make its recommendations. It also gives
   you the ablity to opt out of personalized recommendations. See more
   here.
   Example of an Outbrain Widget.
   Outbrain Example Recommendations
   (a) What information we collect and why
   We use UUIDs, IP Address and other Usage Information so that we can
   serve interesting recommendations. Outbrain’s recommendations may be
   paid for by an advertiser linking you to a new website or they may be
   organic such that the link is to another page on the same publisher’s
   website.
     * UUID.

   When as a User you first visit a Partner Site (e.g., CNN.com), Outbrain
   drops a cookie on your device in order to generate a UUID (a Unique
   User Identifier). We catalog and analyze the content you consume across
   Partner Sites. Our recommendations are based on: (i) browsing history;
   (ii) similar browsing patterns of other Users; (ii) recommendations
   that are generally popular with Outbrain’s audience at this time; (iv)
   some randomness, and (v) targeting requirements that may be provided or
   requested by our Amplify clients. As an example, Outbrain may know that
   UUID 123 (which could be you on your iPhone X on the Guardian using
   Chrome as your browser) likes to read about far away holiday
   destinations and that people who like to read about far away holiday
   destinations also like to read about exotic food.
   The UUID is a sequence of numbers and/or letters. This UUID attaches
   itself to your device and varies depending on which browser you use. In
   other words, Outbrain records a different UUID depending on which
   device and/or which browser you use when accessing the Partner Sites.
   For example, this means that you will have one UUID when you visit a
   Partner Site from your mobile phone using the browser Safari, and a
   different UUID when you visit a Partner Site from your iPad using the
   browser Safari. Outbrain will combine and consolidate a UUID from a
   mobile device (handheld or tablet) from a browser that then accesses an
   application (or vice versa) from the that same device.
   Assigning a UUID allows Outbrain to associate the page views visited
   and clicks on Outbrain’s recommendations from such UUID – all with the
   goal of providing interesting recommendations.
     * IP Address and Other Usage Information.

   We collect a UUID as explained above, we also collect the following
   information from you: (i) IP address; (ii) User Agent data: device type
   (e.g., iphone) , browser type (e.g., chrome), operating system e.g
   iOS); (iii) the pages visited; (iv) the time of visit; and (v)
   referring URLs and other information normally transmitted in HTTP
   requests .
   The above statistical information provides us with information about
   how many Users visited a specific page on our Partner Sites on which
   the Outbrain widget is installed, how long each User stayed on that
   page, the type of content on that page they clicked on and how they
   generally engaged with that page. This information is only personal
   data when it is associated to a UUID.
   (b) What cookies and other similar technologies we use
   Please see this Cookie Table under “Users” for a detailed list of the
   first party cookies we use when you interact with Partner Sites where
   the Outbrain technology is implemented.
   If you click on a link to one of our recommendations, the Amplify
   advertiser sponsoring the recommendation may place cookies on your
   device through redirects prior to arriving on the destination page of
   the recommendations or upon reaching the destination page. In such
   cases you will be subject to that advertiser’s privacy policy.
   In addition to Outbrain’s visible widget on Partner Sites, certain
   Outbrain advertisers may implement the Outbrain pixel on their
   websites. The Outbrain pixel determines whether the user reaching the
   page where the pixel is installed has an Outbrain UUID. If there is a
   UUID associated with such end user, Outbrain allows advertisers to
   retarget those UUIDs and/or provides advertisers with the total number
   of UUIDs that reached such page. If there was no Outbrain UUID on the
   page, the Outbrain pixel does not collect any information about the
   user.
   We encourage advertisers to disclose use of the Outbrain pixel on their
   own websites. Outbrain does not combine pixel information with a UUID’s
   profile.
   Data points such as page views and clicks are connected to a particular
   UUID are retained for 13 months. For example, if UUID 123 read an
   article on December 31, 2017, on February 1, 2018 that article will no
   longer be part of UUID 123’s profile.
   (c) How we may share information
   Outbrain does not share User profiles with any third parties. However,
   we may share the UUID with certain partners for the purpose of cookie
   syncing, or based on technical requirements. Also see the Sharing
   section of this Privacy Policy.
   (d) Your rights
     * Outbrain Opt Out.

   You may opt out of Outbrain’s personalized recommendations at any time.
   Please see Outbrain’s Interest Profile for a general visualization the
   data Outbrain knows about you and may use to make its recommendations.
   The Interest Profile also gives you the ability to opt out of
   personalized recommendations. Note that opting out of browsers is
   through the Outbrain Interest Profile , but opting out of personalized
   recommendations in applications is through the settings on your device
   (examples of steps are in the Interest Profile ).
   IMPORTANT – even though you have opted out of Outbrain:
     * You will still see Outbrain recommendations. Opting out of Outbrain
       personalization tracking does not mean you will no longer receive
       recommendations from Outbrain. Instead, it means that Outbrain’s
       recommendations will not be personalized. The recommendations will
       still use information about the document you are viewing (i.e.,
       contextual information) to provide you recommendations on that
       page.
     * The opt out is cookie based and device/browser specific. If you
       browse the web from several devices and/or browsers, you will need
       to opt out from each device and/or browser to ensure that we
       prevent personalization tracking on all of them. For the same
       reason, if you buy a new device, change browsers or delete (or
       clear) the opt out cookie, you will need to opt-out again. Opting
       out of personalization tracking is not the same as blocking
       cookies.
     * To ensure deletion of the profile tied to your UUID, do not opt in
       to Outbrain for at least 21 days. Your opt out from Outbrain’s
       personalized recommendations is effective immediately. However, if
       your browser permits local storage and you opt into Outbrain’s
       personalized recommendations within 21 days of your opt out, it is
       possible your prior profile will be reconnected to your UUID. If
       you do not opt in within 21 days, your profile will be deleted and
       cannot be recovered.
     * As with most opt out cookies, the Outbrain browser opt out relies
       upon a cookie. The opt-out cookie is intended to be persistent to
       honor the user’s preferences. However, the "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention" feature in iOS11 may impact the persistence of cookies
       across websites post a 24 hour window. We suggest using another
       browser or considering blocking all 3rd party cookies from the
       browser so that you are "opted out" without needing to rely on any
       company's actual opt out methodology.

     * Additional Opt-Out Options.

   You may also opt out of receiving personalized ads served by us or
   other advertising companies through industry powered tools such as the
   NAI or the various DAA-based pages (DAA,
   http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC, www.youradchoices.ca/choices ,
   and/or EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu) . Visiting the NAI, DAA, DAAC, or
   EDAA consumer choice pages allows you to opt out of all some or all of
   the participating members’ services. Like Outbrain’s opt out, these opt
   outs do not mean you will no longer receive any advertising – the
   advertisements will just not be tailored to you. You may continue to
   receive advertisements, for example, based on the particular website
   that you are viewing (i.e., contextually based ads). Also, if your
   browsers are configured to reject cookies when you visit the DAA, DAAC
   or EDAA consumer choice pages, your opt out may not be effective.
   • Lawful Basis. Outbrain’s lawful basis for processing a User’s
   personal data is based on the lawful basis determined by each of our
   Partner Sites. Each Partner Site will rely on consent or legitimate
   interest. Please consult the applicable Partner Sites’ privacy policy
   for more information about their lawful basis. If a Partner is relying
   on consent, Outbrain will not drop a cookie on you if you have not
   provided consent on such Partner Site.
   Business Partners: You are a Business Partner when you register (or
   email with Outbrain) on behalf of the company you work for to use the
   Outbrain Amplify or Outbrain Engage Services. See more here.
   (a) What information we collect and why
   You may provide certain personal data (such as email address) when you
   sign up for the Amplify or Engage services or otherwise communicate or
   interact with us. If you apply to become a Business Partner, we may
   request additional information from you via advertiser application
   forms, insertion orders and other forms. We automatically collect
   information about your username’s actions in the Outbrain dashboard. As
   an example, as an Amplify Business Partner if you change the
   cost-per-click for one your campaigns, Outbrain’s audit trail will have
   a record of all those actions.
   We collect and process the personal data above in order to perform our
   obligations under our agreement as a Business Partner (or prospective
   Business Partner) with you including to:
     * respond to your questions and requests;
     * to provide you with access to certain functions and features of our
       Amplify or Engage services (e.g., to provide and maintain your
       dashboard account);
     * verify your identity;
     * communicate with you about your account, our products, and
       available promotions relevant to your use of the Amplify or Engage
       service.

   (b) What cookies and other similar technologies we use
   Please see this Cookie Table under “Business Partners” for a detailed
   list of the cookies (and their corresponding retention periods) we use
   with Business Partners.
   (c) How we may share information with anyone
   We may disclose certain Business Partner information to vendors,
   contractors, or others who assist Outbrain in delivering the services
   (e.g., credit card processing). Also see the Sharing section of this
   Privacy Policy.
   (d) Your rights
   If as a Business Partner you wish to verify, correct, update or request
   the deactivation of your information, you may go the to the Outbrain
   dashboard edit your profile preferences or contact us at
   support@outbrain.com. If you are receiving Outbrain emails, you may
   “unsubscribe” using a link in the email. Note unsubscribing shall not
   opt you out notifications critical to providing the Amplify or Engage
   services (e.g., email invoices).
   Outbrain’s lawful basis for processing personal data of Business
   Partners is legitimate interest.
   3. How We Keep Information Safe, Transfers Outside the EEA, Sharing and
   Retention
   +
   Security
   Outbrain has a dedicated security team. We maintain tight controls over
   the personal data we collect, retaining it in firewalled and secured
   databases with strictly limited and controlled access rights, to ensure
   it is secure. Please see our security standards for more information.
   Business Partners have access to certain password-protected features of
   the Amplify or Engage service. They are responsible for keeping this
   password confidential. Please remember that unfortunately, the
   transmission of information via the internet is not completely secure.
   A common Internet scam is known as "spoofing" or "phishing." This
   occurs when you receive an email from what appears to be a legitimate
   source requesting personal data from you. Please be aware that we will
   not send you any emails requesting you to verify credit card, bank
   information, or any other personal data. If you ever receive an email
   that appears to be from us requesting such information from you, do not
   respond to it, and do not click on any links appearing in the email.
   Instead, please forward the email to us at legal@outbrain.com, as we
   will investigate instances of possible Internet fraud.
   Data Transfers Outside the EU/EEA
   When we transfer personal data from the European Economic Area to other
   countries in which applicable laws do not offer the same level of data
   privacy protection as in the European Territories, we take measures to
   provide an appropriate level of data privacy protection. In other
   words, your rights and protections remain with your data. For example,
   we use approved contractual clauses and other measures designed to
   ensure that the recipients of your personal data protect it.
   Sharing
   In addition to the description of how we may disclose your personal
   data for each user type, we may also disclose personal data as follows:
     * Within the family of companies controlled by Outbrain for internal
       reasons, primarily for business and operational purposes;
     * If we go through a business transition, such as a merger,
       acquisition by another company, or sale of all or a portion of our
       assets, your personal data will likely be among the assets
       transferred;
     * When legally required to do so (e.g., to cooperate with law
       enforcement investigations or other legal proceedings); and/or
     * To respond to a genuine emergency.

   In addition, we combine your personal data with those of other users in
   order to share trend information and aggregate user statistics with
   third parties, always in aggregated and anonymized form.
   Data Retention
   The retention period for each of the cookies Outbrain uses (whether its
   own or on our behalf by third parties) is stated on the Cookie Table.
   Outbrain also maintains a Data Retention Policy that details the
   retention period for personal data based on our analysis of how long
   the specific data is reasonably required for legal or business
   purposes. When we no longer need personal data, we securely delete or
   destroy it. Aggregated data, which cannot identify a device/browser (or
   individual) and is used for purposes of reporting and analysis, is
   maintained for as long as commercially necessary.
   4. Children
   +
   None of our services are directed to children under 16. We do not
   knowingly collect personal data from anyone under 16 years of age. If
   we determine upon collection that a Site Visitor, a User or a Business
   Partner is under 16, we will not use or maintain his/her personal data.
   If we become aware that we have unknowingly collected personal data
   from a child under the age of 16, we will make reasonable efforts to
   delete such information from our records. If you’re a kid, please go
   play in the yard, don’t use or interact with Outbrain!
   5. European Territory Citizens
   +
   In compliance with European privacy laws, in particular the European
   General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), Outbrain provides specific
   additional rights for citizens of the European Territories such as the
   right to access, rectification, right to object, to complaint, erasure
   and blockage. More specifically:
     * the right to request information about whether and which personal
       data is processed by us, and the right to demand that personal data
       is rectified or amended.
     * under certain circumstances, the right to request that personal
       data should be deleted.
     * under certain circumstances, the right to demand that the
       processing of personal data should be restricted.
     * withdraw your consent to the processing and use of your data
       completely or partially at any time with future application.
     * have the right to obtain your personal data in a common, structured
       and mechanically readable format.
     * contact our data protection officer if there are any questions,
       comments, complaints or requests in connection with our statement
       on data protection and the processing of your personal data.
     * the right to complain to the responsible supervisory authority if
       believed that the processing of your personal data is in violation
       of the legislation.

   In addition to the above, we reference certain rights for European
   Territory citizens throughout this Privacy Policy. Pursuant to the
   GDPR, citizens from "European Territories" mean the European Economic
   Area (EEA) and Switzerland. For the purpose of this Privacy Policy, the
   term "European Territories" shall continue to include the United
   Kingdom, even after the United Kingdom leaves the European Economic
   Area following Brexit.
   Please email PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com with any questions about
   exercising any of the above rights.
   6. California Privacy Rights
   +
   Under California Civil Code sections 1798.83-1798.84, California
   residents are entitled to ask us for a notice describing what
   categories of personal information we share with third parties or
   corporate affiliates for those third parties or corporate affiliates'
   direct marketing purposes. That notice will identify the categories of
   information shared and will include a list of the third parties and
   affiliates with which it was shared, along with their names and
   addresses. If you are a California resident and would like a copy of
   this notice, please submit a written request to
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com or send to the following address:
   Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011.
   Please allow 30 days for a response.
   7. “Do Not Track” Disclosure
   +
   Some browsers transmit Do Not Track (DNT) signals to websites. Because
   there is no common understanding of how to interpret the DNT signal,
   Outbrain does not currently alter, change, or respond to DNT requests
   or signals from these browsers. We will continue to monitor industry
   activity in this area and reassess our DNT practices as necessary. In
   the meantime, you can use the range of other tools we provide to
   control data collection and use, including the ability to opt out of
   receiving personalized recommendations in the Users section.
   8. How This Privacy Policy May Change
   +
   We may change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will place a
   prominent notice that will be visible to you as a Site Visitor or
   Business Partner, but we do not have a means of advising Users of an
   update. You should check back here periodically to see if the Privacy
   Policy has been updated. We will always show the date of the latest
   modification of the Privacy Policy at the top of the page so you can
   tell when it was last revised.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Letzte Aktualisierung: 23. Mai 2018
   Outbrain ist dem Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten verpflichtet.
   Diese Datenschutzbestimmungen („Datenschutzbestimmungen“) gelten für
   die Verwendung durch Outbrain der von uns erfassten Daten,
   einschließlich aller personenbezogenen Daten, durch Outbrain.
   Personenbezogene Daten sind Informationen, die sich auf Sie beziehen
   und Sie persönlich identifizieren können. Wir verwenden Ihre
   personenbezogenen Daten entsprechend den geltenden Gesetzen. Im Sinne
   der Compliance und der Übereinstimmung mit Outbrains Werten rund um
   Vertrauen und Transparenz verfügt Outbrain über ein Team von
   Datenschutz-Champions, die für die kontinuierliche Umsetzung unseres
   weltweit gültigen Maßnahmenkatalogs zum Datenschutz verantwortlich
   sind.

                                                          + ALLE ERWEITERN

                                                 – ALLEX ZUSAMMENBRECHEN

   1. Wer wir sind, Was wir tun, Wie Sie Outbrain kontaktieren können,
   unser Datenschutzbeauftragter oder die zuständigen Behörden

                                      +

   Wer wir sind:
   Outbrain bedeutet Outbrain Inc., ein Unternehmen nach dem Recht von
   Delaware, USA, mit Hauptsitz in New York, und dessen verbundene
   Tochterunternehmen (zusammen bezeichnet als: „Outbrain“ oder „wir“,
   „uns“, „unser“). Wir haben Niederlassungen in zwölf Ländern weltweit
   und arbeiten mit Publishern und Vermarktern auf der ganzen Welt
   zusammen.
   Was wir tun:
   Outbrains Mission ist es, für Nutzer relevante Empfehlungen anhand
   ihrer Interessen bereitzustellen. Zu diesem Zweck schließen wir
   Vereinbarungen mit:
     * Online-Publishern und Partnern, die ihren Lesern relevanten Content
       empfehlen wollen (dabei handelt es sich um Outbrain Engage); und

     * Werbetreibenden, die erreichen wollen, dass Leser ihren Content
       ansehen (hierbei handelt es sich um Outbrain Amplify).

   Wie Sie Kontakt mit uns aufnehmen:
   Unsere Compliance bezüglich dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen überprüfen
   wir regelmäßig. Wir freuen uns über Ihre Fragen, Anmerkungen und
   Anfragen zu diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen. Richten Sie diese bitte an
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oder auf postalischem Weg an Outbrain
   Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, Attn: Privacy
   Questions / Datenschutzanfrage.
   Sollte Outbrain Ihre Fragen oder Anliegen nicht zu Ihrer Zufriedenheit
   beantworten, können Sie sich auch an folgende Ansprechpartner wenden,
   um Rat oder Unterstützung zu erhalten bzw. Beschwerden vorzubringen:
     * Outbrains externen Datenschutzbeauftragten: ePrivacy GmbH,
       vertreten durch Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. Die ePrivacy GmbH können
       Sie direkt erreichen unter privacy@eprivacy.eu und/oder
     * den Information Commissioner’s Officer, die für Outbrain zuständige
       federführende Aufsichtsbehörde in den europäischen Ländern.

   Selbstkontrollgremien
   Outbrain befolgt die im Rahmen der Selbstverpflichtung formulierten
   Grundsätze der Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) und der European
   Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Wir sind
   vollberechtigte Mitglieder der Network Advertising Initiative (NAI),
   eines Verbands, der sich der verantwortungsvollen Erfassung von Daten
   und deren Verwendung in der Digitalwerbung verpflichtet hat. Wir
   befolgen die Verhaltensregeln der NAI für Web- und Mobilwerbung.
   Outbrain befolgt ebenfalls die im Rahmen der Selbstverpflichtung
   formulierten Grundsätze für die verhaltensgesteuerte Online-Werbung des
   Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) sowie die Rahmenbedingungen für
   die verhaltensgesteuerte Online-Werbung des IAB Europe.
   2. Outbrain-Nutzertypen (inklusive Deaktivierung/Opt-Out)

                                      +

   Ein Großteil dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen ist in einzelne Abschnitte
   unterteilt, die sich daran orientieren, wie Sie mit Outbrain
   interagieren. Bitte entscheiden Sie, welcher Nutzertyp Sie sind.
   Entsprechend den einzelnen Nutzertypen erläutern wir, welche
   Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun, welche Cookies und
   andere vergleichbare Technologien wir nutzen, wie wir diese
   Informationen weitergeben und über welche Rechte Sie verfügen.
   Websitebesucher: Sie sind ein Websitebesucher, wenn Sie unsere
   Websites, Internetseiten, interaktiven Funktionen, Blogs und deren
   jeweiligen Content auf Outbrain.com (oder einer darauf basierenden
   Ableitung wie Outbrain.co.uk, Outbrain.fr, Outbrain.de usw.) und
   MyOutbrain.com („unsere Websites“) besuchen und mit diesen
   interagieren. Sehen Sie hier mehr.
   (a) Welche Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun
   Wir möchten wissen, welche Dienstleistungen auf unseren Websites Sie
   interessieren, und Sie an die von uns angebotenen Services erinnern,
   wenn Sie nicht auf unseren Websites sind. Zu diesem Zweck erfassen wird
   folgende Informationen von Ihnen: (i) IP-Adresse; (ii)
   User-Agent-Daten: Gerätetyp (z.B. iPhone), Browsertyp (z.B. Chrome),
   Betriebssystem (z.B. iOS); (iii) die auf unserer Website besuchten
   Seiten (z.B. die Seite „Über Outbrain“); (iv) den Zeitpunkt des Besuchs
   (und die entsprechende Zeitzone); und (v) die verweisenden URLs und
   andere normalerweise bei HTTP-Anfragen übertragenen Informationen (z.B.
   wissen wir durch diese Information, wie Sie auf unsere Websites gelangt
   sind).
   (b) Cookies und andere vergleichbare Technologien, die wir nutzen
   In der Cookie-Tabelle unter „Site Visitors (Websitebesucher)“ erhalten
   Sie eine detaillierte Liste der Cookies (und ihrer jeweiligen
   Speicherfristen), die wir bei Ihrem Besuch unserer Websites verwenden.
   (c) So geben wir unter Umständen Informationen weiter
     * Weitergabe von Informationen, die wir auf unseren Websites von
       Ihnen erhalten.

   Im Allgemeinen geben wir keine personenbezogenen Daten über Sie an
   Dritte für deren Marketing- oder Werbezwecke weiter. Wir nutzen jedoch
   verschiedene Dritte (jeweils in der Cookie-Tabelle aufgeführt) zur
   Unterstützung unserer Marketing- oder Werbetätigkeit Ihnen gegenüber.
   So gehören einige der Cookies, die wir auf unseren Websites verwenden,
   Dritten, die Outbrain bei unserer Marketing- oder Werbetätigkeit Ihnen
   gegenüber unterstützen. Wir verlangen, dass diese Dritten und externen
   Unternehmen einwilligen, sämtliche an sie weitergegebenen Informationen
   vertraulich zu behandeln und nur zur Erfüllung ihrer Pflichten uns
   gegenüber zu verwenden. Zu diesem Zweck schließen wir Vereinbarungen
   mit allen Dritten, die für uns personenbezogene Daten verarbeiten,
   damit gewährleistet ist, dass sie Ihre personenbezogenen Daten in
   Übereinstimmung mit unseren strengen Anweisungen und allen geltenden
   Datenschutzgesetzen verarbeiten. Wenn Sie einen Post auf unserem Blog
   hinterlassen, sind Ihr Kommentar und Ihre Informationen öffentlich
   zugänglich. Bitte wenden Sie sich an support@outbrain.com, um Ihren
   Kommentar zu entfernen.
     * Verwendung von Dienstleistungen Dritter auf unseren Websites.

   Unsere Websites enthalten Links zu anderen Websites, die uns nicht
   gehören und die wir nicht betreiben. Wir kontrollieren, empfehlen oder
   billigen den Content, die Produkte, Dienstleistungen,
   Datenschutzbestimmungen oder -maßnahmen dieser Websites Dritter nicht.
   Auf unseren Websites sehen Sie beispielsweise anklickbare Symbole, über
   die Sie auf die Facebook-Seite von Outbrain oder die LinkedIn-Seite von
   Outbrain gelangen. Sofern Sie entscheiden, diese Links anzuklicken,
   sollten Sie sich dessen bewusst sein, dass Facebook und LinkedIn unter
   Umständen ihre eigenen Cookies auf Ihr Gerät senden und unabhängig
   personenbezogene Daten erfassen. Daher ist es wichtig, dass Sie die
   Datenschutzbestimmungen von Facebook und/oder LinkedIn lesen.
     * Beachten Sie auch den Abschnitt dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen über
       die Weitergabe von Daten.

   (d) Ihre Rechte
   Die Nutzungsbedingungen auf unserer Website regeln die Nutzung unserer
   Website und gelten auch für Sie. Sie können die Nutzung unserer Website
   jederzeit beenden. In diesem Fall können Sie auch die Cookies
   entfernen, die wir auf jedem für den Zugriff auf unsere Website
   verwendeten Gerät gesetzt haben. Falls Sie während Ihrer Nutzung
   unserer Websites Ihre E-Mail-Adresse übermitteln, enthält jede E-Mail,
   die Sie von Outbrain erhalten, eine Option zum Abbestellen des
   E-Mail-Empfangs.
   Für Besucher aus dem europäischen Gebiet hat Outbrain auf unseren
   Websites eine Plattform für das Zustimmungs-Management eingerichtet
   (betrieben durch One Trust), über die Nutzer die Möglichkeit haben,
   ihre Zustimmung zu Cookies und vergleichbaren Trackingtechnologien auf
   unseren Websites zu geben oder zu verweigern. Wenn Sie auf unsere
   Website zugreifen, sehen Sie einen Banner am unteren Ende der Seite,
   das Informationen über die Cookies, die wir einsetzen, enthält. Sie
   können auf das Banner klicken und sämtliche Cookies verweigern, die
   nicht absolut notwendig sind. Der Klick auf "Akzeptieren"/"Accept" auf
   dem Banner oder das Scrollen/Klicken auf unseren Seiten ist ein Zeichen
   Ihres Einverständnisses. Entsprechend basiert Outbrains Rechtmäßigkeit
   der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten auf unseren Websites auf
   Zustimmung. Sie können Ihre Zustimmung jederzeit widerrufen.
   Nutzer: Sie sind ein Nutzer, wenn Sie eine Seite einer Website oder
   Anwendung eines Partners von Outbrain besuchen, auf der das
   Outbrain-Widget installiert ist („Partner-Websites“). Falls Sie
   beispielsweise die Seiten https://news.sky.com/uk, www.spiegel.de oder
   www.cnn.com besuchen, wird das Outbrain-Widget in diese Websites
   eingebunden. Dass Sie mit einem Outbrain-Widget verbunden sind,
   erkennen Sie an dem Text, der auf Outbrain verweist (z.B. „Empfohlen
   von Outbrain“, „von Outbrain“ neben den Empfehlungen). Wenn Sie auf die
   Verlinkung zu Outbrain klicken, sehen Sie einen detaillierten Hinweis ,
   der Ihnen erlaubt, zum Interessenprofil von Outbrain zu navigieren, wo
   Sie eine allgemeine Darstellung der Arten von Datenkategorien finden,
   die Outbrain für die Abgabe seiner Empfehlungen verwendet. Sie haben an
   dieser Stelle auch die Möglichkeit, personalisierte Empfehlungen zu
   deaktivieren. Sehen Sie hier mehr.
   Beispiel eines Outbrain-Widgets
   Outbrain Example Recommendations
   (a) Welche Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun
   Wir verwenden UUIDs, IP-Adressen und andere Nutzungsdaten, damit wir
   Ihnen interessante Empfehlungen unterbreiten können. Outbrains
   Empfehlungen werden unter Umständen von einem Werbetreibenden bezahlt,
   der Sie auf eine neue Website leitet, oder es handelt sich um eigene
   Empfehlungen des Publishers, sodass der Link auf eine andere Seite
   desselben Publishers führt.
     * UUID.

   Wenn Sie als Nutzer erstmalig eine Partner-Website (z.B. CNN.com)
   besuchen, setzt Outbrain zur Erzeugung einer eindeutigen Nutzerkennung,
   UUID (Unique User Identifier), ein Cookie auf Ihrem Gerät. Wir
   katalogisieren und analysieren den Content, den Sie auf
   Partner-Websites konsumieren. Unsere Empfehlungen basieren auf: (i) dem
   Browserverlauf; (ii) ähnlichen Surfmustern anderer Nutzer; (ii)
   Empfehlungen, die bei Outbrains Adressaten zur gegebenen Zeit beliebt
   sind; (iv) einem gewissen Maß an Zufälligkeit und (v)
   Zielanforderungen, die durch unsere Amplify-Kunden bereitgestellt oder
   von ihnen verlangt werden. Beispielsweise weiß Outbrain, dass UUID 123
   (wobei es sich um Sie handeln kann, während Sie mit Ihrem iPhone X und
   dem Chrome-Browser auf der Spiegel-Website surfen) gern Texte über
   ferne Reiseziele liest und dass Personen, die gern von fernen
   Reisezielen lesen, sich auch für Artikel über exotisches Essen
   interessieren.
   Die UUID stellt eine Abfolge von Ziffern und/oder Buchstaben dar. Diese
   UUID ist an Ihr Gerät gebunden und variiert je nach verwendetem
   Browser. Mit anderen Worten: Outbrain erfasst verschiedene UUIDs
   abhängig davon, welches Gerät und/oder welchen Browser Sie für den
   Zugriff auf die Websites des Partners verwenden. Dies bedeutet
   beispielsweise, dass Sie eine UUID haben, wenn Sie eine Partner-Website
   von Ihrem Mobiltelefon aus mit dem Safari-Browser besuchen, und eine
   andere UUID, wenn Sie eine Partner-Website von Ihrem iPad aus mit dem
   Safari-Browser besuchen. Outbrain kombiniert und konsolidiert eine UUID
   von einem Mobilgerät (Handgerät oder Tablet) von einem Browser, der
   dann von demselben Gerät auf eine Anwendung (oder umgekehrt) zugreift.
   Durch die Zuweisung einer UUID kann Outbrain die besuchten Seiten und
   die Klicks auf Outbrains Empfehlungen von dieser UUID kombinieren, was
   alles dem Ziel dient, interessante Empfehlungen bereitzustellen.
     * IP-Adressen und andere Nutzungsdaten.

   Wir erfassen eine UUID wie oben erläutert, und wir erfassen auch die
   folgenden Daten: (i) IP-Adresse (wird nach Industriestandards
   anonymisiert); (ii) User-Agent-Daten: Gerätetyp (z.B. iPhone),
   Browsertyp (z.B. Chrome), Betriebssystem, z.B. iOS); (iii) die
   besuchten Seiten; (iv) den Zeitpunkt des Besuchs und (v) die
   verweisenden URLs und andere normalerweise bei HTTP-Anfragen
   übertragenen Informationen.
   Durch die oben genannten statistischen Daten erhalten wir Informationen
   darüber, wie viele Nutzer eine bestimmte Seite auf unseren
   Partner-Websites, auf denen das Outbrain-Widget installiert ist,
   besucht haben, wie lange jeder Nutzer auf der Seite blieb, die Art des
   Contents auf der Seite, die er angeklickt hat, und wie der Nutzer sich
   auf der Seite allgemein verhalten hat. Diese Informationen sind nur
   dann personenbezogene Daten, wenn sie mit einer UUID verbunden sind.
   (b) Cookies und andere vergleichbare Technologien, die wir nutzen
   Diese Cookie-Tabelle enthält unter „Nutzer“ eine detaillierte Liste der
   Erstanbieter-Cookies, die wir bei Ihrer Interaktion mit
   Partner-Websites, auf denen die Outbrain-Technologie implementiert ist,
   verwenden.
   Wenn Sie auf einen Link zu einer unserer Empfehlungen klicken, setzt
   der Amplify-Werbetreibende, der die Empfehlung finanziert, unter
   Umständen durch Weiterleitungen vor der Ankunft auf der Zielseite der
   Empfehlungen oder bei Erreichen der Zielseite Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät.
   In diesen Fällen gelten für Sie die Datenschutzbestimmungen des
   Werbetreibenden.
   Zusätzlich zu Outbrains sichtbarem Widget auf Partner-Websites
   implementieren bestimmte Outbrain-Werbetreibende gegebenenfalls das
   Outbrain-Pixel auf ihren Websites. Das Outbrain-Pixel ermittelt, ob der
   Nutzer, der auf die Seite mit dem installierten Pixel gelangt, über
   eine Outbrain-UUID verfügt. Falls es eine mit diesem Endnutzer
   verbundene UUID gibt, kann Outbrain den Werbetreibenden erlauben, diese
   UUIDs erneut anzusprechen, und/oder den Werbetreibenden die Gesamtzahl
   der UUIDs, die diese Seite erreicht haben, übermitteln. Sofern es auf
   der Seite keine Outbrain-UUID gab, erfasst das Outbrain-Pixel keine
   Daten über den Nutzer.
   Wir legen Werbetreibenden nahe, die Verwendung des Outbrain-Pixels auf
   ihren eigenen Websites offenzulegen. Outbrain kombiniert keine
   Pixelinformationen mit dem Profil einer UUID.
   Datenpunkte wie Seitenaufrufe und Klicks sind mit einer bestimmten UUID
   verbunden und werden 13 Monate lang gespeichert. Falls beispielsweise
   UUID 123 am 31. Dezember 2017 einen Artikel gelesen hat, ist dieser
   Artikel am 1. Februar 2018 nicht mehr Teil des Profils von UUID 123.
   (c) So geben wir unter Umständen Informationen weiter
   Outbrain leitet keine Nutzerprofile an Dritte weiter. Wir geben jedoch
   unter Umständen die UUID an bestimmte Partner zum Zweck der
   Cookie-Synchronisierung oder aufgrund technischer Anforderungen weiter.
   Beachten Sie bitte auch den Abschnitt dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen
   über die Weitergabe von Daten.
   (d) Ihre Rechte
     * Outbrain-Deaktivierung/Opt-Out. Sie können Outbrains
       personalisierte Empfehlungen jederzeit deaktivieren. In Outbrains
       Interessenprofil finden Sie eine allgemeine Darstellung, welche
       Ihrer Daten Outbrain kennt und gegebenenfalls für Empfehlungen
       nutzt. Über das Interessenprofil haben Sie auch die Möglichkeit,
       personalisierte Empfehlungen zu deaktivieren (Sie können ein
       solches Opt-Out auch hier vornehmen). Bitte beachten Sie, dass die
       Deaktivierung von Browsern über Outbrains Interessenprofil
       stattfindet, die Deaktivierung von personalisierten Empfehlungen in
       Anwendungen jedoch über die Einstellungen in Ihrem Gerät (Beispiele
       für die Schritte erhalten Sie im Interessenprofil).

   WICHTIG – obwohl Sie Outbrain deaktiviert haben:
     * Sie sehen weiterhin Outbrains Empfehlungen. Die Deaktivierung von
       Outbrains Personalisierungsverfolgung bedeutet nicht, dass Sie
       keine weiteren Empfehlungen von Outbrain erhalten. Stattdessen
       bedeutet es, dass Outbrains Empfehlungen nicht mehr personalisiert
       sind. Die Empfehlungen nutzen nach wie vor Informationen über das
       von Ihnen betrachtete Dokument (z.B. Kontextinformationen), um
       Ihnen auf dieser Seite Empfehlungen zu unterbreiten.

     * Die Deaktivierung basiert auf Cookies und ist spezifisch für das
       Gerät/den Browser. Sofern Sie im Web von verschiedenen Geräten
       und/oder Browsern aus surfen, müssen Sie eine Deaktivierung von
       jedem Gerät und/oder Browser aus vornehmen, damit dafür gesorgt
       ist, dass wir auf allen die Personalisierungsverfolgung verhindern.
       Aus demselben Grund müssen Sie, wenn Sie ein neues Gerät kaufen,
       den Browser wechseln oder das Deaktivierungs-Cookie löschen, eine
       erneute Deaktivierung vornehmen. Die Deaktivierung der
       Personalisierungsverfolgung ist nicht dasselbe wie die Blockierung
       von Cookies.

     * Um die Löschung des mit Ihrer UUID verbundenen Profils
       sicherzustellen, sollten Sie Outbrain über mindestens 21 Tage nicht
       aktivieren. Ihre Deaktivierung der personalisierten Empfehlungen
       durch Outbrain ist sofort wirksam. Falls Ihr Browser jedoch die
       lokale Speicherung zulässt und Sie innerhalb von 21 Tagen nach
       Ihrer Deaktivierung Outbrains personalisierte Empfehlungen
       aktivieren, wird Ihr vorheriges Profil möglicherweise wieder mit
       Ihrer UUID verbunden. Sofern Sie nicht innerhalb von 21 Tagen eine
       neue Aktivierung vornehmen, wird Ihr Profil gelöscht und kann nicht
       wiederhergestellt werden.

     * Wie bei den meisten Opt-Outs basiert auch der Outbrain
       Browser-Opt-Out auf einem Cookie. Das Cookie ist dazu bestimmt,
       bestehen zu bleiben, damit die Präferenz des Nutzers durchgesetzt
       werden kann. Allerdings kann die „Intelligent Tracking Prevention“
       (das Verhindern von Aufzeichnungen) für Safari in iOS 11 das
       Fortbestehen von Cookies über ein 24-Stunden-Zeitfenster hinaus
       beeinträchtigen. Wir empfehlen die Nutzung eines anderen Browsers
       oder das Blockieren aller 3rd-Party-Cookies in dem Browser, sodass
       Ihr Opt-Out-Wunsch berücksichtigt wird, ohne dass Sie sich auf die
       Opt-Out-Methodik eines einzelnen Unternehmens verlassen müssen.

     * Zusätzliche Deaktivierungsoptionen. Sie können auch den Erhalt
       personalisierter Werbung durch uns oder andere Werbeunternehmen
       über branchenbetriebene Tools deaktivieren, beispielsweise NAI oder
       die verschiedenen DAA-basierten Seiten (DAA,
       http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices, und/oder EDAA
       www.youronlinechoices.eu). Durch den Besuch der Seiten für
       Verbraucherwahlmöglichkeiten NAI, DAA, DAAC oder EDAA können Sie
       einige oder alle Leistungen der teilnehmenden Mitglieder
       deaktivieren. Wie auch die Deaktivierung von Outbrain bedeuten auch
       diese Deaktivierungen nicht, dass Sie gar keine Werbung mehr
       erhalten, sondern lediglich, dass die Werbung nicht mehr auf Sie
       zugeschnitten ist. Möglicherweise erhalten Sie weiterhin Werbung,
       beispielsweise anhand der speziellen Website, die Sie betrachten
       (d. h. kontextbasierte Werbung). Falls durch die Einstellungen
       Ihrer Browser zudem Cookies abgewiesen werden, wenn Sie die
       Verbraucherseiten DAA, DAAC oder EDAA besuchen, ist Ihre
       Deaktivierung unter Umständen nicht wirksam.
     * Rechtsgrundlage. Outbrains Rechtmäßigkeit der Verarbeitung
       personenbezogener Daten eines Nutzers gründet auf der durch unsere
       Partner-Websites festgelegten Rechtmäßigkeit. Jeder Partner-Website
       liegt Zustimmung oder berechtigtes Interesse zugrunde. Bitte lesen
       Sie die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen der Partner-Websites, um
       weitere Informationen über deren Rechtmäßigkeit zu erhalten. Falls
       bei einem Partner eine Zustimmung erforderlich ist, setzt Outbrain
       kein Cookie bei Ihnen, wenn Sie der Partner-Website keine
       Zustimmung erteilt haben.

   Geschäftspartner: Sie sind ein Geschäftspartner, wenn Sie sich im Namen
   des Unternehmens, für das Sie arbeiten, registrieren (oder Outbrain per
   E-Mail kontaktieren), um die Dienstleistungen Outbrain Amplify oder
   Outbrain Engage zu nutzen. Sehen Sie hier mehr.
   (a) Welche Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun
   Womöglich übermitteln Sie bestimmte personenbezogene Daten (wie die
   E-Mail-Adresse), wenn Sie sich für die Amplify- oder
   Engage-Dienstleistungen registrieren oder anderweitig mit uns
   kommunizieren oder interagieren. Wenn Sie sich bei uns als
   Geschäftspartner bewerben, benötigen wir gegebenenfalls weitere Daten
   von Ihnen über Anmeldebögen für Werbetreibende, Werbeaufträge und
   andere Formulare. Wir erfassen automatisch Informationen über die
   Aktivitäten Ihres Nutzernamens im Outbrain-Dashboard. Wenn Sie
   beispielsweise als Amplify-Geschäftspartner die Kosten pro Klick für
   eine Ihrer Kampagnen ändern, findet sich im Audit Trail von Outbrain
   eine Aufzeichnung all dieser Maßnahmen.
   Wir erfassen und verarbeiten die oben genannten personenbezogenen
   Daten, um unsere Verpflichtungen aus unserem Vertrag mit Ihnen als
   Geschäftspartner (oder zukünftiger Geschäftspartner) zu erfüllen, unter
   anderem:
     * Beantwortung Ihrer Fragen und Anforderungen;

     * Gewährung Ihres Zugriffs auf bestimmte Funktionen und Eigenschaften
       der Amplify- und Engage-Dienstleistungen (z.B. Bereitstellung und
       Pflege Ihres Dashboard-Kontos);

     * Verifizierung Ihrer Identität;

     * Kommunikation mit Ihnen über Ihr Konto, unsere Produkte und die für
       Ihre Nutzung der Amplify- oder Engage-Dienstleistung relevanten
       Werbeaktionen.

   (b) Cookies und andere vergleichbare Technologien, die wir nutzen
   In der Cookie-Tabelle unter „Geschäftspartner“ erhalten Sie eine
   detaillierte Liste der Cookies (und ihrer jeweiligen Speicherfristen),
   die wir für Geschäftspartner verwenden.
   (c) So geben wir unter Umständen Informationen weiter
   Wir legen bestimmte Informationen über Geschäftspartner gegenüber
   Anbietern, Auftragnehmern oder anderen offen, die Outbrain bei der
   Erbringung der Dienstleistungen unterstützen (z.B.
   Kreditkartenabwicklung). Beachten Sie bitte auch den Abschnitt dieser
   Datenschutzbestimmungen über die Weitergabe von Daten.
   (d) Ihre Rechte
   Sofern Sie als Geschäftspartner Ihre Daten verifizieren, berichtigen,
   aktualisieren oder deren Deaktivierung veranlassen möchten, können Sie
   Ihre Profileinstellungen im Outbrain-Dashboard editieren oder uns unter
   support@outbrain.com kontaktieren. Falls Sie von Outbrain E-Mails
   erhalten, können Sie den Empfang über einen Link in der E-Mail
   abbestellen. Bitte beachten Sie, dass Sie durch das Abbestellen nicht
   den Erhalt von Benachrichtigungen deaktivieren, die kritisch für die
   Erbringung der Amplify- oder Engage-Dienstleistungen sind (z.B.
   E-Mail-Rechnungen).
   Outbrains Rechtmäßigkeit der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten von
   Geschäftspartnern gründet in berechtigtem Interesse.
   3. Datensicherheit, Übertragungen außerhalb des EWR, Weitergabe und
   Speicherfristen

                                      +

   Sicherheit
   Outbrain verfügt über ein dezidiertes Sicherheitsteam. Wir führen eine
   strenge Kontrolle der durch uns erfassten Daten durch und speichern
   diese in durch Firewalls geschützten und sicheren Datenbanken mit
   streng begrenzten und kontrollierten Zugriffsrechten, damit deren
   Sicherheit gewährleistet ist. Weitere Informationen können Sie unseren
   Sicherheitsstandards entnehmen.
   Geschäftspartner haben Zugang zu bestimmten passwortgeschützten
   Funktionen der Dienstleistungen Amplify oder Engage. Sie sind für die
   Geheimhaltung dieses Passworts verantwortlich. Bitte denken Sie daran,
   dass die Informationsübertragung über das Internet leider nicht
   vollständig sicher ist. Ein häufig vorkommender Internetbetrug wird als
   „Spoofing“ oder „Phishing“ bezeichnet. Dabei erhalten Sie eine E-Mail,
   die von einer vertrauenswürdigen Quelle zu stammen scheint und in der
   Ihre personenbezogenen Daten erfragt werden. Bitte beachten Sie, dass
   wir Ihnen keine E-Mails senden, in denen wir Sie um die Überprüfung
   Ihrer Kreditkarten- oder Bankdaten oder anderer personenbezogener Daten
   bitten. Sollten Sie jemals eine E-Mail erhalten, die den Anschein
   erweckt, von uns zu sein, und in der derartige Daten von Ihnen
   angefordert werden, antworten Sie nicht darauf und klicken Sie auch auf
   keine Links in dieser E-Mail. Leiten Sie stattdessen diese E-Mail an
   uns unter legal@outbrain.com weiter, da wir Fälle möglichen
   Internetbetrugs untersuchen.
   Datenübertragungen außerhalb der EU/des EWR
   Wenn wir personenbezogene Daten aus dem Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum in
   andere Länder übertragen, deren geltende Gesetze nicht über dasselbe
   Datenschutzniveau wie in den europäischen Gebieten verfügen, sorgen wir
   durch eigene Maßnahmen für ein geeignetes Datenschutzniveau. Für Ihre
   Daten gelten somit weiterhin Ihre Rechte und Ihr Datenschutz.
   Beispielsweise verwenden wir anerkannte Vertragsklauseln und weitere
   Maßnahmen, durch die für den Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten durch
   die Empfänger gesorgt ist.
   Weitergabe von Daten
   Zusätzlich zu der beschriebenen Offenlegung Ihrer personenbezogenen
   Daten der einzelnen Nutzerarten legen wir personenbezogene Daten unter
   Umständen wie folgt offen:
     * Innerhalb der durch Outbrain kontrollierten Unternehmensgruppe aus
       internen Gründen, vorrangig für geschäftliche und betriebliche
       Zwecke;

     * Bei einem Geschäftsübergang, wie einer Fusion, dem Erwerb durch ein
       anderes Unternehmen oder dem teilweisen oder vollständigen Verkauf
       unserer Vermögenswerte, gehören Ihre personenbezogenen Daten
       wahrscheinlich zu den übertragenen Vermögenswerten;

     * Bei entsprechenden rechtlichen Anforderungen (z.B. zur
       Unterstützung strafrechtlicher Ermittlungen oder anderer
       Rechtsverfahren); und/oder

     * Als Reaktion auf einen echten Notfall.

   Außerdem kombinieren wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten mit denen anderer
   Nutzer, um Trendinformationen weiterzugeben und Nutzerstatistiken mit
   Dritten zu verbinden, jedoch stets in zusammengefasster und
   anonymisierter Form.
   Datenspeicherung
   Die Speicherfrist für jedes durch Outbrain verwendete Cookie (gleich ob
   unser eigenes oder für uns durch Dritte) ist in der Cookie-Tabelle
   genannt.
   Outbrain verfügt zudem über eine Richtlinie zur Datenspeicherung, in
   der die Speicherfrist für personenbezogene Daten aufgeführt ist, die
   auf unserer Analyse basiert, welche Speicherfrist für bestimmte Daten
   aus rechtlichen oder geschäftlichen Gründen angemessen ist. Wenn wir
   personenbezogene Daten nicht mehr benötigen, löschen oder vernichten
   wir diese auf sichere Weise. Zusammengefasste Daten, durch die kein
   Gerät/Browser (oder keine Person) identifiziert werden kann und die für
   die Berichterstattung und Analyse benötigt werden, behalten wir so
   lange, wie dies wirtschaftlich nötig ist.
   4. Kinder

                                      +

   Keine unserer Dienstleistungen richtet sich an Kinder unter 16 Jahren.
   Wir erfassen wissentlich keine personenbezogenen Daten von Personen
   unter 16 Jahren. Stellen wir bei der Datenerfassung fest, dass ein
   Websitebesucher, ein Nutzer oder ein Geschäftspartner unter 16 ist,
   verwenden oder behalten wir seine/ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht.
   Wenn wir davon Kenntnis erlangen, dass wir unwissentlich
   personenbezogene Daten von einem Kind im Alter von unter 16 erfasst
   haben, ergreifen wir angemessene Anstrengungen zur Löschung dieser
   Daten aus unseren Verzeichnissen. Wenn du ein Kind bist, nutze Outbrain
   nicht, verlasse diese Seite und geh lieber spielen!
   5. Bürger des europäischen Gebiets

                                      +

   In Übereinstimmung mit europäischen Datenschutzgesetzen, insbesondere
   der europäischen Datenschutz-Grundverordnung (DSGVO), gewährt Outbrain
   Bürgern der europäischen Gebiete bestimmte zusätzliche Rechte wie das
   Recht auf Zugriff, Berichtigung, Einspruch, Beschwerde, Löschung und
   Blockierung. Insbesondere:
     * das Recht auf Auskunft darüber, ob und welche personenbezogenen
       Daten von uns verarbeitet werden, sowie das Recht, die Berichtigung
       oder Änderung personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen.
     * unter bestimmten Umständen das Recht, die Löschung
       personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen.
     * unter bestimmten Umständen das Recht, die Einschränkung der
       Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen.
     * den jederzeitigen vollständigen oder teilweisen Widerruf Ihrer
       Zustimmung zur Verarbeitung und Nutzung Ihrer Daten mit zukünftiger
       Gültigkeit.
     * das Recht auf Erhalt Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten in einem
       üblichen, strukturierten und mechanisch lesbaren Format.
     * Kontaktaufnahme mit Ihrem Datenschutzbeauftragten bei Fragen,
       Anmerkungen, Beschwerden oder Anfragen im Zusammenhang mit unserer
       Datenschutzerklärung und der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen
       Daten.
     * das Recht auf Beschwerde bei der zuständigen Aufsichtsbehörde,
       falls Sie der Auffassung sind, dass die Verarbeitung Ihrer
       personenbezogenen Daten gesetzeswidrig ist.

   Neben dem oben Genannten weisen wir in diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen
   auf bestimmte Rechte für Bürger des europäischen Gebiets hin. Laut der
   DSGVO bezeichnet die Formulierung „Bürger aus europäischen Gebieten“
   den Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum (EWR) und die Schweiz. Im Sinne dieser
   Datenschutzbestimmungen umfasst der Begriff „europäische Gebiete“
   weiterhin das Vereinigte Königreich, auch nachdem dieses den
   Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum im Anschluss an den Austritt (Brexit)
   verlässt.
   Bitte senden Sie eine Nachricht an PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com, wenn
   Sie Fragen zur Ausübung dieser Rechte haben.
   6. Datenschutzrechte in Kalifornien

                                      +

   Laut dem California Civil Code, Abschnitte 1798.83-1798.84, sind
   Einwohner Kaliforniens berechtigt, von uns darüber Auskunft zu
   erhalten, welche Kategorien personenbezogener Daten wir an Dritte oder
   verbundene Unternehmen für diese Dritten oder für direkte
   Marketingzwecke verbundener Unternehmen weiterleiten. In dieser
   Auskunft werden die Kategorien der weitergeleiteten Daten
   identifiziert, einschließlich einer Liste der Dritten und verbundenen
   Unternehmen, an die die Daten weitergeleitet wurden, und deren Namen
   und Adressen. Falls Sie Ihren Wohnsitz in Kalifornien unterhalten und
   Sie diese Auskunft einholen möchten, senden Sie bitte eine schriftliche
   Anforderung an PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oder an die folgende
   Anschrift: Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY
   10011. Sie erhalten eine Antwort innerhalb von 30 Tagen.
   7. „Do Not Track“-Angabe

                                      +

   Einige Browser senden an Websites „Do Not Track (DNT)“-Signale, mit
   denen der Website mitgeteilt wird, dass die Aktivitäten des Nutzers
   nicht verfolgt werden sollen. Es besteht jedoch kein allgemeingültiges
   Verständnis darüber, wie DNT-Signale zu interpretieren sind, und daher
   findet durch Outbrain derzeit keine Modifizierung, Änderung oder
   Reaktion auf die DNT-Anforderungen oder -Signale von diesen Browsern
   statt. Wir beobachten weiterhin die Branchenaktivitäten in diesem
   Bereich und bewerten unsere DNT-Verfahren bei Bedarf neu.
   Zwischenzeitlich können Sie eine Reihe anderer durch uns
   bereitgestellter Tools zur Kontrolle der Datenerfassung und -nutzung
   einsetzen, unter anderem die Möglichkeit, im Nutzerbereich den Erhalt
   personalisierter Empfehlungen zu deaktivieren.
   8. Mögliche Änderungen dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen

                                      +

   Wir ändern diese Datenschutzbestimmungen zu gegebener Zeit. Darüber
   informieren wir durch einen deutlichen Hinweis, der für Sie als
   Websitebesucher oder Geschäftspartner erkennbar ist. Wir haben jedoch
   keine Möglichkeit, Nutzern gegenüber eine Aktualisierung anzukündigen.
   Sie sollten diesen Bereich regelmäßig daraufhin überprüfen, ob die
   Datenschutzbestimmungen aktualisiert worden sind. Wir zeigen stets das
   Datum der letzten Änderung der Datenschutzbestimmungen oben auf der
   Seite an, damit Sie wissen, wann diese zuletzt überarbeitet wurden.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                Última actualización: 23 de mayo de 2018

   Outbrain se compromete a proteger tus datos personales. Esta Política
   de privacidad («Política de privacidad») rige el uso por parte de
   Outbrain de los datos recopilados por nosotros, incluyendo todos y cada
   uno de los datos personales. Los datos personales son información que
   se relaciona contigo y que puede identificarte como individuo.
   Utilizamos tus datos personales de conformidad con todas las leyes
   aplicables. Para garantizar el cumplimiento y estar en sintonía con los
   valores de Outbrain en materia de confianza y transparencia, contamos
   con un equipo de defensores de la privacidad responsables de la
   implementación continua de nuestro programa de privacidad global.

                                                           + EXPANDIR TODO

   1. Quiénes somos, qué hacemos, cómo ponerse en contacto con Outbrain,
   nuestro RPD o las autoridades competentes

                                      +

   Quiénes somos:
   Outbrain significa Outbrain Inc, una sociedad de Delaware (EE.UU.) con
   sede en Nueva York y sus filiales (colectivamente, «Outbrain», o
   «nosotros», «nos», «nuestro»). Operamos desde 12 oficinas globales y
   colaboramos con editores y vendedores de todo el mundo.
   Qué hacemos:
   La misión de Outbrain es facilitar recomendaciones interesantes a sus
   usuarios basadas en sus intereses. Para lograr nuestra misión firmamos
   acuerdos con:
     * editores y socios en línea que desean recomendar contenido
       relevante a sus lectores (Outbrain Engage), y
     * anunciantes que quieren que los lectores vean su contenido
       (Outbrain Amplify).

   Cómo ponerse en contacto con nosotros:
   Revisamos regularmente nuestro cumplimiento de la presente Política de
   privacidad. Las preguntas, comentarios y solicitudes relacionadas con
   esta Política de privacidad son bienvenidas y deben dirigirse a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com o por correo postal a Outbrain Inc. 39
   West 13th Street, 3rd floor, Nueva York, NY 10011, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Si Outbrain no responde satisfactoriamente a tus preguntas o
   inquietudes, también puede ponerte en contacto con las siguientes
   personas para obtener asesoramiento, apoyo o realizar reclamaciones:
     * El Responsable de Protección de Datos externo de Outbrain («RPD»):
       ePrivacy GmbH, representada por D. Christoph Bauer. Se puede
       contactar con ePrivacy GmbH directamente en privacy@eprivacy.eu.
     * El Information Commissioner’s Officer, que es el principal servicio
       de supervisión de Outbrain en Europa.

   Órganos de autorregulación
   Outbrain se adhiere a los principios de autorregulación establecidos
   por la Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) y la European Interactive
   Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Somos miembros activos de la
   Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), una asociación dedicada a la
   recopilación responsable de datos y su uso para la publicidad digital.
   Nos adherimos al Código de conducta de NAI para sitios web y móviles.
   Outbrain también se adhiere a los Principios de autorregulación de la
   Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) para la Publicidad conductual en
   línea y al Marco OBA de IAB de Europa.
   2. Tipos de usuarios de Outbrain (incluyendo la gestión del Opt Out)

                                      +

   Gran parte de esta Política de privacidad está dividida en apartados en
   función de la manera en que puedes interactuar con Outbrain. Por favor,
   determina qué tipo de usuario eres. Para cada tipo de usuario hemos
   explicado qué información recopilamos y por qué, qué cookies y otras
   tecnologías similares utilizamos, cómo compartimos dicha información y
   sus derechos.
   Visitantes del sitio: Eres un Visitante del Sitio cuando visitas e
   interactúas con nuestros sitios, páginas web, funciones interactivas,
   blogs y tus respectivos contenidos en Outbrain.com (o cualquier
   derivación, como Outbrain.co.uk, Outbrain.fr, Outbrain.de, etc.) y
   MyOutbrain.com («Nuestros sitios»). Ver más aquí.
   (a) Qué información recopilamos y por qué
   Queremos entender qué servicios te interesan de Nuestros sitios y
   queremos recordarte los servicios que ofrecemos cuando no estés
   visitando Nuestros sitios. Para ello, recopilamos la siguiente
   información sobre ti: (i) dirección IP, (ii) datos del Agente usuario:
   tipo de dispositivo (por ejemplo, iPhone), tipo de navegador (por
   ejemplo, Chrome), sistema operativo (por ejemplo, iOS), (iii) las
   páginas visitadas en Nuestro sitios (por ejemplo, la página «Acerca de»
   de Outbrain), (iv) la hora de la visita (y la zona horaria
   correspondiente) y (v) las URL de referencia y otra información que
   normalmente se transmite en las solicitudes HTTP (por ejemplo, esta
   información nos dice cómo llegaste a Nuestros sitios).
   (b) Qué cookies y otras tecnologías similares utilizamos
   Consulta esta Tabla de cookies en «Visitantes del sitio» para obtener
   una lista detallada de las cookies (y sus correspondientes períodos de
   retención) que utilizamos cuando visitas Nuestros sitios web.
   (c) Cómo podemos intercambiar información
     * Intercambio de información sobre ti en Nuestros sitios.

   En general, no compartimos tus datos personales con terceros para fines
   de marketing o publicidad. Sin embargo, utilizamos varios terceros
   (cada uno de los cuales aparece en esta Tabla de cookies) para
   ayudarnos a vender o a enviarte publicidad. Por ejemplo, algunas de las
   cookies que utilizamos en Nuestros sitios pertenecen a terceros que
   ayudarán a Outbrain a vender o a enviarte publicidad. Exigimos que
   estos terceros y empresas se comprometan a mantener toda la información
   compartida con ellos de manera confidencial y a utilizar la información
   sólo para cumplir con sus obligaciones para con nosotros. Lo anterior
   se logra mediante acuerdos con todos los terceros que tratan datos
   personales en nuestro nombre para asegurarnos de que tratan tus datos
   personales de conformidad con nuestras estrictas instrucciones y todas
   las leyes de protección de datos aplicables. Si realizas una
   publicación en nuestro blog, tu comentario e información estarán
   disponibles públicamente. Póngate en contacto con support@outbrain.com
   para eliminar tu comentario.
     * Uso de servicios de terceros en Nuestros sitios.

   Nuestros sitios contienen enlaces a otras webs que no operamos ni son
   de nuestra propiedad. No controlamos, recomendamos ni respaldamos el
   contenido, los productos, los servicios, las políticas ni las prácticas
   de privacidad de estas webs de terceros. Por ejemplo, en Nuestros
   sitios encontrará iconos en los que podrá hacer clic y que te llevarán
   a la página de Facebook de Outbrain o a la página de LinkedIn de
   Outbrain. Si decides hacer clic en estos enlaces, debes saber que
   Facebook y LinkedIn podrán enviar sus propias cookies a tu dispositivo
   y que podrán recopilar datos personales de forma independiente. Por lo
   tanto, es importante que leas las políticas de privacidad de Facebook o
   LinkedIn.
     * Consulta también el apartado Intercambio de esta Política de
       privacidad.

   (d) Tus derechos
   Los Términos de uso en Nuestro site rigen el uso de Nuestro site y
   también se aplican a ti. Puedes dejar de usar Nuestro site en cualquier
   momento. Si lo haces, es posible que también desees eliminar las
   cookies que hayamos colocado en cualquier dispositivo utilizado para
   acceder a Nuestro site. Si durante tu uso de Nuestros site proporcionas
   tu dirección de correo electrónico, cualquier correo electrónico que
   recibas de Outbrain incluirá la opción «darse de baja».
   Para los usarios del territorio europeo, Outbrain ha implementado una
   plataforma de administración de consentimiento en nuestro site (con la
   tecnología de One Trust), que brinda al usuario la oportunidad de dar
   su aprobación, o no, a cookies y tecnologías de seguimiento similares
   en nuestros sites. Al acceder a nuestros sites, verás un banner en la
   parte inferior de la página con información sobre las cookies que
   utilizamos. Puedes hacer clic en el banner para rechazar cualquier
   cookie que no sea estrictamente necesaria. Aceptar en el banner o hacer
   scrolling/clic en nuestros sites se interpreta como una indicación de
   aceptación. En consecuencia, la base legal de Outbrain para procesar
   datos personales en nuestros sites es el consentimiento. El usuario
   puede retirar su consentimiento en cualquier momento aquí.
   Usuarios: Eres un Usuario cuando visitas una página de un site o
   aplicación de uno de los socios de Outbrain donde esté instalado el
   complemento (widget) de Outbrain («Sitios asociados»). Por ejemplo, si
   visitas https://news.sky.com/uk o www.elpais.com se implementará el
   complemento Outbrain en esas webs. Sabrás que estás interactuando con
   un complemento de Outbrain cuando veas un texto que haga referencia a
   Outbrain (por ejemplo, «Recomendado por Outbrain», «por Outbrain» cerca
   de las recomendaciones). Si hace clic en la referencia con hipervínculo
   a Outbrain, verás un aviso detallado que te permitirá navegar hasta el
   Perfil de intereses de Outbrain, que proporciona una visualización
   general de los tipos de categorías de datos de Outbrain que se pueden
   utilizar para hacer tus recomendaciones. También te ofrece la
   posibilidad de inhabilitar las recomendaciones personalizadas. Ver más
   aquí.
   Ejemplo de un complemento Outbrain
   [rydw687kQ.png]
   (a) Qué información recopilamos y por qué
   Utilizamos identificadores únicos de usuario (UUID, por sus siglas en
   inglés), direcciones IP y otra información de uso para poder ofrecer
   recomendaciones interesantes. Las recomendaciones de Outbrain podrán
   ser pagadas por un anunciante que las vincule a un nuevo sitio web o
   podrán ser orgánicas de tal manera que el enlace sea a otra página en
   el mismo sitio web del editor.
     * UUID.

   Cuando como Usuario visita por primera vez un Sitio asociado (por
   ejemplo, CNN.com), Outbrain introducirá una cookie en tu dispositivo
   para generar un UUID. Catalogamos y analizamos el contenido que
   consumas en los Sitios asociados. Nuestras recomendaciones se basan en:
   (i) el historial de navegación, (ii) los patrones de navegación
   similares de otros Usuarios, (ii) las recomendaciones que son
   generalmente populares entre la audiencia de Outbrain en ese momento,
   (iv) cierta aleatoriedad y (v) los requisitos de orientación que puedan
   ser proporcionados o solicitados por nuestros clientes de Amplify. Como
   ejemplo, Outbrain puede saber que a UUID 123 (que podrías ser tú en su
   iPhone X en el periódico The Guardian usando Chrome como tu navegador)
   le gusta leer sobre destinos vacacionales lejanos y que a la gente que
   le gusta leer sobre destinos vacacionales lejanos también le gusta leer
   sobre comida exótica.
   El UUID es una secuencia de números o letras. Este UUID se vincula tu
   dispositivo y varía dependiendo del navegador que utilices. En otras
   palabras, Outbrain registra un UUID diferente dependiendo del
   dispositivo o navegador que utilices para acceder a los Sitios
   asociados. Por ejemplo, esto significa que tendrás un UUID cuando
   visites un Sitio asociado desde tu teléfono móvil usando el navegador
   Safari y un UUID diferente cuando visites un Sitio asociado desde tu
   iPad usando el navegador Safari. Outbrain combinará y unificará el UUID
   de un dispositivo móvil (portátil o tableta) y el del navegador que
   acceda posteriormente a una aplicación (o viceversa) desde el mismo
   dispositivo.
   Asignar un UUID permite a Outbrain asociar las páginas visitadas y los
   clics realizados en las recomendaciones de Outbrain desde dicho UUID,
   todo ello con el objetivo de proporcionar recomendaciones interesantes.
     * Dirección IP y otra información de uso.

   Recopilamos UUID como se explicó anteriormente y también recopilamos la
   siguiente información sobre ti: (i) dirección IP (y luego anonimizado
   en base a los estándares de la industria); (ii) datos del Agente
   usuario: tipo de dispositivo (por ejemplo, Iphone), tipo de navegador
   (por ejemplo, Chrome), sistema operativo (por ejemplo, iOS), (iii) las
   páginas visitadas, (iv) el momento de la visita y (v) las URL de
   referencia y otra información que normalmente se transmite en las
   solicitudes HTTP.
   La información estadística anterior nos proporciona información sobre
   cuántos Usuarios visitaron una página específica de nuestros Sitios
   asociados en los que está instalado el complemento de Outbrain, cuánto
   tiempo permaneció cada Usuario en esa página, el tipo de contenido en
   esa página sobre el que hicieron clic y cómo interactuaron en general
   con esa página. Esta información sólo son datos personales cuando están
   asociados a un UUID.
   (b) Qué cookies y otras tecnologías similares utilizamos
   Por favor, consulta esta Tabla de cookies en el apartado «Usuarios»
   para obtener una lista detallada de las primeras cookies que utilizamos
   cuando interactúas con Sitios asociados en los que se implementa la
   tecnología de Outbrain.
   Si haces clic en un enlace a una de nuestras recomendaciones, el
   anunciante de Amplify que patrocina la recomendación puede colocar
   cookies en tu dispositivo a través de redirecciones antes de llegar a
   la página de destino de las recomendaciones o al llegar a la página de
   destino. En tales casos, estarás sujeto a la Política de privacidad de
   ese anunciante.
   Además del complemento visible de Outbrain en los Sitios asociados,
   algunos anunciantes de Outbrain podrán implementar el píxel de Outbrain
   en sus sitios web. El píxel de Outbrain determina si el usuario que
   llega a la página donde está instalado el píxel tiene un UUID de
   Outbrain. Si existe un UUID asociado con dicho usuario final, Outbrain
   permitirá a los anunciantes reorientar esos UUID o proporcionará a los
   anunciantes el número total de UUID que llegaron a dicha página. Si no
   había ningún UUID de Outbrain en la página, el píxel de Outbrain no
   recopilará ninguna información sobre el usuario.
   Animamos a los anunciantes a informar sobre el uso del píxel de
   Outbrain en sus propios sitios web. Outbrain no combina información de
   píxeles con el perfil de un UUID.
   Los puntos de datos como las páginas vistas y los clics están
   conectados a un UUID en particular y se retienen durante 13 meses. Por
   ejemplo, si UUID 123 leyó un artículo el 31 de diciembre de 2017, el 1
   de febrero de 2018 ese artículo ya no formará parte del perfil de UUID
   123.
   (c) Cómo podemos intercambiar información
   Outbrain no comparte perfiles de usuario con terceros. Sin embargo, es
   posible que compartamos el UUID con determinados socios con el fin de
   sincronizar las cookies o en función de los requisitos técnicos.
   Consulta también el apartado «Intercambio» de la presente Política de
   privacidad.
   (d) Tus derechos
     * Inhabilitación voluntaria de Outbrain

   Podrás inhabilitar las recomendaciones personalizadas de Outbrain en
   cualquier momento. Por favor, consulta el Perfil de intereses de
   Outbrain para una visualización general de los datos que Outbrain
   conoce sobre ti y que puede utilizar para hacer sus recomendaciones. El
   Perfil de intereses también te ofrece la posibilidad de inhabilitar las
   recomendaciones personalizadas (puedes también hacer opt-out aquí). Ten
   en cuenta que la inhabilitación de los navegadores se realiza a través
   del Perfil de intereses de Outbrain, pero que la inhabilitación de las
   recomendaciones personalizadas en las aplicaciones se realiza a través
   de la configuración de tu dispositivo (hay ejemplos de los pasos a
   seguir en el Perfil de intereses).
   IMPORTANTE – a pesar de que hayas inhabilitado el seguimiento
   personalizado de Outbrain,
     * seguirás viendo las recomendaciones de Outbrain. Inhabilitar el
       seguimiento personalizado de Outbrain no significa que vayas a
       dejar de recibir recomendaciones de Outbrain. Por el contrario,
       significa que las recomendaciones de Outbrain no serán
       personalizadas. Las recomendaciones seguirán utilizando información
       sobre el documento que estás consultando (es decir, información
       contextual) para proporcionarte recomendaciones en esa página.

     * La inhabilitación voluntaria está basada en las cookies y es
       específica del dispositivo/navegador. Si navegas por la página web
       desde varios dispositivos o navegadores, deberás inhabilitar cada
       dispositivo o navegador para asegurarte de que no realizamos el
       seguimiento personalizado en ninguno ellos. Por la misma razón, si
       compras un dispositivo nuevo, cambias de navegador o borra (o
       limpia) la cookie de inhabilitación tendrás que inhabilitarla de
       nuevo. Inhabilitar el seguimiento personalizado no es lo mismo que
       bloquear las cookies.

     * Para garantizar la eliminación del perfil vinculado a su UUID, no
       habilites Outbrain durante al menos 21 días. Tu inhabilitación de
       las recomendaciones personalizadas de Outbrain será efectiva de
       manera inmediata. Sin embargo, si tu navegador permite el
       almacenamiento local y habilitas las recomendaciones personalizadas
       de Outbrain dentro de los 21 días siguientes a tu inhabilitación,
       es posible que tu perfil anterior se vincule de nuevo a su UUID. Si
       no habilitas Outbrain en un plazo de 21 días, se eliminará tu
       perfil y no podrás recuperarse.

     * Al igual que con la mayoría de los opt-out, también la opción de
       opt-out del navegador de Outbrain se basa en una cookie. La cookie
       de opt-out voluntaria persiste para cumplir con las preferencias
       del usuario. Sin embargo, la función de "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention " en iOS11 puede afectar la persistencia de las cookies
       en los sitios web después de una ventana de 24 horas. Sugerimos
       usar otro navegador o considerar bloquear todas las cookies de
       terceros desde el navegador para que se efectúe el“opt-out" sin
       tener que depender de la metodología de exclusión voluntaria de
       ninguna empresa.

     * Opciones adicionales de inhabilitación voluntaria. También podrás
       inhabilitar los anuncios personalizados que te ofrecemos nosotros u
       otras compañías de publicidad a través de herramientas impulsadas
       por la industria, como la NAI o las diversas páginas basadas en la
       DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices ; o EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
       Visitar las páginas de elección del consumidor de la NAI, DAA, DAAC
       o EDAA te permitirá inhabilitar todos o algunos de los servicios de
       los miembros participantes. Al igual que la inhabilitación de
       Outbrain, estas inhabilitaciones no significan que ya no recibirás
       ninguna publicidad, sino que los anuncios simplemente no serán
       personalizados. Podrás continuar recibiendo anuncios, por ejemplo,
       basados en el sitio web en particular que estás viendo (es decir,
       anuncios basados en el contexto). Además, si tus navegadores están
       configurados para rechazar las cookies cuando visitas las páginas
       de elección del consumidor de la DAA, DAAC o EDAA, es posible que
       no se lleve a cabo la inhabilitación.

     * Base legal. La base legal de Outbrain para el tratamiento de los
       datos personales de un Usuario reside en la base legal determinada
       para cada uno de nuestros Sitios asociados. Cada Sitio asociado se
       basará en el consentimiento o interés legítimo. Consulta la
       Política de privacidad de los Sitios asociados para obtener más
       información sobre su base legal. Si un socio se basa en el
       consentimiento, Outbrain no introducirá ninguna cookie si tu no has
       proporcionado el consentimiento en dicho Sitio asociado.

   Socios comerciales: te conviertes en Socio comercial cuando te
   registras (o envías un correo electrónico a Outbrain) en nombre de la
   compañía para la que trabajas para utilizar los Servicios Outbrain
   Amplify o Outbrain Engage. Ver más aquí.
   (a) Qué información recopilamos y por qué
   Puede que proporciones ciertos datos personales (como la dirección de
   correo electrónico) cuando te suscribas a los servicios de Amplify o
   Engage o alternativamente cuando te pongas en contacto o interactúes
   con nosotros. Si solicitas convertirte en Socio comercial, es posible
   que te solicitemos información adicional a través de formularios de
   solicitud de anunciantes, órdenes de inserción y otros formularios.
   Recopilamos automáticamente información acerca de las acciones de tu
   nombre de usuario en el panel de control de Outbrain. Por ejemplo, como
   un Socio comercial de Amplify, si cambias el coste por clic para una de
   tus campañas, el registro de auditoría de Outbrain tendrá un registro
   de todas esas acciones.
     * Recopilamos y tratamos los datos personales anteriores con el fin
       de cumplir nuestras obligaciones en virtud de nuestro acuerdo como
       Socio comercial (o posible Socio comercial) con usted, incluido
       para:

     * responder a tus preguntas y solicitudes;

     * proporcionarte acceso a ciertas funciones y características de
       nuestros servicios Amplify o Engage (por ejemplo, para proporcionar
       y mantener tu cuenta del panel de control);

     * verificar tu identidad;

     * informarte sobre tu cuenta, nuestros productos y promociones
       disponibles que puedan ser relevantes para tu uso del servicio
       Amplify o Engage.

   (b) Qué cookies y otras tecnologías similares utilizamos
   Consulta esta Tabla de cookies en el apartado «Socios comerciales» para
   obtener una lista detallada de las cookies (y sus correspondientes
   períodos de retención) que empleamos con los Socios comerciales.
   (c) Cómo podemos compartir información con cualquier persona
   Podemos revelar cierta información de los Socios comerciales a
   proveedores, contratistas u otros que ayuden a Outbrain a prestar los
   servicios (por ejemplo, procesamiento de tarjetas de crédito). Consulta
   también el apartado Intercambio de esta Política de privacidad.
   (d) Tus derechos
   Si como Socio comercial deseas verificar, corregir, actualizar o
   solicitar la desactivación de tu información, puedes ir al panel de
   control de Outbrain para editar tus preferencias de perfil o ponerte en
   contacto con nosotros en support@outbrain.com. Si estás recibiendo
   correos electrónicos de Outbrain, puedes «darte de baja» haciendo uso
   del enlace en el correo electrónico. Ten en cuenta que la cancelación
   de la suscripción no inhabilitará las notificaciones que sean críticas
   para proporcionar los servicios de Amplify o Engage (por ejemplo,
   facturas por correo electrónico).
   La base legal de Outbrain para tratar los datos personales de los
   Socios comerciales es el interés legítimo.
   3. Cómo protegemos la información, las transmisiones fuera del EEE, el
   intercambio y la retención

                                      +

   Seguridad
   Outbrain tiene un equipo de seguridad específico. Mantenemos un
   estricto control de los datos que recopilamos y los retenemos en bases
   de datos seguras y protegidas por cortafuegos con derechos de acceso
   estrictamente limitados y controlados, para garantizar su seguridad.
   Consulta nuestras normas de seguridad para obtener más información.
   Los socios comerciales tienen acceso a determinadas funciones
   protegidas por contraseña del servicio Amplify o Engage. Ellos son
   responsables de mantener la confidencialidad de la contraseña. Por
   favor, recuerda que, lamentablemente, la transmisión de información a
   través de Internet no es completamente segura. El «spoofing» o
   «phishing» son algunas de las estafas más comunes en Internet. Esto se
   produce cuando recibes un correo electrónico que parece proceder de una
   fuente legítima que te solicita datos personales. Ten en cuenta que no
   te enviaremos ningún correo electrónico solicitándote que verifiques la
   información de tu tarjeta de crédito, bancaria o cualquier otro dato
   personal. Si alguna vez recibes un correo electrónico que parece ser de
   nuestra parte solicitándote dicha información, no respondas a él y no
   haga clic en ninguno de los enlaces que aparecen en el correo
   electrónico. En su lugar, reenvíenos el correo electrónico a
   legal@outbrain.com, ya que investigaremos casos de posible fraude en
   Internet.
   Transferencias de datos fuera de la UE/EEE
   Cuando transferimos datos personales desde el Espacio Económico Europeo
   a otros países en los que las leyes aplicables no ofrecen el mismo
   nivel de protección de la privacidad de los datos que en el territorio
   europeo, adoptamos medidas para proporcionar un nivel adecuado de
   protección de los datos. En otras palabras, tus derechos y niveles de
   protección se mantienen con tus datos. Por ejemplo, utilizamos
   cláusulas contractuales aprobadas y otras medidas diseñadas para
   asegurar que los destinatarios de tus datos personales los protejan.
   Intercambio
   Además de la descripción de cómo podemos revelar tus datos personales
   en función de cada tipo de usuario, también podemos revelar datos
   personales de la siguiente manera:
     * Dentro de la familia de empresas controladas por Outbrain por
       razones internas, principalmente con fines comerciales y
       operativos.

     * Si pasamos por una transición de negocios, como una fusión,
       adquisición por otra compañía o venta de todos o parte de nuestros
       activos, es probable que tus datos personales se encuentren entre
       los activos transferidos.

     * Cuando la ley así lo requiera (por ejemplo, para cooperar con
       investigaciones de las fuerzas del orden u otros procedimientos
       legales).

     * Para responder a una verdadera emergencia.

   Además, combinamos tus datos personales con los de otros usuarios para
   compartir información de tendencias y agregar estadísticas de usuarios
   con terceros, siempre de forma agregada y anónima.
   Retención de datos
   El período de retención para cada una de las cookies que utiliza
   Outbrain (ya sea por su cuenta o en nuestro nombre por parte de
   terceros) se indica en la Tabla de cookies.
   Outbrain también mantiene una Política de Retención de Datos que
   detalla el período de retención de datos personales sobre la base de
   nuestro análisis sobre cuánto tiempo es necesario retener
   razonablemente los datos específicos para fines legales o comerciales.
   Cuando ya no necesitamos datos personales, los borraremos o
   destruiremos de forma segura. Los datos agregados, que no puedan
   identificar un dispositivo/navegador (o a una persona) y se utilicen
   con fines de información y análisis, se mantendrán durante el tiempo
   que sea necesario desde el punto de vista comercial.
   4. Niños

                                      +

   Ninguno de nuestros servicios está dirigido a niños menores de 16 años.
   No recopilamos de manera consciente datos personales de ninguna persona
   menor de 16 años de edad. Si en el momento de la recopilación
   determinamos que un Visitante del sitio, un Usuario o un Socio
   comercial es menor de 16 años, no utilizaremos ni mantendremos tus
   datos personales. Si tenemos constancia de que sin saberlo hemos
   recopilado datos personales de un menor de 16 años, haremos todos los
   esfuerzos razonables para eliminar dicha información de nuestros
   registros. ¡Si eres un niño, ve a jugar al patio, no uses ni
   interactúes con Outbrain!
   5. Ciudadanos del territorio europeo

                                      +

   En cumplimiento de la legislación europea en materia de privacidad, en
   particular el Reglamento General de Protección de Datos de la Unión
   Europea (RGPD), Outbrain proporciona derechos adicionales específicos a
   los ciudadanos del territorio europeo, tales como el derecho de acceso,
   rectificación, oposición, reclamación, supresión y bloqueo. En
   concreto:
     * El derecho a solicitar información sobre si nosotros tratamos tus
       datos personales y, en caso afirmativo, qué datos personales son
       tratados, y el derecho a exigir que los datos personales sean
       rectificados o modificados.
     * En determinadas circunstancias, el derecho a solicitar la supresión
       de los datos personales.
     * En determinadas circunstancias, el derecho a exigir que se
       restrinja el tratamiento de datos personales.
     * El derecho a retirar tu consentimiento para el tratamiento y uso de
       sus datos total o parcialmente en cualquier momento a través de una
       solicitud en el futuro.
     * El derecho a obtener tus datos personales en un formato común,
       estructurado y legible mecánicamente.
     * El derecho a ponerte en contacto con nuestro responsable de
       protección de datos si tienes alguna pregunta, comentario,
       reclamación o solicitud en relación con nuestra declaración sobre
       la protección de datos y el tratamiento de tus datos personales.
     * El derecho a presentar una reclamación ante la autoridad
       supervisora responsable si crees que el tratamiento de tus datos
       personales infringe la legislación.

   Envía un correo electrónico a privacyquestions@outbrain.com con
   cualquier pregunta sobre el ejercicio de cualquiera de los derechos
   anteriores.
   Además de lo anterior, hacemos referencia a ciertos derechos de los
   ciudadanos del territorio europeo a través de la presente Política de
   Privacidad. De conformidad con el RGPD, por ciudadanos del «territorio
   europeo» se entenderán los ciudadanos del Espacio Económico Europeo
   (EEE) y Suiza. A los efectos de la presente Política de privacidad, el
   término «territorio europeo» seguirá incluyendo al Reino Unido, incluso
   después de que el Reino Unido abandone el Espacio Económico Europeo
   tras el Brexit.
   6. Derechos de Privacidad de California

                                      +

   En virtud de los artículos 1798.83-1798.84 del Código Civil de
   California, los residentes de California tienen derecho a solicitarnos
   un aviso que describa las categorías de información personal que
   compartimos con terceros o filiales corporativas para los propósitos de
   marketing directo de dichos terceros o filiales corporativas. Ese aviso
   identificará las categorías de información compartida e incluirá una
   lista de los terceros y filiales con los que se compartió, junto con
   tus nombres y direcciones. Si eres residente de California y deseas una
   copia de este aviso, por favor envía una solicitud por escrito a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com o envíala a la siguiente dirección:
   Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, Nueva York, NY 10011.
   Por favor, espera 30 días para recibir una respuesta.
   7. Declaración de «no rastreo» (Do Not Track)

                                      +

   Algunos navegadores transmiten señales de «no rastreo» (DNT, por sus
   siglas en inglés) a webs. Debido a que no existe una idea común de cómo
   interpretar la señal DNT, Outbrain no altera, cambia ni responde
   actualmente a las peticiones o señales DNT de estos navegadores.
   Seguiremos supervisando la actividad del sector en esta área y
   volveremos a evaluar nuestras prácticas de DNT según sea necesario.
   Mientras tanto, puedes utilizar el resto de las herramientas que
   ofrecemos para controlar la recopilación y el uso de datos, incluida la
   posibilidad de inhabilitar las recomendaciones personalizadas en el
   apartado «Usuarios».
   8. Cómo puede cambiar esta Política de privacidad

                                      +

   Podemos cambiar esta Política de privacidad cada cierto tiempo.
   Colocaremos un aviso que podrás ver claramente como Visitante del Sitio
   o Socio comercial, pero no disponemos de ningún medio para avisar a los
   Usuarios de las actualizaciones. Deberás comprobar, periódicamente, si
   se ha actualizado la Política de privacidad. Siempre mostraremos la
   fecha de la última modificación de la Política de privacidad en la
   parte superior de la página para que puedas saber cuándo se revisó por
   última vez.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                      Dernière mise à jour : 23 mai 2018

   Outbrain s’engage à protéger vos données personnelles. Cette politique
   de confidentialité (la « Politique de confidentialité ») régit
   l’utilisation des données collectées par Outbrain, notamment les
   données personnelles, quelles qu’elles soient. Par données
   personnelles, nous entendons les informations qui vous concernent et
   permettent éventuellement de vous identifier. Nous utilisons vos
   données personnelles conformément aux lois en vigueur. Afin de garantir
   la conformité et de nous aligner sur les valeurs d’Outbrain en matière
   de confiance et de transparence, nous disposons d’une équipe de «
   privacy champions » chargée de mettre en œuvre en continu notre
   programme mondial de respect de la vie privée.

                                                        + DÉVELOPPER TOUT

   1. Qui sommes-nous, que faisons-nous, comment contacter Outbrain, notre
   DPO ou les autorités compétentes

                                      +

   Qui sommes-nous ?
   Outbrain fait référence à Outbrain Inc., une société du Delaware
   (États-Unis) dont le siège se trouve à New York, et à ses succursales
   affiliées (collectivement désignées par les termes « Outbrain », ou «
   nous », « notre », « nos »). Nous exerçons nos activités à partir de 12
   bureaux internationaux et travaillons en partenariat avec des éditeurs
   et des annonceurs dans le monde entier.
   Que faisons-nous ?
   La mission d’Outbrain est de proposer des recommandations intéressantes
   et pertinentes aux utilisateurs en fonction de leurs centres d’intérêt.
   Pour remplir cette mission, nous concluons des accords avec :
     * des éditeurs en ligne et des partenaires qui souhaitent recommander
       des contenus pertinents à leurs utilisateurs (il s’agit d’Outbrain
       Engage) ; et

     * des annonceurs qui souhaitent que les utilisateurs visualisent
       leurs contenus (il s’agit d’Outbrain Amplify).

   Comment nous contacter ?
   Les questions, commentaires et demandes concernant cette Politique de
   confidentialité sont les bienvenus. Ils doivent être adressés à
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou par courrier à Outbrain Inc., 39 West
   13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, USA, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Si Outbrain ne répond pas de manière satisfaisante à vos questions ou
   inquiétudes, vous pouvez également contacter, pour des conseils, une
   assistance ou des réclamations :
     * le DPO ou délégué à la protection des données externe d’Outbrain :
       ePrivacy GmbH, représenté par Christoph Bauer. ePrivacy GmbH peut
       être contacté directement à l’adresse suivante privacy@eprivacy.eu
       ; et/ou
     * l’Information Commissioner’s Officer, le service de supervision
       principal d’Outbrain pour les pays européens.

   Les organismes d’autorégulation
   Outbrain adhère aux principes d’autorégulation définis par la Digital
   Advertising Alliance (DAA) et l’European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Nous sommes membres de plein droit de la
   Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), une association dédiée à une
   collecte et une utilisation responsable des données à des fins de
   publicité numérique. Nous adhérons au code de bonne conduite de la NAI
   pour le Web et les appareils mobiles. Outbrain adhère également aux
   principes d’autorégulation de l’Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB)
   pour la publicité comportementale en ligne et à l’OBA Framework de
   l’IAB Europe.
   2. Types d’utilisateurs Outbrain (et gestion d'exclusion "opt-out")

                                      +

   La majeure partie de cette Politique de confidentialité est divisée en
   sections basées sur la manière dont vous interagissez avec Outbrain.
   Veuillez déterminer quel type d’utilisateur vous êtes. Pour chaque type
   d’utilisateur, nous détaillons quelles informations nous collectons et
   pourquoi, quels témoins de connexion ou « cookies » et autres
   technologies similaires nous utilisons, comment nous partageons ces
   informations, et vos droits.
   Visiteurs du site: Vous êtes un Visiteur du site quand vous consultez
   et interagissez avec nos sites et pages Web, nos fonctionnalités
   interactives, nos blogs et leurs contenus sur Outbrain.com (ou tout
   autre site dérivé comme Outbrain.co.uk ; Outbrain.fr ; outbrain.de
   etc.) et MyOutbrain.com (« Nos Sites »). Voir plus ici.
   (a) Quelles informations collectons-nous et pourquoi ?
   Nous souhaitons comprendre quels services sur nos Sites vous
   intéressent et vous rappeler les services que nous proposons quand vous
   n’êtes pas sur nos Sites. Pour ce faire, nous collectons auprès de vous
   les informations suivantes : (i) l’adresse IP; (ii) les données agent
   utilisateur : le type d’appareil (ex : iPhone), le type de navigateur
   (ex : Chrome), le système d’exploitation (ex : iOS) ; (iii) les pages
   visitées sur notre Site (ex : la page « À propos » d’Outbrain ») ; (iv)
   l’heure de visite (et le fuseau horaire correspondant) ; et (v) les URL
   correspondantes et autres informations normalement transmises dans les
   requêtes HTTP (par exemple ces informations nous indiquent comment vous
   êtes arrivé sur nos Sites).
   (b) Quels cookies et autres technologies similaires utilisons-nous ?
   Veuillez consulter la Table des cookies sous « Visiteurs du site » pour
   une liste détaillée des cookies (et leurs durées de conservation
   associées) que nous utilisons quand vous visitez nos Sites.
   (c) Comment sommes-nous susceptibles de partager les informations ?
     * Le partage des informations que nous obtenons sur vous sur nos
       Sites.

   De manière générale, nous ne partageons pas les données personnelles
   vous concernant avec des tiers à des fins de marketing ou de publicité.
   Toutefois, nous faisons appel à divers tiers (chacun d’entre eux étant
   listé dans la Table de cookies) pour nous aider dans nos démarches
   commerciales et publicitaires envers vous. Certains des cookies que
   nous utilisons sur nos Sites appartiennent ainsi à des tiers qui
   aideront Outbrain à vous proposer des services ou des publicités. Nous
   demandons à ces tiers et entreprises d’accepter de préserver la
   confidentialité de toutes les informations que nous partageons avec eux
   et de ne les utiliser que pour remplir leurs obligations envers nous.
   Pour ce faire, nous concluons des accords avec tous les tiers qui
   traitent les données personnelles en notre nom afin de garantir qu’ils
   le font en conformité avec nos instructions rigoureuses et toutes les
   lois de protection des données applicables. Si vous publiez un post sur
   notre blog, vos commentaires et informations seront disponibles
   publiquement. Veuillez contacter support@outbrain.com pour supprimer
   vos commentaires.
     * Utilisation de services de tiers sur nos Sites.

   Nos Sites contiennent des liens vers d’autres sites Web dont nous ne
   sommes ni propriétaires, ni opérateurs. Nous ne contrôlons, ne
   recommandons et ne cautionnons pas le contenu, les produits, les
   services, les politiques de confidentialité ou les pratiques de ces
   sites Web tiers. Vous noterez par exemple sur nos Sites la présence
   d’icônes que vous pouvez cliquer pour accéder à la page Facebook ou
   LinkedIn d’Outbrain. Si vous choisissez de cliquer sur ces liens, vous
   devez savoir que Facebook et LinkedIn peuvent déposer leurs propres
   cookies sur votre appareil et collecter indépendamment des données
   personnelles. Il est donc important que vous lisiez les politiques de
   confidentialité de Facebook et/ou de LinkedIn.
     * Veuillez aussi consulter la section Partage de la présente
       Politique de confidentialité.

   (d) Vos droits
   Les Conditions d’utilisation sur notre Site régissent l’utilisation de
   notre Site et s’appliquent également à vous. Vous pouvez cesser
   d’utiliser notre Site à tout moment. Dans ce cas, vous souhaiterez
   peut-être aussi supprimer tout cookie placé sur les appareils, quels
   qu’ils soient, utilisés pour accéder à notre Site. Si, en cours
   d’utilisation de nos Sites vous avez fourni une adresse e-mail, chaque
   e-mail que vous recevez de la part d’Outbrain comporte une option de
   désabonnement (« unsubscribe »).
   Pour les visiteurs provenant des pays Européens, Outbrain a installé
   sur ses sites une CMP - plateforme de gestion du consentement - opérée
   par One Trust, qui donne aux utilisateurs la possibilité de consentir,
   ou non, à la dépose de cookies et autres technologies de ciblage. En
   accédant à nos sites, vous verrez une bannière située en bas de page
   donnant des informations sur les cookies que nous utilisons. Vous
   pouvez cliquer sur cette bannière pour supprimer les cookies, à
   l’exception de ceux strictement nécessaires. Le fait de cliquer sur
   “Accept” dans la bannière, de poursuivre votre navigation ou de cliquer
   dans un lien sur nos sites est une indication de votre consentement.
   Utilisateurs: Vous êtes un Utilisateur si vous visitez la page d’un
   site ou une application d’un des partenaires d’Outbrain sur laquelle
   est installée le widget Outbrain (les « Sites de partenaires »). Si
   vous vous rendez par exemple sur https://news.sky.com/uk,
   www.spiegel.de ou www.cnn.com, le widget Outbrain est installé sur ces
   sites Web. Les mentions référençant Outbrain (ex : « Recommandé par
   Outbrain », « by Outbrain » à côté des recommandations) vous indiquent
   la présence d’un widget Outbrain. Si vous cliquez sur le lien de la
   référence Outbrain, vous visualiserez une notification détaillée qui
   vous permettra de vous rendre sur le Portail des Centres d’Intérêt
   Outbrain, qui vous donne une vision globale des types de catégories de
   données que nous pouvons utiliser pour faire les recommandations. Ce
   portail vous donne également la possibilité d’opter pour une demande
   d’exclusion des recommandations personnalisées (« opt-out »). Voir plus
   ici.
   Exemple de widget Outbrain
   [SJ4v1w7y7.png]
   (a) Quelles informations collectons-nous et pourquoi ?
   Nous utilisons les UUID, l’adresse IP et autres informations d’usage
   afin de proposer des recommandations intéressantes aux utilisateurs.
   Les recommandations d’Outbrain peuvent être payées par un annonceur
   pour vous mettre en relation avec un nouveau site Web. Elles peuvent
   également être organiques avec un lien vers une autre page du site Web
   du même éditeur.
     * UUID.

   Quand vous consultez un Site de Partenaire (ex : CNN.com) en tant
   qu’Utilisateur pour la première fois, Outbrain dépose un cookie sur
   votre appareil afin de générer un UUID (identifiant utilisateur
   unique). Nous cataloguons et analysons le contenu que vous parcourez
   sur les Sites de Partenaires. Nos recommandations se basent sur : (i)
   l’historique de navigation ; (ii) les profils de consommation
   similaires d’autres Utilisateurs ; (ii) les recommandations
   généralement populaires auprès des utilisateurs d’Outbrain ; (iv)
   quelques données aléatoires, et (v) les exigences de ciblage
   éventuellement fournies ou demandées par nos clients Amplify. À titre
   d’exemple, Outbrain peut savoir que l’UUID 123 (cela pourrait être vous
   sur votre iPhone X lisant le Guardian en utilisant Chrome comme
   navigateur) aime lire des articles sur les voyages et que les personnes
   qui aiment lire ce type d’article aiment aussi les contenus sur la
   nourriture exotique.
   L’UUID est une séquence de chiffres et/ou de lettres. Cet UUID est
   associé à votre appareil et varie en fonction du navigateur que vous
   utilisez. Autrement dit, Outbrain enregistre un UUID différent selon le
   navigateur et/ou appareil que vous utilisez pour accéder aux Sites de
   Partenaires. Ceci signifie que vous aurez par exemple un UUID quand
   vous consultez un Site de Partenaire depuis votre téléphone portable
   avec le navigateur Safari et un autre UUID pour la consultation d’un
   Site de Partenaire depuis votre iPad avec le navigateur Safari.
   Outbrain va combiner et consolider l’UUID depuis un appareil mobile
   (portatif ou tablette) et un navigateur qui accède ensuite à
   l’application (ou vice versa) à partir du même appareil.
   L’affectation d’un UUID permet à Outbrain d’associer les pages vues et
   les clics sur les recommandations d’Outbrain à partir de cet UUID, avec
   pour objectif de vous proposer des recommandations intéressantes et
   pertinentes en fonction de vos centres d’intérêt.
     * Adresse IP et autres informations d’usage.

   Nous recueillons l’UUID comme expliqué précédemment, nous collectons
   également les informations suivantes : (i) l’adresse IP (puis rendus
   anonymes selon les normes de l'industrie); ; (ii) les données agent
   utilisateur : le type d’appareil (ex : iPhone) ; le type de navigateur
   (ex : Chrome), le système d’exploitation (ex : iOS) ; (iii) les pages
   visitées ; (iv) l’heure de visite ; et (v) les URL correspondantes et
   autres informations normalement transmises dans les requêtes HTTP.
   Les informations statistiques ci-dessus nous donnent des informations
   sur le nombre d’Utilisateurs consultant une page spécifique sur les
   Sites de Partenaires sur lesquels le widget Outbrain est installé, le
   temps que chaque Utilisateur a passé sur cette page, le type de contenu
   sur lequel ils ont cliqué et la manière générale dont ils ont interagi
   avec cette page. Ces informations ne constituent des informations
   personnelles que quand elles sont associées à un UUID.
   (b) Quels cookies et autres technologies similaires utilisons-nous ?
   Veuillez consulter la Table des cookies sous « Utilisateurs » pour une
   liste détaillée des cookies propriétaires que nous utilisons quand vous
   interagissez avec des Sites de Partenaires où la technologie Outbrain
   est mise en œuvre.
   Si vous cliquez sur le lien d’une de nos recommandations, l’annonceur
   Amplify qui sponsorise la recommandation est susceptible de placer des
   cookies sur votre appareil lors de la redirection avant d’arriver sur
   la page de destination ou en atteignant la page de destination. Dans de
   tels cas, vous serez soumis à la politique de confidentialité de
   l’annonceur.
   En complément du widget visible d’Outbrain sur nos Sites de
   Partenaires, certains annonceurs Outbrain peuvent installer le pixel
   Outbrain sur leurs sites Web. Le pixel Outbrain détermine si
   l’utilisateur qui atteint la page où le pixel est installé a un UUID
   Outbrain. S’il existe un UUID associé avec un utilisateur final,
   Outbrain permet aux annonceurs de recibler ces UUID et/ou leur donne le
   nombre total d’UUID ayant atteint cette page. S’il n’existe pas d’UUID
   Outbrain sur la page, le pixel Outbrain ne collecte aucune information
   sur l’utilisateur.
   Nous encourageons les annonceurs à divulguer l’utilisation du pixel
   Outbrain sur leurs propres sites Web. Outbrain ne combine aucune
   information pixel avec le profil d’un UUID.
   Les indicateurs sur la visualisation des pages ou les clics reliés à un
   UUID en particulier sont conservés pour une durée de 13 mois. Par
   exemple, si l’UUID 123 lit un article le 31 décembre 2017, cet article
   ne fera plus partie du profil de l’UUID 123 le 1 ^er février 2018.
   (c) Comment sommes-nous susceptibles de partager les informations ?
   Outbrain ne partage pas de profils d’Utilisateurs avec des tiers, quels
   qu’ils soient. Cependant, nous sommes susceptibles de partager l’UUID
   avec certains partenaires à des fins de synchronisation des cookies ou
   en raison d’exigences techniques. Veuillez également consulter la
   section Partage de la présente Politique de confidentialité.
   (d) Vos droits
   Demande d’exclusion (« opt-out ») d’Outbrain. Vous pouvez demander
   votre exclusion des recommandations personnalisées à tout moment.
   Veuillez consulter également le Profil d’intérêts d’Outbrain pour une
   vue générale des données qu’Outbrain connaît à votre sujet et peut
   utiliser pour faire ses recommandations. Le Profil d’intérêts vous
   donne également la possibilité d’ opter pour une exclusion des
   recommandations personnalisées (vous pouvez également demander une
   exclusion (“opt-out”) en cliquant ici). Veuillez noter que cette
   demande d’exclusion pour les navigateurs se fait par le Profil
   d’intérêts d’Outbrain, mais qu’elle se fait via les paramètres de votre
   appareil pour les applications (vous trouverez des exemples d’étapes à
   suivre dans le Profil d’intérêts).
   REMARQUE IMPORTANTE – même si vous avez opté pour une exclusion
   d’Outbrain,
     * vous continuerez à voir des recommandations Outbrain. Le fait de
       demander votre exclusion du suivi personnalisé d’Outbrain ne
       signifie pas que vous cesserez de recevoir des recommandations
       d’Outbrain. Cela signifie que les recommandations d’Outbrain ne
       seront pas personnalisées. Les recommandations continueront à
       utiliser les informations sur la page que vous êtes en train de
       parcourir (c.-à-d. les informations contextuelles) pour vous
       proposer des recommandations sur cette page.

     * L’exclusion de recommandations personnalisées est fondée sur les
       cookies et spécifique à un appareil/navigateur. Si vous naviguez
       sur Internet depuis plusieurs appareils et/ou navigateurs, vous
       devrez demander l’exclusion pour chaque appareil et/ou navigateur
       pour garantir que nous empêchons un suivi de personnalisation sur
       tous. Pour la même raison, si vous achetez un nouvel appareil,
       changez de navigateurs ou supprimez (ou effacez) le cookie
       d’exclusion, vous devrez procéder de nouveau à votre demande
       d’exclusion. Demander l’exclusion du suivi de personnalisation
       n’est pas la même chose que bloquer les cookies.

     * Pour garantir la suppression du profil lié à votre UUID, ne
       procédez pas à l’opération inverse (demande d’inclusion ou « opt-in
       » d’Outbrain) pendant au moins 21 jours. Votre demande d’exclusion
       des recommandations personnalisées d’Outbrain prend effet
       immédiatement. Cependant, si votre navigateur autorise un stockage
       local, et si vous demandez votre inclusion des recommandations
       personnalisées dans les 21 jours suivant votre demande d’exclusion,
       il est possible que votre profil antérieur soit reconnecté à votre
       UUID. Si vous ne procédez pas à une nouvelle demande d’inclusion
       dans les 21 jours, votre profil sera supprimé et ne pourra pas être
       récupéré.

     * Comme pour la plupart des cookies opt-out, le processus d’opt-out
       Outbrain sur navigateur s'appuie sur un cookie. Le cookie opt-out
       est destiné à être persistant afin d'honorer les préférences de
       l'utilisateur. Cependant, la fonction "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention" pour IPhone de l'iOS11 peut avoir un impact sur la
       persistance des cookies sur les sites Web qui affichent une fenêtre
       de 24 heures. Nous vous suggérons d'utiliser un autre navigateur ou
       d'envisager de bloquer tous les cookies d'une tierce partie du
       navigateur afin que vous soyez « désactivés » sans avoir besoin de
       vous fier à la méthode d'exclusion d’autres entreprises.

     * Options complémentaires d’exclusion. Vous pouvez également demander
       votre exclusion de la réception de publicités personnalisées de
       notre part ou de celle d’autres sociétés publicitaires à l’aide
       d’outils fournis par l’industrie comme la NAI ou des pages basées
       sur la DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices ; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices, et/ou EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
       En vous rendant sur les pages dédiées à la gestion des préférences
       consommateur de la NAI, la DAA, la DACC (Alliance de la publicité
       numérique du Canada) ou de l’EDAA, vous pourrez refuser tout ou
       partie des services de leurs membres. Comme dans le cas de
       l’exclusion pour Outbrain, ces retraits ne signifient pas que vous
       ne recevrez plus aucune publicité, mais les publicités que vous
       recevrez ne seront plus personnalisées. Vous êtes susceptible de
       continuer à recevoir des publicités, par exemple basées sur le site
       Web en particulier que vous êtes en train de consulter (c.-à-d. des
       publicités liées au contexte). Par ailleurs, si vos navigateurs
       sont configurés pour rejeter les cookies quand vous visitez les
       pages du consommateur de la DAA, de la DAAC ou de l’EDAA, votre
       exclusion (ou retrait) peut ne pas être effective.

     * Base juridique. La base juridique d’Outbrain pour le traitement des
       données personnelles d’un Utilisateur se fonde sur la base
       juridique déterminée par chacun des Sites de Partenaires. Chaque
       Site de Partenaire s’appuiera sur le consentement ou l’intérêt
       légitime. Veuillez consulter la politique de confidentialité
       applicable des Sites de Partenaires pour plus d’informations sur
       leurs bases juridiques. Si un Partenaire s’appuie sur le
       consentement, Outbrain ne déposera pas de cookie sur votre appareil
       si vous n’avez pas donné votre consentement sur le Site de
       Partenaire concerné.

   Partenaires commerciaux: Vous êtes un Partenaire commercial si vous
   vous inscrivez (ou échangez des e-mails avec Outbrain) au nom de la
   société dans laquelle vous travaillez pour l’utilisation des services
   Outbrain Amplify ou Outbrain Engage. Voir plus ici.
   (a) Quelles informations collectons-nous et pourquoi ?
   Vous êtes susceptible de fournir certaines données personnelles (par
   exemple une adresse e-mail) quand vous signez pour des services Amplify
   ou Engage, ou communiquez ou interagissez avec nous d’une autre
   manière. Si vous demandez à devenir Partenaire, nous sommes
   susceptibles de vous demander des informations complémentaires sous
   forme de formulaires de candidature annonceur, d’ordres d’insertion ou
   autres. Nous collectons automatiquement les informations sur vos
   actions liées à votre nom d’utilisateur dans le tableau de bord
   Outbrain. Par exemple, si vous changez, en tant que Partenaire Amplify,
   le coût-par-clic d’une de vos campagnes, la piste d’audit d’Outbrain
   gardera un enregistrement de toutes ces actions.
   Nous collectons et traitons les données personnelles ci-dessus afin de
   remplir nos obligations au titre de notre accord avec un Partenaire (ou
   Partenaire potentiel), notamment pour :
     * Répondre à vos questions et demandes.

     * Donner accès à certaines fonctions et fonctionnalités de nos
       services Amplify et Engage (par exemple pour fournir et tenir à
       jour le compte de votre tableau de bord).

     * Vérifier votre identité.

     * Communiquer avec vous sur votre compte, nos produits et les
       promotions disponibles compte tenu de votre utilisation du service
       Amplify ou Engage.

   (b) Quels cookies et autres technologies similaires utilisons-nous ?
   Veuillez consulter la Table des cookies sous « Partenaires commerciaux
   » pour une liste détaillée des cookies (et de leurs périodes de
   conservation associées) que nous utilisons avec les Partenaires.
   (c) Comment sommes-nous susceptibles de partager les informations ?
   Nous sommes susceptibles de divulguer certaines informations de
   Partenaires aux prestataires, sous-traitants ou autres, contribuant à
   la prestation des services Outbrain (ex : traitement des cartes de
   crédit). Veuillez aussi consulter la section Partage de la présente
   Politique de confidentialité.
   (d) Vos droits
   Si, en tant que Partenaire, vous souhaitez vérifier, corriger, mettre à
   jour ou demander la désactivation de vos informations, rendez-vous sur
   le tableau de bord Outbrain pour modifier vos préférences de profil ou
   contactez-nous à l’adresse support@outbrain.com. Si vous recevez des
   e-mails Outbrain, vous pouvez vous « désabonner » en utilisant le lien
   présent dans chaque e-mail. Veuillez noter que le désabonnement ne vous
   exclura pas de recevoir des notifications considérées comme critiques
   dans la fourniture de services Amplify ou Engage (ex : factures par
   e-mail).
   La base juridique du traitement des données personnelles de nos
   Partenaires commerciaux est l’intérêt légitime.
   3. Comment sécurisons-nous les informations ; les transferts en dehors
   de l’EEE ; le partage et les durées de conservation

                                      +

   Sécurité
   Outbrain dispose d’une équipe de sécurité dédiée. Nous mettons en œuvre
   des contrôles stricts sur les données que nous collectons, en les
   conservant dans des bases de données sécurisées et protégées par des
   pare-feu avec des droits d’accès contrôlés et limités afin de garantir
   leur sécurité. Veuillez consulter nos normes de sécurité pour de plus
   amples informations.
   Les Partenaires commerciaux ont un accès protégé par mot de passe à
   certaines fonctionnalités du service Amplify ou Engage. Ils ont la
   responsabilité de préserver la confidentialité de ce mot de passe. Il
   est néanmoins nécessaire de rappeler que la transmission d’informations
   par Internet n’est malheureusement pas complètement sécurisée. Une des
   fraudes classiques sur Internet est connue sous le nom d’usurpation
   d’identité électronique (« spoofing ») ou hameçonnage (« phishing »).
   Ceci se produit quand vous recevez un e-mail d’une source apparemment
   légitime vous demandant de lui fournir des données personnelles. Sachez
   que nous ne vous enverrons aucun e-mail vous demandant de vérifier un
   numéro de carte de crédit, des informations bancaires ou toutes autres
   données personnelles. S’il vous arrivait de recevoir un e-mail
   apparemment de notre part et vous demandant de nous fournir de telles
   informations, n’y répondez pas et ne cliquez sur aucun lien
   apparaissant dans ce message électronique. Veuillez plutôt nous
   transférer l’e-mail à l’adresse legal@outbrain.com, et nous mènerons
   des enquêtes sur d’éventuelles fraudes sur Internet.
   Transferts des données en dehors de l’UE/EEE
   Lorsque nous transférons des données personnelles de l’Espace
   économique européen vers d’autres pays dans lesquels les lois
   applicables n’offrent pas le même niveau de protection de
   confidentialité des données que les pays européens, nous prenons des
   mesures pour fournir un niveau approprié de protection de la
   confidentialité des données. En d’autres termes, vos droits et
   protections perdurent avec vos données. Nous utilisons par exemple des
   clauses contractuelles approuvées et d’autres mesures conçues pour
   garantir que les destinataires de vos données personnelles les
   protègent.
   Partage
   En complément de la description de la manière dont nous sommes
   susceptibles de divulguer vos données personnelles pour chaque type
   d’utilisateur, nous pouvons également divulguer les données
   personnelles comme suit :
     * Au sein de la famille des sociétés contrôlées par Outbrain pour des
       raisons internes, particulièrement pour des objectifs liés aux
       activités et au fonctionnement de l’entreprise ;

     * Si nous faisons face à une évolution de notre entreprise, comme une
       fusion, l’acquisition d’une autre société, ou la vente de tout ou
       partie de nos actifs, vos données personnelles sont susceptibles de
       faire partie des actifs transférés ;

     * En cas d’exigences légales le demandant (par exemple pour coopérer
       dans le cadre d’investigations sur la mise en application de la
       législation ou autres procédures légales) ; et/ou

     * Pour répondre à une urgence qualifiée.

   Par ailleurs, nous combinons vos données personnelles avec celles
   d’autres utilisateurs afin de partager des informations sur les
   tendances et agréger des statistiques d’utilisation avec des tiers,
   toujours sous forme agrégée et anonyme.
   Conservation des données
   La période de conservation pour chacun des cookies qu’Outbrain utilise
   (les siens propres ou au nom de tiers) est définie dans la Table des
   cookies.
   Outbrain tient également à jour une Politique de conservation des
   données qui détaille la période de conservation pour les données
   personnelles sur la base de notre analyse de la durée raisonnable de
   conservation nécessaire de données particulières pour des raisons
   légales ou opérationnelles. Quand nous n’avons plus besoin des données
   personnelles, nous les effaçons ou les supprimons de manière sécurisée.
   Les données agrégées, qui ne permettent pas d’identifier un
   appareil/navigateur (ou un individu) et sont utilisées pour des
   objectifs de reporting et d’analyse, sont conservées aussi longtemps
   que commercialement nécessaire.
   4. Enfants

                                      +

   Aucun de nos services n’est destiné à des enfants de moins de 16 ans.
   Nous ne recueillons pas sciemment de données personnelles auprès
   d’enfants âgés de moins de 16 ans. Si nous réalisons en cours de
   collecte qu’un Visiteur du site, un Utilisateur ou un Partenaire
   commercial a moins de 16 ans, nous n’utiliserons ni ne conserverons ses
   données personnelles. Si nous réalisons que nous avons involontairement
   collecté des données personnelles auprès d’un enfant de moins de 16
   ans, nous prendrons alors les mesures raisonnables pour supprimer ces
   informations de nos registres.
   5. Citoyens européens

                                      +

   Conformément aux lois européennes sur le respect de la vie privée, en
   particulier le Règlement général sur la protection des données (RGPD),
   Outbrain octroie des droits particuliers complémentaires aux citoyens
   des pays européens, comme le droit d’accès aux données, le droit de
   rectification, le droit d’opposition, le droit de porter réclamation,
   le droit à l’effacement et le droit de blocage. Plus spécifiquement :
     * Le droit de demander des informations sur l’utilisation ou non que
       nous faisons de données personnelles, et si oui, lesquelles, et le
       droit de demander la rectification ou la modification de ces
       données personnelles.
     * Dans certaines conditions, le droit de demander la suppression de
       données personnelles.
     * Dans certaines conditions, le droit de demander la limitation du
       traitement des données personnelles.
     * Le droit de retirer votre consentement à l’utilisation et au
       traitement de vos données, intégralement ou partiellement, à tout
       moment, avec effet futur.
     * Le droit d’obtenir vos données personnelles dans un format
       compréhensible, structuré et lisible.
     * La possibilité de contacter le délégué à la protection des données
       (« DPO ») pour toute question, commentaire, réclamation ou demande
       en lien avec notre déclaration sur la protection des données et le
       traitement de vos données personnelles.
     * Le droit de vous plaindre auprès de l’autorité de contrôle si vous
       êtes persuadé que le traitement de vos données personnelles
       constitue une violation de la législation.

   En complément des droits ci-dessus, nous référençons certains droits
   pour les citoyens des pays européens dans cette Politique de
   confidentialité. Conformément au RGPD, nous entendons par citoyens des
   « pays européens » les citoyens de l’Espace économique européen (EEE)
   et de la Suisse. Aux fins de cette Politique de confidentialité, le
   terme « pays européens » continuera d’inclure le Royaume-Uni, même
   après son départ de l’Espace économique européen suite au Brexit.
   Merci d’envoyer un mail à privacyquestions@outbrain.com pour toutes
   questions relatives à l’exercice des droits mentionnés ci-dessus.
   6. Droits au respect de la vie privée en Californie

                                      +

   Conformément au Code civil de Californie, articles 1798.83-1798.84, les
   résidents californiens ont le droit de nous demander une note décrivant
   les catégories d’informations personnelles que nous partageons avec des
   tiers et sociétés affiliées à des fins de marketing direct desdits
   tiers ou sociétés. Cette note indiquera les catégories d’informations
   partagées et inclura la liste des tiers et sociétés affiliées avec
   lesquels nous les partageons, avec leur nom et adresse. Si vous résidez
   en Californie et souhaitez une copie de cette note, veuillez en faire
   la demande par écrit à PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou l’envoyer à
   l’adresse suivante : Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New
   York, NY 10011, USA. Veuillez nous accorder 30 jours pour vous
   répondre.
   7. Dispositions « Do Not Track » (non-traçage)

                                      +

   Certains navigateurs transmettent des signaux refusant le traçage de
   données (« do not track ») aux sites Web. Outbrain ne procède
   actuellement à aucune altération, modification ou réponse aux demandes
   ou signaux de non-traçage de ces navigateurs car il n’existe pas de
   compréhension commune sur la manière d’interpréter les signaux de
   non-traçage. Nous continuerons de suivre l’activité du secteur dans ce
   domaine et réévaluerons nos pratiques de non-traçage si nécessaire. En
   attendant, vous pouvez utiliser la gamme d’autres outils que nous vous
   proposons pour contrôler la collecte et l’utilisation des données,
   notamment la possibilité de demander l’exclusion de la réception de
   recommandations personnalisées (« opt-out ») dans la section
   Utilisateurs.
   8. Les modifications qui pourraient être apportées à cette Politique de
   confidentialité

                                      +

   Nous sommes susceptibles de modifier cette Politique de confidentialité
   de manière ponctuelle. Nous afficherons clairement une notification que
   vous pourrez voir en tant que Visiteur du site ou Partenaire
   commercial, mais nous n’avons pas de moyen d’informer les Utilisateurs
   d’une mise à jour. Nous vous conseillons de régulièrement vérifier ici
   si la Politique de confidentialité a été mise à jour. Nous indiquerons
   toujours la date de dernière modification de la Politique de
   confidentialité en haut de la page afin que vous puissiez savoir quand
   elle a été révisée pour la dernière fois.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                      Ultimo aggiornamento: 23 maggio 2018

   Outbrain si impegna a proteggere i tuoi dati personali. La presente
   politica sulla privacy (“Politica sulla privacy ”) disciplina
   l'utilizzo da parte di Outbrain dei dati raccolti da noi, ivi inclusi
   tutti i dati personali. I dati personali sono informazioni che si
   riferiscono a te e possono identificarti come individuo. Utilizziamo i
   tuoi dati personali in linea con tutte le leggi applicabili. Al fine di
   garantire il rispetto e l'allineamento con i valori di Outbrain in
   materia di fiducia e trasparenza, disponiamo di team di esperti di
   privacy responsabili dell'implementazione continua del nostro programma
   di privacy globale.

                                                           + ESPANDI TUTTO

   1. Chi siamo, Cosa facciamo, Come contattare Outbrain, il nostro RPD o
   le autorità competenti

                                      +

   Chi siamo:
   Outbrain indica Outbrain Inc., un'azienda del Delaware (USA) con sede a
   New York; e le sue partecipate (collettivamente, “Outbrain,” o "noi",
   "ci", "nostro"). Operiamo da 12 uffici a livello globale e collaboriamo
   con editori e operatori di mercato in tutto il mondo.
   Cosa facciamo:
   La mission di Outbrain consiste nel fornire ai suoi utenti contenuti
   interessanti basati sui loro interessi. Per realizzare la nostra
   mission stipuliamo accordi con:
     * editori e partner online che desiderano raccomandare contenuti
       pertinenti ai loro lettori (si tratta del servizio Outbrain
       Engage); e

     * inserzionisti che desiderano che i lettori visualizzino i loro
       contenuti (si tratta del servizio Outbrain Amplify).

   Come contattarci
   Esaminiamo regolarmente il nostro rispetto della presente politica
   sulla privacy. Domande, commenti e richieste riguardanti la presente
   politica sulla privacy sono apprezzati e vanno indirizzati a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oppure all'indirizzo postale: Outbrain
   Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Qualora Outbrain non risponda in maniera soddisfacente alle tue domande
   o preoccupazioni, puoi altresì contattare i seguenti riferimenti per
   informazioni, supporto o reclami:
     * Responsabile esterno della protezione dei dati di Outbrain ("RPD"):
       ePrivacy GmbH, rappresentata dal Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. È
       possibile contattare direttamente ePrivacy GmbH all'indirizzo:
       privacy@eprivacy.eu; e/o
     * l'Information Commissioner’s Officer, che è la principale autorità
       di controllo su Outbrain all'interno dei Territori europei.

   Organismi di autoregolamentazione
   Outbrain aderisce ai principi di autoregolamentazione stabiliti da
   Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) e da European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Siamo soci in regola della Network
   Advertising Initiative (NAI), un'associazione dedicata alla raccolta
   responsabile di dati e al loro utilizzo per la pubblicità digitale.
   Aderiamo al Codice di condotta NAI per il settore Web e Mobile.
   Outbrain aderisce altresì ai principi di autoregolamentazione
   dell'Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) per la pubblicità
   comportamentale online e al framework di IAB Europa per la pubblicità
   comportamentale online.
   2. Tipi di utente Outbrain (compresa la gestione delle opzioni di Opt
   Out)

                                      +

   Gran parte della presente politica sulla privacy è suddivisa in sezioni
   in base al modo in cui è possibile interagire con Outbrain. Ti
   preghiamo di stabilire quale tipo di utente sei, in quanto, per ogni
   tipo di utente abbiamo spiegato quali informazioni raccogliamo e
   perché, quali cookie e altre tecnologie analoghe utilizziamo, come
   condividiamo tali informazioni e i tuoi diritti.
   Visitatori del sito: Sei un visitatore del sito quando visiti e
   interagisci con i nostri siti web, le nostre pagine web, le funzioni
   interattive, i blog e i loro rispettivi contenuti disponibili
   all'indirizzo Outbrain.com (o qualsiasi sua derivazione, come
   Outbrain.co.uk; Outbrain.fr; outbrain.de, ecc.) e MyOutbrain.com (“I
   nostri siti“). Vedi di più qui.
   (a) Quali informazioni raccogliamo e perché
   Desideriamo capire quali servizi sui nostri siti ti interessino e
   desideriamo ricordarti i servizi che offriamo quando non sei sui nostri
   siti. Per fare questo, raccogliamo le seguenti informazioni su di te:
   (i) indirizzo IP; (ii) dati dell'agente utente: tipo di dispositivo (ad
   es. iPhone), tipo di browser (ad es. Chrome), sistema operativo (ad es.
   iOS); (iii) le pagine visitate sul nostro sito (ad es. la pagina "Chi
   siamo" di Outbrain); (iv) l'orario della visita (e il fuso orario
   corrispondente); nonché (v) le URL di riferimento e altre informazioni
   normalmente trasmesse nelle richieste HTTP (ad esempio, queste
   informazioni ci dicono come sei arrivato sui nostri siti).
   (b) Quali cookie e altre tecnologie simili utilizziamo
   Ti rimandiamo a questa Tabella dei cookie alla sezione "Visitatori del
   sito" per un elenco dettagliato dei cookie (e dei relativi periodi di
   conservazione) che utilizziamo quando visiti i nostri siti.
   (c) Come possiamo condividere le informazioni
     * Condivisione delle informazioni che acquisiamo su di te sui nostri
       siti.

   In generale, non condividiamo i tuoi dati personali con terzi per
   finalità di pubblicità o marketing di terzi. Tuttavia, ricorriamo a
   vari terzi (ciascuno elencato nella Tabella dei cookie) affinché ci
   aiutino a svolgere attività di commercializzazione o pubblicità nei
   tuoi confronti. Ad esempio, alcuni dei cookie che utilizziamo sui
   nostri siti appartengono a terzi che aiuteranno Outbrain a svolgere
   attività di commercializzazione o pubblicità nei tuoi confronti.
   Richiediamo a tali parti e società terze di acconsentire a mantenere
   riservate tutte le informazioni condivise con loro e a utilizzare tali
   informazioni esclusivamente per adempiere ai loro obblighi nei nostri
   confronti. Facciamo ciò stipulando accordi con tutti i terzi che
   trattano dati personali per nostro conto in maniera da garantire che
   trattino i tuoi dati personali in conformità con le nostre severe
   istruzioni e tutte le leggi applicabili in materia di protezione dei
   dati. Se pubblichi un post sul nostro blog, i tuoi commenti e le tue
   informazioni saranno disponibili al pubblico. Contatta
   support@outbrain.com per rimuovere il tuo commento.
     * Utilizzo di servizi di terzi sui nostri siti.

   I nostri siti contengono collegamenti ad altri siti web che non sono di
   nostra proprietà o gestiti da noi. Non controlliamo, raccomandiamo o
   approviamo il contenuto, i prodotti, i servizi, le politiche sulla
   privacy o le pratiche di tali siti web di terzi. Ad esempio, sui nostri
   siti noterai icone cliccabili che ti condurranno alla pagina Facebook
   di Outbrain o alla pagina LinkedIn di Outbrain. Se scegli di fare click
   su tali collegamenti, devi sapere che Facebook e LinkedIn potrebbero
   inviare i propri cookie al tuo dispositivo e potrebbero raccogliere
   dati personali in maniera indipendente. Di conseguenza è importante che
   tu legga le politiche sulla privacy di Facebook e/o LinkedIn.
     * Consulta anche la sezione Condivisione della presente politica
       sulla privacy.

   (d) I tuoi diritti
   Le Condizioni d'uso presenti sul nostro sito disciplinano l'uso del
   nostro sito e si applicano anche a te. Puoi smettere di usare il nostro
   sito in qualsiasi momento. Se lo fai, puoi altresì desiderare rimuovere
   tutti i cookie che abbiamo inserito su qualsiasi dispositivo utilizzato
   per accedere al nostro sito. Se durante l'utilizzo dei nostri siti hai
   fornito il tuo indirizzo e-mail, qualsiasi e-mail che ricevi da
   Outbrain include un'opzione di "annullamento dell'iscrizione"
   (unsubscribe).
   Per gli utenti dei Territori europei, Outbrain ha implementato una
   piattaforma di gestione del consenso (gestita da One Trust ) sui nostri
   siti che offre ai visitatori l'opportunità di acconsentire, o meno, a
   cookie e tecnologie di tracciamento simili sui nostri siti. Accedendo
   ai nostri siti, vedrai un banner nella parte inferiore della pagina con
   informazioni sui cookie che utilizziamo. È possibile fare click sul
   banner per rifiutare tutti i cookie che non sono strettamente
   necessari. Premendo "accetta" sul banner o scorrendo / facendo click
   sui nostri siti è un'indicazione della tua accettazione. Di
   conseguenza, la base legale di Outbrain per il trattamento dei dati
   personali sui nostri siti è il consenso. Puoi ritirare il tuo consenso
   in qualsiasi momento cliccando qui.
   Utenti: Sei un utente se visiti una pagina di un sito web o di
   un'applicazione di uno dei partner di Outbrain nelle quali è installato
   il widget Outbrain (“Siti partner”). Ad esempio, se visiti
   https://news.sky.com/uk, www.corriere.it il widget Outbrain è
   implementato su tali siti web. Sai che stai interagendo con un widget
   Outbrain quando vedi del testo che fa riferimento a Outbrain (ad
   esempio "Recommended by Outbrain", "by Outbrain" accanto ai contenuti).
   Se fai click sul riferimento contenente il collegamento ipertestuale a
   Outbrain, visualizzerai una informativa dettagliata che ti consentirà
   di raggiungere il Profilo di interesse di Outbrain, che fornisce una
   visualizzazione generale dei tipi di categorie di dati di Outbrain che
   quest'ultima può utilizzare per formulare le sue raccomandazioni.
   Inoltre, ti dà la possibilità di rinunciare a ricevere contenuti
   personalizzati. Vedi di più qui.
   Esempio di un widget Outbrain
   [S1q4BIXJQ.png]
   (a) Quali informazioni raccogliamo e perché
   Usiamo UUID, indirizzo IP e altre informazioni di utilizzo in maniera
   da poter offrire contenuti interessanti. Le raccomandazioni di Outbrain
   possono essere pagate da un inserzionista che ti collega a un nuovo
   sito web oppure possono essere organiche, nel qual caso il collegamento
   rinvia a un'altra pagina sullo stesso sito web dell'editore.
     * UUID.

   Quando in veste di Utente visiti per la prima volta un Sito partner (ad
   esempio, CNN.com), Outbrain deposita un cookie sul dispositivo al fine
   di generare un UUID (un identificativo utente univoco). Cataloghiamo e
   analizziamo i contenuti che consumi attraverso i Siti partner. Le
   nostre raccomandazioni si basano su: (i) cronologia di navigazione;
   (ii) modelli di navigazione simili di altri Utenti; (ii)
   raccomandazioni di contenuto che sono in genere popolari presso il
   pubblico di Outbrain in quel dato momento; (iv) un pizzico di casualità
   e (v) requisiti di targeting che possono essere forniti o richiesti dai
   nostri clienti Amplify. Ad esempio, Outbrain potrebbe sapere che l'UUID
   123 (che potresti essere tu che sul tuo iPhone X stai visitando il
   Guardian usando Chrome come browser) ama leggere di destinazioni di
   vacanza lontane e che alle persone che amano leggere delle medesime
   destinazioni di vacanza lontane piace leggere di cibi esotici.
   L'UUID è una sequenza di numeri e/o lettere. L'UUID viene associato al
   tuo dispositivo e varia in base al browser che utilizzi. In altre
   parole, Outbrain registra un UUID diverso a seconda del dispositivo e/o
   del browser che utilizzi per accedere ai Siti partner. Ad esempio, ciò
   significa che avrai un UUID quando visiti un Sito partner dal tuo
   telefono cellulare utilizzando Safari come browser e un UUID diverso
   quando visiti un Sito partner dal tuo iPad utilizzando Safari come
   browser. Outbrain combinerà e consoliderà un UUID da un dispositivo
   mobile (palmare o tablet) da un browser che accede quindi a
   un'applicazione (o viceversa) da quel medesimo dispositivo.
   L'assegnazione di un UUID consente a Outbrain di associare le
   visualizzazioni di pagina visitate e i click sulle raccomandazioni di
   Outbrain provenienti da tale UUID, il tutto con l'obiettivo di fornire
   contenuti interessanti.
     * Indirizzo IP e altre informazioni sull'utilizzo.

   Raccogliamo un UUID come spiegato sopra, inoltre raccogliamo le
   seguenti informazioni da te: (i) indirizzo IP (reso anonimo in base
   agli standard di settore) (ii) dati dell'agente utente: tipo di
   dispositivo (ad es. iPhone), tipo di browser (ad es. Chrome), sistema
   operativo (ad es. iOS); (iii) le pagine visitate; (iv) l'orario della
   visita; e (v) gli URL di riferimento e altre informazioni normalmente
   trasmesse nelle richieste HTTP.
   Le suddette informazioni statistiche ci forniscono informazioni su
   quanti Utenti hanno visitato una pagina specifica sui nostri Siti
   partner sui quali è installato il widget Outbrain, per quanto tempo
   ciascun Utente è rimasto su quella pagina, il tipo di contenuto su
   quella pagina sul quale hanno fatto click e, in generale, come hanno
   interagito con tale pagina. Queste informazioni costituiscono dati
   personali soltanto quando sono associati a un UUID.
   (b) Quali cookie e altre tecnologie simili utilizziamo
   Visita questa Tabella dei cookie nella sezione "Utenti" per un elenco
   dettagliato dei cookie proprietari che utilizziamo quando interagisci
   con i Siti partner nei quali è implementata la tecnologia Outbrain.
   Se fai click su un collegamento verso una delle nostre raccomndazioni,
   l'inserzionista Amplify che sponsorizza tale contenuto può installare
   cookie sul tuo dispositivo tramite reindirizzamenti prima che tu giunga
   alla pagina di destinazione della raccomandazione di contenuto o nel
   momento in cui raggiungi la pagina di destinazione. In tali casi sarai
   soggetto alla politica sulla privacy di tale inserzionista.
   Oltre al widget Outbrain visibile su Siti partner, alcuni inserzionisti
   di Outbrain possono implementare il pixel Outbrain sui loro siti web.
   Il pixel Outbrain determina se l'utente che raggiunge la pagina nella
   quale è installato il pixel dispone di un UUID Outbrain. Se esiste un
   UUID associato a tale utente finale, Outbrain consente agli
   inserzionisti di reindirizzare tali UUID e/o fornisce agli
   inserzionisti il numero totale di UUID che hanno raggiunto tale pagina.
   Se nessun UUID Outbrain ha visitato la pagina, il pixel Outbrain non
   raccoglie alcuna informazione sull'utente.
   Invitiamo gli inserzionisti a divulgare l'uso di pixel Outbrain sui
   propri siti web. Outbrain non combina le informazioni ottenute dal
   pixel con il profilo di un UUID.
   I punti dati come le visualizzazioni delle pagine e i click che sono
   collegati a un UUID specifico sono conservati per 13 mesi. Ad esempio,
   se l'UUID 123 legge un articolo il 31 dicembre 2017, il 1° febbraio
   2018 quell'articolo non farà più parte del profilo dell'UUID 123.
   (c) Come possiamo condividere le informazioni
   Outbrain non condivide i profili Utente con terzi. Tuttavia, potremmo
   condividere l'UUID con taluni partner per fini di sincronizzazione dei
   cookie oppure in base a requisiti tecnici. Consulta anche la sezione
   Condivisione della presente politica sulla privacy.
   (d) I tuoi diritti
     * Opt Out di Outbrain. Puoi rinunciare (opt-out) alle raccomandazioni
       di contenuto personalizzate di Outbrain in qualsiasi momento.
       Consulta il Profilo di interesse di Outbrain per una panoramica
       generale dei dati che Outbrain conosce su di te e può utilizzare
       per formulare le sue raccomandazioni. Il Profilo di interesse ti dà
       altresì la possibilità di decidere di rinunciare alle
       raccomandazioni personalizzate (puoi anche effettuare l’opt-out
       cliccando qui). Tieni presente che l'esclusione dei browser avviene
       tramite il Profilo di interesse di Outbrain, ma la rinuncia ai
       contenuti personalizzati nelle applicazioni avviene attraverso le
       impostazioni presenti sul tuo dispositivo (esempi di passaggi sono
       disponibili nel Profilo di interesse).

   IMPORTANTE – anche se hai rinunciato a usufruire di Outbrain:
     * Continuerai a visualizzare le raccomandazioni di Outbrain. La
       disattivazione del tracking per la personalizzazione di Outbrain
       non significa che non riceverai più raccomandazioni di contenuto da
       Outbrain. Piuttosto significa che non saranno personalizzate. Tali
       raccomandazioni continueranno a utilizzare le informazioni relative
       al documento che stai visualizzando (ad esempio informazioni
       contestuali) per fornirti consigli su quella pagina.

     * La rinuncia (opt-out) è basata su cookie ed è specifica del
       dispositivo/browser. Se navighi sul web da dispositivi e/o browser
       diversi, dovrai esprimere la rinuncia da ciascun dispositivo e/o
       browser per assicurarti di impedire il tracking per la
       personalizzazione su ciascuno di loro. Per lo stesso motivo, se
       acquisti un nuovo dispositivo, cambi browser o cancelli (o annulli)
       il cookie di rinuncia, dovrai esprimere nuovamente tale rinuncia.
       Rinunciare al tracking per la personalizzazione non equivale a
       bloccare i cookie.

     * Per garantire la cancellazione del profilo legato al tuo UUID, non
       attivare Outbrain per almeno 21 giorni. La tua rinuncia alle
       raccomandazioni personalizzate di Outbrain è efficace
       immediatamente. Tuttavia, se il tuo browser consente
       l'archiviazione locale e attivi le raccomandazioni di contenuto
       personalizzate di Outbrain entro 21 giorni dalla rinuncia, è
       possibile che il tuo profilo precedente venga riconnesso al tuo
       UUID. Se non effettui l'attivazione entro 21 giorni, il profilo
       verrà eliminato e non potrà essere ripristinato.

     * Come con la maggior parte dei casi di opt-out, anche l’opzione di
       opt-out del browser Outbrain si basa su un cookie. Il cookie di
       opt-out è inteso come persistente per rispettare le preferenze
       dell'utente. Tuttavia, la funzionalità di "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention" in iOS11 potrebbe avere un impatto sulla persistenza
       dei cookie nei siti web nelle 24 ore successive. Ti suggeriamo di
       utilizzare un altro browser o di bloccare tutti i cookie di terze
       parti dal browser in modo da essere "disattivato" senza dover
       ricorrere all'effettiva metodologia di opt-out di qualsiasi
       azienda.

     * Ulteriori opzioni di rinuncia (opt-out). Puoi anche esprimere la
       tua rinuncia a ricevere contenuti personalizzati offerti da noi o
       da altre agenzie pubblicitarie attraverso strumenti messi a
       disposizione dal settore come la NAI o le varie pagine basate su
       DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices, e/o EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
       Visitare le pagine delle scelte dei consumatori di NAI, DAA, DAAC o
       EDAA ti consente di rinunciare a tutti o parte dei servizi dei
       membri partecipanti. Come la funzione di opt out di Outbrain,
       queste rinunce non fanno sì che non riceverai più alcuna
       pubblicità, semplicemente gli annunci pubblicitari non saranno
       personalizzati per te. Puoi continuare a ricevere annunci
       pubblicitari, ad esempio, in base al sito web specifico che stai
       visualizzando (ossia annunci basati sul contesto). Inoltre, se i
       tuoi browser sono configurati per rifiutare i cookie quando visiti
       le pagine delle scelte dei consumatori DAA, DAAC o EDAA, la tua
       rinuncia potrebbe non essere efficace.

     * Base giuridica. La base giuridica di Outbrain per il trattamento
       dei dati personali dell'Utente si fonda sulla base giuridica
       determinata da ciascuno dei nostri Siti partner. Ciascun Sito
       partner si baserà sul consenso o sul legittimo interesse. Consulta
       la politica sulla privacy dei Siti partner per ulteriori
       informazioni sulla loro base giuridica. Se un Partner fa
       affidamento sul consenso, Outbrain non depositerà un cookie sul tuo
       dispositivo se non hai fornito il consenso su tale Sito partner.

   Partner commerciali: Sei un Partner commerciale quando ti registri (o
   invii un'e-mail a Outbrain) per conto dell'azienda per la quale lavori
   per utilizzare i servizi Outbrain Amplify o Outbrain Engage. Vedi di
   più qui.
   (a) Quali informazioni raccogliamo e perché
   Puoi fornire determinati dati personali (quali ad esempio indirizzo
   e-mail) quando ti registri per i servizi Amplify o Engage o altrimenti
   quando comunichi o interagisci con noi. Se presenti domanda per
   diventare un Partner commerciale, potremmo richiederti ulteriori
   informazioni tramite moduli di domanda dell'inserzionista, ordini di
   inserzione e altri moduli. Raccogliamo automaticamente informazioni in
   merito alle azioni del tuo nome utente nella dashboard di Outbrain. Ad
   esempio, in qualità di Partner commerciale Amplify, se modifichi il
   costo per click per una delle tue campagne, la traccia di controllo di
   Outbrain registrerà tutte queste azioni.
   Raccogliamo e trattiamo i dati personali di cui sopra al fine di
   adempiere ai nostri obblighi ai sensi del nostro accordo come Partner
   commerciale (o potenziale Partner commerciale) stipulato con voi, ivi
   incluso per:
     * rispondere alle tue domande e richieste;

     * fornirti accesso a determinate funzioni e caratteristiche dei
       nostri servizi Amplify o Engage (ad esempio per fornirti e
       mantenere il tuo account dashboard);

     * verificare la tua identità;

     * comunicare con te in merito al tuo account, ai nostri prodotti e
       alle promozioni disponibili pertinenti al tuo utilizzo del servizio
       Amplify o Engage.

   (b) Quali cookie e altre tecnologie simili utilizziamo
   Ti rimandiamo a questa Tabella dei cookie nella sezione "Partner
   commerciali" per un elenco dettagliato dei cookie (e dei relativi
   periodi di conservazione) che utilizziamo con i Partner commerciali.
   (c) Come possiamo condividere le informazioni con chiunque
   Potremmo divulgare determinate informazioni dei Business Partner a
   venditori, contraenti o altri soggetti che assistono Outbrain
   nell'erogazione dei servizi (ad es. trattamento delle carte di
   credito). Consulta anche la sezione Condivisione della presente
   politica sulla privacy.
   (d) I tuoi diritti
   Se in veste di Partner commerciale desideri verificare, correggere,
   aggiornare o richiedere la disattivazione delle tue informazioni, puoi
   accedere alla dashboard di Outbrain e modificare le preferenze del tuo
   profilo oppure contattarci all'indirizzo: support@outbrain.com. Se stai
   ricevendo e-mail di Outbrain, puoi "annullare l'iscrizione" a tale
   invio utilizzando un collegamento presente nell'e-mail. Nota:
   l'annullamento dell'iscrizione non comporta la rinuncia a ricevere
   notifiche critiche all'erogazione dei servizi Amplify o Engage (ad es.
   fatture inviate via e-mail).
   La base giuridica di Outbrain per il trattamento dei dati personali dei
   Partner commerciali è il legittimo interesse.
   3. Come manteniamo le informazioni al sicuro, Trasferimenti al di fuori
   del SEE, Condivisione e conservazione

                                      +

   Sicurezza
   Outbrain dispone di un team dedicato per la sicurezza. Manteniamo
   rigorosi controlli sui dati che raccogliamo, conservandoli in database
   protetti e soggetti a firewall con diritti di accesso rigorosamente
   limitati e controllati, per garantirne la sicurezza. Consulta le nostre
   norme sulla sicurezza per maggiori informazioni.
   I partner commerciali hanno accesso a determinate funzionalità protette
   da password del servizio Amplify o Engage. Loro sono responsabili del
   mantenimento della riservatezza di tale password. Ricorda che,
   sfortunatamente, la trasmissione di informazioni tramite Internet non è
   completamente sicura. Una truffa comune su Internet è nota come
   "spoofing" o "phishing" e si verifica quando ricevi un'email
   proveniente da quella che sembra essere una fonte legittima che
   richiede i tuoi dati personali. Ti preghiamo di osservare che non ti
   invieremo alcuna e-mail che ti chieda di verificare la carta di
   credito, le coordinate bancarie o eventuali altri dati personali.
   Qualora dovessi ricevere un'e-mail che sembra provenire da noi e ti
   chiede tali informazioni ti preghiamo di non rispondere e non fare
   click su nessun link presente nell'e-mail. Al contrario, inoltraci
   l'e-mail all'indirizzo legal@outbrain.com, in quanto esamineremo
   possibili casi di frodi su Internet.
   Trasferimento dei dati al di fuori dell'UE/del SEE
   Quando trasferiamo i dati personali dallo Spazio economico europeo ad
   altri paesi nei quali le leggi applicabili non offrono il medesimo
   livello di protezione della privacy dei dati offerto nei Territori
   europei, adottiamo misure atte a fornire un livello appropriato di
   protezione della privacy dei dati. In altre parole, i tuoi diritti e le
   protezioni che ti spettano rimangono associati ai tuoi dati. Ad
   esempio, utilizziamo clausole contrattuali approvate e altre misure
   studiate per garantire che i destinatari dei tuoi dati personali li
   proteggano.
   Condivisione
   Oltre alla descrizione di come possiamo divulgare i tuoi dati personali
   per ciascun tipo di utente, possiamo altresì divulgare dati personali
   nei seguenti casi:
     * all'interno della famiglia di società controllate da Outbrain per
       ragioni interne, principalmente per scopi aziendali e operativi;

     * qualora dovessimo attraversare una transizione aziendale, quale una
       fusione, un'acquisizione da parte di un'altra società oppure una
       vendita di tutte o di parte delle nostre attività, i tuoi dati
       personali saranno probabilmente inclusi tra le attività trasferite;

     * laddove ciò sia richiesto dalla legge (ad esempio, per collaborare
       con indagini delle forze dell'ordine oppure con altri procedimenti
       giudiziari); e/o

     * per rispondere a un'emergenza effettiva.

   Inoltre, combiniamo i tuoi dati personali con quelli di altri utenti al
   fine di condividere informazioni sulle tendenze e aggregare le
   statistiche degli utenti con terze parti, sempre in forma aggregata e
   anonimizzata.
   Conservazione dei dati
   Il periodo di conservazione per ciascuno dei cookie utilizzati da
   Outbrain (sia per quelli propri sia per quelli usati da terzi per
   nostro conto) è indicato nella Tabella dei cookie.
   Outbrain mantiene altresì una politica di conservazione dei dati che
   dettaglia il periodo di conservazione dei dati personali in base alla
   nostra analisi della durata ragionevolmente necessaria di tale
   conservazione, rispetto a dati specifici, tenuto conto delle finalità
   legali o commerciali. Nel momento in cui non necessitiamo più dei dati
   personali, li cancelliamo o li distruggiamo in maniera sicura. I dati
   aggregati, che non consentono di identificare un dispositivo/browser (o
   una singola persona) e sono utilizzati per finalità di reporting e
   analisi vengono conservati per tutto il tempo necessario dal punto di
   vista commerciale.
   4. Minori

                                      +

   Nessuno dei nostri servizi si rivolge a minori di 16 anni. Non
   raccogliamo consapevolmente dati personali da minori di 16 anni. Se al
   momento della raccolta dovessimo stabilire che un Visitatore del sito,
   un Utente o un Partner commerciale ha meno di 16 anni, non useremo né
   conserveremo i suoi dati personali. Qualora dovessimo venire a
   conoscenza del fatto che abbiamo raccolto inconsapevolmente dati
   personali da un minore di età inferiore ai 16 anni, attueremo ogni
   ragionevole sforzo per eliminare tali informazioni dai nostri archivi.
   Se sei un bambino, vai a giocare in giardino, non usare o interagire
   con Outbrain!
   5. Cittadini dei territori europei

                                      +

   In conformità con le leggi europee in materia di tutela della vita
   privata (privacy), in particolare con il regolamento generale europeo
   sulla protezione dei dati (GDPR), Outbrain riconosce specifici diritti
   aggiuntivi ai cittadini dei Territori europei quali il diritto di
   accesso, di rettifica, di opposizione, di reclamo, di cancellazione e
   di blocco. Più specificamente:
     * il diritto di richiedere informazioni sull'eventualità del
       trattamento in atto e su quali dati personali siano trattati da
       noi, nonché il diritto di richiedere la rettifica o la modifica di
       tali dati personali.
     * in determinate circostanze, il diritto di richiedere che i dati
       personali siano cancellati.
     * in determinate circostanze, il diritto di chiedere che il
       trattamento dei dati personali sia soggetto a limitazioni.
     * il diritto alla revoca del proprio consenso al trattamento e
       all'utilizzo dei propri dati, in tutto o in parte, in qualsiasi
       momento con applicazione per il futuro.
     * il diritto di ottenere i propri dati personali in un formato
       comune, strutturato e leggibile da un dispositivo automatico.
     * il diritto di contattare il nostro responsabile della protezione
       dei dati nel caso in cui vi siano domande, commenti, reclami o
       richieste in relazione alla nostra dichiarazione sulla protezione
       dei dati e sul trattamento dei dati personali.
     * il diritto di sporgere reclamo presso l'autorità di controllo
       responsabile qualora si ritenga che il trattamento dei propri dati
       personali avvenga in violazione della legislazione.

   In aggiunta a quanto sopra, facciamo riferimento a determinati diritti
   per i cittadini dei Territori europei nel corso della presente politica
   sulla privacy. Ai sensi del GDPR, con il termine cittadini dei
   "Territori europei" si intendono i cittadini dello Spazio economico
   europeo (SEE) e della Svizzera. Ai fini della presente Informativa
   sulla privacy, il termine "Territori europei" continuerà a includere il
   Regno Unito, anche dopo che il Regno Unito avrà lasciato lo Spazio
   economico europeo in seguito alla Brexit.
   Nel caso avessi domande su come esercitare qualsiasi dei diritti
   descritti qui sopra, scrivici al seguente indirizzo e-mail:
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com.
   6. Diritti in materia di privacy della California

                                      +

   Ai sensi degli articoli 1798.83-1798.84 del Codice Civile della
   California, i residenti californiani hanno il diritto di richiederci
   un'informativa che descriva le categorie di informazioni personali che
   condividiamo con terzi o società affiliate per finalità di marketing
   diretto di tali terzi o società affiliate. Tale informativa individuerà
   le categorie di informazioni condivise e includerà un elenco dei terzi
   e delle società affiliate con le quali sono state condivise, unitamente
   ai loro nomi e indirizzi. Se sei residente in California e desideri una
   copia di tale informativa, invia una richiesta scritta a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oppure inviala al seguente indirizzo
   postale: Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY
   10011. Si prega di consentire 30 giorni per la risposta.
   7. Comunicazione antitracciamento (“Do Not Track”)

                                      +

   Alcuni browser trasmettono segnali antitracciamento, denominati "Do Not
   Track" (DNT), ai siti web. Poiché non esiste una comprensione comune su
   come interpretare il segnale DNT, al momento Outbrain non altera,
   modifica o risponde alle richieste o ai segnali DNT di tali browser.
   Continueremo a monitorare l'attività del settore in questo contesto e
   rivaluteremo le nostre pratiche DNT se necessario. Nel frattempo, puoi
   utilizzare la gamma di altri strumenti che mettiamo a disposizione per
   controllare la raccolta e l'utilizzo dei dati, ivi inclusa la capacità
   di rinunciare a ricevere raccomandazioni personalizzate consultando la
   sezione Utenti.
   8. Come può variare la presente politica sulla privacy

                                      +

   Occasionalmente potremmo modificare la presente politica sulla privacy.
   Inseriremo un avviso in evidenza che ti sarà visibile in qualità di
   Visitatore del sito o Partner commerciale, tuttavia non disponiamo di
   mezzi per avvertire gli Utenti in merito a un aggiornamento. In tal
   caso si raccomanda di verificare periodicamente questa pagina per
   sapere se la politica sulla privacy è stata aggiornata. Visualizzeremo
   sempre la data dell'ultima modifica della politica sulla privacy nella
   parte alta della pagina affinché tu possa sapere quando è stata rivista
   l'ultima volta.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   2018年5月24日
   アウトブレインはお客様の個人データを大切に保護します。このプライバシー ポリシーは（以下「プライバシー
   ポリシー」といいます。）、アウトブレインが収集する全ての個人データも含めた情報の利用方法を定めるものです。個人データは、お客様に関わる情報であ
   って、個人を特定できる情報です。アウトブレインは、お客様の個人データを利用に際しては、適用されるすべての法令を遵守します。プライバシーチャンピ
   オンチームのもと信頼と透明性というアウトブレインの価値を守ります
   + ＋全てを広げる
   – COLLAPSE ALL
   １．私たちについて、私たちのミッション、及びアウトブレイン・アウトブレインのDPO・又は関係部署へのお問い合わせ方法
   +
   アウトブレインについて
   私たちは、米国のデラウェア州で設立された株式会社及びその関連子会社（以下合わせて「アウトブレイン」又は「私たち」といいます。）であり、本社はニ
   ューヨークにあります。アウトブレインは、12 個のグローバルオフィスを有し、世界中のパブリッシャー及びマーケッターと提携関係を組んでいます。
   アウトブレインのミッション
   アウトブレインのミッションは、ユーザーの関心に基づいて、ユーザーの興味関心に基づいてレコメンデーションを提供することです。そのミッションのため
   、次のようなパートナーと提携しています。
     * 読者に価値があるコンテンツを勧めたいオンラインパブリッシャ及びパートナー（こちらの契約をOutbrain Engageといいます。）

     * コンテンツを読者に配信することを希望するアドバタイザー（こちらの契約を Outbrain Amplifyといいます。）

   アウトブレインへのお問い合わせ
   アウトブレインはプライバシーポリシーを遵守していることを定期的に確認しております。プライバシーポリシーに関するご質問、コメント、又は他のお問い
   合わせは次の連絡先までお願いします。
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com 又は
   Attn: Privacy Questions
   Outbrain Inc.
   39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor
   New York, NY 10011
   また上記のお問い合わせ以外にもご質問がございましたら、次の連絡先までご連絡下さい。
     * 外部のData Protection Officer （以下「DPO」と言う）：ePrivacy GmbH
       担当者：クリストフ・バウワー博士
       ePrivacy GmbHには privacy@eprivacy.eu 宛てご連絡ください。

     * 欧州内のアウトブレインの担当部署である Information Commissioner’s Officer

   自主規制機関
   アウトブレインは、Digital Advertising Alliance （以下「DAA」という）及び European
   Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance（以下「EDAA
   」という）において自主規制の原則を遵守します。アウトブレインは、責任あるデータの収集とデジタル広告におけるデータの使用を定める社団Networ
   k Advertising Initiative
   (NAI)の優良メンバーであり、そのウェブとモバイルのための行動規範を遵守します。アウトブレインは、オンライン行動アドバタイジング(OAB)
   に関するInteractive Advertising Bureau (IAB)の自主規制原則及びIAB の欧州OBA原則を遵守します。
   ２．アウトブレインのユーザータイプ（オプトアウトも含む）)
   +
   このプライバシーポリシーにおいては、様々な場面ごとに、お客さまのユーザータイプに応じて、どの情報を収集し、なぜ収集するのか、なぜ、どのクッキー
   を使うのか、またどのような類似の技術を用いるのか、私たちがどのようにその情報を共有するのか、またお客様にはどのような権利があるのかということを
   ご説明します。
   ウェブサイトの訪問者：お客様はアウトブレインのOutbrain.com （又は国によるアドレス、例えばOutbrain.co.uk、
   Outbrain.fr 、Outbrain.de 、など）及び MyOutbrain.com
   のウェブサイト、ウェブページ、相互作用機能（以下すべて合わせて「アウトブレインのサイト」という）を訪問、及び相互作用する場合、サイトの訪問者に
   なります。 詳しくは こちらへ。
   ア）収集する情報及びその理由
   アウトブレインは、アウトブレインのサイトにおいてお客様がどのコンテンツに興味を持つかを理解し、且つお客様がアウトブレインのサイトを訪問しない時
   にもアウトブレインが提供するサービスを認識していただきたいと考えています。このために、お客様から（１）IP
   アドレス、（２）ユーザーエージェントデータ、あるいはデバイスの種類（例えばiPhone など）、ブラウザの種類（例えばGoogle
   Chromeなど）、オペレーティングシステム（例えばiOS など）、（３）アウトブレインのサイト のどのページを閲覧したか
   （例えば、「アウトブレインについて」のページ）、（４）閲覧した時間（対応する時差）、（５）URL のリファーラル及びHTTP
   リクエストにおいて通常に通信される情報（例えば、この情報でお客様がアウトブレインのサイトにどの経由でいらしたのかを知ることができます）の情報を
   収集します。
   イ）利用するクッキー、又は使用する技術
   お客様がアウトブレインのサイトを訪問する際に使用されるクッキー（及びその有効期間）に関する詳細については、こちらの クッキーテーブル
   のウェッブサイト訪問者の部分をご参照ください。
   ウ）情報の共有
   アウトブレインのサイトにおいて収集したお客様の情報の共有
   原則として、アウトブレインはお客様の個人データを第三者に対しそのマーケティング活動のために共有することはいたしません。しかし、アウトブレインが
   お客様に対してマーケティング及び広告配信ができるように第三者のサービス（こちらの クッキーテーブル
   に表示されます）を利用することがあります。例えば、アウトブレインのサイトにおいて、アウトブレインがお客様にマーケティング及び広告配信を行うため
   に使用するクッキーの一部は、第三者のクッキーです。アウトブレインはこれら第三者に対して、共有された情報を機密情報として取り扱わせるとともに、こ
   れらの情報をアウトブレインに対する義務の履行のためにのみ使用させるものとします。私たちは、私たちのために個人データを処理するあらゆる第三者との
   間で、個人データを私たちの指示及び適用されるデータ保護に関するあらゆる法令を遵守して処理することを義務付ける契約を締結しております。又、お客様
   がアウトブレインのブログにコメントする場合、そのコメント及び情報は開示されます。コメントを削除するためには、
   support@outbrain.comまでご連絡ください。
   アウトブレインのサイトにおける第三者のサービスの利用
   アウトブレインのサイト上には、アウトブレインが所有又は管理しないウェブサイトへのリンクがあります。アウトブレインは、他の第三者のウェブサイトの
   コンテンツ、商品、サービス、プライバシーポリシー、又はデータ処理方法を管理又は保証することができません。例えば、アウトブレインのサイトにおいて
   、アウトブレインのFacebook のページ、又はLinkedin
   のページへのクリックできるアイコンがあります。お客様がこのリンクをクリックする際にFacebook 及びLinkedin
   がお客様のデバイスに自らのクッキーを送信し、個別に個人データを収集する可能性があります。従って、お客様にはFacebook やLinkedin
   のプライバシーポリシーもご確認いただきますようお願いいたします。
   エ）お客様の権利
   アウトブレインのサイトの利用は、アウトブレインのサイトの 利用条件
   にしたがうこととされ、お客様にも適用されます。お客様は、アウトブレインのサイトを利用することをいつでもやめることができます。お客様は利用するこ
   とをやめる場合に、お客様のデバイスに送信されたクッキーを削除することもできます。お客様はアウトブレインのサイトを利用する際にお客様のメールアド
   レスを提供している場合、アウトブレインから送信されるメールの「配信停止」のオプションを利用することもできます。
   アウトブレインは、 欧州
   からのサイト訪問者のために、お客様がアウトブレインのサイトで使用されるクッキー又は他の技術に同意・不同意を表明することを可能にする同意管理プラ
   ットフォーム（「 One
   Trust」を使用する）をアウトブレインのサイトおいて実施します。アウトブレインはお客様が同意しない限りクッキーを送信しません。したがって、ア
   ウトブレインが個人データを処理するための法的根拠は、「同意」となります。お客様はいつでも同意を撤回することができます。
   ユーザー：お客様は
   、アウトブレインのウィジェットがインストールされるアウトブレインのパートナーのウェブサイトのページ（以下「パートナーサイト」といいます。）を訪
   問者をユーザーといいます。例えば、お客様はhttps://news.sky.com/uk 、www.spiegel.de、又は
   www.cnn.com
   を訪問する場合、そのウェブサイトにおいてアウトブレインのウィジェットが表示されます。アウトブレインのウィジェットにおいて、アウトブレインに言及
   するテキスト（例えばレコメンデーションの近くに「アウトブレインのおすすめ」や「アウトブレインからの」といったテキスト）があります。お客様がアウ
   トブレインに言及するリンクをクリックする場合、アウトブレインがレコメンデーションにおいて利用するデータカテゴリーを提供する
   アウトブレインのInterest プロファイルへリンクする通知
   が表示されます。お客様はプロファイルにおいてパーソナルレコメンデーションからオプトアウトすることもできます。詳しくは こちらへ.
   アウトブレインのウィジェットの例
   Outbrain Example Recommendations
   ア）収集する情報及びその理由
   アウトブレインは、価値があるレコメンデーションを提供するために、UUID、IPアドレス、及び他の情報を利用します。アウトブレインのレコメンデー
   ションは、費用を払う広告社から新しいサイトへリンクするもの、又は同じパブリッシャのページへリンクするものです。
     * UUID

   お客様は最初にパートナーサイト（例えば、CNN.com）を訪問する際に、アウトブレインがUUID（一意なユーザー識別子）を割り当てることができ
   るよう、お客様のデバイスにクッキーが送信されます。アウトブレインは、お客様がパートナーサイトにおいて表示又は閲覧するコンテンツをカテゴライズし
   、分析します。アウトブレインのレコメンデーションは、（１）ブラウザの履歴、（２）他のユーザーの類似ブラウジングパータン、（３）アウトブレインの
   ユーザーにおけるその時に人気のコンテンツ、（４）ランダム、及び（５）Amplifyの顧客が提供する又は求めるターゲット条件に基づいて提供されま
   す。例えば、アウトブレインは、UUID123（例えばiPhoneXにおいてChromeのブラウザを使用してガーディアン新聞を訪問するお客様）が
   遠い外国の旅行先について読むことが好きだということ、且つ遠い外国の旅行先について読むことが好きな人は面白い外国の食べ物についても読むことが好き
   だということを知っている可能性があります。
   UUIDは数字又は文字の配列です。UUIDはお客様のデバイスに対応し、ブラウザによって変更されます。言い換えれば、アウトブレインは、お客様がパ
   ートナーサイトを訪問する毎に、お客様のデバイス又はブラウザごとに個別のUUIDを保存します。例えば、お客様がモバイルデバイスにおいてサファリと
   いうブラウザを使用してパートナーサイトを訪問する場合にあるひとつのUUIDが割り当てられ、iPadにおいてサファリというブラウザを使用してパー
   トナーサイトを訪問する場合にまた別のUUIDが割り当てられます。アウトブレインは、モバイルデバイス（携帯端末かタブレット）上のブラウザのUUI
   Dが同じデバイスにおいてアプリにアクセスする（逆も含む）場合、そのUUIDを結合します。
   アウトブレインは、デバイス又はブラウザにUUIDを割り当てることにより、お客様に対してお客様の関心に基づくレコメンデーションを提供することがで
   きるため、そのUUIDと訪問されたページ及びアウトブレインのレコメンデーションのクリックを対応させることができます。
   IPアドレス及び他の使用情報
   アウトブレインは、上記のようにUUIDを収集し、また、（１）IPアドレス、（２）ユーザーエージェントデータ；デバイスの種類（例えば携帯電話）、
   ブラウザの種類（例えばChrome）、オペレーティングシステム（例えばiOS）、（３）訪問したページ、（４）訪問時間、及び（５）リファラURL
   及びHTTP要求において通常に通信される情報を収集します。
   この統計情報は、アウトブレインのウィジェットがインストールされるパートナーサイトのページに何人が訪問しているのかということに関する情報、そのペ
   ージの訪問時間、ユーザーにクリックされたコンテンツ、及び一般的な訪問方法に関する情報をアウトブレインに提供するものです。この情報は、UUIDと
   対応しないため、個人データには該当しません。
   イ）利用するクッキー、又は使用する技術
   アウトブレインの技術が実施されるパートナーサイトを利用する際に使用するクッキーについては、こちらのクッキーテーブルの「ユーザー」の部分をご参照
   くだい。
   お客様がアウトブレインがレコメンドしたコンテンツのリンクをクリックする場合、そのレコメンデーションの遷移先ページが表示される前に、又は遷移先ペ
   ージが表示された際に、レコメンデーションのスポンサーをするAmplifyのアドバタイザーからリダイレクトを使用してお客様のデバイスにクッキーが
   送信される可能性があります。その場合、アドバタイザーのプライバシーポリシーが適用されます。
   アウトブレインのアドバタイザーは 、 表示されるアウトブレインのウィジェットに加えて
   アウトブレインピクセルを使用する可能性があります。アウトブレインピクセルは、ピクセルが実施されるページを訪問するユーザーに対応するアウトブレイ
   ン UUIDが存在するかどうか判断します。アウトブレインはエンドユーザーに対応するアウトブレインUUID が存在する場合、アドバタイザーがその
   UUIDをリターゲットすることができる機能やページを訪問する合計の UUID
   を提供します。アウトブレインピクセルは、ページへの訪問者がアウトブレイン UUID を保持しない場合にはユーザーの情報を収集しません。
   アウトブレインは、アドバタイザーが自らのウェブサイトにおいてアウトブレインピクセルが実施されている旨を開示するよう推奨しています。アウトブレイ
   ンはピクセルから収集した情報とUUIDのプロフィールを結合しません。
   各UUIDに対応するページの閲覧、及びクリック数のようなデータポイントは 13ヶ月間保存されます。例えば、UUID123が 2017年12月
   31日に記事を閲覧したという場合、その記事は2018年 2月1日にその UUIDのプロフィールから削除されます。
   ウ）情報の共有
   アウトブレインはいかなる第三者に対してもユーザーのプロフィールを共有しません。しかし、アウトブレインはクッキーの突合又は技術的に必要となる範囲
   で第三者にUUID を共有する可能性があります。
   詳しくはこのプライバシーポリシーのデータ共有の 部分もご参照ください。
   エ）お客様の権利
     * アウトブレインのオプトアウト

   お客様は、いつでもアウトブレインのパーソナルレコメンデーションからオプトアウトすることができます。お客様の個人データ及びその個人データに基づい
   てお客様にレコメンデーションをすることに関しては、アウトブレインのinterest プロファイル
   をご参照ください。お客様は、興味プロフィールからパーソナルレコメンデーションをオプトアウトすることもできます。ブラウザ上で行うオプトアウトはア
   ウトブレインのinterest プロファイル
   上で行われるものであり、アプリ上でのパーソナルレコメンデーションのオプトアウトはお客様のデバイスの設定を通して行われるものであることにご注意く
   ださい（interest プロファイル にオプトアウトの際のステップの例があります）。
   ご注意ください アウトブレインからオプトアウトしても：
     * お客様に対してまだアウトブレインのレコメンデーションが表示されます。
       アウトブレインのパーソナルトラッキングからオプトアウトをしてもアウトブレインからのレコメンデーションが表示されなくなるわけではありませ
       ん。以降表示されるレコメンデーションはお客様に特化していないだけのものとなります。レコメンデーションは、そのページに関するレコメンデー
       ションを提供するために、お客様が閲覧している文書に関する情報を利用します。
     * オプトアウトはクッキーベースであって、デバイス及びブラウザに特有される
       ものです。お客様が複数のデバイス又はブラウザからウェブサイトを訪問する場合、お客様のすべてのデバイス又はブラウザにおいてパーソナルトラ
       ッキングがなされないようにするため、お客様ご自身ですべてのデバイス又はブラウザにおいてオプトアウトをしていただく必要があります。また、
       お客様は新しいデバイスを買い、ブラウザを変更し、又はオプトアウトのクッキーを削除する場合、再度オプトアウトしなければなりません。また、
       パーソナルトラッキングからオプトアウトすることと、クッキー自体をブロックすることとは異なりますのでご注意ください。
     * お客様は、お客様のUUID
       と対応するプロフィールの削除を保証するために、最低２１日間の間はアウトブレインをオプトインしないようにご注意ください。
       お客様のアウトブレインのパーソナルレコメンデーションからのオプトアウトは直ちに実施されます。しかし、お客様のブラウザがローカル保存をす
       る設定となっており、オプトアウトから２１日以内にアウトブレインのパーソナルレコメンデーションにオプトインする場合、お客様のUUID
       にお客様の従前のプロフィールが再接続される可能性があります。お客様が２１日間以内にオプトインしない場合、お客様のプロフィールは削除され
       、回復することができなくなります。
     * アウトブレインのオプトアウト機能はクッキーに基づくものであり、ユーザーの希望を遵守するように作成されます。しかし、iOS11の
       Intelligent Tracking
       Preventionという機能は、２４時間の範囲を超える場合にウェブサイトのクッキーに影響を与える可能性があります。アウトブレインは、
       お客様が他の会社のオプトアウト方法に依存しなくてもいいように、他のブラウザを使用し、又はブラウザから第三者のクッキーをすべてブロックす
       ることをお勧めします。
     * オプトアウトの追加のオプション

   お客様は、NAI又はDAA のページ（DAA：http://www.aboutads.info/choices 、 DAAC：
   www.youradchoices.ca/choices、及び／又は EDAA
   www.youronlinechoices.eu）のような業界のツールを通してアウトブレイン又は他のアドバタイザーからのパーソナルアドバタイジ
   ングをオプトアウトすることもできます。お客様は、 NAI 、DAA、 DAAC、又は
   EDAAのページを訪問することにより、参加するメンバーのサービスから全体的、又は部分的にオプトアウトすることができます。こちらにもオプトアウト
   することで、アウトブレインのオプトアウトと同じように、お客様に広告が表示されないようになるという意味ではなく、ただお客様にパーソナルな広告が表
   示されないという意味になります。お客様が訪問するウェブサイトに基づく広告（例えば、内容に基づく広告）はまだお客様に対して表示されます。また、お
   客様は、 DAA、DAAC、又は
   EDAAコンスマーチョイスのウェブサイトを訪問する際にブラウザがクッキーを却下するように設定される場合、お客様のオプトアウトが実施されない可能
   性があります。
     * 法的根拠：
       ユーザーの個人データを処理することに関する法的根拠は、アウトブレインの各パートナーサイトの法的根拠に基づくものです。各パートナーサイト
       は、「同意」又は「正当な利益」に基づく法的根拠があります。各パートナーサイトの法的根拠の詳細については、各パートナーサイトのプライバシ
       ーポリシーをご参照ください。アウトブレインは、パートナーが「同意」という法的根拠を採用している場合、パートナーサイトにおいてお客様が同
       意しない限りクッキーを送信しません。

   ビジネスパートナー： お客様は、会社の役割としてアウトブレインの Amplify又はEngage
   のサービスを利用できるようにに登録する（又はアウトブレインとメールのやり取りを行う）場合、ビジネスパートナーとなります。詳しくは こちらへ.
   ア）収集する情報及びその理由
   お客様は、Amplify又はEngage
   のサービスに登録又はアウトブレインとのやり取りを行う際に個人データ（例えばメールアドレスなど）をアウトブレインに提供する可能性があります。お客
   様がビジネスパートナーとなることを希望される際には、アドバタイザーの申込書、広告掲載申込書、又は他の申込書において追加の情報が要求される可能性
   があります。アウトブレインは、アウトブレインダッシュボードにおいて、お客様に対応するユーザーネームの行動に関する情報を自動的に収集します。例え
   ば、お客様がキャンペーンの CPCを変更する場合、アウトブレインの監査証跡に全てのCPCの変更に対応する行動の記録が残ります。
   アウトブレインは、お客様とのビジネスパートナー（又はなり得るビジネスパートナー）としての契約条件を遵守するために例えば下記のような目的のため上
   記のようなデータを収集し、処理します。
     * お客様からのご質問及びお問い合わせに対応すること
     * お客様にAmplify及び
       Engageサービスが提供する機能へのアクセスを提供すること（例えばお客様のダッシュボードアカウントを提供、管理すること）
     * お客様のアイデンティティーを確認すること
     * お客様にお客様のアカウント、アウトブレインのサービス、又はAmplify及び
       Engageのサービスに関するプロモーションについてご連絡すること

   イ）利用するクッキー、又は使用する技術
   アウトブレインがビジネスパートナーに対して使用するクッキー（及びその有効期間）に関する詳細については、こちらのクッキーテーブル
   の「ビジネスパートナー」の部分をご参照ください。
   ウ）情報の共有
   アウトブレインは、ベンダー、コントラクター、又はアウトブレインのサービスをサポートする他の第三者（例えば、クレジットカード処理）にビジネスパー
   トナーの情報を開示する可能性があります。詳しくはこのプライバシーポリシーの データ共有 の部分をご参照ください。
   エ）お客様の権利
   お客様がビジネスパートナーとして、個人データを確認、修正、更新、又は削除を希望する場合、アウトブレインのダッシュボードの「プロフィール設定」か
   ら行っていただくことができます。あるいは、support@outbrain.com
   までご連絡ください。お客様は、お客様にアウトブレインのメールが送信されている場合、そのメールに記載されているリンクを通して配信停止をすることも
   できます。「配信停止」によっても、アウトブレインのサービスを提供するために必要な連絡又は通知にはオプトアウトの効果は生じません（例えば、請求書
   など）。
   アウトブレインがビジネスパートナーの個人データを処理する法的根拠は「正当な利益」です。
   ３．アウトブレインの情報保持、欧州経済領域外への移転、共有及び保存
   +
   セキュリティー
   アウトブレインには専門のセキュリティーチームがあります。アウトブレインは個人データの厳密な管理体制を整備し、その個人データは、ファイアウォール
   が設けられた安全なサーバーに保存され、且つ、アクセス権が限定されます。詳しくはアウトブレインのセキュリティー規定 をご参照ください。
   ビジネスパートナーは、Amply又はEngage
   のサービスにおいてパスワードによって保護される機能に対するアクセス権が有します。ビジネスパートナーはこのパスワードを秘密情報として扱う責任があ
   ります。お客様はインターネットを通じた情報通信は完全に安全ではないということにご注意ください。「スプーフィング」又は「フィッシング」と呼ばれる
   詐欺行為もあります。「スプーフィング」又は「フィッシング」とは、信頼されている主体になりすまして個人データを求める電子メールです。アウトブレイ
   ンが、クレジットカード、銀行情報、又は他の個人データを求めるメールを送信することはありません。もしお客様が、アウトブレインになりすました個人デ
   ータを求めるメールを受信したような場合には、これに対し返事すること、又は表示されたリンクをクリックすることのないようにご注意ください。アウトブ
   レインがそのインターネットを通じた詐欺行為を確認できるように、何かありましたら、 legal@outbrain.comまでにご連絡ください。
   欧州／欧州経済領域外のデータ移転
   アウトブレインは、欧州又は欧州経済領域から、欧州と同等のデータプライバシー保護がなされていない国にデータを移転する場合、適切なデータプライバシ
   ー保護を提供できるような措置を実施します。つまり、お客様のデータはお客様の権利と一緒に移転します。例えば、私たちは承認された契約条項（標準契約
   条項）の使用やその他の個人データの受領者がお客様のデータを保護するための措置を実施します。
   共有
   以上のユーザータイプ別の個人データの開示に加えて、次の方法で個人データが開示される可能性もあります。
     * ビジネス及び業務遂行を目的として、アウトブレインの関連子会社間における開示
     * アウトブレインが合併、買収、又は事業譲渡の対象となることにより、個人データも移転対象となることによる開示
     * 法令、規則、管轄官庁の求めに応じた開示（例えば、法律の執行の又は他の訴訟手続きの協力を目的とする開示）
     * 緊急事態下における開示

   上記に加えて、アウトブレインは、傾向情報及び集合体のユーザー情報を第三者に共有できるようにお客様の個人データと他のユーザー情報を結合します。結
   合される情報は常に集合体及び匿名扱いの状態にあります。
   データ保持
   アウトブレインが使用するクッキー（自らのクッキー及び第三者のも含む）の有効期間はクッキーテーブル に記載されます。
   アウトブレインは、個人データが法律上及び取引上どの程度の期間必要とされるかという分析を踏まえて、データの保存期間を定めるデータ保持ポリシーを整
   備します。
   個人データの必要性がなくなった場合、アウトブレインは確実に個人情報を削除、又は消去します。デバイス、ブラウザ、又は個人を特定しない集合体データ
   は、報告又は分析のため、商業的な必要性がある限り保持されます。
   ４．未成年に対して
   +
   アウトブレインは16歳未満の未成年を対象とするサービスを提供しません。また、アウトブレインは、
   16歳未満の未成年の個人データを意図的に収集することは行いません。データを取集する際にサイト訪問者、ユーザー、又はビジネスパートナーが16
   歳未満の未成年であることが判明した場合、その個人データが利用され、又は保存されることはありません。アウトブレインは、意図せず
   16歳未満の未成年者の個人データを収集したことを知った場合、その個人データを削除するために必要となる合理的な対応を行います。アウトブレインは、
   未成年者はアウトブレインを利用するよりも、外で遊ぶ方が望ましいと考えています。
   ５．欧州市民
   +
   欧州の市民には、欧州のプライバシーに関する法律、特に欧州の個人データ保護規則（General Data Protection
   Regulation）（以下「
   GDPR」という）に基づいた個人データに関するアクセス、訂正、拒否、削除、ブロック、及び苦情申し立ての権利があります。具体的には、
     * お客様の個人データが処理されているか否か、されているとすれば、どの情報についてであるのかについての情報を求める権利及び個人データの修正
       あるいは訂正を求める権利
     * 状況により、自己の個人データの削除を求める権利
     * 状況により、自己の個人データの処理の限定を求める権利
     * お客様の個人データの処理及び利用に対する同意の全部または一部を撤回する権利
     * 一般的に、整理された、機械的に読み取ることができる方法で事故の個人データのコピーを取得する権利
     * アウトブレインのデータ保持及びお客様の個人データの処理に関する質問、コメント、要求、又は苦情がある場合に、アウトブレインのData
       Protection Officerと連絡する権利
     * 規則に違反した個人データの処理が行われていると信じる場合の監督機関に対する苦情申し立ての権利

   上記に加えてこのプライバシーポリシーに欧州市民の権利が参照されます。GDPRに応じて、「欧州市民」とは、欧州経済領域及びスイス連邦を意味します
   。このプライバシーポリシーにおいては、「欧州」とは、ブレグジット以降イギリスが欧州連合から脱退した後でもイギリスを含むものとします。
   上記の権利についてお問い合わせがある場合、PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com までご連絡ください。
   ６．カリフォルニア州のプライバシーポリシー
   +
   カリフォルニア州住民は、カリフォルニア州の民法1798.83
   及び1798.84号により、アウトブレインに、アウトブレインがダイレクトマーケティングできるように第三者又は関連会社と共有する個人データのカテ
   ゴリーが記載された通知書の発行を求める権利があります。その通知書には共有される情報が特定され、また共有する第三者及び関連会社、その第三者及び関
   連会社の住所が含まれます。お客様がカリフォルニア州住民の場合、この通知書を取得するためには
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.comまでご連絡ください。又は次の住所までご連絡ください。
   Outbrain Inc.
   39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor
   New York, NY 10011
   応答のために30日間かかりますのでご了承ください。
   ７．「Do Not Track」の開示
   +
   ブラウザによって「Do Not Track」（以下「DNT
   」という）の信号が通信されます。アウトブレインは、DNT信号に関して一般的な解読がないため、現在ブラウザからの DNT
   信号に対応していません。アウトブレインは、DNT 信号に関する業界活動を監視し、必要性に応じて DNT 活動を更新します。
   お客様は、アウトブレインがユーザーのところにおいて パーソナルレコメンデーションからオプトアウトすること
   も含む他の提供されるツールを利用してデータ収集及び利用を管理することができます。
   ８．プライバシーポリシーの更新
   +
   アウトブレインはこのプライバシーポリシーを随時更新します。アウトブレインはサイト訪問者又はビジネスパートナーがこれを明確に知ることができるよう
   変更のお知らせをサイト上で表示しますが、ユーザーに対し個別に通知をする方法を有していません。アウトブレインは、お客様ご自身でプライバシーポリシ
   ーの更新を確認するため、このページを定期的に閲覧されるようお願いいたします。プライバシーポリシーの更新日付は、お客様にこのプライバシーポリシー
   がいつ更新されたのかをご確認いただけるように、常にこのページの上において表示されます。

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                 Última atualização: 23 de maio de 2018

   A Outbrain tem o compromisso de proteger seus dados pessoais. Esta
   política de privacidade (“Política de Privacidade”) rege o uso pela
   Outbrain dos dados coletados por nós, incluindo todos e quaisquer dados
   pessoais. Dados pessoais são informações relacionadas a você e que
   podem identificá-lo como indivíduo. Usamos seus dados pessoais
   cumprindo todas as leis aplicáveis. Para garantir a conformidade e o
   alinhamento aos valores da Outbrain de confiança e transparência, temos
   uma equipe de especialistas responsável por implementar continuamente o
   nosso programa global de privacidade.

                                                              + EXPAND ALL

   1. Quem somos, o que fazemos, como contatar a Outbrain, nosso DPO ou as
   autoridades competentes

                                      +

   Quem somos:
   Outbrain representa a Outbrain Inc., empresa de Delaware, EUA com sede
   em Nova York; e suas subsidiárias afiliadas (coletivamente denominadas
   “Outbrain” ou “nós”, “nos”, “nosso(as)”). Operamos a partir de 12
   escritórios globalmente e trabalhamos em parceria com editores de
   conteúdo e marketing do mundo todo.
   O que fazemos:
   A missão da Outbrain é oferecer recomendações interessantes aos seus
   Usuários com base nos seus interesses. Para cumprir nossa missão,
   firmamos acordos com:
     * Produtores e editores de conteúdo on-line e parceiros que desejam
       recomendar conteúdo relevante aos seus leitores (no Outbrain
       Engage); e
     * anunciantes que desejam que leitores visualizem seu conteúdo (no
       Outbrain Amplify).

   Como nos contatar:
   Fazemos verificações regulares de conformidade com base nesta Política
   de Privacidade. Perguntas, comentários e solicitações relacionados a
   esta Política de Privacidade são bem-vindos e devem ser encaminhados a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou via correio a Outbrain Inc., 39 West
   13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, USA, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Caso a Outbrain não forneça resposta satisfatória para suas perguntas
   ou preocupações, também é possível contatar o seguinte departamento
   para orientações, suporte ou reclamações:
     * responsável externa Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) da Outbrain:
       ePrivacy GmbH, representada pelo Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. A
       ePrivacy GmbH pode ser contatada diretamente via
       privacy@eprivacy.eu; e/ou
     * o órgão público britânico Information Commissioner’s Officer, que é
       o principal serviço supervisor da Outbrain nos Territórios
       Europeus.

   Órgãos de autorregulação
   A Outbrain segue os Princípios de Autorregulação definidos pela Digital
   Advertising Alliance (DAA) e pela European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Somos membros conceituados da Network
   Advertising Initiative (NAI), associação dedicada à coleta responsável
   de dados e ao seu uso para publicidade digital. Seguimos o Code of
   Conduct for Web and Mobile (Código de Conduta para Web e Internet
   Móvel) da NAI. A Outbrain também segue os Self-Regulatory Principles
   for Online Behavioral Advertising (Princípios de Autorregulação para
   Publicidade Comportamental On-line) e o Europe OBA Framework do
   Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB).
   2. Tipos de usuários da Outbrain

                                      +

   Parte desta Política de Privacidade está dividida em seções baseadas no
   seu modo de interagir com a Outbrain portanto é necessário definir em
   qual tipo de usuário você se encaixa. Para cada tipo de usuário,
   explicamos que tipo de informação coletamos e por que, quais cookies e
   outras tecnologias similares usamos, como compartilhamos essas
   informações e quais são os seus direitos.
   Visitantes do Site: Você é um “Visitante do Site” ao visitar e
   interagir com nossos websites, páginas na web, recursos interativos,
   blogs e seus respectivos conteúdos no Outbrain.com (ou qualquer página
   derivada, como Outbrain.co.uk; Outbrain.fr; Outbrain.de, etc.) e no
   MyOutbrain.com (“Nossos Sites“). Veja mais aqui.
   (a)&Tab;Quais informações coletamos e por quê
   Queremos entender quais serviços nos Nossos Sites interessam a você e
   lembrá-lo dos serviços que oferecemos quando você não está nos Nossos
   Sites. Para fazê-lo, coletamos as seguintes informações suas: (i)
   endereço IP; (ii) dados do Agente do Usuário: tipo de dispositivo (ex.:
   iPhone), tipo de navegador (ex.: Chrome), sistema operacional (ex.:
   iOS); (iii) páginas visitadas no Nosso Site (ex.: página “Sobre nós” da
   Outbrain); (iv) horário da visita (e respectivo fuso horário); e (v)
   URLs de encaminhamento e outras informações normalmente transmitidas em
   solicitações HTTP (ex.: essas informações nos dizem como você chegou
   aos Nossos Sites).
   (b)&Tab;Quais cookies e outras tecnologias similares utilizamos
   Consulte esta Tabela de Cookies em “Visitantes do Site” para uma lista
   detalhada dos cookies (e os respectivos períodos de retenção) que
   usamos quando você visita os Nossos Sites.
   (c)&Tab;Como podemos compartilhar informações
     * Compartilhamento de informações que coletamos sobre você nos Nossos
       Sites.

   De maneira geral, não compartilhamos dados pessoais seus com terceiros
   para fins de marketing ou publicidade de terceiros. No entanto,
   recorremos a vários terceiros (todos listados nesta Tabela de Cookies)
   para nos ajudar a vender ou fazer publicidade para você. Por exemplo:
   alguns dos cookies que usamos nos Nossos Sites pertencem a terceiros
   que ajudarão a Outbrain a vender ou fazer publicidade para você.
   Exigimos que esses terceiros e empresas se comprometam a manter
   confidenciais todas as informações compartilhadas com eles e a usar as
   informações somente para cumprir suas obrigações conosco. Fazemos isso
   firmando acordos com todos os terceiros que processam dados pessoais em
   nosso nome para garantir que eles processem seus dados pessoais em
   conformidade com nossas instruções exatas e com todas as leis de
   proteção de dados aplicáveis. Se você publicar em nosso blog, seu
   comentário e suas informações ficarão visíveis publicamente. Entre em
   contato com support@outbrain.com para solicitar a remoção do seu
   comentário.
     * Usando serviços de terceiros nos Nossos Sites.

   Nossos Sites contêm links para outros websites que não operamos nem são
   de nossa propriedade. Não controlamos, recomendamos ou endossamos o
   conteúdo, os produtos, serviços, políticas de privacidade ou práticas
   desses websites de terceiros. Por exemplo: nos Nossos Sites, você
   notará ícones clicáveis que o levam à página da Outbrain no Facebook ou
   no LinkedIn. Ao escolher clicar nesses links, você deve estar ciente de
   que Facebook e LinkedIn podem enviar seus próprios cookies ao seu
   aparelho, que podem coletar dados pessoais de maneira independente. Por
   isso, é importante que você leia as políticas de privacidade do
   Facebook e/ou LinkedIn.
     * Consulte também a seção de Compartilhamento desta Política de
       Privacidade.

   (d)&Tab;Seus direitos
   Os Termos de Uso no Nosso Site regem o uso do Nosso Site e também se
   aplicam a você. Você pode interromper o uso do Nosso Site a qualquer
   momento. Ao fazê-lo, também tem a opção de remover quaisquer cookies
   que tenhamos colocado em qualquer dispositivo usado para acessar o
   Nosso Site. Se você forneceu seu endereço de e-mail durante o uso dos
   Nossos Sites, todos os e-mails que você receber da Outbrain incluirão a
   opção de se “descadastrar”.
   Para Visitantes no Território Europeu, a Outbrain implementou uma
   plataforma de gestão de consentimento (operada pela One Trust) nos
   Nossos Sites que dá aos visitantes a oportunidade de autorizar ou não
   cookies e tecnologias similares de rastreamento nos Nossos Sites. Se
   você não deu seu consentimento (especificamente em “aceitar”), a
   Outbrain não permitirá que Nosso Site instale cookies. A base legal da
   Outbrain para processar dados pessoais em Nossos Sites é o
   consentimento. Você pode retirar seu consentimento a qualquer momento
   aqui.
   Usuários: Você é um “Usuário” ao visitar uma página de um website ou
   aplicativo de um dos parceiros da Outbrain onde o widget da Outbrain
   esteja instalado (“Sites Parceiros”). Por exemplo, ao visitar
   https://news.sky.com/uk, www.spiegel.de ou www.cnn.com, o widget
   Outbrain está implementado nesses sites. Ao interagir com um widget da
   Outbrain, você é informado por um texto que faz referência à Outbrain
   (ex.: “Recomendado pela Outbrain” ou “by Outbrain” ao lado das
   recomendações). Ao clicar no link que faz referência à Outbrain, você
   verá um aviso detalhado que permite acessar o Perfil de Interesse da
   Outbrain, que fornece uma visualização geral dos tipos de categorias de
   dados da Outbrain que podem ser usados para fazer suas recomendações.
   Ele também permite optar por recusar recomendações personalizadas. Veja
   mais aqui.
   Exemplo de widget da Outbrain
   [S1q4BIXJQ.png]
   (a) Quais informações coletamos e por quê
   Usamos UUIDs, endereço IP e outras Informações de Uso para poder lhe
   oferecer recomendações interessantes. As recomendações da Outbrain
   podem ser pagas por um anunciante que redireciona você para um novo
   website ou podem ser orgânicas, com link para outra página no site do
   mesmo anunciante.
     * UUID.

   Quando, como usuário, você visita pela primeira vez um Site Parceiro
   (ex.: CNN.com), a Outbrain instala um cookie no seu dispositivo para
   gerar um UUID (identificador único de usuário). Nós catalogamos e
   analisamos o conteúdo que você consome nos Sites Parceiros. Nossas
   recomendações baseiam-se em: (i) histórico de navegação; (ii) padrões
   de navegação similares de outros Usuários; (ii) recomendações
   geralmente populares entre o público da Outbrain atualmente; (iv) um
   certo grau de aleatoriedade; e (v) requisitos de público-alvo que podem
   ser fornecidos ou solicitados por nossos clientes Amplify. Por exemplo,
   a Outbrain pode saber que o UUID 123 (que poderia ser você no seu
   iPhone X acessando o jornal Guardian usando o Chrome como navegador)
   gosta de ler sobre destinos de férias remotos e que pessoas que gostam
   de ler sobre destinos de férias remotos também gostam de ler sobre
   comida exótica.
   O UUID é uma sequência de números e/ou letras. Esse UUID vincula-se ao
   seu dispositivo e varia conforme o navegador que você usa. Em outras
   palavras, a Outbrain registra um UUID diferente dependendo do aparelho
   e/ou navegador que você está usando ao acessar os Sites Parceiros. Por
   exemplo, isso significa que você terá um UUID quando visitar um Site
   Parceiro a partir do seu celular usando o navegador Safari e outro UUID
   ao visitar um Site Parceiro do seu iPad usando o navegador Safari. A
   Outbrain combinará e consolidará o UUID de um aparelho móvel (celular
   ou tablet) por um navegador que depois acessa um aplicativo (ou
   vice-versa) a partir do mesmo dispositivo.
   Atribuir um UUID permite à Outbrain associar as visualizações das
   páginas visitadas e cliques nas recomendações da Outbrain desse UUID –
   tudo com o objetivo de fornecer recomendações interessantes.
     * Endereço IP e outras Informações de Uso.

   Coletamos um UUID conforme explicado acima e ainda as seguintes
   informações: (i) endereço IP (depois anonimizado com base nos padrões
   do setor); (ii) dados do Agente do Usuário: tipo de dispositivo (ex.:
   iPhone), tipo de navegador (ex.: Chrome), sistema operacional (ex.:
   iOS); (iii) páginas visitadas; (iv) horário da visita; e (v) URLs de
   encaminhamento e outras informações normalmente transmitidas em
   solicitações HTTP.
   As informações estatísticas acima nos fornecem dados de como muitos
   Usuários visitaram determinada página dos nossos Sites Parceiros que
   tem o widget da Outbrain instalado, quanto tempo cada Usuário ficou
   nessa página, o tipo de conteúdo na página em que clicou e como foi seu
   engajamento geral com a página em questão. Essas informações só são
   dados pessoais quando associadas a um UUID.
   (b) Quais cookies e outras tecnologias similares utilizamos
   Consulte esta Tabela de Cookies em “Usuários” para uma lista detalhada
   dos cookies internos que usamos quando você interage com Sites
   Parceiros que tenham a tecnologia Outbrain implementada.
   Ao clicar no link para uma das nossas recomendações, o anunciante
   Amplify que patrocina a recomendação pode instalar cookies no seu
   aparelho via redirecionamentos antes da chegada à página de destino das
   recomendações ou ao chegar à página de destino. Nesses casos, você
   estará sujeito à política de privacidade desse anunciante.
   Além do widget visível em Sites Parceiros da Outbrain, determinados
   anunciantes Outbrain podem implementar o pixel Outbrain nos seus
   websites. O pixel Outbrain determina se o usuário que acessa a página
   na qual o pixel está instalado possui um UUID Outbrain. Se houver um
   UUID associado a esse usuário final, a Outbrain permitirá que
   anunciantes redirecionem sua publicidade a esses UUIDs e/ou fornecerá
   aos anunciantes o número total de UUIDs que acessaram a página em
   questão. Se não houver UUID Outbrain associado ao usuário que visitou a
   página, o pixel Outbrain não coletará nenhuma informação sobre o
   usuário. Encorajamos anunciantes a comunicar o uso do pixel Outbrain
   nos seus próprios websites. A Outbrain não combina informações do pixel
   a perfis UUID.
   Pontos de dados como visualizações de páginas e cliques são vinculados
   a um UUID particular e mantidos por 13 meses. Por exemplo: se o UUID
   123 leu um artigo em 31 de dezembro de 2017, em 1º de fevereiro de 2018
   esse artigo deixará de fazer parte do perfil UUID 123.
   (c) Como podemos compartilhar informações
   A Outbrain não compartilha perfis de Usuário com nenhum terceiro.
   Contudo, podemos compartilhar o UUID com determinados parceiros para
   fins de sincronização de cookies ou com base em requisitos técnicos.
   Consulte também a seção de Compartilhamento desta Política de
   Privacidade.
   (d) Seus direitos
     * Recusa à Outbrain.

   Você pode optar por recusar as recomendações personalizadas da Outbrain
   a qualquer momento. Consulte o Perfil de Interesse da Outbrain para uma
   visualização geral dos dados que a Outbrain conhece a seu respeito e
   pode usar para fazer suas recomendações. O Perfil de Interesse também
   permite optar por recusar recomendações personalizadas (você também
   pode fazer a recusa simplesmente clicando aqui). Note que a recusa nos
   navegadores é feita pelo Perfil de Interesse da Outbrain, mas que a
   recusa de recomendações personalizadas em aplicativos é feita pelas
   configurações do seu dispositivo (veja exemplos de passo a passo no
   Perfil de Interesse).
   IMPORTANTE – mesmo fazendo a recusa à Outbrain:
     * Você ainda verá recomendações da Outbrain. Recusar o rastreamento
       para personalização da Outbrain não significa que você deixará de
       receber recomendações da Outbrain. Em vez disso, significa que as
       recomendações da Outbrain não serão personalizadas. As
       recomendações ainda usarão informações sobre o documento que você
       está visualizando (ou seja, informações contextuais) para lhe
       fornecer recomendações na página em questão.
     * A recusa baseia-se em cookies e é específica para cada
       dispositivo/navegador. Se você navegar na internet em diferentes
       dispositivos e/ou navegadores, você precisará fazer a recusa em
       cada aparelho e/ou navegador para que possamos impedir o
       rastreamento para personalização em todos eles. Pela mesma razão,
       se você comprar um novo dispositivo, mudar de navegador ou excluir
       (ou limpar) o cookie de recusa, será necessário fazer a recusa
       novamente. Recusar o rastreamento para personalização não significa
       bloquear cookies.
     * Para garantir a exclusão do perfil vinculado ao seu UUID, não
       exclua seu cookie de recusa da Outbrain por ao menos 21 dias. Sua
       recusa às recomendações personalizadas da Outbrain entra em vigor
       imediatamente. No entanto, se o seu navegador permite armazenamento
       local e você aceitar novamente as recomendações personalizadas da
       Outbrain dentro de 21 dias após sua recusa, é possível que seu
       perfil anterior seja revinculado ao seu UUID. Se você não fizer
       nova aceitação dentro de 21 dias, seu perfil será excluído e não
       poderá ser recuperado.
     * Como acontece na maioria das recusas, a recusa à Outbrain no
       navegador é feita usando um cookie. O cookie de recusa é feito para
       ser mantido, a fim de cumprir as preferências do usuário. No
       entanto, o recurso de “Prevenção de Rastreamento Inteligente” do
       Safari no iOS 11 pode impactar na persistência dos cookies entre
       websites após uma janela de 24 horas. Sugerimos usar outro
       navegador ou bloquear todos os cookies de terceiros do navegador
       para que você faça a recusa sem precisar depender de nenhuma
       metodologia de recusa de nenhuma empresa.
     * Opções adicionais de recusa.

   Você também pode optar por recusar receber anúncios personalizados
   oferecidos por nós ou outras empresas de publicidade usando ferramentas
   de entidades do setor, como as páginas da NAI ou as diversas páginas
   baseadas na DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
   www.youradchoices.ca/choices e/ou EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
   Visitando as páginas da NAI, DAA, DAAC ou EDAA pró-escolha do
   consumidor permite recusar todos ou alguns dos serviços dos membros
   participantes. Como ocorre na recusa junto à Outbrain, essas recusas
   não significam que você deixará de receber todos os anúncios: eles só
   deixarão de ser sob medida para você. Você pode continuar a receber
   anúncios; por exemplo, com base no website específico que você está
   visualizando (ou seja, anúncios baseados no contexto). E se os seus
   navegadores estiverem configurados para rejeitar cookies quando você
   visitar as páginas pró-escolha do consumidor da DAA, DAAC ou EDAA, a
   recusa também pode não funcionar corretamente.
     * Bases legais.

   Os fundamentos legais da Outbrain para processar dados pessoais de
   Usuários apoiam-se nas bases legais determinadas por cada um dos nossos
   Sites Parceiros. Cada Site Parceiro baseia-se em consentimento ou
   interesse legítimo. Consulte a política de privacidade aplicável dos
   Sites Parceiros para mais informações sobre as bases legais utilizadas.
   Se um Parceiro se basear no seu consentimento, a Outbrain não instalará
   um cookie nos seus aparelhos sem que você tenha dado seu consentimento
   no respectivo Site Parceiro.
   Parceiros Comerciais: Você é um “Parceiro Comercial” ao se cadastrar
   (ou trocar e-mails com a Outbrain) em nome da empresa para a qual
   trabalha para utilizar os serviços Outbrain Amplify ou Outbrain Engage.
   Veja mais aqui.
   (a) Quais informações coletamos e por quê
   Você pode fornecer determinados dados pessoais (como endereço de
   e-mail) ao se inscrever para os serviços Amplify ou Engage ou se
   comunicar ou interagir conosco por outros meios. Se você se inscrever
   para se tornar Parceiro Comercial, podemos solicitar informações
   adicionais suas via formulários de inscrição para anunciante, pedidos
   de inserção e outros meios. Coletamos informações automaticamente sobre
   as ações do seu nome de usuário no painel da Outbrain. Por exemplo, se
   como Parceiro Comercial Amplify você alterar o custo por clique de uma
   de suas campanhas, o registro de auditoria da Outbrain terá o histórico
   de todas essas ações.
   Coletamos e processamos os dados pessoais acima para cumprir nossas
   obrigações nos termos do nosso acordo como Parceiro Comercial (ou
   potencial Parceiro Comercial) seu, inclusive para:
   responder às suas perguntas e solicitações;
   fornecer acesso a determinadas funções e recursos dos nossos serviços
   Amplify ou Engage (ex.: para fornecimento e manutenção da sua conta no
   painel);
   verificar sua identidade;
   nos comunicar com você sobre sua conta, nossos produtos e promoções
   disponíveis relevantes para o seu uso do serviço Amplify ou Engage.
   (b) Quais cookies e outras tecnologias similares utilizamos
   Consulte esta Tabela de Cookies em “Parceiros Comerciais” para uma
   lista detalhada dos cookies (e os respectivos períodos de retenção) que
   usamos com Parceiros Comerciais.
   (c) Como podemos compartilhar informações
   Podemos revelar determinadas informações de Parceiros Comerciais a
   fornecedores, prestadores de serviços ou outros que auxiliem a Outbrain
   na prestação dos seus serviços (ex.: processamento de cartões de
   crédito). Consulte também a seção de Compartilhamento desta Política de
   Privacidade.
   (d) Seus direitos
   Se, como Parceiro Comercial, você deseja verificar, corrigir, atualizar
   ou solicitar desativação das suas informações, você pode acessar o
   painel da Outbrain para editar suas preferências de perfil ou nos
   contatar em support@outbrain.com. Se você está recebendo e-mails da
   Outbrain, você pode se “descadastrar” acessando o link nos e-mails.
   Observe que o descadastramento pode não desativar o recebimento de
   notificações importantes para o fornecimento dos serviços Amplify ou
   Engage (ex.: faturas por e-mail).
   A base legal da Outbrain para processar dados pessoais dos Parceiros
   Comerciais é o seu interesse legítimo.
   3. Como mantemos a segurança das informações, transferências fora do
   EEE, compartilhamento e períodos de retenção

                                      +

   Segurança
   A Outbrain possui uma equipe de segurança dedicada. Mantemos rigorosos
   controles sobre os dados que coletamos, mantendo-os em bancos de dados
   protegidos com firewall e permissões de acesso estritamente limitadas e
   controladas, para garantir sua segurança. Verifique nossos padrões de
   segurança para mais informações.
   Parceiros Comerciais têm acesso a certos recursos protegidos por senha
   dos serviços Amplify ou Engage. Eles são responsáveis por manter sua
   senha confidencial. Lembre-se que, infelizmente, a transmissão de
   informações via internet não é totalmente segura. Um tipo de fraude
   comum na internet é conhecido como spoofing ou phishing. Ele ocorre
   quando você recebe um e-mail de uma fonte que parece legítima
   solicitando dados pessoais seus. Tenha em mente que não lhe mandaremos
   nenhum e-mail solicitando a verificação de cartão de crédito,
   informações bancárias ou quaisquer outros dados pessoais. Se você vier
   a receber um e-mail que pareça ser nosso solicitando essas informações
   suas, não responda e não clique em nenhum link constante no e-mail. Em
   vez disso, pedimos que nos encaminhe o e-mail para legal@outbrain.com
   para que possamos investigar possíveis casos de fraude pela internet.
   Transferências de dados fora da UE/do EEE
   Quando transferimos dados pessoais do Espaço Econômico Europeu a outros
   países nos quais as leis aplicáveis não oferecem o mesmo nível de
   proteção à privacidade dos dados que nos Territórios Europeus, tomamos
   medidas para fornecer um nível adequado de proteção à privacidade dos
   dados. Em outras palavras, seus direitos e proteções são conservados
   com seus dados. Por exemplo: usamos cláusulas contratuais aprovadas e
   outras medidas criadas para garantir que os receptores dos seus dados
   pessoais os protejam.
   Compartilhamento
   Adicionalmente à descrição de como podemos revelar seus dados pessoais
   para cada tipo de usuário, também podemos divulgar dados pessoais nos
   seguintes casos:
     * Dentro do grupo de empresas controladas pela Outbrain, por razões
       internas, principalmente para fins comerciais e operacionais;
     * Se passarmos por uma transição comercial, como uma fusão, aquisição
       por outra empresa ou venda total ou parcial dos nossos ativos, seus
       dados pessoais provavelmente estarão entre os ativos transferidos;
     * Quando legalmente exigido (ex.: para cooperar com investigações
       para aplicação da lei ou outros procedimentos legais); e/ou
     * Para reagir a emergências reais.

   Adicionalmente, combinamos seus dados pessoais aos dos outros usuários
   para compartilhar informações sobre tendências e reunir estatísticas de
   usuários com terceiros, sempre de forma agregada e anonimizada.
   Retenção de dados
   O período de retenção para cada um dos cookies usados pela Outbrain
   (seja por ela mesma ou em nosso nome por terceiros) está descrito na
   Tabela de Cookies.
   A Outbrain também mantém uma Política de Retenção de Dados que detalha
   o período de retenção de dados pessoais com base em nossa análise do
   prazo razoável em que é necessário manter cada dado específico para
   fins legais ou comerciais. Quando não precisamos mais dos dados
   pessoais, os excluímos ou destruímos com segurança. Dados agregados,
   que não são capazes de identificar um dispositivo/navegador (ou
   indivíduo) e são usados para fins de relatórios e análise, são mantidos
   enquanto comercialmente necessários.
   4. Crianças

                                      +

   Nenhum dos nossos serviços é destinado a crianças menores de 16 anos.
   Não coletamos deliberadamente dados pessoais de menores de 16 anos de
   idade. Se durante a coleta constatarmos que um Visitante do Site,
   Usuário ou Parceiro Comercial é menor de 16 anos, não usaremos ou
   manteremos seus dados pessoais. Se tomarmos ciência de que
   involuntariamente coletamos dados pessoais de uma criança menor de 16
   anos, tomaremos medidas razoáveis para excluir tais informações dos
   nossos registros. Se você é criança, pedimos que vá brincar no quintal
   em vez de usar ou interagir com a Outbrain!
   5. Cidadãos do Território Europeu

                                      +

   Em conformidade com as leis de privacidade europeias, especialmente com
   o Regulamento Geral de Proteção de Dados da União Europeia (RGPD), a
   Outbrain fornece direitos adicionais específicos a cidadãos dos
   Territórios Europeus, como o direito de acesso, retificação,
   contestação, reclamação, exclusão e bloqueio. Mais especificamente:
     * o direito de perguntar se ou quais dados pessoais estão sendo
       processados por nós e o direito de solicitar que os dados pessoais
       sejam corrigidos ou alterados;
     * em determinadas circunstâncias, o direito de solicitar a exclusão
       de dados pessoais;
     * em determinadas circunstâncias, o direito de exigir restrições no
       processamento de dados pessoais;
     * o direito de cancelar seu consentimento para processamento e uso
       dos seus dados, total ou parcialmente e a qualquer momento, com
       validade para o futuro;
     * o direito de receber seus dados pessoais em formato comum,
       estruturado e mecanicamente legível;
     * o direito de contatar nosso responsável pela proteção dos dados se
       tiver perguntas, comentários, reclamações ou solicitações
       relacionadas à nossa declaração sobre proteção de dados e o
       processamento dos seus dados pessoais;
     * o direito de reclamar à autoridade supervisora responsável caso
       acredite que o processamento dos seus dados pessoais está violando
       a legislação.

   Além dos itens acima, relacionamos determinados direitos para cdadãos
   do Território Europeu ao longo desta Política de Privacidade. Nos
   termos do RGPD, são considerados “Territórios Europeus” o Espaço
   Econômico Europeu (EEE) e a Suíça. Para os fins desta Política de
   Privacidade, o termo “Territórios Europeus” deve continuar a incluir o
   Reino Unido mesmo após sua retirada do Espaço Econômico Europeu em
   decorrência do Brexit.
   Em caso de perguntas sobre o exercício de quaisquer dos direitos acima,
   envie um e-mail a privacyquestions@outbrain.com.
   6. Direitos de privacidade da Califórnia

                                      +

   Conforme o Código Civil da Califórnia, EUA, nos termos das seções
   1798.83–1798.84, os residentes da Califórnia têm direito de nos
   solicitar uma notificação que descreva quais categorias de informações
   pessoais compartilhamos com terceiros ou afiliados corporativos para os
   fins de marketing direto desses terceiros ou afiliados corporativos.
   Essa notificação identificará as categorias de informações
   compartilhadas e incluirá uma lista dos terceiros e afiliados com os
   quais foram compartilhadas, junto com os respectivos nomes e endereços.
   Se você é residente da Califórnia e gostaria de receber uma cópia dessa
   notificação, envie sua solicitação por escrito a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou ao seguinte endereço: Outbrain Inc.,
   39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, USA. Pedimos que
   aguarde 30 dias para a resposta.
   7. Comunicazione antitracciamento (“Do Not Track”)

                                      +

   Alguns navegadores transmitem sinais Do Not Track (DNT), ou Não
   Rastrear, aos websites. Como não há consenso sobre como interpretar o
   sinal DNT, a Outbrain atualmente não altera, modifica ou responde a
   solicitações ou sinais DNT desses navegadores. Continuaremos a
   monitorar a atuação do setor nesse âmbito e reavaliaremos nossas
   práticas relacionadas a DNT se necessário. Enquanto isso, você pode
   utilizar as várias outras ferramentas que fornecemos para controlar a
   coleta e o uso de dados, incluindo a possibilidade de optar por recusar
   o recebimento de recomendações personalizadas na seção Usuários.
   8. Como esta Política de Privacidade pode mudar

                                      +

   De tempos em tempos, podemos fazer alterações nesta Política de
   Privacidade. Nesse caso, colocaremos um aviso em destaque, visível para
   você como Visitante do Site ou Parceiro Comercial. Contudo, não temos
   meios para alertar Usuários sobre atualizações. Recomendamos que você
   verifique aqui periodicamente se a Política de Privacidade foi
   atualizada. Sempre exibiremos a data da última alteração da Política de
   Privacidade no topo da página, para que você saiba a última vez em que
   foi revisada.

Cookies

Version 4.4

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   OUTBRAIN'S COOKIE TABLE
   This Cookie Table provides you with information about the cookies and
   other similar technologies Outbrain and/or its partners may use, their
   purpose and the retention period associated with such cookie. Where a
   third party partner drops a cookie, they determine the purpose for
   which that cookie is dropped and the relevant retention period.
   We may place cookies or similar files such as pixel tags and web
   beacons on the devices you use to engage with Outbrain for security
   purposes, to facilitate site navigation and to personalize your
   experience when you engage with Outbrain as a Site Vistior, a User or a
   Business Partner. Cookies allow us to collect technical and
   navigational information, such as browser type, time spent by you
   engaging with Outbrain and pages visited. Please read the Privacy
   Policy to further understand how we use data collected by these
   cookies.
   For even more information about cookies, we recommend visiting:
   https://cookies.insites.com/about-cookies/
   Users
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same page
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Site Visitors
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Unbounce

     Ubvt

     Ubvs

     ubpv
   These cookies are associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.

     3 days

     3 days

     5 months
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It is variation of the _gat cookie
   which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by Google on high
   traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Google Univesral Analytics
     * _ga
     * _gid

     This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports.

     This cookie is associated with Google Universal Analytics. No
   information is available from Google however, it appears to store and
   update a unique value for each page visited.
     * 2 years
     * a day

   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar. It uniquely identifies a visitor during a single browser
   session and indicates they are included in an audience sample.
   Session
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Piwik
     * _pk_id*
     * _pk_ses*

   These cookies are set by Piwiki and are used to help website owners
   track visitor behaviour and measure site performance. They are a
   pattern type cookie, where the prefix is followed by a short series of
   numbers and letters, which is believed to be a reference code for the
   domain setting the cookie.
     * 1 year
     * 24 minutes

   Kissmetrics

     km_lv

     km_uq

     km_ai
   These cookies are set by Kissmetrics analytics service. They are used
   to provide site owners with information about how visitors use the
   site.
   5 years
   Bing
     * MUIDB
     * MUID

   This domain is owned by Mircosoft - it is the site for the search
   engine Bing.
   a year
   JSESSIONID
   This domain is controlled by New Relic, which provides a platform for
   monitoring the performance of web and mobile applications.
   Session
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   obuid
   This cookie is used to hold an anonymous user's ID. IT is used for
   tracking user actions.
   3 months
   c
   This domain is owned by IPONWEB and is used to provide a real time
   bidding platform for online advertising.
   1 year
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   1 year
   TheTradeDesk
     * TDID
     * TDCPM

   This domain is owned by TheTradeDesk. The main business activity is: Ad
   Serving Platform
   1 year
   _uv_id
   This domain is owned by LinkedIn. It is used to provide services for
   embedding slide presentations into websites. Information collected via
   cookies on this domain can also be used for targeted advertising
   purposes.
   2 years
   YouTube
     * HSID
     * Demographics
     * VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
     * PREF
     * LOGIN_INFO
     * GPS
     * YSC

   YouTube collects user data through videos embedded in websites, which
   is aggregated with profile data from other Google services in order to
   display targeted advertising to web visitors. These cookies are:
     * Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user
       account and most recent login time
     * Used for demographic profiling and targeting for advertising
     * This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of
       videos
     * Stores user preference, can be used to personalise ads on google
       searches
     * Used for targeted advertising to web visitors across a broad range
       of their own and other websites.

     1 year

     1 year

     1 month

     5 years

     2 years

     a month

     Session
   Linkedin
     * BizoID
     * Lidc
     * __utmv
     * __utmz
     * __utmb
     * __utmt
     * Bcookie
     * Lang
     * __utma
     * SERVERID
     * language
     * bscookie__qca
     * __qca
     * __utmc
     * UserMatchHistory
     * visit

   These cookies are associated with Linkedin It typically acts as a third
   party host where website owners have placed one of its content sharing
   buttons in their pages, although its content and services can be
   embedded in other ways. Although such buttons add functionality to the
   website they are on, cookies are set regardless of whether or not the
   visitor has an active Linkedin profile, or agreed to their terms and
   conditions. For this reason it is classified as a primarily
   tracking/targeting domain.

     30 days

     1 month

     8 months

     6 months

     21 minutes

     a few seconds

     8 months

     Session

     2 years

     Session

     Session

     8 months

     2 months

     Session

     2 days

     8 months

   Facebook

     datr

     fr

     lu
   These cookies are owned by Facebook:

     It is not directly tied to individual Facebook the user. It is used
   to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially around
   detection of bots trying to access the service. This cookie is also
   read via Like and other Facebook buttons and tags placed on many
   different websites.

     This is used to serve targeted advertising to its users when logged
   into its services. In 2014 it also started serving up behaviourally
   targeted advertising on other websites, similar to most dedicated
   online marketing companies. Contains browser and user unique ID
   combination, used for targeted advertising.

     This is used to serve targeted advertising to its users when logged
   into its services. In 2014 it also started serving up behaviourally
   targeted advertising on other websites, similar to most dedicated
   online marketing companies. Contains browser and user unique ID
   combination, used for targeted advertising

     1 year

     3 months

     1 year
   Twitter
     * auth_token
     * twll
     * secure_session
     * guest_id
     * personalization_id
     * remember_checked
     * remember_checked_on
     * lang

   This domain is owned by Twitter. The main business activity is: Social
   Networking Services. Where twitter acts as a third party host, it
   collects data through a range of plug-ins and integrations, that is
   primarily used for tracking and targeting.

     15 years

     5 years

     15 years

     a year

     2 years

     5 years

     4 years

     session
   Google
     * APISID
     * SSID
     * NID
     * SAPISID

   This cookies are owned by Google Inc. It uses the data gathered from
   most of these services to profile the interests of web users and sell
   advertising space to organisations based on such interest profiles as
   well as aligning adverts to the content on the pages where its
   customer's adverts appear.

     2 years

     8 months

     5 months

     2 years
   AA003
   This domain is owned by Atlas Solutions which is in turn owned by
   Facebook. Atlas is an online advertising business, targeting users
   through tracking their web activity. From September 2014 the company
   re-launched under the ownership of Facebook, promising the ability to
   reach known users and target adverts based on profiles generated using
   Facebook's user data.
   2 months
   u
   This domain is owned by Aggregate Knowledge, which has been acquired by
   Neustar Inc. Aggregate Knowledge provides a data management platform
   which enables real time targeting and consumer profiling functionality.
   a month
   __cfduid
   This domain is owned by AddToAny. The main business activity is: Social
   Sharing Services and Tracking
   1 year
   rlas3
   This domain is owned by Live Ramp Inc, providers of a platform for
   targeted marketing and profiling.
   1 year
   Bluekai
     * bku
     * bkdc
     * bkpa

   This domain is owned by Blue Kai. The main business activity is:
   Advertising/Audience Targeting
   5 months
   d
   This domain is owned by Quantcast. The main business activity is:
   Market and Audience Segmentation, Targeted advertising services
   2 months
   Adobe Audience Manager
     * demdex
     * dpm

   This domain is owned by Adobe - Audience Manager.
   The main business activity is: Online profiling for targeted marketing
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
     * 6 months
     * 5 months

   tuuid_lu
   This domain is owned by IPONWEB and is used to provide a real time
   bidding platform for online advertising.
   1 year
   Amazon
     * ad-id
     * ad-privacy

   This domain is owned by online retailer Amazon and is used as part of
   its affiliate marketing programme.
     * 8 months
     * 8 months

   Doubleclick
     * id
     * IDE

   This domain is owned by Doubleclick (Google). The main business
   activity is: Doubleclick is Googles real time bidding advertising
   exchange
     * 8 months
     * 2 years

   OnAudience
     * cookie
     * done_redirects161

   This domain is owned by OnAudience. The company provides a range of
   marketing and advertising services.
     * a year
     * a month

   uuid2
   This domain is owned by AppNexus Inc. The company provides a range of
   online advertising technology and services.
   2 months
   pxcr
   This domain is owned by Live Ramp Inc, providers of a platform for
   targeted marketing and profiling.
   a month
   MediaMath
     * uuidc
     * uuid

   This domain is owned by MediaMath Inc. a US based digital advertising
   business.
   a year
   comScore
     * UID
     * UIDR

   This domain is owned by ScorecardResearch (comScore). The main business
   activity is: Advertising. The cookies in this domain have lifespans of
   2 years.
     * a month
     * 2 years

   ruds
   This domain is owned by Rocketfuel. The main business activity is:
   Advertising
   Session
   ab
   This domain is owned by Aggregate Knowledge, which has been acquired by
   Neustar Inc. Aggregate Knowledge provides a data management platform
   which enables real time targeting and consumer profiling functionality.
   Session
   ATN
   This domain is owned by Atlas Solutions which is in turn owned by
   Facebook. Atlas is an online advertising business, targeting users
   through tracking their web activity. From September 2014 the company
   re-launched under the ownership of Facebook, promising the ability to
   reach known users and target adverts based on profiles generated using
   Facebook's user data.
   2 years
   uvc
   This domain is owned by AddToAny. The main business activity is: Social
   Sharing Services and Tracking
   a month
   custom_data
   This domain is owned by BidSwitch. The company provides a range of
   marketing and advertising services.
   10+ years
   eud
   This domain is owned by Rocketfuel. The main business activity is:
   Advertising
   a year
   EE
   This domain is owned by Exelate. The main business activity is:
   Advertising Data Aggregation
   3 months
   _kuid_
   This domain is owned by Krux Digital, a US company providing a data
   management platform which enables real time profiling of visitor
   interests.
   5 months
   pi
   This domain appears to be connected to a company called Bombora, a USA
   based audience targeting and intelligence business.
   a year
   uid
   This domain is owned by Adform. The main business activity is: Real
   time bidding for display advertising to targeted audiences.
   a month
   ud
   This domain is owned by Exelate. The main business activity is:
   Advertising Data Aggregation
   3 months
   tuuid
   This domain is owned by IPONWEB and is used to provide a real time
   bidding platform for online advertising.
   a year
   Quantcast
     * mc
     * d

   This domain is owned by Quantcast. The main business activity is:
   Market and Audience Segmentation, Targeted advertising services
   2 months
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   recs_xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
   This is a pattern type cookie with the root being recs_ and the rest of
   the name being a unique, 32-length alphanumeric string. This cookie is
   used to store recommended documents so that the same document isn't
   recommended twice.
   1 minute or refresh
   ___distillery
   This cookie may be set by the website itself, or by Wistia, to support
   video functionality that may be found throughot the website. In
   addition to keeping track of the website visitor's position in a video
   should playback be interrupted, this cookie also notes user behavior
   regarding the video itself.
   1 year
   Vimeo
     * player
     * vuid

   This domain is owned by Vimeo. The main business activity is: Video
   Hosting/Sharing
     * 1 year
     * 2 years

   Business Partners
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Outbrains Cookie-Tabelle
   In dieser Cookie-Tabelle erhalten Sie verständliche und umfassende
   Informationen über die Cookies und ähnliche Technologien, die wir
   verwenden.
   Gegebenenfalls setzen wir auf den Geräten, die Sie zur Interaktion mit
   Outbrain verwenden, Cookies oder ähnliche Dateien wie Pixel-Tags und
   Web-Beacons, und zwar aus Sicherheitsgründen, zur leichteren
   Website-Navigation und zur Personalisierung Ihrer Erfahrung bei der
   Interaktion mit Outbrain als Websitebesucher, Nutzer oder
   Geschäftspartner. Cookies ermöglichen uns, technische oder für die
   Navigation erforderliche Informationen zu erfassen, beispielsweise
   Browsertyp, die Zeit, die Sie mit der Interaktion mit Outbrain
   verbracht haben, oder die besuchten Seiten. Bitte lesen Sie die
   Datenschutzbestimmungen, damit Sie genauer verstehen, wie wir Daten
   verwenden.
   Nutzer
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Websitebesucher
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Geschäftspartner
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Tabla de cookies de Outbrain
   La presente Tabla de cookies te facilita información clara y completa
   sobre las cookies y otras tecnologías similares que utilizamos.
   Es posible que introduzcamos cookies o archivos similares, como
   etiquetas de píxel y balizas web (web beacons), en los dispositivos que
   utilices para interactuar con Outbrain por motivos de seguridad, para
   facilitar la navegación por el sitio y para personalizar tu experiencia
   cuando interactúes con Outbrain como Visitante del Sitio, Usuario o
   Socio comercial. Las cookies nos permiten recopilar información técnica
   y de navegación, como el tipo de navegador, el tiempo que interactúas
   con Outbrain y las páginas visitadas. Por favor, lee la Política de
   privacidad para entender mejor cómo utilizamos los datos.
   Utenti
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visitantes del sitio
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Socios comerciales
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Table des cookies d’Outbrain
   Cette Table des cookies vous donne des informations claires et
   détaillées sur les cookies et autres technologies similaires que nous
   utilisons.
   Nous sommes susceptibles de déposer des cookies ou autres fichiers
   similaires comme des balises pixel ou des balises Web sur les appareils
   que vous utilisez en lien avec Outbrain pour des raisons de sécurité,
   pour faciliter la navigation dans le site, ou personnaliser votre
   expérience quand vous interagissez avec Outbrain en tant que Visiteur
   du Site, Utilisateur ou Partenaire commercial. Les cookies nous
   permettent de collecter des données techniques et de navigation, comme
   le type de navigateur, le temps passé à interagir avec Outbrain et les
   pages visitées. Veuillez lire la Politique de confidentialité pour
   mieux comprendre comment nous utilisons les cookies suivants.
   Utilisateurs
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visiteurs du site
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Partenaires commerciaux
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Tabella dei cookie di Outbrain
   La presente tabella dei cookie fornisce informazioni chiare complete
   sui cookie e su altre tecnologie simili che utilizziamo.
   Possiamo installare cookie o file analoghi quali pixel tag e web beacon
   sui dispositivi che utilizzi per interagire con Outbrain per finalità
   di sicurezza, per facilitare la navigazione sul sito e per
   personalizzare la tua esperienza quando interagisci con Outbrain in
   veste di Visitatore del sito, Utente o Partner commerciale. I cookie ci
   consentono di raccogliere informazioni tecniche e sulla navigazione,
   quali il tipo di browser, il tempo che hai trascorso interagendo con
   Outbrain e le pagine visitate. Si raccomanda di leggere la politica
   sulla privacy per capire meglio come utilizziamo i dati.
   Utenti
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visitatori del sito
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Partner commerciali
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   TABELA DE COOKIES DA OUTBRAIN
   Esta tabela de cookies fornece informações claras e completas sobre os
   cookies e outras tecnologias similares usadas por nós.
   Podemos instalar cookies ou arquivos similares como pixel tags ou web
   beacons nos aparelhos que você usa para interagir com a Outbrain, por
   fins de segurança, para facilitar a navegação no site e para
   personalizar sua experiência ao interagir com a Outbrain como Visitante
   do Site, Usuário ou Parceiro Comercial. Cookies nos permitem coletar
   informações técnicas e relacionadas à navegação, como tipo de
   navegador, tempo gasto por você na interação com a Outbrain e páginas
   visitadas. Leia a Política de Privacidade para compreender melhor como
   usamos os dados.
   Usuários
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visitantes do Site
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Parceiros Comercials
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

   Interest-Based Ads (and Opt-Out Preferences)Advertising
   GuidelinesPrivacy PolicySecurityPatentsTerms of Use

   Copyright © 2019 Outbrain Inc. All rights reserved.
   Outbrain is a trademark of Outbrain Inc. - IMPRESSUM
     __________________________________________________________________

   Legal Center powered by PactSafe

   Copyright © 2019, Outbrain Inc.
[outbrain-logo.png] Legal Center

   Error

Contracts

     * Engage Terms
     * Privacy Policy
     * Engage Terms
     * Amplify Terms
     * Amplify Terms
     * Cookies
     * Amplify Terms
     * Amplify Terms
     * Engage Terms
     * Engage Terms
     * 3rd Party Targeting Terms
     * Impressum & Nutzungsbedingungen
     * Outbrain Terms of Use
     * LiveRamp Terms
     * Outbrain Health Segment
     * Gambling Terms (United States)
     * Gambling Terms (United Kingdom Only)
     * LiveRamp Terms
     * Data Processing Agreement

   [English (United States)  ]

          Engage Terms
          Amplify Terms
          Terms of Use

Engage Terms

Version 2.4

Effective September 16, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   The following standard partner distribution terms (“Terms”) govern the
   implementation and use of the products, services, and technology made
   available by Outbrain to the Partner identified in a Partner Enrollment
   Form. To the extent that Partner has not yet signed a Partner
   Enrollment form (1) references to “the Agreement” shall be to the Terms
   and (2) these Terms permit the use of the Technology, but no payment
   shall accrue or be made to Partner until such Partner Enrollment Form
   is signed by both Outbrain and Partner.
    1. CERTAIN DEFINITIONS
         1. "Advertiser Recs" means Recommendations (that are not
            Recirculation Recommendations) in the Outbrain network
            submitted by Outbrain’s advertisers.
         2. "Content" means graphical, textual, and/or auditory content
            (which may include text, data, information, photos, images,
            graphics, audio, video or other content).
         3. "Data" means all data collected or generated by Outbrain
            through the Technology, including any reports or other data
            made available to Partner in connection with the Agreement.
         4. "Destination Page" means any webpage or other online location
            that may be accessed by clicking on Recommendations.
         5. "End User" means individual human end users of the Partner
            Site(s).
         6. "Partner Sites" means the web properties, applications or
            platforms identified in the Partner Enrollment Form, together
            with any additional properties on which Partner elects to
            implement the Technology upon prior written approval from
            Outbrain (e-mail will suffice).
         7. "Recirculation Recs" means Recommendations (that are not
            Advertiser Recs) which link to Content on Partner Sites.
         8. "Recommendations" means the display of Content that Outbrain
            delivers to the viewer of a web page, application or platform
            on which the Technology is implemented. For clarity,
            Recommendations may include Advertiser Recs and/or
            Recirculation Recs.
         9. "Revenue" means net revenue generated from Advertiser Recs and
            charged by Outbrain for the display of such Advertiser Recs in
            the Outbrain network.
        10. "Technology" means the Javascript, API, SDK and associated
            protocols provided by Outbrain to Partner that, when
            implemented on Partner Site(s), display one or more
            Recommendation(s) and/or permit users to navigate to
            Destination Pages by clicking on such Recommendations.
    2. TECHNOLOGY; PLACEMENT AND APPEARANCE
         1. Partner shall implement the Technology pursuant to Outbrain’s
            technical instructions, including any implementation guides
            made available by Outbrain, as revised from time to time.
            Outbrain, in its sole discretion, may determine which of
            Outbrain’s available Technology (e.g., JS, API, SDK) shall be
            used in each Partner implementation. Implementations of the
            Technology must appear directly below the main Content on each
            page of the Partner Sites on which the Technology is installed
            or as otherwise mutually agreed in writing (e-mail shall
            suffice).
         2. Partner shall display the Technology in accordance with all
            self-regulatory codes and
            applicable laws and regulations, including with respect to
            disclosing the source or nature of the Recommendations.
            Without limiting the foregoing obligation, Partner agrees to
            comply with Outbrain’s instructions regarding how the
            Technology is to be displayed, labelled or identified.
         3. Outbrain may make updates, modifications or improvements to
            the Technology from time to time in its sole discretion,
            including, but not limited to, adding Ads.txt lines and any
            other similar industry standards from time to time. If
            Outbrain requests Partner to implement any such update,
            Partner will use commercially reasonable efforts to do so
            within thirty (30) days of receipt of same from Outbrain;
            provided, that if Outbrain requests Partner to implement any
            update that Partner reasonably determines would materially and
            adversely affect the performance of the Partner Site(s),
            Partner may elect to cease displaying the Technology on such
            page(s) unless Outbrain either addresses Partner’s concerns to
            its reasonable satisfaction or agrees not to require Partner
            to implement such update.
         4. During the Term, Outbrain shall be Partner's sole and
            exclusive provider of content recommendations, where “content
            recommendations” are one or more links comprised of a headline
            or phrase indicating that an End User will be driven to
            Content (regardless of whether the Destination Page displays
            content, advertorials or advertisements).
         5. Notwithstanding any other provision of the Agreement and
            unless Outbrain provides prior written consent, any
            implementation of the Technology shall include at least one
            (1) link to Advertiser Recs per page (i.e., Partner may not
            use the Technology solely to provide Recirculation Recs).
         6. Outbrain may test changes to the Technology, and based result
            of each testing, Outbrain may make optimisations to the
            Technology if such optimisations may result in increased click
            through rates on Advertiser Recs (as calculated by Outbrain in
            its sole discretion). To the extent that Partner uses the API
            and thus controls any testing, Partner shall comply with such
            testing requests on at least a quarterly basis.
    3. REVENUE & PAYMENT
         1. During the Term, Partner will be paid the percentage of
            Adjusted Gross Revenue indicated on the Partner Enrollment
            Form. Outbrain shall make such payments within a certain
            number of days (as indicated on the Partner Enrollment Form)
            after the end of any calendar month during which Outbrain
            collects Revenue. For the avoidance of doubt, Revenue is net
            of, inter alia, fees for third-party data services integrated
            into Outbrain’s platform, invalid clicks/impressions, and
            advertiser and agency discounts/rebates.
         2. Partner must promptly provide Outbrain completed and accurate
            tax forms and all other similar materials Outbrain requires,
            which may include tax form W-8BEN, W-8BEN-E or W-9 if
            applicable (collectively all such forms and materials, “Tax
            Materials”). Notwithstanding anything set forth to the
            contrary in this Agreement, Outbrain may (a) withhold payments
            owed to Partner hereunder without penalty or late fee until
            Outbrain has received Partner’s Tax Materials, and (b) deduct
            any applicable withholding taxes payable by Outbrain from
            payments owed to Partner by Outbrain hereunder as required by
            law. Once Outbrain has received the Tax Materials, Outbrain
            will use commercially reasonable efforts to pay any amounts
            not paid to Partner pursuant to the foregoing subsection (a)
            as soon as reasonably practicable. All payments to Partner
            shall be subject to withholding for income taxes and similar
            deductions, as required by applicable law.
         3. To ensure proper payment, Partner is responsible for notifying
            Outbrain of accurate contact and payment information. Partner
            is also responsible for any charges assessed by Partner’s bank
            or payment provider. If the amount owed to Partner is less
            than US$50, then the amount owed will be accrued if and until
            the calendar month in which the balance of the payments due to
            Partner exceeds US$50. Any dispute regarding a payment from
            Outbrain must be submitted to Outbrain in writing within
            thirty (30) days of postage or wire transfer date of such
            payment or it shall be deemed waived.
         4. Outbrain may withhold, set off, charge or credit back payments
            to Partner, if Outbrain, in its sole reasonable discretion,
            believes that the performance related to them are fraudulent
            or invalid in nature or if Outbrain was charged or credited
            back by the advertiser. Invalid activity is determined by
            Outbrain in all cases and may include, but is not limited to,
            (i) invalid clicks on or impressions of Advertiser Recs
            generated by any person, bot, automated program or similar
            device, including through any clicks/impressions originating
            from Partner’s IP addresses or computers under Partner’s
            control; (ii) clicks/impressions solicited or generated by
            payment of money, false representation, or requests for End
            Users to click on Advertiser Recs or take other actions; (iii)
            Advertiser Recs served to End Users whose browsers have
            JavaScript disabled; and (iv) clicks/impressions co-mingled
            with a significant amount of the activity described in (i, ii,
            and iii) above.
         5. In addition to Outbrain’s other rights and remedies, Outbrain
            may (i) withhold and offset any payments owed to Partner under
            the Agreement against any fees Partner owes Outbrain under the
            Agreement or any other agreement, and/or (ii) require Partner
            to refund Outbrain within thirty (30) days of any invoice, any
            amounts Outbrain may have overpaid to Partner in prior
            periods. If an Outbrain advertiser whose Advertiser Recs are
            displayed on any Partner Site defaults on payment to Outbrain,
            Outbrain may withhold payment or charge back Partner’s
            account.
    4. PRIVACY
         1. Outbrain and Partner shall each maintain and display on their
            respective websites an easily accessible and discoverable
            privacy notice and/or policy that complies with all applicable
            laws, and with respect to Partner, that discloses usage of
            third-party technology to collect and use data in connection
            with the Partner Sites. Outbrain's privacy policy is available
            at here.
         2. The parties are independent controllers in respect of End User
            data processed via the Partner Site(s) and each party remains
            individually responsible for compliance with relevant data
            protection laws. It is Partner’s (and not Outbrain’s)
            responsibility to comply with all data protection legislation
            in particular, in respect of the placing and use of third
            party cookies, upon which the Technology relies, and the
            capturing of any consent to cookies required to be obtained
            from the relevant End User). Partner acknowledges that
            Outbrain relies on Partner’s lawful basis for processing End
            User data. Accordingly, Partner warrants that: (i) if
            Publisher relies on legitimate interest, it has completed a
            legitimate interest assessment which has considered Outbrain’s
            provision of the Outbrain Service; and (ii) if the Publisher
            relies on consent, the Publisher shall disclose Outbrain to an
            End User via a consent management platform using the IAB
            methodology and pass Outbrain a clear consent or no consent
            signal (i.e., the Publisher must not send Outbrain a null or
            invalid signal via a consent management platform). Regardless
            of the foregoing, the parties shall provide End Users access
            to a user-choice mechanism such as the opt out page(s) of the
            Network Advertising Initiative, the Digital Advertising
            Alliance, the European Digital Advertising Alliance, and/or a
            direct opt out of Outbrain through Outbrain’s privacy policy.
            If an End User has opted out of behavioral advertising through
            a mechanism, alerting Publisher (instead of Outbrain), such as
            device settings, Publisher must not pass Outbrain such End
            User’s advertiser ID or other identifying mechanism. The
            provisions of the Data Processing Agreement shall be
            incorporated into, and form part of, this Agreement.
    5. LICENSE TERMS
         1. During the Term and subject to Partner’s full compliance with
            all of the terms of the Agreement, Outbrain grants Partner a
            limited, non-exclusive, revocable, non-sublicensable,
            non-transferable license to use the Technology to display the
            Recommendations on Partner Sites in the form and format
            provided.
            Outbrain grants Partner, during the Term, a limited,
            worldwide, non-exclusive, royalty-free license to use and
            display Outbrain’s trademarks, service marks and logos
            (collectively, “Outbrain Marks”), as incorporated into the
            Technology, strictly in accordance with Partner’s obligations
            and rights in the Agreement. All goodwill arising out of
            Partner’s use of any of the Outbrain Marks shall inure solely
            to the benefit of Outbrain. Outbrain shall have the right to
            refer to Partner and the Partner Sites in any general listing
            of advertisers or partners (including in marketing and sales
            materials) who have implemented the Technology.
            Notwithstanding the foregoing, each party will request prior
            written consent before issuing a press release regarding the
            Agreement or using the other party’s name on its website other
            than in accordance with the Agreement.
         2. As between the parties: (a) Outbrain retains all right, title
            and interest in and to the Outbrain Marks, Technology, Data,
            and Content displayed on or made available by the Technology
            (excluding any Content from the Partner Sites which shall be
            owned by Partner); and (b) Partner retains all right, title
            and interest in and to the Partner Site(s) including the look
            and feel, excluding the items described in subparagraph (a)
            above, (including without limitation all intellectual property
            rights in them).The licenses granted under the Agreement are
            specifically set forth in the Agreement; there are no implied
            rights. All rights not expressly granted to Partner in the
            Agreement are reserved by Outbrain.
    6. PROHIBITED ACTIVITY
         1. Partner will not: (i) edit, modify, truncate, filter, or
            change the order of Recommendations; (ii) obscure, modify or
            redirect Partner Site users away from a Destination Page, or
            intersperse any Content between the Recommendations and any
            Destination Page; (iii) minimize, remove or otherwise inhibit
            the full and complete display of the Technology; (iv)
            artificially inflate clicks or impressions on Recommendations,
            or encourage or require any person to click on Recommendations
            using incentives or other methods; (v) remove, deface,
            obscure, or alter any notices of intellectual property rights
            included in the Technology; (vi) access, reproduce or use the
            Technology in any manner or for any purpose other than as
            expressly permitted under the Agreement; (vii) modify, adapt,
            translate, prepare derivative works from, decompile, reverse
            engineer, disassemble or otherwise attempt to derive source
            code from the Technology, or attempt to create a substitute or
            similar service or product through use of or access to
            Technology or related proprietary information; (viii) attempt
            to interfere with or disrupt the Technology or attempt to gain
            access to any systems or networks that connect to it other
            than through the Technology as implemented pursuant to the
            Agreement; (ix) copy, cache, distribute, display, alter, or
            otherwise use any Recommendations (or authorize or assist any
            third party to do so) except as such Recommendations are
            provided through the Technology; or (x) use the Technology for
            any purpose not authorized by Outbrain, including for any
            purpose that is inconsistent with the Implementation Guides as
            provided to Partner.
         2. Partner will not deploy the Technology on any properties that
            display adult, obscene, pornographic, defamatory, libelous,
            infringing, abusive, or illegal Content, that promotes hate or
            discrimination, facilitates the sale of firearms or illegal
            drugs, or that participates or encourages participation in,
            illegal activities or is directed at children under of the age
            of 16. Outbrain reserves the right in its sole discretion to
            disable the Technology on any property at any time.
         3. Except as expressly and unambiguously authorized under the
            Agreement, Partner will not copy, rent, lease, sell, transfer,
            assign, sublicense, disassemble, reverse engineer or decompile
            (except to the limited extent expressly authorized by
            applicable statutory law), modify or alter any part of the
            Technology or otherwise use the Technology on behalf of or for
            the benefit of any third party.
    7. REGISTRATION
       Partner is not required to register on the Outbrain website to use
       the Technology. If Partner registers, it will have access to online
       reports and the Outbrain dashboard, which allows Partner to control
       certain settings for the Technology, including certain
       Recommendation functionality. To the extent that Partner registers
       and has access to the Outbrain dashboard, Outbrain may collect
       Partner’s (or individuals who act on behalf of Partner) personally
       identifiable information. Partner will be solely responsible for
       all changes to data made by it, or individuals acting on Partner's
       behalf, through the Outbrain dashboard. Estimates of revenue
       displayed in the Outbrain dashboard are provided solely for the
       Partner’s convenience. Outbrain does not guarantee that these
       estimated amounts displayed during a calendar month, if any, shall
       be precise or definitively due to be paid to Partner as a result of
       the Agreement. Access to Outbrain dashboard shall be solely at the
       discretion of Outbrain and may be discontinued by Outbrain at any
       time.
    8. SUSPENSION OF TECHNOLOGY; TERMINATION
         1. Outbrain may suspend or discontinue all or any aspect of the
            Technology, including its availability, at any time if
            required by exigent circumstances (such as a significant
            security breach, propagation of malware, other viruses to
            users, etc.) or other improper, unlawful, fraudulent or
            misleading circumstances.
         2. Either party may terminate the Agreement at any time in the
            event of a material breach by the other party of any provision
            of the Agreement that remains uncured for seven (7) days after
            the breaching party’s receipt of written notice of the breach.
         3. The Agreement is terminable on fourteen (14) days prior
            written notice unless otherwise stated on the Partner
            Enrollment Form. Upon expiration or termination of the
            Agreement, all rights and obligations of the parties under the
            Agreement will be extinguished, except that Sections 9.6.,
            9.7., 10, 11 and 13 of the Terms will survive termination, as
            well as any other terms of this Agreement which, by their
            nature should survive termination, and continue to bind the
            parties.
    9. LIMITED WARRANTIES; INDEMNITY
         1. Each party represents and warrants to the other that: (i) it
            has all right, power, and authority necessary to enter into
            the Agreement and perform its obligations under it; and (ii)
            it will comply with all applicable laws, regulations and
            orders in its performance of the Agreement.
         2. Outbrain warrants that the Technology (as provided and made
            available by Outbrain and implemented by Partner in accordance
            with the Agreement does not and will not, to the best of
            Outbrain's knowledge, infringe any Intellectual Property Right
            of any third party.
         3. Partner represents and warrants that the Partner Site(s) do
            not and will not contain any Content that is: (i) illegal;
            (ii) infringes any Intellectual Property Right of any third
            party; (iii) is obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous
            material or material that violates any person’s right of
            publicity, privacy or personality; or (iv) knowingly contains
            a misrepresentation of fact or factual inaccuracy.
         4. Nothing in the Agreement shall be construed as a promise of
            any sort of minimum traffic volumes, clicks, impressions or
            usage or any other such commitments by Outbrain to Partner.
         5. Except as expressly provided in the Agreement, neither party
            makes any representations or warranties, express or implied in
            relation to the Agreement, the Partner Sites, the Technology,
            any Content made available by Outbrain through the Technology
            or any other matters (including any implied terms relating to
            satisfactory quality or fitness for any purpose, any
            warranties of availability or uninterrupted or error free
            performance, any warranties arising out of any course of
            performance or dealing).
         6. Outbrain makes no representations or warranties concerning any
            Content contained in or accessed via the Technology, including
            without limitation Advertiser Recs, and Outbrain will not be
            responsible or liable for the contents, accuracy, intellectual
            property infringement, legality or decency of Content provided
            through the Technology or for Partner’s reliance on any of the
            foregoing.
         7. Each party (the “Indemnifying Party”) shall indemnify, defend
            and hold harmless the other party and its parent and
            affiliates, and each of its and their respective affiliates,
            directors, officers, shareholders, members, authorized
            representatives, employees and agents (collectively, the
            “Indemnified Party”) from and against any and all claims,
            losses, liabilities, damages, costs, settlements, regulatory
            findings andor fines and other expenses (including reasonable
            legal fees) (collectively, “Claims”) that arise out of any
            third party claim occasioned by any breach or alleged breach
            of any of the Indemnifying Party’s representations, warranties
            and obligations of the Agreement. The Indemnified Party shall
            promptly notify the Indemnifying Party of any Claim in
            writing, provided, however, that any delay in providing such
            notice shall not relieve the Indemnifying Party of any of its
            obligations except to the extent that the Indemnifying Party
            is actually prejudiced by such delay. The Indemnified Party
            shall have the right to participate in the defense and
            settlement of the Claim with counsel of its own choosing and
            its own expense, subject to the Indemnifying Party’s control
            thereof.
   10. CONFIDENTIALITY
       Each party (the “Receiving Party”) acknowledges that it will have
       access to certain information and materials, including the terms of
       the Agreement, concerning the business, technology, products and
       services of the other party (the “Disclosing Party”) that are, or
       reasonably should be considered given the circumstances of
       disclosure to be, confidential (“Confidential Information”).
       Confidential Information will not include: (a) information known to
       the Receiving Party prior to disclosure by the Disclosing Party;
       (b) information independently developed by the Receiving Party
       without reference to Confidential Information of the Disclosing
       Party; (c) information that is or becomes publicly known through no
       fault of the Receiving Party; or (d) information disclosed to the
       Receiving Party by a third party without breach of any obligation
       of confidence. Except as permitted hereunder, the Receiving Party
       (aa) will not use any Confidential Information for its own account
       or the account of any third party, and (bb) will not disclose any
       Confidential Information to any third party other than its
       directors, employees, contractors, advisors, investors or potential
       investors who have a need to know and who have agreed not to use,
       and to maintain the confidentiality of, the Confidential
       Information consistent with this Section 10. The Receiving Party
       will return or destroy the Confidential Information promptly upon
       the Disclosing Party’s written request. Notwithstanding the
       foregoing, the Receiving Party may disclose Confidential
       Information to the extent required by applicable law or legal
       process, provided that the Receiving Party provides prompt written
       notice of any required disclosure to the Disclosing Party and
       provides reasonable cooperation (at the Disclosing Party’s expense)
       with any effort by the Disclosing Party to contest or limit the
       scope of such disclosure.
   11. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
         1. Neither Outbrain nor the Partner exclude or limit liability to
            the other for: (i) death or personal injury caused by its
            negligence or that of its employees or contractors; (ii) fraud
            or fraudulent misrepresentation; or (iii) any other liability
            which cannot lawfully be excluded or limited.
         2. EXCEPT IN CONNECTION WITH A PARTY’S INDEMNIFICATION
            OBLIGATIONS HEREUNDER, NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE FOR ANY
            SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES ARISING OUT OF OR
            IN CONNECTION WITH THE AGREEMENT OR ANY BREACH HEREOF
            (INCLUDING FOR LOSS OF DATA OR COST OF COVER), WHETHER OR NOT
            SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
            DAMAGES, AND WHETHER UNDER A THEORY OF CONTRACT, TORT
            (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE) OR OTHERWISE.
         3. EXCEPT FOR A PARTY’S INDEMNIFICATION OBLIGATIONS HEREUNDER OR
            LIABILITIES ARISING OUT OF A PARTY’S VIOLATION,
            MISAPPROPRIATION OR INFRINGEMENT OF A PARTY’S INTELLECTUAL
            PROPERTY RIGHTS, IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY’S AGGREGATE
            LIABILITY ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE AGREEMENT
            OR ANY BREACH HEREOF (WHETHER UNDER A THEORY OF CONTRACT, TORT
            (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE), WARRANTY OR OTHERWISE) EXCEED THE
            GREATER OF ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS ($100,000) OR THE
            AMOUNT OF ADJUSTED GROSS REVENUE PAID OR PAYABLE TO THE
            PARTNER IN THE 12-MONTH PERIOD IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE EVENT
            GIVING RISE TO LIABILITY (OR, IN THE CASE OF A SERIES OF
            CONNECTED EVENTS, THE FIRST SUCH EVENT).
   12. EXPORT CONTROLS
       Partner will comply with all export laws and restrictions and
       regulations of the Department of Commerce, the United States
       Department of Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control ("OFAC"),
       or other United States or foreign agency or authority, and shall
       not export, or allow the export or re-export of the Technology in
       violation of any such restrictions, laws or regulations. By
       downloading or using the Technology, Partner agrees to the
       foregoing and represent and warrants that it is not located in,
       under the control of, or a national or resident of any restricted
       country. Partner represents and warrants that none of it, or any
       individual, entity, or organization holding any ownership interest
       or controlling interest in Partner, including any officer or
       director, is an individual, entity, organization with whom any
       United States law, regulation, or executive order prohibits U.S.
       companies and individuals from dealing, including, names appearing
       on the Specially Designated Nationals List.
   13. MISCELLANEOUS
       The Agreement shall be interpreted and construed in accordance with
       and governed by the laws of the State of New York, without regard
       to its conflict of law provisions or the United Nations Conventions
       for the International Sale of Goods. Any action or proceeding
       arising from or relating to the Agreement must be brought in a
       federal court in the Southern District of New York or in state
       court in New York County, New York, and each party irrevocably
       submits to the jurisdiction and venue of any such court in any such
       action or proceeding. The parties agree that irreparable damage
       would occur in the event that any of the provisions of the
       Agreement is not performed in accordance with these specific terms.
       Accordingly, the parties agree that each shall be entitled to
       injunctive relief to prevent breaches of the Agreement and to
       enforce specifically the terms and provisions of the Agreement, in
       addition to any other remedy to which they are entitled at law or
       in equity. The parties are independent contractors, and nothing in
       the Agreement will be construed to create a partnership, joint
       venture, agency or other relationship between the parties. No
       failure or forbearance by a party to enforce any of its rights
       under the Agreement or insist upon performance of the other party’s
       obligations under the Agreement will be deemed a waiver of such
       rights or obligations to any extent, and no waiver by either party
       of any default or breach of the Agreement will constitute a waiver
       of any other or subsequent default or breach. Neither party will be
       liable for any failure to perform due to causes beyond the party's
       reasonable control. The Agreement constitutes the entire agreement
       between the parties concerning its subject matter and supersedes
       all prior or contemporaneous agreements or understandings, written
       or oral, concerning such subject matter. The Partner Enrollment
       Form may be amended, modified or superseded, only by a written
       instrument signed by both parties. The headings in the Agreement
       are for the convenience of reference only and have no legal effect.
       The Agreement may be executed and delivered via electronic
       transmission or another means of complete and accurate
       reproduction, and copies of the Agreement delivered via such means
       will be deemed originals for all purposes. The Agreement may be
       executed in counterparts, each of which will be deemed an original,
       but all of which together will constitute one and the same
       instrument. If any provision of the Agreement is held to be
       unenforceable for any reason, such provision shall be reformed only
       to the extent necessary to make it enforceable, failing which, it
       shall be severed from the Agreement and the balance of the
       Agreement shall continue in full force and effect. Neither party
       may assign the Agreement or any of its rights or obligations
       hereunder without the other party’s prior written consent, except
       (i) due to operation of law, merger, reorganization, or as a result
       of an acquisition or change of control, and (ii) by Outbrain to its
       subsidiaries. Subject to the foregoing, the Agreement will be
       binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties and their
       permitted successors and assigns.

Privacy Policy

Version 2.3

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   Last Updated May 24, 2018
   Outbrain is committed to protecting your personal data. This privacy
   policy (“Privacy Policy ”) governs Outbrain’s use of data collected by
   us, including any and all personal data. Personal data is information
   that relates to you and may identify you as an individual. We use your
   personal data in line with all applicable laws. To ensure compliance
   and to align with Outbrain’s values around Trust & Transparency, we
   have a team of privacy champions responsible for continuously
   implementing our global privacy program.
   + EXPAND ALL
   – COLLAPSE ALL
   1. Who we are, What we do, How you can contact Outbrain, our DPO or the
   relevant authorities
   +
   Who we are:
   Outbrain means Outbrain Inc., a Delaware, USA corporation with
   headquarters in New York; and its affiliated subsidiaries
   (collectively, “Outbrain,” or “we“, “us“, “our“). We operate out of 12
   global offices and we partner with publishers and marketers across the
   globe.
   What we do:
   Outbrain’s mission is to serve interesting recommendations to its Users
   based on their interests. To achieve our mission we enter into
   agreements with:
     * online publishers and partners who want to recommend relevant
       content to their readers (this is Outbrain Engage); and
     * advertisers who want readers to view their content (this is
       Outbrain Amplify).

   How to contact us:
   We regularly review our compliance with this Privacy Policy. Questions,
   comments and requests regarding this Privacy Policy are welcomed and
   should be addressed to PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com or by mail to
   Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011,
   Attn: Privacy Questions.
   If Outbrain does not satisfactorily answers your questions or concerns,
   you may also contact the following for advice, support or complaints:
     * Outbrain’s external Data Protection Officer (“DPO”): ePrivacy GmbH,
       represented by Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. ePrivacy GmbH can be
       reached directly at privacy@eprivacy.eu ; and/or
     * the Information Commissioner’s Officer, which is Outbrain’s lead
       supervisory service within the European Territories.

   Self-Regulatory Bodies
   Outbrain adheres to the Self-Regulatory Principles set forth by the
   Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) and the European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). We are members in good standing of the
   Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), an association dedicated to
   responsible data collection and its use for digital advertising. We
   adhere to the NAI Code of Conduct for Web and Mobile. Outbrain also
   adheres to the Interactive Advertising Bureau’s (IAB) Self-Regulatory
   Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising, and the IAB Europe OBA
   Framework.
   2. Outbrain User Types (including Opt Out Options)
   +
   Much of this Privacy Policy is divided into sections based on the way
   you may interact with Outbrain. Please determine what user type you
   are. For each user type we’ve explained what information we collect and
   why, what cookies and other similar technologies we use, how we share
   such information, and your rights.
   Site Visitors: You are a Site Visitor when you visit and interact with
   our web sites, web pages, interactive features, blogs and their
   respective contents at Outbrain.com (or any derivation, such as
   Outbrain.co.uk; Outbrain.fr; outbrain.de etc.) and MyOutbrain.com (“Our
   Sites“). See more here.
   (a) What information we collect and why
   We want to understand what services on Our Sites interest you and we
   want to remind you about the services we offer when you are not on Our
   Sites. To do this, we collect the following information from you: (i)
   IP address; (ii) User Agent data: device type (e.g., iPhone), browser
   type (e.g., Chrome), operating system (e.g., iOS); (iii) the pages
   visited on Our Site (e.g., the Outbrain “About” page); (iv) the time of
   visit (and corresponding timezone); and (v) referring URLs and other
   information normally transmitted in HTTP requests (e.g., this
   information tells us how you arrived on Our Sites).
   (b) What cookies and other similar technologies we use
   Please see this Cookie Table under “Site Visitors” for a detailed list
   of the cookies (and their corresponding retention periods) we use when
   you visit Our Sites.
   (c) How we may share information
     * Sharing Information we learn about you on Our Sites.

   In general, we do not share personal data about you with third parties
   for third party marketing or advertising purposes. However, we use
   various third parties (each listed on this Cookie Table) to help us
   market or advertise to you. For example, some of the cookies we use on
   Our Sites belong to third parties that will help Outbrain market or
   advertise to you. We require that these third parties and companies
   agree to keep all information shared with them confidential and to use
   the information only to perform their obligations to us. We do this by
   entering into agreements with all third parties who process personal
   data on our behalf to ensure that they process your personal data in
   accordance with our strict instructions and all applicable data
   protection laws. If you post on our blog, your comment and information
   will be publicly available. Please contact support@outbrain.com to
   remove your comment.
     * Using Third Party Services on Our Sites.

   Our Sites contain links to other websites that we do not own or
   operate. We do not control, recommend or endorse the content, products,
   services, privacy policies or practices of these third party websites.
   For example, on Our Sites you will notice clickable icons which take
   you to the Outbrain Facebook page or the Outbrain LinkedIn page. If you
   choose to click on these links, you should know that Facebook and
   Linkedin may send their own cookies to your device and they may
   independently collect personal data. It is therefore important that you
   read the Facebook and/or LinkedIn privacy policies.
     * Also see the Sharing section of this Privacy Policy.

   (d) Your rights
   The Terms of Use on Our Site govern the use of Our Site and also apply
   to you. You can stop using Our Site at any time. If you do, you may
   also want to remove any cookies that we have placed on any device used
   to access Our Site. If during your use of Our Sites you provided your
   email address, any email you receive from Outbrain includes an
   “unsubscribe” option.
   For European Territory Visitors, Outbrain has implemented a consent
   management platform (powered by One Trust) on Our Sites that provide
   visitors the opportunity to consent, or not consent, to cookies and
   similar tracking technologies on Our Sites. Upon accessing Our Sites,
   you will see a banner on the bottom of the page with information about
   the cookies we use. You may click the banner to reject any cookies that
   are not strictly necessary. Pressing “accept” on the banner or
   scrolling/clicking on Our Sites is an indication of your acceptance.
   Accordingly, Outbrain’s lawful basis for processing personal data on
   Our Sites is consent. You may withdraw your consent at any time here.
   Users: You are an User when you visit a page of a website or
   application of one of Outbrain’s partners where the Outbrain widget is
   installed (“Partner Sites”). For example, if you visit
   https://news.sky.com/uk, www.spiegel.de or www.cnn.com, the Outbrain
   widget is implemented on those websites. You know you are engaging with
   an Outbrain widget when you see text referencing Outbrain (e.g.,
   “Recommended by Outbrain”, “by Outbrain” near recommendations). If you
   click on the hyperlinked reference to Outbrain you will see a detailed
   notice that enables you to navigate to Outbrain’s Interest Portal,
   which provides a general visualization of the types of Outbrain data
   categories that may be used to make its recommendations. It also gives
   you the ablity to opt out of personalized recommendations. See more
   here.
   Example of an Outbrain Widget.
   Outbrain Example Recommendations
   (a) What information we collect and why
   We use UUIDs, IP Address and other Usage Information so that we can
   serve interesting recommendations. Outbrain’s recommendations may be
   paid for by an advertiser linking you to a new website or they may be
   organic such that the link is to another page on the same publisher’s
   website.
     * UUID.

   When as a User you first visit a Partner Site (e.g., CNN.com), Outbrain
   drops a cookie on your device in order to generate a UUID (a Unique
   User Identifier). We catalog and analyze the content you consume across
   Partner Sites. Our recommendations are based on: (i) browsing history;
   (ii) similar browsing patterns of other Users; (ii) recommendations
   that are generally popular with Outbrain’s audience at this time; (iv)
   some randomness, and (v) targeting requirements that may be provided or
   requested by our Amplify clients. As an example, Outbrain may know that
   UUID 123 (which could be you on your iPhone X on the Guardian using
   Chrome as your browser) likes to read about far away holiday
   destinations and that people who like to read about far away holiday
   destinations also like to read about exotic food.
   The UUID is a sequence of numbers and/or letters. This UUID attaches
   itself to your device and varies depending on which browser you use. In
   other words, Outbrain records a different UUID depending on which
   device and/or which browser you use when accessing the Partner Sites.
   For example, this means that you will have one UUID when you visit a
   Partner Site from your mobile phone using the browser Safari, and a
   different UUID when you visit a Partner Site from your iPad using the
   browser Safari. Outbrain will combine and consolidate a UUID from a
   mobile device (handheld or tablet) from a browser that then accesses an
   application (or vice versa) from the that same device.
   Assigning a UUID allows Outbrain to associate the page views visited
   and clicks on Outbrain’s recommendations from such UUID – all with the
   goal of providing interesting recommendations.
     * IP Address and Other Usage Information.

   We collect a UUID as explained above, we also collect the following
   information from you: (i) IP address; (ii) User Agent data: device type
   (e.g., iphone) , browser type (e.g., chrome), operating system e.g
   iOS); (iii) the pages visited; (iv) the time of visit; and (v)
   referring URLs and other information normally transmitted in HTTP
   requests .
   The above statistical information provides us with information about
   how many Users visited a specific page on our Partner Sites on which
   the Outbrain widget is installed, how long each User stayed on that
   page, the type of content on that page they clicked on and how they
   generally engaged with that page. This information is only personal
   data when it is associated to a UUID.
   (b) What cookies and other similar technologies we use
   Please see this Cookie Table under “Users” for a detailed list of the
   first party cookies we use when you interact with Partner Sites where
   the Outbrain technology is implemented.
   If you click on a link to one of our recommendations, the Amplify
   advertiser sponsoring the recommendation may place cookies on your
   device through redirects prior to arriving on the destination page of
   the recommendations or upon reaching the destination page. In such
   cases you will be subject to that advertiser’s privacy policy.
   In addition to Outbrain’s visible widget on Partner Sites, certain
   Outbrain advertisers may implement the Outbrain pixel on their
   websites. The Outbrain pixel determines whether the user reaching the
   page where the pixel is installed has an Outbrain UUID. If there is a
   UUID associated with such end user, Outbrain allows advertisers to
   retarget those UUIDs and/or provides advertisers with the total number
   of UUIDs that reached such page. If there was no Outbrain UUID on the
   page, the Outbrain pixel does not collect any information about the
   user.
   We encourage advertisers to disclose use of the Outbrain pixel on their
   own websites. Outbrain does not combine pixel information with a UUID’s
   profile.
   Data points such as page views and clicks are connected to a particular
   UUID are retained for 13 months. For example, if UUID 123 read an
   article on December 31, 2017, on February 1, 2018 that article will no
   longer be part of UUID 123’s profile.
   (c) How we may share information
   Outbrain does not share User profiles with any third parties. However,
   we may share the UUID with certain partners for the purpose of cookie
   syncing, or based on technical requirements. Also see the Sharing
   section of this Privacy Policy.
   (d) Your rights
     * Outbrain Opt Out.

   You may opt out of Outbrain’s personalized recommendations at any time.
   Please see Outbrain’s Interest Profile for a general visualization the
   data Outbrain knows about you and may use to make its recommendations.
   The Interest Profile also gives you the ability to opt out of
   personalized recommendations. Note that opting out of browsers is
   through the Outbrain Interest Profile , but opting out of personalized
   recommendations in applications is through the settings on your device
   (examples of steps are in the Interest Profile ).
   IMPORTANT – even though you have opted out of Outbrain:
     * You will still see Outbrain recommendations. Opting out of Outbrain
       personalization tracking does not mean you will no longer receive
       recommendations from Outbrain. Instead, it means that Outbrain’s
       recommendations will not be personalized. The recommendations will
       still use information about the document you are viewing (i.e.,
       contextual information) to provide you recommendations on that
       page.
     * The opt out is cookie based and device/browser specific. If you
       browse the web from several devices and/or browsers, you will need
       to opt out from each device and/or browser to ensure that we
       prevent personalization tracking on all of them. For the same
       reason, if you buy a new device, change browsers or delete (or
       clear) the opt out cookie, you will need to opt-out again. Opting
       out of personalization tracking is not the same as blocking
       cookies.
     * To ensure deletion of the profile tied to your UUID, do not opt in
       to Outbrain for at least 21 days. Your opt out from Outbrain’s
       personalized recommendations is effective immediately. However, if
       your browser permits local storage and you opt into Outbrain’s
       personalized recommendations within 21 days of your opt out, it is
       possible your prior profile will be reconnected to your UUID. If
       you do not opt in within 21 days, your profile will be deleted and
       cannot be recovered.
     * As with most opt out cookies, the Outbrain browser opt out relies
       upon a cookie. The opt-out cookie is intended to be persistent to
       honor the user’s preferences. However, the "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention" feature in iOS11 may impact the persistence of cookies
       across websites post a 24 hour window. We suggest using another
       browser or considering blocking all 3rd party cookies from the
       browser so that you are "opted out" without needing to rely on any
       company's actual opt out methodology.

     * Additional Opt-Out Options.

   You may also opt out of receiving personalized ads served by us or
   other advertising companies through industry powered tools such as the
   NAI or the various DAA-based pages (DAA,
   http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC, www.youradchoices.ca/choices ,
   and/or EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu) . Visiting the NAI, DAA, DAAC, or
   EDAA consumer choice pages allows you to opt out of all some or all of
   the participating members’ services. Like Outbrain’s opt out, these opt
   outs do not mean you will no longer receive any advertising – the
   advertisements will just not be tailored to you. You may continue to
   receive advertisements, for example, based on the particular website
   that you are viewing (i.e., contextually based ads). Also, if your
   browsers are configured to reject cookies when you visit the DAA, DAAC
   or EDAA consumer choice pages, your opt out may not be effective.
   • Lawful Basis. Outbrain’s lawful basis for processing a User’s
   personal data is based on the lawful basis determined by each of our
   Partner Sites. Each Partner Site will rely on consent or legitimate
   interest. Please consult the applicable Partner Sites’ privacy policy
   for more information about their lawful basis. If a Partner is relying
   on consent, Outbrain will not drop a cookie on you if you have not
   provided consent on such Partner Site.
   Business Partners: You are a Business Partner when you register (or
   email with Outbrain) on behalf of the company you work for to use the
   Outbrain Amplify or Outbrain Engage Services. See more here.
   (a) What information we collect and why
   You may provide certain personal data (such as email address) when you
   sign up for the Amplify or Engage services or otherwise communicate or
   interact with us. If you apply to become a Business Partner, we may
   request additional information from you via advertiser application
   forms, insertion orders and other forms. We automatically collect
   information about your username’s actions in the Outbrain dashboard. As
   an example, as an Amplify Business Partner if you change the
   cost-per-click for one your campaigns, Outbrain’s audit trail will have
   a record of all those actions.
   We collect and process the personal data above in order to perform our
   obligations under our agreement as a Business Partner (or prospective
   Business Partner) with you including to:
     * respond to your questions and requests;
     * to provide you with access to certain functions and features of our
       Amplify or Engage services (e.g., to provide and maintain your
       dashboard account);
     * verify your identity;
     * communicate with you about your account, our products, and
       available promotions relevant to your use of the Amplify or Engage
       service.

   (b) What cookies and other similar technologies we use
   Please see this Cookie Table under “Business Partners” for a detailed
   list of the cookies (and their corresponding retention periods) we use
   with Business Partners.
   (c) How we may share information with anyone
   We may disclose certain Business Partner information to vendors,
   contractors, or others who assist Outbrain in delivering the services
   (e.g., credit card processing). Also see the Sharing section of this
   Privacy Policy.
   (d) Your rights
   If as a Business Partner you wish to verify, correct, update or request
   the deactivation of your information, you may go the to the Outbrain
   dashboard edit your profile preferences or contact us at
   support@outbrain.com. If you are receiving Outbrain emails, you may
   “unsubscribe” using a link in the email. Note unsubscribing shall not
   opt you out notifications critical to providing the Amplify or Engage
   services (e.g., email invoices).
   Outbrain’s lawful basis for processing personal data of Business
   Partners is legitimate interest.
   3. How We Keep Information Safe, Transfers Outside the EEA, Sharing and
   Retention
   +
   Security
   Outbrain has a dedicated security team. We maintain tight controls over
   the personal data we collect, retaining it in firewalled and secured
   databases with strictly limited and controlled access rights, to ensure
   it is secure. Please see our security standards for more information.
   Business Partners have access to certain password-protected features of
   the Amplify or Engage service. They are responsible for keeping this
   password confidential. Please remember that unfortunately, the
   transmission of information via the internet is not completely secure.
   A common Internet scam is known as "spoofing" or "phishing." This
   occurs when you receive an email from what appears to be a legitimate
   source requesting personal data from you. Please be aware that we will
   not send you any emails requesting you to verify credit card, bank
   information, or any other personal data. If you ever receive an email
   that appears to be from us requesting such information from you, do not
   respond to it, and do not click on any links appearing in the email.
   Instead, please forward the email to us at legal@outbrain.com, as we
   will investigate instances of possible Internet fraud.
   Data Transfers Outside the EU/EEA
   When we transfer personal data from the European Economic Area to other
   countries in which applicable laws do not offer the same level of data
   privacy protection as in the European Territories, we take measures to
   provide an appropriate level of data privacy protection. In other
   words, your rights and protections remain with your data. For example,
   we use approved contractual clauses and other measures designed to
   ensure that the recipients of your personal data protect it.
   Sharing
   In addition to the description of how we may disclose your personal
   data for each user type, we may also disclose personal data as follows:
     * Within the family of companies controlled by Outbrain for internal
       reasons, primarily for business and operational purposes;
     * If we go through a business transition, such as a merger,
       acquisition by another company, or sale of all or a portion of our
       assets, your personal data will likely be among the assets
       transferred;
     * When legally required to do so (e.g., to cooperate with law
       enforcement investigations or other legal proceedings); and/or
     * To respond to a genuine emergency.

   In addition, we combine your personal data with those of other users in
   order to share trend information and aggregate user statistics with
   third parties, always in aggregated and anonymized form.
   Data Retention
   The retention period for each of the cookies Outbrain uses (whether its
   own or on our behalf by third parties) is stated on the Cookie Table.
   Outbrain also maintains a Data Retention Policy that details the
   retention period for personal data based on our analysis of how long
   the specific data is reasonably required for legal or business
   purposes. When we no longer need personal data, we securely delete or
   destroy it. Aggregated data, which cannot identify a device/browser (or
   individual) and is used for purposes of reporting and analysis, is
   maintained for as long as commercially necessary.
   4. Children
   +
   None of our services are directed to children under 16. We do not
   knowingly collect personal data from anyone under 16 years of age. If
   we determine upon collection that a Site Visitor, a User or a Business
   Partner is under 16, we will not use or maintain his/her personal data.
   If we become aware that we have unknowingly collected personal data
   from a child under the age of 16, we will make reasonable efforts to
   delete such information from our records. If you’re a kid, please go
   play in the yard, don’t use or interact with Outbrain!
   5. European Territory Citizens
   +
   In compliance with European privacy laws, in particular the European
   General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), Outbrain provides specific
   additional rights for citizens of the European Territories such as the
   right to access, rectification, right to object, to complaint, erasure
   and blockage. More specifically:
     * the right to request information about whether and which personal
       data is processed by us, and the right to demand that personal data
       is rectified or amended.
     * under certain circumstances, the right to request that personal
       data should be deleted.
     * under certain circumstances, the right to demand that the
       processing of personal data should be restricted.
     * withdraw your consent to the processing and use of your data
       completely or partially at any time with future application.
     * have the right to obtain your personal data in a common, structured
       and mechanically readable format.
     * contact our data protection officer if there are any questions,
       comments, complaints or requests in connection with our statement
       on data protection and the processing of your personal data.
     * the right to complain to the responsible supervisory authority if
       believed that the processing of your personal data is in violation
       of the legislation.

   In addition to the above, we reference certain rights for European
   Territory citizens throughout this Privacy Policy. Pursuant to the
   GDPR, citizens from "European Territories" mean the European Economic
   Area (EEA) and Switzerland. For the purpose of this Privacy Policy, the
   term "European Territories" shall continue to include the United
   Kingdom, even after the United Kingdom leaves the European Economic
   Area following Brexit.
   Please email PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com with any questions about
   exercising any of the above rights.
   6. California Privacy Rights
   +
   Under California Civil Code sections 1798.83-1798.84, California
   residents are entitled to ask us for a notice describing what
   categories of personal information we share with third parties or
   corporate affiliates for those third parties or corporate affiliates'
   direct marketing purposes. That notice will identify the categories of
   information shared and will include a list of the third parties and
   affiliates with which it was shared, along with their names and
   addresses. If you are a California resident and would like a copy of
   this notice, please submit a written request to
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com or send to the following address:
   Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011.
   Please allow 30 days for a response.
   7. “Do Not Track” Disclosure
   +
   Some browsers transmit Do Not Track (DNT) signals to websites. Because
   there is no common understanding of how to interpret the DNT signal,
   Outbrain does not currently alter, change, or respond to DNT requests
   or signals from these browsers. We will continue to monitor industry
   activity in this area and reassess our DNT practices as necessary. In
   the meantime, you can use the range of other tools we provide to
   control data collection and use, including the ability to opt out of
   receiving personalized recommendations in the Users section.
   8. How This Privacy Policy May Change
   +
   We may change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will place a
   prominent notice that will be visible to you as a Site Visitor or
   Business Partner, but we do not have a means of advising Users of an
   update. You should check back here periodically to see if the Privacy
   Policy has been updated. We will always show the date of the latest
   modification of the Privacy Policy at the top of the page so you can
   tell when it was last revised.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Letzte Aktualisierung: 23. Mai 2018
   Outbrain ist dem Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten verpflichtet.
   Diese Datenschutzbestimmungen („Datenschutzbestimmungen“) gelten für
   die Verwendung durch Outbrain der von uns erfassten Daten,
   einschließlich aller personenbezogenen Daten, durch Outbrain.
   Personenbezogene Daten sind Informationen, die sich auf Sie beziehen
   und Sie persönlich identifizieren können. Wir verwenden Ihre
   personenbezogenen Daten entsprechend den geltenden Gesetzen. Im Sinne
   der Compliance und der Übereinstimmung mit Outbrains Werten rund um
   Vertrauen und Transparenz verfügt Outbrain über ein Team von
   Datenschutz-Champions, die für die kontinuierliche Umsetzung unseres
   weltweit gültigen Maßnahmenkatalogs zum Datenschutz verantwortlich
   sind.

                                                          + ALLE ERWEITERN

                                                 – ALLEX ZUSAMMENBRECHEN

   1. Wer wir sind, Was wir tun, Wie Sie Outbrain kontaktieren können,
   unser Datenschutzbeauftragter oder die zuständigen Behörden

                                      +

   Wer wir sind:
   Outbrain bedeutet Outbrain Inc., ein Unternehmen nach dem Recht von
   Delaware, USA, mit Hauptsitz in New York, und dessen verbundene
   Tochterunternehmen (zusammen bezeichnet als: „Outbrain“ oder „wir“,
   „uns“, „unser“). Wir haben Niederlassungen in zwölf Ländern weltweit
   und arbeiten mit Publishern und Vermarktern auf der ganzen Welt
   zusammen.
   Was wir tun:
   Outbrains Mission ist es, für Nutzer relevante Empfehlungen anhand
   ihrer Interessen bereitzustellen. Zu diesem Zweck schließen wir
   Vereinbarungen mit:
     * Online-Publishern und Partnern, die ihren Lesern relevanten Content
       empfehlen wollen (dabei handelt es sich um Outbrain Engage); und

     * Werbetreibenden, die erreichen wollen, dass Leser ihren Content
       ansehen (hierbei handelt es sich um Outbrain Amplify).

   Wie Sie Kontakt mit uns aufnehmen:
   Unsere Compliance bezüglich dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen überprüfen
   wir regelmäßig. Wir freuen uns über Ihre Fragen, Anmerkungen und
   Anfragen zu diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen. Richten Sie diese bitte an
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oder auf postalischem Weg an Outbrain
   Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, Attn: Privacy
   Questions / Datenschutzanfrage.
   Sollte Outbrain Ihre Fragen oder Anliegen nicht zu Ihrer Zufriedenheit
   beantworten, können Sie sich auch an folgende Ansprechpartner wenden,
   um Rat oder Unterstützung zu erhalten bzw. Beschwerden vorzubringen:
     * Outbrains externen Datenschutzbeauftragten: ePrivacy GmbH,
       vertreten durch Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. Die ePrivacy GmbH können
       Sie direkt erreichen unter privacy@eprivacy.eu und/oder
     * den Information Commissioner’s Officer, die für Outbrain zuständige
       federführende Aufsichtsbehörde in den europäischen Ländern.

   Selbstkontrollgremien
   Outbrain befolgt die im Rahmen der Selbstverpflichtung formulierten
   Grundsätze der Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) und der European
   Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Wir sind
   vollberechtigte Mitglieder der Network Advertising Initiative (NAI),
   eines Verbands, der sich der verantwortungsvollen Erfassung von Daten
   und deren Verwendung in der Digitalwerbung verpflichtet hat. Wir
   befolgen die Verhaltensregeln der NAI für Web- und Mobilwerbung.
   Outbrain befolgt ebenfalls die im Rahmen der Selbstverpflichtung
   formulierten Grundsätze für die verhaltensgesteuerte Online-Werbung des
   Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) sowie die Rahmenbedingungen für
   die verhaltensgesteuerte Online-Werbung des IAB Europe.
   2. Outbrain-Nutzertypen (inklusive Deaktivierung/Opt-Out)

                                      +

   Ein Großteil dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen ist in einzelne Abschnitte
   unterteilt, die sich daran orientieren, wie Sie mit Outbrain
   interagieren. Bitte entscheiden Sie, welcher Nutzertyp Sie sind.
   Entsprechend den einzelnen Nutzertypen erläutern wir, welche
   Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun, welche Cookies und
   andere vergleichbare Technologien wir nutzen, wie wir diese
   Informationen weitergeben und über welche Rechte Sie verfügen.
   Websitebesucher: Sie sind ein Websitebesucher, wenn Sie unsere
   Websites, Internetseiten, interaktiven Funktionen, Blogs und deren
   jeweiligen Content auf Outbrain.com (oder einer darauf basierenden
   Ableitung wie Outbrain.co.uk, Outbrain.fr, Outbrain.de usw.) und
   MyOutbrain.com („unsere Websites“) besuchen und mit diesen
   interagieren. Sehen Sie hier mehr.
   (a) Welche Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun
   Wir möchten wissen, welche Dienstleistungen auf unseren Websites Sie
   interessieren, und Sie an die von uns angebotenen Services erinnern,
   wenn Sie nicht auf unseren Websites sind. Zu diesem Zweck erfassen wird
   folgende Informationen von Ihnen: (i) IP-Adresse; (ii)
   User-Agent-Daten: Gerätetyp (z.B. iPhone), Browsertyp (z.B. Chrome),
   Betriebssystem (z.B. iOS); (iii) die auf unserer Website besuchten
   Seiten (z.B. die Seite „Über Outbrain“); (iv) den Zeitpunkt des Besuchs
   (und die entsprechende Zeitzone); und (v) die verweisenden URLs und
   andere normalerweise bei HTTP-Anfragen übertragenen Informationen (z.B.
   wissen wir durch diese Information, wie Sie auf unsere Websites gelangt
   sind).
   (b) Cookies und andere vergleichbare Technologien, die wir nutzen
   In der Cookie-Tabelle unter „Site Visitors (Websitebesucher)“ erhalten
   Sie eine detaillierte Liste der Cookies (und ihrer jeweiligen
   Speicherfristen), die wir bei Ihrem Besuch unserer Websites verwenden.
   (c) So geben wir unter Umständen Informationen weiter
     * Weitergabe von Informationen, die wir auf unseren Websites von
       Ihnen erhalten.

   Im Allgemeinen geben wir keine personenbezogenen Daten über Sie an
   Dritte für deren Marketing- oder Werbezwecke weiter. Wir nutzen jedoch
   verschiedene Dritte (jeweils in der Cookie-Tabelle aufgeführt) zur
   Unterstützung unserer Marketing- oder Werbetätigkeit Ihnen gegenüber.
   So gehören einige der Cookies, die wir auf unseren Websites verwenden,
   Dritten, die Outbrain bei unserer Marketing- oder Werbetätigkeit Ihnen
   gegenüber unterstützen. Wir verlangen, dass diese Dritten und externen
   Unternehmen einwilligen, sämtliche an sie weitergegebenen Informationen
   vertraulich zu behandeln und nur zur Erfüllung ihrer Pflichten uns
   gegenüber zu verwenden. Zu diesem Zweck schließen wir Vereinbarungen
   mit allen Dritten, die für uns personenbezogene Daten verarbeiten,
   damit gewährleistet ist, dass sie Ihre personenbezogenen Daten in
   Übereinstimmung mit unseren strengen Anweisungen und allen geltenden
   Datenschutzgesetzen verarbeiten. Wenn Sie einen Post auf unserem Blog
   hinterlassen, sind Ihr Kommentar und Ihre Informationen öffentlich
   zugänglich. Bitte wenden Sie sich an support@outbrain.com, um Ihren
   Kommentar zu entfernen.
     * Verwendung von Dienstleistungen Dritter auf unseren Websites.

   Unsere Websites enthalten Links zu anderen Websites, die uns nicht
   gehören und die wir nicht betreiben. Wir kontrollieren, empfehlen oder
   billigen den Content, die Produkte, Dienstleistungen,
   Datenschutzbestimmungen oder -maßnahmen dieser Websites Dritter nicht.
   Auf unseren Websites sehen Sie beispielsweise anklickbare Symbole, über
   die Sie auf die Facebook-Seite von Outbrain oder die LinkedIn-Seite von
   Outbrain gelangen. Sofern Sie entscheiden, diese Links anzuklicken,
   sollten Sie sich dessen bewusst sein, dass Facebook und LinkedIn unter
   Umständen ihre eigenen Cookies auf Ihr Gerät senden und unabhängig
   personenbezogene Daten erfassen. Daher ist es wichtig, dass Sie die
   Datenschutzbestimmungen von Facebook und/oder LinkedIn lesen.
     * Beachten Sie auch den Abschnitt dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen über
       die Weitergabe von Daten.

   (d) Ihre Rechte
   Die Nutzungsbedingungen auf unserer Website regeln die Nutzung unserer
   Website und gelten auch für Sie. Sie können die Nutzung unserer Website
   jederzeit beenden. In diesem Fall können Sie auch die Cookies
   entfernen, die wir auf jedem für den Zugriff auf unsere Website
   verwendeten Gerät gesetzt haben. Falls Sie während Ihrer Nutzung
   unserer Websites Ihre E-Mail-Adresse übermitteln, enthält jede E-Mail,
   die Sie von Outbrain erhalten, eine Option zum Abbestellen des
   E-Mail-Empfangs.
   Für Besucher aus dem europäischen Gebiet hat Outbrain auf unseren
   Websites eine Plattform für das Zustimmungs-Management eingerichtet
   (betrieben durch One Trust), über die Nutzer die Möglichkeit haben,
   ihre Zustimmung zu Cookies und vergleichbaren Trackingtechnologien auf
   unseren Websites zu geben oder zu verweigern. Wenn Sie auf unsere
   Website zugreifen, sehen Sie einen Banner am unteren Ende der Seite,
   das Informationen über die Cookies, die wir einsetzen, enthält. Sie
   können auf das Banner klicken und sämtliche Cookies verweigern, die
   nicht absolut notwendig sind. Der Klick auf "Akzeptieren"/"Accept" auf
   dem Banner oder das Scrollen/Klicken auf unseren Seiten ist ein Zeichen
   Ihres Einverständnisses. Entsprechend basiert Outbrains Rechtmäßigkeit
   der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten auf unseren Websites auf
   Zustimmung. Sie können Ihre Zustimmung jederzeit widerrufen.
   Nutzer: Sie sind ein Nutzer, wenn Sie eine Seite einer Website oder
   Anwendung eines Partners von Outbrain besuchen, auf der das
   Outbrain-Widget installiert ist („Partner-Websites“). Falls Sie
   beispielsweise die Seiten https://news.sky.com/uk, www.spiegel.de oder
   www.cnn.com besuchen, wird das Outbrain-Widget in diese Websites
   eingebunden. Dass Sie mit einem Outbrain-Widget verbunden sind,
   erkennen Sie an dem Text, der auf Outbrain verweist (z.B. „Empfohlen
   von Outbrain“, „von Outbrain“ neben den Empfehlungen). Wenn Sie auf die
   Verlinkung zu Outbrain klicken, sehen Sie einen detaillierten Hinweis ,
   der Ihnen erlaubt, zum Interessenprofil von Outbrain zu navigieren, wo
   Sie eine allgemeine Darstellung der Arten von Datenkategorien finden,
   die Outbrain für die Abgabe seiner Empfehlungen verwendet. Sie haben an
   dieser Stelle auch die Möglichkeit, personalisierte Empfehlungen zu
   deaktivieren. Sehen Sie hier mehr.
   Beispiel eines Outbrain-Widgets
   Outbrain Example Recommendations
   (a) Welche Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun
   Wir verwenden UUIDs, IP-Adressen und andere Nutzungsdaten, damit wir
   Ihnen interessante Empfehlungen unterbreiten können. Outbrains
   Empfehlungen werden unter Umständen von einem Werbetreibenden bezahlt,
   der Sie auf eine neue Website leitet, oder es handelt sich um eigene
   Empfehlungen des Publishers, sodass der Link auf eine andere Seite
   desselben Publishers führt.
     * UUID.

   Wenn Sie als Nutzer erstmalig eine Partner-Website (z.B. CNN.com)
   besuchen, setzt Outbrain zur Erzeugung einer eindeutigen Nutzerkennung,
   UUID (Unique User Identifier), ein Cookie auf Ihrem Gerät. Wir
   katalogisieren und analysieren den Content, den Sie auf
   Partner-Websites konsumieren. Unsere Empfehlungen basieren auf: (i) dem
   Browserverlauf; (ii) ähnlichen Surfmustern anderer Nutzer; (ii)
   Empfehlungen, die bei Outbrains Adressaten zur gegebenen Zeit beliebt
   sind; (iv) einem gewissen Maß an Zufälligkeit und (v)
   Zielanforderungen, die durch unsere Amplify-Kunden bereitgestellt oder
   von ihnen verlangt werden. Beispielsweise weiß Outbrain, dass UUID 123
   (wobei es sich um Sie handeln kann, während Sie mit Ihrem iPhone X und
   dem Chrome-Browser auf der Spiegel-Website surfen) gern Texte über
   ferne Reiseziele liest und dass Personen, die gern von fernen
   Reisezielen lesen, sich auch für Artikel über exotisches Essen
   interessieren.
   Die UUID stellt eine Abfolge von Ziffern und/oder Buchstaben dar. Diese
   UUID ist an Ihr Gerät gebunden und variiert je nach verwendetem
   Browser. Mit anderen Worten: Outbrain erfasst verschiedene UUIDs
   abhängig davon, welches Gerät und/oder welchen Browser Sie für den
   Zugriff auf die Websites des Partners verwenden. Dies bedeutet
   beispielsweise, dass Sie eine UUID haben, wenn Sie eine Partner-Website
   von Ihrem Mobiltelefon aus mit dem Safari-Browser besuchen, und eine
   andere UUID, wenn Sie eine Partner-Website von Ihrem iPad aus mit dem
   Safari-Browser besuchen. Outbrain kombiniert und konsolidiert eine UUID
   von einem Mobilgerät (Handgerät oder Tablet) von einem Browser, der
   dann von demselben Gerät auf eine Anwendung (oder umgekehrt) zugreift.
   Durch die Zuweisung einer UUID kann Outbrain die besuchten Seiten und
   die Klicks auf Outbrains Empfehlungen von dieser UUID kombinieren, was
   alles dem Ziel dient, interessante Empfehlungen bereitzustellen.
     * IP-Adressen und andere Nutzungsdaten.

   Wir erfassen eine UUID wie oben erläutert, und wir erfassen auch die
   folgenden Daten: (i) IP-Adresse (wird nach Industriestandards
   anonymisiert); (ii) User-Agent-Daten: Gerätetyp (z.B. iPhone),
   Browsertyp (z.B. Chrome), Betriebssystem, z.B. iOS); (iii) die
   besuchten Seiten; (iv) den Zeitpunkt des Besuchs und (v) die
   verweisenden URLs und andere normalerweise bei HTTP-Anfragen
   übertragenen Informationen.
   Durch die oben genannten statistischen Daten erhalten wir Informationen
   darüber, wie viele Nutzer eine bestimmte Seite auf unseren
   Partner-Websites, auf denen das Outbrain-Widget installiert ist,
   besucht haben, wie lange jeder Nutzer auf der Seite blieb, die Art des
   Contents auf der Seite, die er angeklickt hat, und wie der Nutzer sich
   auf der Seite allgemein verhalten hat. Diese Informationen sind nur
   dann personenbezogene Daten, wenn sie mit einer UUID verbunden sind.
   (b) Cookies und andere vergleichbare Technologien, die wir nutzen
   Diese Cookie-Tabelle enthält unter „Nutzer“ eine detaillierte Liste der
   Erstanbieter-Cookies, die wir bei Ihrer Interaktion mit
   Partner-Websites, auf denen die Outbrain-Technologie implementiert ist,
   verwenden.
   Wenn Sie auf einen Link zu einer unserer Empfehlungen klicken, setzt
   der Amplify-Werbetreibende, der die Empfehlung finanziert, unter
   Umständen durch Weiterleitungen vor der Ankunft auf der Zielseite der
   Empfehlungen oder bei Erreichen der Zielseite Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät.
   In diesen Fällen gelten für Sie die Datenschutzbestimmungen des
   Werbetreibenden.
   Zusätzlich zu Outbrains sichtbarem Widget auf Partner-Websites
   implementieren bestimmte Outbrain-Werbetreibende gegebenenfalls das
   Outbrain-Pixel auf ihren Websites. Das Outbrain-Pixel ermittelt, ob der
   Nutzer, der auf die Seite mit dem installierten Pixel gelangt, über
   eine Outbrain-UUID verfügt. Falls es eine mit diesem Endnutzer
   verbundene UUID gibt, kann Outbrain den Werbetreibenden erlauben, diese
   UUIDs erneut anzusprechen, und/oder den Werbetreibenden die Gesamtzahl
   der UUIDs, die diese Seite erreicht haben, übermitteln. Sofern es auf
   der Seite keine Outbrain-UUID gab, erfasst das Outbrain-Pixel keine
   Daten über den Nutzer.
   Wir legen Werbetreibenden nahe, die Verwendung des Outbrain-Pixels auf
   ihren eigenen Websites offenzulegen. Outbrain kombiniert keine
   Pixelinformationen mit dem Profil einer UUID.
   Datenpunkte wie Seitenaufrufe und Klicks sind mit einer bestimmten UUID
   verbunden und werden 13 Monate lang gespeichert. Falls beispielsweise
   UUID 123 am 31. Dezember 2017 einen Artikel gelesen hat, ist dieser
   Artikel am 1. Februar 2018 nicht mehr Teil des Profils von UUID 123.
   (c) So geben wir unter Umständen Informationen weiter
   Outbrain leitet keine Nutzerprofile an Dritte weiter. Wir geben jedoch
   unter Umständen die UUID an bestimmte Partner zum Zweck der
   Cookie-Synchronisierung oder aufgrund technischer Anforderungen weiter.
   Beachten Sie bitte auch den Abschnitt dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen
   über die Weitergabe von Daten.
   (d) Ihre Rechte
     * Outbrain-Deaktivierung/Opt-Out. Sie können Outbrains
       personalisierte Empfehlungen jederzeit deaktivieren. In Outbrains
       Interessenprofil finden Sie eine allgemeine Darstellung, welche
       Ihrer Daten Outbrain kennt und gegebenenfalls für Empfehlungen
       nutzt. Über das Interessenprofil haben Sie auch die Möglichkeit,
       personalisierte Empfehlungen zu deaktivieren (Sie können ein
       solches Opt-Out auch hier vornehmen). Bitte beachten Sie, dass die
       Deaktivierung von Browsern über Outbrains Interessenprofil
       stattfindet, die Deaktivierung von personalisierten Empfehlungen in
       Anwendungen jedoch über die Einstellungen in Ihrem Gerät (Beispiele
       für die Schritte erhalten Sie im Interessenprofil).

   WICHTIG – obwohl Sie Outbrain deaktiviert haben:
     * Sie sehen weiterhin Outbrains Empfehlungen. Die Deaktivierung von
       Outbrains Personalisierungsverfolgung bedeutet nicht, dass Sie
       keine weiteren Empfehlungen von Outbrain erhalten. Stattdessen
       bedeutet es, dass Outbrains Empfehlungen nicht mehr personalisiert
       sind. Die Empfehlungen nutzen nach wie vor Informationen über das
       von Ihnen betrachtete Dokument (z.B. Kontextinformationen), um
       Ihnen auf dieser Seite Empfehlungen zu unterbreiten.

     * Die Deaktivierung basiert auf Cookies und ist spezifisch für das
       Gerät/den Browser. Sofern Sie im Web von verschiedenen Geräten
       und/oder Browsern aus surfen, müssen Sie eine Deaktivierung von
       jedem Gerät und/oder Browser aus vornehmen, damit dafür gesorgt
       ist, dass wir auf allen die Personalisierungsverfolgung verhindern.
       Aus demselben Grund müssen Sie, wenn Sie ein neues Gerät kaufen,
       den Browser wechseln oder das Deaktivierungs-Cookie löschen, eine
       erneute Deaktivierung vornehmen. Die Deaktivierung der
       Personalisierungsverfolgung ist nicht dasselbe wie die Blockierung
       von Cookies.

     * Um die Löschung des mit Ihrer UUID verbundenen Profils
       sicherzustellen, sollten Sie Outbrain über mindestens 21 Tage nicht
       aktivieren. Ihre Deaktivierung der personalisierten Empfehlungen
       durch Outbrain ist sofort wirksam. Falls Ihr Browser jedoch die
       lokale Speicherung zulässt und Sie innerhalb von 21 Tagen nach
       Ihrer Deaktivierung Outbrains personalisierte Empfehlungen
       aktivieren, wird Ihr vorheriges Profil möglicherweise wieder mit
       Ihrer UUID verbunden. Sofern Sie nicht innerhalb von 21 Tagen eine
       neue Aktivierung vornehmen, wird Ihr Profil gelöscht und kann nicht
       wiederhergestellt werden.

     * Wie bei den meisten Opt-Outs basiert auch der Outbrain
       Browser-Opt-Out auf einem Cookie. Das Cookie ist dazu bestimmt,
       bestehen zu bleiben, damit die Präferenz des Nutzers durchgesetzt
       werden kann. Allerdings kann die „Intelligent Tracking Prevention“
       (das Verhindern von Aufzeichnungen) für Safari in iOS 11 das
       Fortbestehen von Cookies über ein 24-Stunden-Zeitfenster hinaus
       beeinträchtigen. Wir empfehlen die Nutzung eines anderen Browsers
       oder das Blockieren aller 3rd-Party-Cookies in dem Browser, sodass
       Ihr Opt-Out-Wunsch berücksichtigt wird, ohne dass Sie sich auf die
       Opt-Out-Methodik eines einzelnen Unternehmens verlassen müssen.

     * Zusätzliche Deaktivierungsoptionen. Sie können auch den Erhalt
       personalisierter Werbung durch uns oder andere Werbeunternehmen
       über branchenbetriebene Tools deaktivieren, beispielsweise NAI oder
       die verschiedenen DAA-basierten Seiten (DAA,
       http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices, und/oder EDAA
       www.youronlinechoices.eu). Durch den Besuch der Seiten für
       Verbraucherwahlmöglichkeiten NAI, DAA, DAAC oder EDAA können Sie
       einige oder alle Leistungen der teilnehmenden Mitglieder
       deaktivieren. Wie auch die Deaktivierung von Outbrain bedeuten auch
       diese Deaktivierungen nicht, dass Sie gar keine Werbung mehr
       erhalten, sondern lediglich, dass die Werbung nicht mehr auf Sie
       zugeschnitten ist. Möglicherweise erhalten Sie weiterhin Werbung,
       beispielsweise anhand der speziellen Website, die Sie betrachten
       (d. h. kontextbasierte Werbung). Falls durch die Einstellungen
       Ihrer Browser zudem Cookies abgewiesen werden, wenn Sie die
       Verbraucherseiten DAA, DAAC oder EDAA besuchen, ist Ihre
       Deaktivierung unter Umständen nicht wirksam.
     * Rechtsgrundlage. Outbrains Rechtmäßigkeit der Verarbeitung
       personenbezogener Daten eines Nutzers gründet auf der durch unsere
       Partner-Websites festgelegten Rechtmäßigkeit. Jeder Partner-Website
       liegt Zustimmung oder berechtigtes Interesse zugrunde. Bitte lesen
       Sie die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen der Partner-Websites, um
       weitere Informationen über deren Rechtmäßigkeit zu erhalten. Falls
       bei einem Partner eine Zustimmung erforderlich ist, setzt Outbrain
       kein Cookie bei Ihnen, wenn Sie der Partner-Website keine
       Zustimmung erteilt haben.

   Geschäftspartner: Sie sind ein Geschäftspartner, wenn Sie sich im Namen
   des Unternehmens, für das Sie arbeiten, registrieren (oder Outbrain per
   E-Mail kontaktieren), um die Dienstleistungen Outbrain Amplify oder
   Outbrain Engage zu nutzen. Sehen Sie hier mehr.
   (a) Welche Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun
   Womöglich übermitteln Sie bestimmte personenbezogene Daten (wie die
   E-Mail-Adresse), wenn Sie sich für die Amplify- oder
   Engage-Dienstleistungen registrieren oder anderweitig mit uns
   kommunizieren oder interagieren. Wenn Sie sich bei uns als
   Geschäftspartner bewerben, benötigen wir gegebenenfalls weitere Daten
   von Ihnen über Anmeldebögen für Werbetreibende, Werbeaufträge und
   andere Formulare. Wir erfassen automatisch Informationen über die
   Aktivitäten Ihres Nutzernamens im Outbrain-Dashboard. Wenn Sie
   beispielsweise als Amplify-Geschäftspartner die Kosten pro Klick für
   eine Ihrer Kampagnen ändern, findet sich im Audit Trail von Outbrain
   eine Aufzeichnung all dieser Maßnahmen.
   Wir erfassen und verarbeiten die oben genannten personenbezogenen
   Daten, um unsere Verpflichtungen aus unserem Vertrag mit Ihnen als
   Geschäftspartner (oder zukünftiger Geschäftspartner) zu erfüllen, unter
   anderem:
     * Beantwortung Ihrer Fragen und Anforderungen;

     * Gewährung Ihres Zugriffs auf bestimmte Funktionen und Eigenschaften
       der Amplify- und Engage-Dienstleistungen (z.B. Bereitstellung und
       Pflege Ihres Dashboard-Kontos);

     * Verifizierung Ihrer Identität;

     * Kommunikation mit Ihnen über Ihr Konto, unsere Produkte und die für
       Ihre Nutzung der Amplify- oder Engage-Dienstleistung relevanten
       Werbeaktionen.

   (b) Cookies und andere vergleichbare Technologien, die wir nutzen
   In der Cookie-Tabelle unter „Geschäftspartner“ erhalten Sie eine
   detaillierte Liste der Cookies (und ihrer jeweiligen Speicherfristen),
   die wir für Geschäftspartner verwenden.
   (c) So geben wir unter Umständen Informationen weiter
   Wir legen bestimmte Informationen über Geschäftspartner gegenüber
   Anbietern, Auftragnehmern oder anderen offen, die Outbrain bei der
   Erbringung der Dienstleistungen unterstützen (z.B.
   Kreditkartenabwicklung). Beachten Sie bitte auch den Abschnitt dieser
   Datenschutzbestimmungen über die Weitergabe von Daten.
   (d) Ihre Rechte
   Sofern Sie als Geschäftspartner Ihre Daten verifizieren, berichtigen,
   aktualisieren oder deren Deaktivierung veranlassen möchten, können Sie
   Ihre Profileinstellungen im Outbrain-Dashboard editieren oder uns unter
   support@outbrain.com kontaktieren. Falls Sie von Outbrain E-Mails
   erhalten, können Sie den Empfang über einen Link in der E-Mail
   abbestellen. Bitte beachten Sie, dass Sie durch das Abbestellen nicht
   den Erhalt von Benachrichtigungen deaktivieren, die kritisch für die
   Erbringung der Amplify- oder Engage-Dienstleistungen sind (z.B.
   E-Mail-Rechnungen).
   Outbrains Rechtmäßigkeit der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten von
   Geschäftspartnern gründet in berechtigtem Interesse.
   3. Datensicherheit, Übertragungen außerhalb des EWR, Weitergabe und
   Speicherfristen

                                      +

   Sicherheit
   Outbrain verfügt über ein dezidiertes Sicherheitsteam. Wir führen eine
   strenge Kontrolle der durch uns erfassten Daten durch und speichern
   diese in durch Firewalls geschützten und sicheren Datenbanken mit
   streng begrenzten und kontrollierten Zugriffsrechten, damit deren
   Sicherheit gewährleistet ist. Weitere Informationen können Sie unseren
   Sicherheitsstandards entnehmen.
   Geschäftspartner haben Zugang zu bestimmten passwortgeschützten
   Funktionen der Dienstleistungen Amplify oder Engage. Sie sind für die
   Geheimhaltung dieses Passworts verantwortlich. Bitte denken Sie daran,
   dass die Informationsübertragung über das Internet leider nicht
   vollständig sicher ist. Ein häufig vorkommender Internetbetrug wird als
   „Spoofing“ oder „Phishing“ bezeichnet. Dabei erhalten Sie eine E-Mail,
   die von einer vertrauenswürdigen Quelle zu stammen scheint und in der
   Ihre personenbezogenen Daten erfragt werden. Bitte beachten Sie, dass
   wir Ihnen keine E-Mails senden, in denen wir Sie um die Überprüfung
   Ihrer Kreditkarten- oder Bankdaten oder anderer personenbezogener Daten
   bitten. Sollten Sie jemals eine E-Mail erhalten, die den Anschein
   erweckt, von uns zu sein, und in der derartige Daten von Ihnen
   angefordert werden, antworten Sie nicht darauf und klicken Sie auch auf
   keine Links in dieser E-Mail. Leiten Sie stattdessen diese E-Mail an
   uns unter legal@outbrain.com weiter, da wir Fälle möglichen
   Internetbetrugs untersuchen.
   Datenübertragungen außerhalb der EU/des EWR
   Wenn wir personenbezogene Daten aus dem Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum in
   andere Länder übertragen, deren geltende Gesetze nicht über dasselbe
   Datenschutzniveau wie in den europäischen Gebieten verfügen, sorgen wir
   durch eigene Maßnahmen für ein geeignetes Datenschutzniveau. Für Ihre
   Daten gelten somit weiterhin Ihre Rechte und Ihr Datenschutz.
   Beispielsweise verwenden wir anerkannte Vertragsklauseln und weitere
   Maßnahmen, durch die für den Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten durch
   die Empfänger gesorgt ist.
   Weitergabe von Daten
   Zusätzlich zu der beschriebenen Offenlegung Ihrer personenbezogenen
   Daten der einzelnen Nutzerarten legen wir personenbezogene Daten unter
   Umständen wie folgt offen:
     * Innerhalb der durch Outbrain kontrollierten Unternehmensgruppe aus
       internen Gründen, vorrangig für geschäftliche und betriebliche
       Zwecke;

     * Bei einem Geschäftsübergang, wie einer Fusion, dem Erwerb durch ein
       anderes Unternehmen oder dem teilweisen oder vollständigen Verkauf
       unserer Vermögenswerte, gehören Ihre personenbezogenen Daten
       wahrscheinlich zu den übertragenen Vermögenswerten;

     * Bei entsprechenden rechtlichen Anforderungen (z.B. zur
       Unterstützung strafrechtlicher Ermittlungen oder anderer
       Rechtsverfahren); und/oder

     * Als Reaktion auf einen echten Notfall.

   Außerdem kombinieren wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten mit denen anderer
   Nutzer, um Trendinformationen weiterzugeben und Nutzerstatistiken mit
   Dritten zu verbinden, jedoch stets in zusammengefasster und
   anonymisierter Form.
   Datenspeicherung
   Die Speicherfrist für jedes durch Outbrain verwendete Cookie (gleich ob
   unser eigenes oder für uns durch Dritte) ist in der Cookie-Tabelle
   genannt.
   Outbrain verfügt zudem über eine Richtlinie zur Datenspeicherung, in
   der die Speicherfrist für personenbezogene Daten aufgeführt ist, die
   auf unserer Analyse basiert, welche Speicherfrist für bestimmte Daten
   aus rechtlichen oder geschäftlichen Gründen angemessen ist. Wenn wir
   personenbezogene Daten nicht mehr benötigen, löschen oder vernichten
   wir diese auf sichere Weise. Zusammengefasste Daten, durch die kein
   Gerät/Browser (oder keine Person) identifiziert werden kann und die für
   die Berichterstattung und Analyse benötigt werden, behalten wir so
   lange, wie dies wirtschaftlich nötig ist.
   4. Kinder

                                      +

   Keine unserer Dienstleistungen richtet sich an Kinder unter 16 Jahren.
   Wir erfassen wissentlich keine personenbezogenen Daten von Personen
   unter 16 Jahren. Stellen wir bei der Datenerfassung fest, dass ein
   Websitebesucher, ein Nutzer oder ein Geschäftspartner unter 16 ist,
   verwenden oder behalten wir seine/ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht.
   Wenn wir davon Kenntnis erlangen, dass wir unwissentlich
   personenbezogene Daten von einem Kind im Alter von unter 16 erfasst
   haben, ergreifen wir angemessene Anstrengungen zur Löschung dieser
   Daten aus unseren Verzeichnissen. Wenn du ein Kind bist, nutze Outbrain
   nicht, verlasse diese Seite und geh lieber spielen!
   5. Bürger des europäischen Gebiets

                                      +

   In Übereinstimmung mit europäischen Datenschutzgesetzen, insbesondere
   der europäischen Datenschutz-Grundverordnung (DSGVO), gewährt Outbrain
   Bürgern der europäischen Gebiete bestimmte zusätzliche Rechte wie das
   Recht auf Zugriff, Berichtigung, Einspruch, Beschwerde, Löschung und
   Blockierung. Insbesondere:
     * das Recht auf Auskunft darüber, ob und welche personenbezogenen
       Daten von uns verarbeitet werden, sowie das Recht, die Berichtigung
       oder Änderung personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen.
     * unter bestimmten Umständen das Recht, die Löschung
       personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen.
     * unter bestimmten Umständen das Recht, die Einschränkung der
       Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen.
     * den jederzeitigen vollständigen oder teilweisen Widerruf Ihrer
       Zustimmung zur Verarbeitung und Nutzung Ihrer Daten mit zukünftiger
       Gültigkeit.
     * das Recht auf Erhalt Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten in einem
       üblichen, strukturierten und mechanisch lesbaren Format.
     * Kontaktaufnahme mit Ihrem Datenschutzbeauftragten bei Fragen,
       Anmerkungen, Beschwerden oder Anfragen im Zusammenhang mit unserer
       Datenschutzerklärung und der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen
       Daten.
     * das Recht auf Beschwerde bei der zuständigen Aufsichtsbehörde,
       falls Sie der Auffassung sind, dass die Verarbeitung Ihrer
       personenbezogenen Daten gesetzeswidrig ist.

   Neben dem oben Genannten weisen wir in diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen
   auf bestimmte Rechte für Bürger des europäischen Gebiets hin. Laut der
   DSGVO bezeichnet die Formulierung „Bürger aus europäischen Gebieten“
   den Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum (EWR) und die Schweiz. Im Sinne dieser
   Datenschutzbestimmungen umfasst der Begriff „europäische Gebiete“
   weiterhin das Vereinigte Königreich, auch nachdem dieses den
   Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum im Anschluss an den Austritt (Brexit)
   verlässt.
   Bitte senden Sie eine Nachricht an PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com, wenn
   Sie Fragen zur Ausübung dieser Rechte haben.
   6. Datenschutzrechte in Kalifornien

                                      +

   Laut dem California Civil Code, Abschnitte 1798.83-1798.84, sind
   Einwohner Kaliforniens berechtigt, von uns darüber Auskunft zu
   erhalten, welche Kategorien personenbezogener Daten wir an Dritte oder
   verbundene Unternehmen für diese Dritten oder für direkte
   Marketingzwecke verbundener Unternehmen weiterleiten. In dieser
   Auskunft werden die Kategorien der weitergeleiteten Daten
   identifiziert, einschließlich einer Liste der Dritten und verbundenen
   Unternehmen, an die die Daten weitergeleitet wurden, und deren Namen
   und Adressen. Falls Sie Ihren Wohnsitz in Kalifornien unterhalten und
   Sie diese Auskunft einholen möchten, senden Sie bitte eine schriftliche
   Anforderung an PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oder an die folgende
   Anschrift: Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY
   10011. Sie erhalten eine Antwort innerhalb von 30 Tagen.
   7. „Do Not Track“-Angabe

                                      +

   Einige Browser senden an Websites „Do Not Track (DNT)“-Signale, mit
   denen der Website mitgeteilt wird, dass die Aktivitäten des Nutzers
   nicht verfolgt werden sollen. Es besteht jedoch kein allgemeingültiges
   Verständnis darüber, wie DNT-Signale zu interpretieren sind, und daher
   findet durch Outbrain derzeit keine Modifizierung, Änderung oder
   Reaktion auf die DNT-Anforderungen oder -Signale von diesen Browsern
   statt. Wir beobachten weiterhin die Branchenaktivitäten in diesem
   Bereich und bewerten unsere DNT-Verfahren bei Bedarf neu.
   Zwischenzeitlich können Sie eine Reihe anderer durch uns
   bereitgestellter Tools zur Kontrolle der Datenerfassung und -nutzung
   einsetzen, unter anderem die Möglichkeit, im Nutzerbereich den Erhalt
   personalisierter Empfehlungen zu deaktivieren.
   8. Mögliche Änderungen dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen

                                      +

   Wir ändern diese Datenschutzbestimmungen zu gegebener Zeit. Darüber
   informieren wir durch einen deutlichen Hinweis, der für Sie als
   Websitebesucher oder Geschäftspartner erkennbar ist. Wir haben jedoch
   keine Möglichkeit, Nutzern gegenüber eine Aktualisierung anzukündigen.
   Sie sollten diesen Bereich regelmäßig daraufhin überprüfen, ob die
   Datenschutzbestimmungen aktualisiert worden sind. Wir zeigen stets das
   Datum der letzten Änderung der Datenschutzbestimmungen oben auf der
   Seite an, damit Sie wissen, wann diese zuletzt überarbeitet wurden.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                Última actualización: 23 de mayo de 2018

   Outbrain se compromete a proteger tus datos personales. Esta Política
   de privacidad («Política de privacidad») rige el uso por parte de
   Outbrain de los datos recopilados por nosotros, incluyendo todos y cada
   uno de los datos personales. Los datos personales son información que
   se relaciona contigo y que puede identificarte como individuo.
   Utilizamos tus datos personales de conformidad con todas las leyes
   aplicables. Para garantizar el cumplimiento y estar en sintonía con los
   valores de Outbrain en materia de confianza y transparencia, contamos
   con un equipo de defensores de la privacidad responsables de la
   implementación continua de nuestro programa de privacidad global.

                                                           + EXPANDIR TODO

   1. Quiénes somos, qué hacemos, cómo ponerse en contacto con Outbrain,
   nuestro RPD o las autoridades competentes

                                      +

   Quiénes somos:
   Outbrain significa Outbrain Inc, una sociedad de Delaware (EE.UU.) con
   sede en Nueva York y sus filiales (colectivamente, «Outbrain», o
   «nosotros», «nos», «nuestro»). Operamos desde 12 oficinas globales y
   colaboramos con editores y vendedores de todo el mundo.
   Qué hacemos:
   La misión de Outbrain es facilitar recomendaciones interesantes a sus
   usuarios basadas en sus intereses. Para lograr nuestra misión firmamos
   acuerdos con:
     * editores y socios en línea que desean recomendar contenido
       relevante a sus lectores (Outbrain Engage), y
     * anunciantes que quieren que los lectores vean su contenido
       (Outbrain Amplify).

   Cómo ponerse en contacto con nosotros:
   Revisamos regularmente nuestro cumplimiento de la presente Política de
   privacidad. Las preguntas, comentarios y solicitudes relacionadas con
   esta Política de privacidad son bienvenidas y deben dirigirse a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com o por correo postal a Outbrain Inc. 39
   West 13th Street, 3rd floor, Nueva York, NY 10011, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Si Outbrain no responde satisfactoriamente a tus preguntas o
   inquietudes, también puede ponerte en contacto con las siguientes
   personas para obtener asesoramiento, apoyo o realizar reclamaciones:
     * El Responsable de Protección de Datos externo de Outbrain («RPD»):
       ePrivacy GmbH, representada por D. Christoph Bauer. Se puede
       contactar con ePrivacy GmbH directamente en privacy@eprivacy.eu.
     * El Information Commissioner’s Officer, que es el principal servicio
       de supervisión de Outbrain en Europa.

   Órganos de autorregulación
   Outbrain se adhiere a los principios de autorregulación establecidos
   por la Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) y la European Interactive
   Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Somos miembros activos de la
   Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), una asociación dedicada a la
   recopilación responsable de datos y su uso para la publicidad digital.
   Nos adherimos al Código de conducta de NAI para sitios web y móviles.
   Outbrain también se adhiere a los Principios de autorregulación de la
   Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) para la Publicidad conductual en
   línea y al Marco OBA de IAB de Europa.
   2. Tipos de usuarios de Outbrain (incluyendo la gestión del Opt Out)

                                      +

   Gran parte de esta Política de privacidad está dividida en apartados en
   función de la manera en que puedes interactuar con Outbrain. Por favor,
   determina qué tipo de usuario eres. Para cada tipo de usuario hemos
   explicado qué información recopilamos y por qué, qué cookies y otras
   tecnologías similares utilizamos, cómo compartimos dicha información y
   sus derechos.
   Visitantes del sitio: Eres un Visitante del Sitio cuando visitas e
   interactúas con nuestros sitios, páginas web, funciones interactivas,
   blogs y tus respectivos contenidos en Outbrain.com (o cualquier
   derivación, como Outbrain.co.uk, Outbrain.fr, Outbrain.de, etc.) y
   MyOutbrain.com («Nuestros sitios»). Ver más aquí.
   (a) Qué información recopilamos y por qué
   Queremos entender qué servicios te interesan de Nuestros sitios y
   queremos recordarte los servicios que ofrecemos cuando no estés
   visitando Nuestros sitios. Para ello, recopilamos la siguiente
   información sobre ti: (i) dirección IP, (ii) datos del Agente usuario:
   tipo de dispositivo (por ejemplo, iPhone), tipo de navegador (por
   ejemplo, Chrome), sistema operativo (por ejemplo, iOS), (iii) las
   páginas visitadas en Nuestro sitios (por ejemplo, la página «Acerca de»
   de Outbrain), (iv) la hora de la visita (y la zona horaria
   correspondiente) y (v) las URL de referencia y otra información que
   normalmente se transmite en las solicitudes HTTP (por ejemplo, esta
   información nos dice cómo llegaste a Nuestros sitios).
   (b) Qué cookies y otras tecnologías similares utilizamos
   Consulta esta Tabla de cookies en «Visitantes del sitio» para obtener
   una lista detallada de las cookies (y sus correspondientes períodos de
   retención) que utilizamos cuando visitas Nuestros sitios web.
   (c) Cómo podemos intercambiar información
     * Intercambio de información sobre ti en Nuestros sitios.

   En general, no compartimos tus datos personales con terceros para fines
   de marketing o publicidad. Sin embargo, utilizamos varios terceros
   (cada uno de los cuales aparece en esta Tabla de cookies) para
   ayudarnos a vender o a enviarte publicidad. Por ejemplo, algunas de las
   cookies que utilizamos en Nuestros sitios pertenecen a terceros que
   ayudarán a Outbrain a vender o a enviarte publicidad. Exigimos que
   estos terceros y empresas se comprometan a mantener toda la información
   compartida con ellos de manera confidencial y a utilizar la información
   sólo para cumplir con sus obligaciones para con nosotros. Lo anterior
   se logra mediante acuerdos con todos los terceros que tratan datos
   personales en nuestro nombre para asegurarnos de que tratan tus datos
   personales de conformidad con nuestras estrictas instrucciones y todas
   las leyes de protección de datos aplicables. Si realizas una
   publicación en nuestro blog, tu comentario e información estarán
   disponibles públicamente. Póngate en contacto con support@outbrain.com
   para eliminar tu comentario.
     * Uso de servicios de terceros en Nuestros sitios.

   Nuestros sitios contienen enlaces a otras webs que no operamos ni son
   de nuestra propiedad. No controlamos, recomendamos ni respaldamos el
   contenido, los productos, los servicios, las políticas ni las prácticas
   de privacidad de estas webs de terceros. Por ejemplo, en Nuestros
   sitios encontrará iconos en los que podrá hacer clic y que te llevarán
   a la página de Facebook de Outbrain o a la página de LinkedIn de
   Outbrain. Si decides hacer clic en estos enlaces, debes saber que
   Facebook y LinkedIn podrán enviar sus propias cookies a tu dispositivo
   y que podrán recopilar datos personales de forma independiente. Por lo
   tanto, es importante que leas las políticas de privacidad de Facebook o
   LinkedIn.
     * Consulta también el apartado Intercambio de esta Política de
       privacidad.

   (d) Tus derechos
   Los Términos de uso en Nuestro site rigen el uso de Nuestro site y
   también se aplican a ti. Puedes dejar de usar Nuestro site en cualquier
   momento. Si lo haces, es posible que también desees eliminar las
   cookies que hayamos colocado en cualquier dispositivo utilizado para
   acceder a Nuestro site. Si durante tu uso de Nuestros site proporcionas
   tu dirección de correo electrónico, cualquier correo electrónico que
   recibas de Outbrain incluirá la opción «darse de baja».
   Para los usarios del territorio europeo, Outbrain ha implementado una
   plataforma de administración de consentimiento en nuestro site (con la
   tecnología de One Trust), que brinda al usuario la oportunidad de dar
   su aprobación, o no, a cookies y tecnologías de seguimiento similares
   en nuestros sites. Al acceder a nuestros sites, verás un banner en la
   parte inferior de la página con información sobre las cookies que
   utilizamos. Puedes hacer clic en el banner para rechazar cualquier
   cookie que no sea estrictamente necesaria. Aceptar en el banner o hacer
   scrolling/clic en nuestros sites se interpreta como una indicación de
   aceptación. En consecuencia, la base legal de Outbrain para procesar
   datos personales en nuestros sites es el consentimiento. El usuario
   puede retirar su consentimiento en cualquier momento aquí.
   Usuarios: Eres un Usuario cuando visitas una página de un site o
   aplicación de uno de los socios de Outbrain donde esté instalado el
   complemento (widget) de Outbrain («Sitios asociados»). Por ejemplo, si
   visitas https://news.sky.com/uk o www.elpais.com se implementará el
   complemento Outbrain en esas webs. Sabrás que estás interactuando con
   un complemento de Outbrain cuando veas un texto que haga referencia a
   Outbrain (por ejemplo, «Recomendado por Outbrain», «por Outbrain» cerca
   de las recomendaciones). Si hace clic en la referencia con hipervínculo
   a Outbrain, verás un aviso detallado que te permitirá navegar hasta el
   Perfil de intereses de Outbrain, que proporciona una visualización
   general de los tipos de categorías de datos de Outbrain que se pueden
   utilizar para hacer tus recomendaciones. También te ofrece la
   posibilidad de inhabilitar las recomendaciones personalizadas. Ver más
   aquí.
   Ejemplo de un complemento Outbrain
   [rydw687kQ.png]
   (a) Qué información recopilamos y por qué
   Utilizamos identificadores únicos de usuario (UUID, por sus siglas en
   inglés), direcciones IP y otra información de uso para poder ofrecer
   recomendaciones interesantes. Las recomendaciones de Outbrain podrán
   ser pagadas por un anunciante que las vincule a un nuevo sitio web o
   podrán ser orgánicas de tal manera que el enlace sea a otra página en
   el mismo sitio web del editor.
     * UUID.

   Cuando como Usuario visita por primera vez un Sitio asociado (por
   ejemplo, CNN.com), Outbrain introducirá una cookie en tu dispositivo
   para generar un UUID. Catalogamos y analizamos el contenido que
   consumas en los Sitios asociados. Nuestras recomendaciones se basan en:
   (i) el historial de navegación, (ii) los patrones de navegación
   similares de otros Usuarios, (ii) las recomendaciones que son
   generalmente populares entre la audiencia de Outbrain en ese momento,
   (iv) cierta aleatoriedad y (v) los requisitos de orientación que puedan
   ser proporcionados o solicitados por nuestros clientes de Amplify. Como
   ejemplo, Outbrain puede saber que a UUID 123 (que podrías ser tú en su
   iPhone X en el periódico The Guardian usando Chrome como tu navegador)
   le gusta leer sobre destinos vacacionales lejanos y que a la gente que
   le gusta leer sobre destinos vacacionales lejanos también le gusta leer
   sobre comida exótica.
   El UUID es una secuencia de números o letras. Este UUID se vincula tu
   dispositivo y varía dependiendo del navegador que utilices. En otras
   palabras, Outbrain registra un UUID diferente dependiendo del
   dispositivo o navegador que utilices para acceder a los Sitios
   asociados. Por ejemplo, esto significa que tendrás un UUID cuando
   visites un Sitio asociado desde tu teléfono móvil usando el navegador
   Safari y un UUID diferente cuando visites un Sitio asociado desde tu
   iPad usando el navegador Safari. Outbrain combinará y unificará el UUID
   de un dispositivo móvil (portátil o tableta) y el del navegador que
   acceda posteriormente a una aplicación (o viceversa) desde el mismo
   dispositivo.
   Asignar un UUID permite a Outbrain asociar las páginas visitadas y los
   clics realizados en las recomendaciones de Outbrain desde dicho UUID,
   todo ello con el objetivo de proporcionar recomendaciones interesantes.
     * Dirección IP y otra información de uso.

   Recopilamos UUID como se explicó anteriormente y también recopilamos la
   siguiente información sobre ti: (i) dirección IP (y luego anonimizado
   en base a los estándares de la industria); (ii) datos del Agente
   usuario: tipo de dispositivo (por ejemplo, Iphone), tipo de navegador
   (por ejemplo, Chrome), sistema operativo (por ejemplo, iOS), (iii) las
   páginas visitadas, (iv) el momento de la visita y (v) las URL de
   referencia y otra información que normalmente se transmite en las
   solicitudes HTTP.
   La información estadística anterior nos proporciona información sobre
   cuántos Usuarios visitaron una página específica de nuestros Sitios
   asociados en los que está instalado el complemento de Outbrain, cuánto
   tiempo permaneció cada Usuario en esa página, el tipo de contenido en
   esa página sobre el que hicieron clic y cómo interactuaron en general
   con esa página. Esta información sólo son datos personales cuando están
   asociados a un UUID.
   (b) Qué cookies y otras tecnologías similares utilizamos
   Por favor, consulta esta Tabla de cookies en el apartado «Usuarios»
   para obtener una lista detallada de las primeras cookies que utilizamos
   cuando interactúas con Sitios asociados en los que se implementa la
   tecnología de Outbrain.
   Si haces clic en un enlace a una de nuestras recomendaciones, el
   anunciante de Amplify que patrocina la recomendación puede colocar
   cookies en tu dispositivo a través de redirecciones antes de llegar a
   la página de destino de las recomendaciones o al llegar a la página de
   destino. En tales casos, estarás sujeto a la Política de privacidad de
   ese anunciante.
   Además del complemento visible de Outbrain en los Sitios asociados,
   algunos anunciantes de Outbrain podrán implementar el píxel de Outbrain
   en sus sitios web. El píxel de Outbrain determina si el usuario que
   llega a la página donde está instalado el píxel tiene un UUID de
   Outbrain. Si existe un UUID asociado con dicho usuario final, Outbrain
   permitirá a los anunciantes reorientar esos UUID o proporcionará a los
   anunciantes el número total de UUID que llegaron a dicha página. Si no
   había ningún UUID de Outbrain en la página, el píxel de Outbrain no
   recopilará ninguna información sobre el usuario.
   Animamos a los anunciantes a informar sobre el uso del píxel de
   Outbrain en sus propios sitios web. Outbrain no combina información de
   píxeles con el perfil de un UUID.
   Los puntos de datos como las páginas vistas y los clics están
   conectados a un UUID en particular y se retienen durante 13 meses. Por
   ejemplo, si UUID 123 leyó un artículo el 31 de diciembre de 2017, el 1
   de febrero de 2018 ese artículo ya no formará parte del perfil de UUID
   123.
   (c) Cómo podemos intercambiar información
   Outbrain no comparte perfiles de usuario con terceros. Sin embargo, es
   posible que compartamos el UUID con determinados socios con el fin de
   sincronizar las cookies o en función de los requisitos técnicos.
   Consulta también el apartado «Intercambio» de la presente Política de
   privacidad.
   (d) Tus derechos
     * Inhabilitación voluntaria de Outbrain

   Podrás inhabilitar las recomendaciones personalizadas de Outbrain en
   cualquier momento. Por favor, consulta el Perfil de intereses de
   Outbrain para una visualización general de los datos que Outbrain
   conoce sobre ti y que puede utilizar para hacer sus recomendaciones. El
   Perfil de intereses también te ofrece la posibilidad de inhabilitar las
   recomendaciones personalizadas (puedes también hacer opt-out aquí). Ten
   en cuenta que la inhabilitación de los navegadores se realiza a través
   del Perfil de intereses de Outbrain, pero que la inhabilitación de las
   recomendaciones personalizadas en las aplicaciones se realiza a través
   de la configuración de tu dispositivo (hay ejemplos de los pasos a
   seguir en el Perfil de intereses).
   IMPORTANTE – a pesar de que hayas inhabilitado el seguimiento
   personalizado de Outbrain,
     * seguirás viendo las recomendaciones de Outbrain. Inhabilitar el
       seguimiento personalizado de Outbrain no significa que vayas a
       dejar de recibir recomendaciones de Outbrain. Por el contrario,
       significa que las recomendaciones de Outbrain no serán
       personalizadas. Las recomendaciones seguirán utilizando información
       sobre el documento que estás consultando (es decir, información
       contextual) para proporcionarte recomendaciones en esa página.

     * La inhabilitación voluntaria está basada en las cookies y es
       específica del dispositivo/navegador. Si navegas por la página web
       desde varios dispositivos o navegadores, deberás inhabilitar cada
       dispositivo o navegador para asegurarte de que no realizamos el
       seguimiento personalizado en ninguno ellos. Por la misma razón, si
       compras un dispositivo nuevo, cambias de navegador o borra (o
       limpia) la cookie de inhabilitación tendrás que inhabilitarla de
       nuevo. Inhabilitar el seguimiento personalizado no es lo mismo que
       bloquear las cookies.

     * Para garantizar la eliminación del perfil vinculado a su UUID, no
       habilites Outbrain durante al menos 21 días. Tu inhabilitación de
       las recomendaciones personalizadas de Outbrain será efectiva de
       manera inmediata. Sin embargo, si tu navegador permite el
       almacenamiento local y habilitas las recomendaciones personalizadas
       de Outbrain dentro de los 21 días siguientes a tu inhabilitación,
       es posible que tu perfil anterior se vincule de nuevo a su UUID. Si
       no habilitas Outbrain en un plazo de 21 días, se eliminará tu
       perfil y no podrás recuperarse.

     * Al igual que con la mayoría de los opt-out, también la opción de
       opt-out del navegador de Outbrain se basa en una cookie. La cookie
       de opt-out voluntaria persiste para cumplir con las preferencias
       del usuario. Sin embargo, la función de "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention " en iOS11 puede afectar la persistencia de las cookies
       en los sitios web después de una ventana de 24 horas. Sugerimos
       usar otro navegador o considerar bloquear todas las cookies de
       terceros desde el navegador para que se efectúe el“opt-out" sin
       tener que depender de la metodología de exclusión voluntaria de
       ninguna empresa.

     * Opciones adicionales de inhabilitación voluntaria. También podrás
       inhabilitar los anuncios personalizados que te ofrecemos nosotros u
       otras compañías de publicidad a través de herramientas impulsadas
       por la industria, como la NAI o las diversas páginas basadas en la
       DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices ; o EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
       Visitar las páginas de elección del consumidor de la NAI, DAA, DAAC
       o EDAA te permitirá inhabilitar todos o algunos de los servicios de
       los miembros participantes. Al igual que la inhabilitación de
       Outbrain, estas inhabilitaciones no significan que ya no recibirás
       ninguna publicidad, sino que los anuncios simplemente no serán
       personalizados. Podrás continuar recibiendo anuncios, por ejemplo,
       basados en el sitio web en particular que estás viendo (es decir,
       anuncios basados en el contexto). Además, si tus navegadores están
       configurados para rechazar las cookies cuando visitas las páginas
       de elección del consumidor de la DAA, DAAC o EDAA, es posible que
       no se lleve a cabo la inhabilitación.

     * Base legal. La base legal de Outbrain para el tratamiento de los
       datos personales de un Usuario reside en la base legal determinada
       para cada uno de nuestros Sitios asociados. Cada Sitio asociado se
       basará en el consentimiento o interés legítimo. Consulta la
       Política de privacidad de los Sitios asociados para obtener más
       información sobre su base legal. Si un socio se basa en el
       consentimiento, Outbrain no introducirá ninguna cookie si tu no has
       proporcionado el consentimiento en dicho Sitio asociado.

   Socios comerciales: te conviertes en Socio comercial cuando te
   registras (o envías un correo electrónico a Outbrain) en nombre de la
   compañía para la que trabajas para utilizar los Servicios Outbrain
   Amplify o Outbrain Engage. Ver más aquí.
   (a) Qué información recopilamos y por qué
   Puede que proporciones ciertos datos personales (como la dirección de
   correo electrónico) cuando te suscribas a los servicios de Amplify o
   Engage o alternativamente cuando te pongas en contacto o interactúes
   con nosotros. Si solicitas convertirte en Socio comercial, es posible
   que te solicitemos información adicional a través de formularios de
   solicitud de anunciantes, órdenes de inserción y otros formularios.
   Recopilamos automáticamente información acerca de las acciones de tu
   nombre de usuario en el panel de control de Outbrain. Por ejemplo, como
   un Socio comercial de Amplify, si cambias el coste por clic para una de
   tus campañas, el registro de auditoría de Outbrain tendrá un registro
   de todas esas acciones.
     * Recopilamos y tratamos los datos personales anteriores con el fin
       de cumplir nuestras obligaciones en virtud de nuestro acuerdo como
       Socio comercial (o posible Socio comercial) con usted, incluido
       para:

     * responder a tus preguntas y solicitudes;

     * proporcionarte acceso a ciertas funciones y características de
       nuestros servicios Amplify o Engage (por ejemplo, para proporcionar
       y mantener tu cuenta del panel de control);

     * verificar tu identidad;

     * informarte sobre tu cuenta, nuestros productos y promociones
       disponibles que puedan ser relevantes para tu uso del servicio
       Amplify o Engage.

   (b) Qué cookies y otras tecnologías similares utilizamos
   Consulta esta Tabla de cookies en el apartado «Socios comerciales» para
   obtener una lista detallada de las cookies (y sus correspondientes
   períodos de retención) que empleamos con los Socios comerciales.
   (c) Cómo podemos compartir información con cualquier persona
   Podemos revelar cierta información de los Socios comerciales a
   proveedores, contratistas u otros que ayuden a Outbrain a prestar los
   servicios (por ejemplo, procesamiento de tarjetas de crédito). Consulta
   también el apartado Intercambio de esta Política de privacidad.
   (d) Tus derechos
   Si como Socio comercial deseas verificar, corregir, actualizar o
   solicitar la desactivación de tu información, puedes ir al panel de
   control de Outbrain para editar tus preferencias de perfil o ponerte en
   contacto con nosotros en support@outbrain.com. Si estás recibiendo
   correos electrónicos de Outbrain, puedes «darte de baja» haciendo uso
   del enlace en el correo electrónico. Ten en cuenta que la cancelación
   de la suscripción no inhabilitará las notificaciones que sean críticas
   para proporcionar los servicios de Amplify o Engage (por ejemplo,
   facturas por correo electrónico).
   La base legal de Outbrain para tratar los datos personales de los
   Socios comerciales es el interés legítimo.
   3. Cómo protegemos la información, las transmisiones fuera del EEE, el
   intercambio y la retención

                                      +

   Seguridad
   Outbrain tiene un equipo de seguridad específico. Mantenemos un
   estricto control de los datos que recopilamos y los retenemos en bases
   de datos seguras y protegidas por cortafuegos con derechos de acceso
   estrictamente limitados y controlados, para garantizar su seguridad.
   Consulta nuestras normas de seguridad para obtener más información.
   Los socios comerciales tienen acceso a determinadas funciones
   protegidas por contraseña del servicio Amplify o Engage. Ellos son
   responsables de mantener la confidencialidad de la contraseña. Por
   favor, recuerda que, lamentablemente, la transmisión de información a
   través de Internet no es completamente segura. El «spoofing» o
   «phishing» son algunas de las estafas más comunes en Internet. Esto se
   produce cuando recibes un correo electrónico que parece proceder de una
   fuente legítima que te solicita datos personales. Ten en cuenta que no
   te enviaremos ningún correo electrónico solicitándote que verifiques la
   información de tu tarjeta de crédito, bancaria o cualquier otro dato
   personal. Si alguna vez recibes un correo electrónico que parece ser de
   nuestra parte solicitándote dicha información, no respondas a él y no
   haga clic en ninguno de los enlaces que aparecen en el correo
   electrónico. En su lugar, reenvíenos el correo electrónico a
   legal@outbrain.com, ya que investigaremos casos de posible fraude en
   Internet.
   Transferencias de datos fuera de la UE/EEE
   Cuando transferimos datos personales desde el Espacio Económico Europeo
   a otros países en los que las leyes aplicables no ofrecen el mismo
   nivel de protección de la privacidad de los datos que en el territorio
   europeo, adoptamos medidas para proporcionar un nivel adecuado de
   protección de los datos. En otras palabras, tus derechos y niveles de
   protección se mantienen con tus datos. Por ejemplo, utilizamos
   cláusulas contractuales aprobadas y otras medidas diseñadas para
   asegurar que los destinatarios de tus datos personales los protejan.
   Intercambio
   Además de la descripción de cómo podemos revelar tus datos personales
   en función de cada tipo de usuario, también podemos revelar datos
   personales de la siguiente manera:
     * Dentro de la familia de empresas controladas por Outbrain por
       razones internas, principalmente con fines comerciales y
       operativos.

     * Si pasamos por una transición de negocios, como una fusión,
       adquisición por otra compañía o venta de todos o parte de nuestros
       activos, es probable que tus datos personales se encuentren entre
       los activos transferidos.

     * Cuando la ley así lo requiera (por ejemplo, para cooperar con
       investigaciones de las fuerzas del orden u otros procedimientos
       legales).

     * Para responder a una verdadera emergencia.

   Además, combinamos tus datos personales con los de otros usuarios para
   compartir información de tendencias y agregar estadísticas de usuarios
   con terceros, siempre de forma agregada y anónima.
   Retención de datos
   El período de retención para cada una de las cookies que utiliza
   Outbrain (ya sea por su cuenta o en nuestro nombre por parte de
   terceros) se indica en la Tabla de cookies.
   Outbrain también mantiene una Política de Retención de Datos que
   detalla el período de retención de datos personales sobre la base de
   nuestro análisis sobre cuánto tiempo es necesario retener
   razonablemente los datos específicos para fines legales o comerciales.
   Cuando ya no necesitamos datos personales, los borraremos o
   destruiremos de forma segura. Los datos agregados, que no puedan
   identificar un dispositivo/navegador (o a una persona) y se utilicen
   con fines de información y análisis, se mantendrán durante el tiempo
   que sea necesario desde el punto de vista comercial.
   4. Niños

                                      +

   Ninguno de nuestros servicios está dirigido a niños menores de 16 años.
   No recopilamos de manera consciente datos personales de ninguna persona
   menor de 16 años de edad. Si en el momento de la recopilación
   determinamos que un Visitante del sitio, un Usuario o un Socio
   comercial es menor de 16 años, no utilizaremos ni mantendremos tus
   datos personales. Si tenemos constancia de que sin saberlo hemos
   recopilado datos personales de un menor de 16 años, haremos todos los
   esfuerzos razonables para eliminar dicha información de nuestros
   registros. ¡Si eres un niño, ve a jugar al patio, no uses ni
   interactúes con Outbrain!
   5. Ciudadanos del territorio europeo

                                      +

   En cumplimiento de la legislación europea en materia de privacidad, en
   particular el Reglamento General de Protección de Datos de la Unión
   Europea (RGPD), Outbrain proporciona derechos adicionales específicos a
   los ciudadanos del territorio europeo, tales como el derecho de acceso,
   rectificación, oposición, reclamación, supresión y bloqueo. En
   concreto:
     * El derecho a solicitar información sobre si nosotros tratamos tus
       datos personales y, en caso afirmativo, qué datos personales son
       tratados, y el derecho a exigir que los datos personales sean
       rectificados o modificados.
     * En determinadas circunstancias, el derecho a solicitar la supresión
       de los datos personales.
     * En determinadas circunstancias, el derecho a exigir que se
       restrinja el tratamiento de datos personales.
     * El derecho a retirar tu consentimiento para el tratamiento y uso de
       sus datos total o parcialmente en cualquier momento a través de una
       solicitud en el futuro.
     * El derecho a obtener tus datos personales en un formato común,
       estructurado y legible mecánicamente.
     * El derecho a ponerte en contacto con nuestro responsable de
       protección de datos si tienes alguna pregunta, comentario,
       reclamación o solicitud en relación con nuestra declaración sobre
       la protección de datos y el tratamiento de tus datos personales.
     * El derecho a presentar una reclamación ante la autoridad
       supervisora responsable si crees que el tratamiento de tus datos
       personales infringe la legislación.

   Envía un correo electrónico a privacyquestions@outbrain.com con
   cualquier pregunta sobre el ejercicio de cualquiera de los derechos
   anteriores.
   Además de lo anterior, hacemos referencia a ciertos derechos de los
   ciudadanos del territorio europeo a través de la presente Política de
   Privacidad. De conformidad con el RGPD, por ciudadanos del «territorio
   europeo» se entenderán los ciudadanos del Espacio Económico Europeo
   (EEE) y Suiza. A los efectos de la presente Política de privacidad, el
   término «territorio europeo» seguirá incluyendo al Reino Unido, incluso
   después de que el Reino Unido abandone el Espacio Económico Europeo
   tras el Brexit.
   6. Derechos de Privacidad de California

                                      +

   En virtud de los artículos 1798.83-1798.84 del Código Civil de
   California, los residentes de California tienen derecho a solicitarnos
   un aviso que describa las categorías de información personal que
   compartimos con terceros o filiales corporativas para los propósitos de
   marketing directo de dichos terceros o filiales corporativas. Ese aviso
   identificará las categorías de información compartida e incluirá una
   lista de los terceros y filiales con los que se compartió, junto con
   tus nombres y direcciones. Si eres residente de California y deseas una
   copia de este aviso, por favor envía una solicitud por escrito a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com o envíala a la siguiente dirección:
   Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, Nueva York, NY 10011.
   Por favor, espera 30 días para recibir una respuesta.
   7. Declaración de «no rastreo» (Do Not Track)

                                      +

   Algunos navegadores transmiten señales de «no rastreo» (DNT, por sus
   siglas en inglés) a webs. Debido a que no existe una idea común de cómo
   interpretar la señal DNT, Outbrain no altera, cambia ni responde
   actualmente a las peticiones o señales DNT de estos navegadores.
   Seguiremos supervisando la actividad del sector en esta área y
   volveremos a evaluar nuestras prácticas de DNT según sea necesario.
   Mientras tanto, puedes utilizar el resto de las herramientas que
   ofrecemos para controlar la recopilación y el uso de datos, incluida la
   posibilidad de inhabilitar las recomendaciones personalizadas en el
   apartado «Usuarios».
   8. Cómo puede cambiar esta Política de privacidad

                                      +

   Podemos cambiar esta Política de privacidad cada cierto tiempo.
   Colocaremos un aviso que podrás ver claramente como Visitante del Sitio
   o Socio comercial, pero no disponemos de ningún medio para avisar a los
   Usuarios de las actualizaciones. Deberás comprobar, periódicamente, si
   se ha actualizado la Política de privacidad. Siempre mostraremos la
   fecha de la última modificación de la Política de privacidad en la
   parte superior de la página para que puedas saber cuándo se revisó por
   última vez.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                      Dernière mise à jour : 23 mai 2018

   Outbrain s’engage à protéger vos données personnelles. Cette politique
   de confidentialité (la « Politique de confidentialité ») régit
   l’utilisation des données collectées par Outbrain, notamment les
   données personnelles, quelles qu’elles soient. Par données
   personnelles, nous entendons les informations qui vous concernent et
   permettent éventuellement de vous identifier. Nous utilisons vos
   données personnelles conformément aux lois en vigueur. Afin de garantir
   la conformité et de nous aligner sur les valeurs d’Outbrain en matière
   de confiance et de transparence, nous disposons d’une équipe de «
   privacy champions » chargée de mettre en œuvre en continu notre
   programme mondial de respect de la vie privée.

                                                        + DÉVELOPPER TOUT

   1. Qui sommes-nous, que faisons-nous, comment contacter Outbrain, notre
   DPO ou les autorités compétentes

                                      +

   Qui sommes-nous ?
   Outbrain fait référence à Outbrain Inc., une société du Delaware
   (États-Unis) dont le siège se trouve à New York, et à ses succursales
   affiliées (collectivement désignées par les termes « Outbrain », ou «
   nous », « notre », « nos »). Nous exerçons nos activités à partir de 12
   bureaux internationaux et travaillons en partenariat avec des éditeurs
   et des annonceurs dans le monde entier.
   Que faisons-nous ?
   La mission d’Outbrain est de proposer des recommandations intéressantes
   et pertinentes aux utilisateurs en fonction de leurs centres d’intérêt.
   Pour remplir cette mission, nous concluons des accords avec :
     * des éditeurs en ligne et des partenaires qui souhaitent recommander
       des contenus pertinents à leurs utilisateurs (il s’agit d’Outbrain
       Engage) ; et

     * des annonceurs qui souhaitent que les utilisateurs visualisent
       leurs contenus (il s’agit d’Outbrain Amplify).

   Comment nous contacter ?
   Les questions, commentaires et demandes concernant cette Politique de
   confidentialité sont les bienvenus. Ils doivent être adressés à
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou par courrier à Outbrain Inc., 39 West
   13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, USA, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Si Outbrain ne répond pas de manière satisfaisante à vos questions ou
   inquiétudes, vous pouvez également contacter, pour des conseils, une
   assistance ou des réclamations :
     * le DPO ou délégué à la protection des données externe d’Outbrain :
       ePrivacy GmbH, représenté par Christoph Bauer. ePrivacy GmbH peut
       être contacté directement à l’adresse suivante privacy@eprivacy.eu
       ; et/ou
     * l’Information Commissioner’s Officer, le service de supervision
       principal d’Outbrain pour les pays européens.

   Les organismes d’autorégulation
   Outbrain adhère aux principes d’autorégulation définis par la Digital
   Advertising Alliance (DAA) et l’European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Nous sommes membres de plein droit de la
   Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), une association dédiée à une
   collecte et une utilisation responsable des données à des fins de
   publicité numérique. Nous adhérons au code de bonne conduite de la NAI
   pour le Web et les appareils mobiles. Outbrain adhère également aux
   principes d’autorégulation de l’Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB)
   pour la publicité comportementale en ligne et à l’OBA Framework de
   l’IAB Europe.
   2. Types d’utilisateurs Outbrain (et gestion d'exclusion "opt-out")

                                      +

   La majeure partie de cette Politique de confidentialité est divisée en
   sections basées sur la manière dont vous interagissez avec Outbrain.
   Veuillez déterminer quel type d’utilisateur vous êtes. Pour chaque type
   d’utilisateur, nous détaillons quelles informations nous collectons et
   pourquoi, quels témoins de connexion ou « cookies » et autres
   technologies similaires nous utilisons, comment nous partageons ces
   informations, et vos droits.
   Visiteurs du site: Vous êtes un Visiteur du site quand vous consultez
   et interagissez avec nos sites et pages Web, nos fonctionnalités
   interactives, nos blogs et leurs contenus sur Outbrain.com (ou tout
   autre site dérivé comme Outbrain.co.uk ; Outbrain.fr ; outbrain.de
   etc.) et MyOutbrain.com (« Nos Sites »). Voir plus ici.
   (a) Quelles informations collectons-nous et pourquoi ?
   Nous souhaitons comprendre quels services sur nos Sites vous
   intéressent et vous rappeler les services que nous proposons quand vous
   n’êtes pas sur nos Sites. Pour ce faire, nous collectons auprès de vous
   les informations suivantes : (i) l’adresse IP; (ii) les données agent
   utilisateur : le type d’appareil (ex : iPhone), le type de navigateur
   (ex : Chrome), le système d’exploitation (ex : iOS) ; (iii) les pages
   visitées sur notre Site (ex : la page « À propos » d’Outbrain ») ; (iv)
   l’heure de visite (et le fuseau horaire correspondant) ; et (v) les URL
   correspondantes et autres informations normalement transmises dans les
   requêtes HTTP (par exemple ces informations nous indiquent comment vous
   êtes arrivé sur nos Sites).
   (b) Quels cookies et autres technologies similaires utilisons-nous ?
   Veuillez consulter la Table des cookies sous « Visiteurs du site » pour
   une liste détaillée des cookies (et leurs durées de conservation
   associées) que nous utilisons quand vous visitez nos Sites.
   (c) Comment sommes-nous susceptibles de partager les informations ?
     * Le partage des informations que nous obtenons sur vous sur nos
       Sites.

   De manière générale, nous ne partageons pas les données personnelles
   vous concernant avec des tiers à des fins de marketing ou de publicité.
   Toutefois, nous faisons appel à divers tiers (chacun d’entre eux étant
   listé dans la Table de cookies) pour nous aider dans nos démarches
   commerciales et publicitaires envers vous. Certains des cookies que
   nous utilisons sur nos Sites appartiennent ainsi à des tiers qui
   aideront Outbrain à vous proposer des services ou des publicités. Nous
   demandons à ces tiers et entreprises d’accepter de préserver la
   confidentialité de toutes les informations que nous partageons avec eux
   et de ne les utiliser que pour remplir leurs obligations envers nous.
   Pour ce faire, nous concluons des accords avec tous les tiers qui
   traitent les données personnelles en notre nom afin de garantir qu’ils
   le font en conformité avec nos instructions rigoureuses et toutes les
   lois de protection des données applicables. Si vous publiez un post sur
   notre blog, vos commentaires et informations seront disponibles
   publiquement. Veuillez contacter support@outbrain.com pour supprimer
   vos commentaires.
     * Utilisation de services de tiers sur nos Sites.

   Nos Sites contiennent des liens vers d’autres sites Web dont nous ne
   sommes ni propriétaires, ni opérateurs. Nous ne contrôlons, ne
   recommandons et ne cautionnons pas le contenu, les produits, les
   services, les politiques de confidentialité ou les pratiques de ces
   sites Web tiers. Vous noterez par exemple sur nos Sites la présence
   d’icônes que vous pouvez cliquer pour accéder à la page Facebook ou
   LinkedIn d’Outbrain. Si vous choisissez de cliquer sur ces liens, vous
   devez savoir que Facebook et LinkedIn peuvent déposer leurs propres
   cookies sur votre appareil et collecter indépendamment des données
   personnelles. Il est donc important que vous lisiez les politiques de
   confidentialité de Facebook et/ou de LinkedIn.
     * Veuillez aussi consulter la section Partage de la présente
       Politique de confidentialité.

   (d) Vos droits
   Les Conditions d’utilisation sur notre Site régissent l’utilisation de
   notre Site et s’appliquent également à vous. Vous pouvez cesser
   d’utiliser notre Site à tout moment. Dans ce cas, vous souhaiterez
   peut-être aussi supprimer tout cookie placé sur les appareils, quels
   qu’ils soient, utilisés pour accéder à notre Site. Si, en cours
   d’utilisation de nos Sites vous avez fourni une adresse e-mail, chaque
   e-mail que vous recevez de la part d’Outbrain comporte une option de
   désabonnement (« unsubscribe »).
   Pour les visiteurs provenant des pays Européens, Outbrain a installé
   sur ses sites une CMP - plateforme de gestion du consentement - opérée
   par One Trust, qui donne aux utilisateurs la possibilité de consentir,
   ou non, à la dépose de cookies et autres technologies de ciblage. En
   accédant à nos sites, vous verrez une bannière située en bas de page
   donnant des informations sur les cookies que nous utilisons. Vous
   pouvez cliquer sur cette bannière pour supprimer les cookies, à
   l’exception de ceux strictement nécessaires. Le fait de cliquer sur
   “Accept” dans la bannière, de poursuivre votre navigation ou de cliquer
   dans un lien sur nos sites est une indication de votre consentement.
   Utilisateurs: Vous êtes un Utilisateur si vous visitez la page d’un
   site ou une application d’un des partenaires d’Outbrain sur laquelle
   est installée le widget Outbrain (les « Sites de partenaires »). Si
   vous vous rendez par exemple sur https://news.sky.com/uk,
   www.spiegel.de ou www.cnn.com, le widget Outbrain est installé sur ces
   sites Web. Les mentions référençant Outbrain (ex : « Recommandé par
   Outbrain », « by Outbrain » à côté des recommandations) vous indiquent
   la présence d’un widget Outbrain. Si vous cliquez sur le lien de la
   référence Outbrain, vous visualiserez une notification détaillée qui
   vous permettra de vous rendre sur le Portail des Centres d’Intérêt
   Outbrain, qui vous donne une vision globale des types de catégories de
   données que nous pouvons utiliser pour faire les recommandations. Ce
   portail vous donne également la possibilité d’opter pour une demande
   d’exclusion des recommandations personnalisées (« opt-out »). Voir plus
   ici.
   Exemple de widget Outbrain
   [SJ4v1w7y7.png]
   (a) Quelles informations collectons-nous et pourquoi ?
   Nous utilisons les UUID, l’adresse IP et autres informations d’usage
   afin de proposer des recommandations intéressantes aux utilisateurs.
   Les recommandations d’Outbrain peuvent être payées par un annonceur
   pour vous mettre en relation avec un nouveau site Web. Elles peuvent
   également être organiques avec un lien vers une autre page du site Web
   du même éditeur.
     * UUID.

   Quand vous consultez un Site de Partenaire (ex : CNN.com) en tant
   qu’Utilisateur pour la première fois, Outbrain dépose un cookie sur
   votre appareil afin de générer un UUID (identifiant utilisateur
   unique). Nous cataloguons et analysons le contenu que vous parcourez
   sur les Sites de Partenaires. Nos recommandations se basent sur : (i)
   l’historique de navigation ; (ii) les profils de consommation
   similaires d’autres Utilisateurs ; (ii) les recommandations
   généralement populaires auprès des utilisateurs d’Outbrain ; (iv)
   quelques données aléatoires, et (v) les exigences de ciblage
   éventuellement fournies ou demandées par nos clients Amplify. À titre
   d’exemple, Outbrain peut savoir que l’UUID 123 (cela pourrait être vous
   sur votre iPhone X lisant le Guardian en utilisant Chrome comme
   navigateur) aime lire des articles sur les voyages et que les personnes
   qui aiment lire ce type d’article aiment aussi les contenus sur la
   nourriture exotique.
   L’UUID est une séquence de chiffres et/ou de lettres. Cet UUID est
   associé à votre appareil et varie en fonction du navigateur que vous
   utilisez. Autrement dit, Outbrain enregistre un UUID différent selon le
   navigateur et/ou appareil que vous utilisez pour accéder aux Sites de
   Partenaires. Ceci signifie que vous aurez par exemple un UUID quand
   vous consultez un Site de Partenaire depuis votre téléphone portable
   avec le navigateur Safari et un autre UUID pour la consultation d’un
   Site de Partenaire depuis votre iPad avec le navigateur Safari.
   Outbrain va combiner et consolider l’UUID depuis un appareil mobile
   (portatif ou tablette) et un navigateur qui accède ensuite à
   l’application (ou vice versa) à partir du même appareil.
   L’affectation d’un UUID permet à Outbrain d’associer les pages vues et
   les clics sur les recommandations d’Outbrain à partir de cet UUID, avec
   pour objectif de vous proposer des recommandations intéressantes et
   pertinentes en fonction de vos centres d’intérêt.
     * Adresse IP et autres informations d’usage.

   Nous recueillons l’UUID comme expliqué précédemment, nous collectons
   également les informations suivantes : (i) l’adresse IP (puis rendus
   anonymes selon les normes de l'industrie); ; (ii) les données agent
   utilisateur : le type d’appareil (ex : iPhone) ; le type de navigateur
   (ex : Chrome), le système d’exploitation (ex : iOS) ; (iii) les pages
   visitées ; (iv) l’heure de visite ; et (v) les URL correspondantes et
   autres informations normalement transmises dans les requêtes HTTP.
   Les informations statistiques ci-dessus nous donnent des informations
   sur le nombre d’Utilisateurs consultant une page spécifique sur les
   Sites de Partenaires sur lesquels le widget Outbrain est installé, le
   temps que chaque Utilisateur a passé sur cette page, le type de contenu
   sur lequel ils ont cliqué et la manière générale dont ils ont interagi
   avec cette page. Ces informations ne constituent des informations
   personnelles que quand elles sont associées à un UUID.
   (b) Quels cookies et autres technologies similaires utilisons-nous ?
   Veuillez consulter la Table des cookies sous « Utilisateurs » pour une
   liste détaillée des cookies propriétaires que nous utilisons quand vous
   interagissez avec des Sites de Partenaires où la technologie Outbrain
   est mise en œuvre.
   Si vous cliquez sur le lien d’une de nos recommandations, l’annonceur
   Amplify qui sponsorise la recommandation est susceptible de placer des
   cookies sur votre appareil lors de la redirection avant d’arriver sur
   la page de destination ou en atteignant la page de destination. Dans de
   tels cas, vous serez soumis à la politique de confidentialité de
   l’annonceur.
   En complément du widget visible d’Outbrain sur nos Sites de
   Partenaires, certains annonceurs Outbrain peuvent installer le pixel
   Outbrain sur leurs sites Web. Le pixel Outbrain détermine si
   l’utilisateur qui atteint la page où le pixel est installé a un UUID
   Outbrain. S’il existe un UUID associé avec un utilisateur final,
   Outbrain permet aux annonceurs de recibler ces UUID et/ou leur donne le
   nombre total d’UUID ayant atteint cette page. S’il n’existe pas d’UUID
   Outbrain sur la page, le pixel Outbrain ne collecte aucune information
   sur l’utilisateur.
   Nous encourageons les annonceurs à divulguer l’utilisation du pixel
   Outbrain sur leurs propres sites Web. Outbrain ne combine aucune
   information pixel avec le profil d’un UUID.
   Les indicateurs sur la visualisation des pages ou les clics reliés à un
   UUID en particulier sont conservés pour une durée de 13 mois. Par
   exemple, si l’UUID 123 lit un article le 31 décembre 2017, cet article
   ne fera plus partie du profil de l’UUID 123 le 1 ^er février 2018.
   (c) Comment sommes-nous susceptibles de partager les informations ?
   Outbrain ne partage pas de profils d’Utilisateurs avec des tiers, quels
   qu’ils soient. Cependant, nous sommes susceptibles de partager l’UUID
   avec certains partenaires à des fins de synchronisation des cookies ou
   en raison d’exigences techniques. Veuillez également consulter la
   section Partage de la présente Politique de confidentialité.
   (d) Vos droits
   Demande d’exclusion (« opt-out ») d’Outbrain. Vous pouvez demander
   votre exclusion des recommandations personnalisées à tout moment.
   Veuillez consulter également le Profil d’intérêts d’Outbrain pour une
   vue générale des données qu’Outbrain connaît à votre sujet et peut
   utiliser pour faire ses recommandations. Le Profil d’intérêts vous
   donne également la possibilité d’ opter pour une exclusion des
   recommandations personnalisées (vous pouvez également demander une
   exclusion (“opt-out”) en cliquant ici). Veuillez noter que cette
   demande d’exclusion pour les navigateurs se fait par le Profil
   d’intérêts d’Outbrain, mais qu’elle se fait via les paramètres de votre
   appareil pour les applications (vous trouverez des exemples d’étapes à
   suivre dans le Profil d’intérêts).
   REMARQUE IMPORTANTE – même si vous avez opté pour une exclusion
   d’Outbrain,
     * vous continuerez à voir des recommandations Outbrain. Le fait de
       demander votre exclusion du suivi personnalisé d’Outbrain ne
       signifie pas que vous cesserez de recevoir des recommandations
       d’Outbrain. Cela signifie que les recommandations d’Outbrain ne
       seront pas personnalisées. Les recommandations continueront à
       utiliser les informations sur la page que vous êtes en train de
       parcourir (c.-à-d. les informations contextuelles) pour vous
       proposer des recommandations sur cette page.

     * L’exclusion de recommandations personnalisées est fondée sur les
       cookies et spécifique à un appareil/navigateur. Si vous naviguez
       sur Internet depuis plusieurs appareils et/ou navigateurs, vous
       devrez demander l’exclusion pour chaque appareil et/ou navigateur
       pour garantir que nous empêchons un suivi de personnalisation sur
       tous. Pour la même raison, si vous achetez un nouvel appareil,
       changez de navigateurs ou supprimez (ou effacez) le cookie
       d’exclusion, vous devrez procéder de nouveau à votre demande
       d’exclusion. Demander l’exclusion du suivi de personnalisation
       n’est pas la même chose que bloquer les cookies.

     * Pour garantir la suppression du profil lié à votre UUID, ne
       procédez pas à l’opération inverse (demande d’inclusion ou « opt-in
       » d’Outbrain) pendant au moins 21 jours. Votre demande d’exclusion
       des recommandations personnalisées d’Outbrain prend effet
       immédiatement. Cependant, si votre navigateur autorise un stockage
       local, et si vous demandez votre inclusion des recommandations
       personnalisées dans les 21 jours suivant votre demande d’exclusion,
       il est possible que votre profil antérieur soit reconnecté à votre
       UUID. Si vous ne procédez pas à une nouvelle demande d’inclusion
       dans les 21 jours, votre profil sera supprimé et ne pourra pas être
       récupéré.

     * Comme pour la plupart des cookies opt-out, le processus d’opt-out
       Outbrain sur navigateur s'appuie sur un cookie. Le cookie opt-out
       est destiné à être persistant afin d'honorer les préférences de
       l'utilisateur. Cependant, la fonction "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention" pour IPhone de l'iOS11 peut avoir un impact sur la
       persistance des cookies sur les sites Web qui affichent une fenêtre
       de 24 heures. Nous vous suggérons d'utiliser un autre navigateur ou
       d'envisager de bloquer tous les cookies d'une tierce partie du
       navigateur afin que vous soyez « désactivés » sans avoir besoin de
       vous fier à la méthode d'exclusion d’autres entreprises.

     * Options complémentaires d’exclusion. Vous pouvez également demander
       votre exclusion de la réception de publicités personnalisées de
       notre part ou de celle d’autres sociétés publicitaires à l’aide
       d’outils fournis par l’industrie comme la NAI ou des pages basées
       sur la DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices ; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices, et/ou EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
       En vous rendant sur les pages dédiées à la gestion des préférences
       consommateur de la NAI, la DAA, la DACC (Alliance de la publicité
       numérique du Canada) ou de l’EDAA, vous pourrez refuser tout ou
       partie des services de leurs membres. Comme dans le cas de
       l’exclusion pour Outbrain, ces retraits ne signifient pas que vous
       ne recevrez plus aucune publicité, mais les publicités que vous
       recevrez ne seront plus personnalisées. Vous êtes susceptible de
       continuer à recevoir des publicités, par exemple basées sur le site
       Web en particulier que vous êtes en train de consulter (c.-à-d. des
       publicités liées au contexte). Par ailleurs, si vos navigateurs
       sont configurés pour rejeter les cookies quand vous visitez les
       pages du consommateur de la DAA, de la DAAC ou de l’EDAA, votre
       exclusion (ou retrait) peut ne pas être effective.

     * Base juridique. La base juridique d’Outbrain pour le traitement des
       données personnelles d’un Utilisateur se fonde sur la base
       juridique déterminée par chacun des Sites de Partenaires. Chaque
       Site de Partenaire s’appuiera sur le consentement ou l’intérêt
       légitime. Veuillez consulter la politique de confidentialité
       applicable des Sites de Partenaires pour plus d’informations sur
       leurs bases juridiques. Si un Partenaire s’appuie sur le
       consentement, Outbrain ne déposera pas de cookie sur votre appareil
       si vous n’avez pas donné votre consentement sur le Site de
       Partenaire concerné.

   Partenaires commerciaux: Vous êtes un Partenaire commercial si vous
   vous inscrivez (ou échangez des e-mails avec Outbrain) au nom de la
   société dans laquelle vous travaillez pour l’utilisation des services
   Outbrain Amplify ou Outbrain Engage. Voir plus ici.
   (a) Quelles informations collectons-nous et pourquoi ?
   Vous êtes susceptible de fournir certaines données personnelles (par
   exemple une adresse e-mail) quand vous signez pour des services Amplify
   ou Engage, ou communiquez ou interagissez avec nous d’une autre
   manière. Si vous demandez à devenir Partenaire, nous sommes
   susceptibles de vous demander des informations complémentaires sous
   forme de formulaires de candidature annonceur, d’ordres d’insertion ou
   autres. Nous collectons automatiquement les informations sur vos
   actions liées à votre nom d’utilisateur dans le tableau de bord
   Outbrain. Par exemple, si vous changez, en tant que Partenaire Amplify,
   le coût-par-clic d’une de vos campagnes, la piste d’audit d’Outbrain
   gardera un enregistrement de toutes ces actions.
   Nous collectons et traitons les données personnelles ci-dessus afin de
   remplir nos obligations au titre de notre accord avec un Partenaire (ou
   Partenaire potentiel), notamment pour :
     * Répondre à vos questions et demandes.

     * Donner accès à certaines fonctions et fonctionnalités de nos
       services Amplify et Engage (par exemple pour fournir et tenir à
       jour le compte de votre tableau de bord).

     * Vérifier votre identité.

     * Communiquer avec vous sur votre compte, nos produits et les
       promotions disponibles compte tenu de votre utilisation du service
       Amplify ou Engage.

   (b) Quels cookies et autres technologies similaires utilisons-nous ?
   Veuillez consulter la Table des cookies sous « Partenaires commerciaux
   » pour une liste détaillée des cookies (et de leurs périodes de
   conservation associées) que nous utilisons avec les Partenaires.
   (c) Comment sommes-nous susceptibles de partager les informations ?
   Nous sommes susceptibles de divulguer certaines informations de
   Partenaires aux prestataires, sous-traitants ou autres, contribuant à
   la prestation des services Outbrain (ex : traitement des cartes de
   crédit). Veuillez aussi consulter la section Partage de la présente
   Politique de confidentialité.
   (d) Vos droits
   Si, en tant que Partenaire, vous souhaitez vérifier, corriger, mettre à
   jour ou demander la désactivation de vos informations, rendez-vous sur
   le tableau de bord Outbrain pour modifier vos préférences de profil ou
   contactez-nous à l’adresse support@outbrain.com. Si vous recevez des
   e-mails Outbrain, vous pouvez vous « désabonner » en utilisant le lien
   présent dans chaque e-mail. Veuillez noter que le désabonnement ne vous
   exclura pas de recevoir des notifications considérées comme critiques
   dans la fourniture de services Amplify ou Engage (ex : factures par
   e-mail).
   La base juridique du traitement des données personnelles de nos
   Partenaires commerciaux est l’intérêt légitime.
   3. Comment sécurisons-nous les informations ; les transferts en dehors
   de l’EEE ; le partage et les durées de conservation

                                      +

   Sécurité
   Outbrain dispose d’une équipe de sécurité dédiée. Nous mettons en œuvre
   des contrôles stricts sur les données que nous collectons, en les
   conservant dans des bases de données sécurisées et protégées par des
   pare-feu avec des droits d’accès contrôlés et limités afin de garantir
   leur sécurité. Veuillez consulter nos normes de sécurité pour de plus
   amples informations.
   Les Partenaires commerciaux ont un accès protégé par mot de passe à
   certaines fonctionnalités du service Amplify ou Engage. Ils ont la
   responsabilité de préserver la confidentialité de ce mot de passe. Il
   est néanmoins nécessaire de rappeler que la transmission d’informations
   par Internet n’est malheureusement pas complètement sécurisée. Une des
   fraudes classiques sur Internet est connue sous le nom d’usurpation
   d’identité électronique (« spoofing ») ou hameçonnage (« phishing »).
   Ceci se produit quand vous recevez un e-mail d’une source apparemment
   légitime vous demandant de lui fournir des données personnelles. Sachez
   que nous ne vous enverrons aucun e-mail vous demandant de vérifier un
   numéro de carte de crédit, des informations bancaires ou toutes autres
   données personnelles. S’il vous arrivait de recevoir un e-mail
   apparemment de notre part et vous demandant de nous fournir de telles
   informations, n’y répondez pas et ne cliquez sur aucun lien
   apparaissant dans ce message électronique. Veuillez plutôt nous
   transférer l’e-mail à l’adresse legal@outbrain.com, et nous mènerons
   des enquêtes sur d’éventuelles fraudes sur Internet.
   Transferts des données en dehors de l’UE/EEE
   Lorsque nous transférons des données personnelles de l’Espace
   économique européen vers d’autres pays dans lesquels les lois
   applicables n’offrent pas le même niveau de protection de
   confidentialité des données que les pays européens, nous prenons des
   mesures pour fournir un niveau approprié de protection de la
   confidentialité des données. En d’autres termes, vos droits et
   protections perdurent avec vos données. Nous utilisons par exemple des
   clauses contractuelles approuvées et d’autres mesures conçues pour
   garantir que les destinataires de vos données personnelles les
   protègent.
   Partage
   En complément de la description de la manière dont nous sommes
   susceptibles de divulguer vos données personnelles pour chaque type
   d’utilisateur, nous pouvons également divulguer les données
   personnelles comme suit :
     * Au sein de la famille des sociétés contrôlées par Outbrain pour des
       raisons internes, particulièrement pour des objectifs liés aux
       activités et au fonctionnement de l’entreprise ;

     * Si nous faisons face à une évolution de notre entreprise, comme une
       fusion, l’acquisition d’une autre société, ou la vente de tout ou
       partie de nos actifs, vos données personnelles sont susceptibles de
       faire partie des actifs transférés ;

     * En cas d’exigences légales le demandant (par exemple pour coopérer
       dans le cadre d’investigations sur la mise en application de la
       législation ou autres procédures légales) ; et/ou

     * Pour répondre à une urgence qualifiée.

   Par ailleurs, nous combinons vos données personnelles avec celles
   d’autres utilisateurs afin de partager des informations sur les
   tendances et agréger des statistiques d’utilisation avec des tiers,
   toujours sous forme agrégée et anonyme.
   Conservation des données
   La période de conservation pour chacun des cookies qu’Outbrain utilise
   (les siens propres ou au nom de tiers) est définie dans la Table des
   cookies.
   Outbrain tient également à jour une Politique de conservation des
   données qui détaille la période de conservation pour les données
   personnelles sur la base de notre analyse de la durée raisonnable de
   conservation nécessaire de données particulières pour des raisons
   légales ou opérationnelles. Quand nous n’avons plus besoin des données
   personnelles, nous les effaçons ou les supprimons de manière sécurisée.
   Les données agrégées, qui ne permettent pas d’identifier un
   appareil/navigateur (ou un individu) et sont utilisées pour des
   objectifs de reporting et d’analyse, sont conservées aussi longtemps
   que commercialement nécessaire.
   4. Enfants

                                      +

   Aucun de nos services n’est destiné à des enfants de moins de 16 ans.
   Nous ne recueillons pas sciemment de données personnelles auprès
   d’enfants âgés de moins de 16 ans. Si nous réalisons en cours de
   collecte qu’un Visiteur du site, un Utilisateur ou un Partenaire
   commercial a moins de 16 ans, nous n’utiliserons ni ne conserverons ses
   données personnelles. Si nous réalisons que nous avons involontairement
   collecté des données personnelles auprès d’un enfant de moins de 16
   ans, nous prendrons alors les mesures raisonnables pour supprimer ces
   informations de nos registres.
   5. Citoyens européens

                                      +

   Conformément aux lois européennes sur le respect de la vie privée, en
   particulier le Règlement général sur la protection des données (RGPD),
   Outbrain octroie des droits particuliers complémentaires aux citoyens
   des pays européens, comme le droit d’accès aux données, le droit de
   rectification, le droit d’opposition, le droit de porter réclamation,
   le droit à l’effacement et le droit de blocage. Plus spécifiquement :
     * Le droit de demander des informations sur l’utilisation ou non que
       nous faisons de données personnelles, et si oui, lesquelles, et le
       droit de demander la rectification ou la modification de ces
       données personnelles.
     * Dans certaines conditions, le droit de demander la suppression de
       données personnelles.
     * Dans certaines conditions, le droit de demander la limitation du
       traitement des données personnelles.
     * Le droit de retirer votre consentement à l’utilisation et au
       traitement de vos données, intégralement ou partiellement, à tout
       moment, avec effet futur.
     * Le droit d’obtenir vos données personnelles dans un format
       compréhensible, structuré et lisible.
     * La possibilité de contacter le délégué à la protection des données
       (« DPO ») pour toute question, commentaire, réclamation ou demande
       en lien avec notre déclaration sur la protection des données et le
       traitement de vos données personnelles.
     * Le droit de vous plaindre auprès de l’autorité de contrôle si vous
       êtes persuadé que le traitement de vos données personnelles
       constitue une violation de la législation.

   En complément des droits ci-dessus, nous référençons certains droits
   pour les citoyens des pays européens dans cette Politique de
   confidentialité. Conformément au RGPD, nous entendons par citoyens des
   « pays européens » les citoyens de l’Espace économique européen (EEE)
   et de la Suisse. Aux fins de cette Politique de confidentialité, le
   terme « pays européens » continuera d’inclure le Royaume-Uni, même
   après son départ de l’Espace économique européen suite au Brexit.
   Merci d’envoyer un mail à privacyquestions@outbrain.com pour toutes
   questions relatives à l’exercice des droits mentionnés ci-dessus.
   6. Droits au respect de la vie privée en Californie

                                      +

   Conformément au Code civil de Californie, articles 1798.83-1798.84, les
   résidents californiens ont le droit de nous demander une note décrivant
   les catégories d’informations personnelles que nous partageons avec des
   tiers et sociétés affiliées à des fins de marketing direct desdits
   tiers ou sociétés. Cette note indiquera les catégories d’informations
   partagées et inclura la liste des tiers et sociétés affiliées avec
   lesquels nous les partageons, avec leur nom et adresse. Si vous résidez
   en Californie et souhaitez une copie de cette note, veuillez en faire
   la demande par écrit à PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou l’envoyer à
   l’adresse suivante : Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New
   York, NY 10011, USA. Veuillez nous accorder 30 jours pour vous
   répondre.
   7. Dispositions « Do Not Track » (non-traçage)

                                      +

   Certains navigateurs transmettent des signaux refusant le traçage de
   données (« do not track ») aux sites Web. Outbrain ne procède
   actuellement à aucune altération, modification ou réponse aux demandes
   ou signaux de non-traçage de ces navigateurs car il n’existe pas de
   compréhension commune sur la manière d’interpréter les signaux de
   non-traçage. Nous continuerons de suivre l’activité du secteur dans ce
   domaine et réévaluerons nos pratiques de non-traçage si nécessaire. En
   attendant, vous pouvez utiliser la gamme d’autres outils que nous vous
   proposons pour contrôler la collecte et l’utilisation des données,
   notamment la possibilité de demander l’exclusion de la réception de
   recommandations personnalisées (« opt-out ») dans la section
   Utilisateurs.
   8. Les modifications qui pourraient être apportées à cette Politique de
   confidentialité

                                      +

   Nous sommes susceptibles de modifier cette Politique de confidentialité
   de manière ponctuelle. Nous afficherons clairement une notification que
   vous pourrez voir en tant que Visiteur du site ou Partenaire
   commercial, mais nous n’avons pas de moyen d’informer les Utilisateurs
   d’une mise à jour. Nous vous conseillons de régulièrement vérifier ici
   si la Politique de confidentialité a été mise à jour. Nous indiquerons
   toujours la date de dernière modification de la Politique de
   confidentialité en haut de la page afin que vous puissiez savoir quand
   elle a été révisée pour la dernière fois.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                      Ultimo aggiornamento: 23 maggio 2018

   Outbrain si impegna a proteggere i tuoi dati personali. La presente
   politica sulla privacy (“Politica sulla privacy ”) disciplina
   l'utilizzo da parte di Outbrain dei dati raccolti da noi, ivi inclusi
   tutti i dati personali. I dati personali sono informazioni che si
   riferiscono a te e possono identificarti come individuo. Utilizziamo i
   tuoi dati personali in linea con tutte le leggi applicabili. Al fine di
   garantire il rispetto e l'allineamento con i valori di Outbrain in
   materia di fiducia e trasparenza, disponiamo di team di esperti di
   privacy responsabili dell'implementazione continua del nostro programma
   di privacy globale.

                                                           + ESPANDI TUTTO

   1. Chi siamo, Cosa facciamo, Come contattare Outbrain, il nostro RPD o
   le autorità competenti

                                      +

   Chi siamo:
   Outbrain indica Outbrain Inc., un'azienda del Delaware (USA) con sede a
   New York; e le sue partecipate (collettivamente, “Outbrain,” o "noi",
   "ci", "nostro"). Operiamo da 12 uffici a livello globale e collaboriamo
   con editori e operatori di mercato in tutto il mondo.
   Cosa facciamo:
   La mission di Outbrain consiste nel fornire ai suoi utenti contenuti
   interessanti basati sui loro interessi. Per realizzare la nostra
   mission stipuliamo accordi con:
     * editori e partner online che desiderano raccomandare contenuti
       pertinenti ai loro lettori (si tratta del servizio Outbrain
       Engage); e

     * inserzionisti che desiderano che i lettori visualizzino i loro
       contenuti (si tratta del servizio Outbrain Amplify).

   Come contattarci
   Esaminiamo regolarmente il nostro rispetto della presente politica
   sulla privacy. Domande, commenti e richieste riguardanti la presente
   politica sulla privacy sono apprezzati e vanno indirizzati a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oppure all'indirizzo postale: Outbrain
   Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Qualora Outbrain non risponda in maniera soddisfacente alle tue domande
   o preoccupazioni, puoi altresì contattare i seguenti riferimenti per
   informazioni, supporto o reclami:
     * Responsabile esterno della protezione dei dati di Outbrain ("RPD"):
       ePrivacy GmbH, rappresentata dal Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. È
       possibile contattare direttamente ePrivacy GmbH all'indirizzo:
       privacy@eprivacy.eu; e/o
     * l'Information Commissioner’s Officer, che è la principale autorità
       di controllo su Outbrain all'interno dei Territori europei.

   Organismi di autoregolamentazione
   Outbrain aderisce ai principi di autoregolamentazione stabiliti da
   Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) e da European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Siamo soci in regola della Network
   Advertising Initiative (NAI), un'associazione dedicata alla raccolta
   responsabile di dati e al loro utilizzo per la pubblicità digitale.
   Aderiamo al Codice di condotta NAI per il settore Web e Mobile.
   Outbrain aderisce altresì ai principi di autoregolamentazione
   dell'Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) per la pubblicità
   comportamentale online e al framework di IAB Europa per la pubblicità
   comportamentale online.
   2. Tipi di utente Outbrain (compresa la gestione delle opzioni di Opt
   Out)

                                      +

   Gran parte della presente politica sulla privacy è suddivisa in sezioni
   in base al modo in cui è possibile interagire con Outbrain. Ti
   preghiamo di stabilire quale tipo di utente sei, in quanto, per ogni
   tipo di utente abbiamo spiegato quali informazioni raccogliamo e
   perché, quali cookie e altre tecnologie analoghe utilizziamo, come
   condividiamo tali informazioni e i tuoi diritti.
   Visitatori del sito: Sei un visitatore del sito quando visiti e
   interagisci con i nostri siti web, le nostre pagine web, le funzioni
   interattive, i blog e i loro rispettivi contenuti disponibili
   all'indirizzo Outbrain.com (o qualsiasi sua derivazione, come
   Outbrain.co.uk; Outbrain.fr; outbrain.de, ecc.) e MyOutbrain.com (“I
   nostri siti“). Vedi di più qui.
   (a) Quali informazioni raccogliamo e perché
   Desideriamo capire quali servizi sui nostri siti ti interessino e
   desideriamo ricordarti i servizi che offriamo quando non sei sui nostri
   siti. Per fare questo, raccogliamo le seguenti informazioni su di te:
   (i) indirizzo IP; (ii) dati dell'agente utente: tipo di dispositivo (ad
   es. iPhone), tipo di browser (ad es. Chrome), sistema operativo (ad es.
   iOS); (iii) le pagine visitate sul nostro sito (ad es. la pagina "Chi
   siamo" di Outbrain); (iv) l'orario della visita (e il fuso orario
   corrispondente); nonché (v) le URL di riferimento e altre informazioni
   normalmente trasmesse nelle richieste HTTP (ad esempio, queste
   informazioni ci dicono come sei arrivato sui nostri siti).
   (b) Quali cookie e altre tecnologie simili utilizziamo
   Ti rimandiamo a questa Tabella dei cookie alla sezione "Visitatori del
   sito" per un elenco dettagliato dei cookie (e dei relativi periodi di
   conservazione) che utilizziamo quando visiti i nostri siti.
   (c) Come possiamo condividere le informazioni
     * Condivisione delle informazioni che acquisiamo su di te sui nostri
       siti.

   In generale, non condividiamo i tuoi dati personali con terzi per
   finalità di pubblicità o marketing di terzi. Tuttavia, ricorriamo a
   vari terzi (ciascuno elencato nella Tabella dei cookie) affinché ci
   aiutino a svolgere attività di commercializzazione o pubblicità nei
   tuoi confronti. Ad esempio, alcuni dei cookie che utilizziamo sui
   nostri siti appartengono a terzi che aiuteranno Outbrain a svolgere
   attività di commercializzazione o pubblicità nei tuoi confronti.
   Richiediamo a tali parti e società terze di acconsentire a mantenere
   riservate tutte le informazioni condivise con loro e a utilizzare tali
   informazioni esclusivamente per adempiere ai loro obblighi nei nostri
   confronti. Facciamo ciò stipulando accordi con tutti i terzi che
   trattano dati personali per nostro conto in maniera da garantire che
   trattino i tuoi dati personali in conformità con le nostre severe
   istruzioni e tutte le leggi applicabili in materia di protezione dei
   dati. Se pubblichi un post sul nostro blog, i tuoi commenti e le tue
   informazioni saranno disponibili al pubblico. Contatta
   support@outbrain.com per rimuovere il tuo commento.
     * Utilizzo di servizi di terzi sui nostri siti.

   I nostri siti contengono collegamenti ad altri siti web che non sono di
   nostra proprietà o gestiti da noi. Non controlliamo, raccomandiamo o
   approviamo il contenuto, i prodotti, i servizi, le politiche sulla
   privacy o le pratiche di tali siti web di terzi. Ad esempio, sui nostri
   siti noterai icone cliccabili che ti condurranno alla pagina Facebook
   di Outbrain o alla pagina LinkedIn di Outbrain. Se scegli di fare click
   su tali collegamenti, devi sapere che Facebook e LinkedIn potrebbero
   inviare i propri cookie al tuo dispositivo e potrebbero raccogliere
   dati personali in maniera indipendente. Di conseguenza è importante che
   tu legga le politiche sulla privacy di Facebook e/o LinkedIn.
     * Consulta anche la sezione Condivisione della presente politica
       sulla privacy.

   (d) I tuoi diritti
   Le Condizioni d'uso presenti sul nostro sito disciplinano l'uso del
   nostro sito e si applicano anche a te. Puoi smettere di usare il nostro
   sito in qualsiasi momento. Se lo fai, puoi altresì desiderare rimuovere
   tutti i cookie che abbiamo inserito su qualsiasi dispositivo utilizzato
   per accedere al nostro sito. Se durante l'utilizzo dei nostri siti hai
   fornito il tuo indirizzo e-mail, qualsiasi e-mail che ricevi da
   Outbrain include un'opzione di "annullamento dell'iscrizione"
   (unsubscribe).
   Per gli utenti dei Territori europei, Outbrain ha implementato una
   piattaforma di gestione del consenso (gestita da One Trust ) sui nostri
   siti che offre ai visitatori l'opportunità di acconsentire, o meno, a
   cookie e tecnologie di tracciamento simili sui nostri siti. Accedendo
   ai nostri siti, vedrai un banner nella parte inferiore della pagina con
   informazioni sui cookie che utilizziamo. È possibile fare click sul
   banner per rifiutare tutti i cookie che non sono strettamente
   necessari. Premendo "accetta" sul banner o scorrendo / facendo click
   sui nostri siti è un'indicazione della tua accettazione. Di
   conseguenza, la base legale di Outbrain per il trattamento dei dati
   personali sui nostri siti è il consenso. Puoi ritirare il tuo consenso
   in qualsiasi momento cliccando qui.
   Utenti: Sei un utente se visiti una pagina di un sito web o di
   un'applicazione di uno dei partner di Outbrain nelle quali è installato
   il widget Outbrain (“Siti partner”). Ad esempio, se visiti
   https://news.sky.com/uk, www.corriere.it il widget Outbrain è
   implementato su tali siti web. Sai che stai interagendo con un widget
   Outbrain quando vedi del testo che fa riferimento a Outbrain (ad
   esempio "Recommended by Outbrain", "by Outbrain" accanto ai contenuti).
   Se fai click sul riferimento contenente il collegamento ipertestuale a
   Outbrain, visualizzerai una informativa dettagliata che ti consentirà
   di raggiungere il Profilo di interesse di Outbrain, che fornisce una
   visualizzazione generale dei tipi di categorie di dati di Outbrain che
   quest'ultima può utilizzare per formulare le sue raccomandazioni.
   Inoltre, ti dà la possibilità di rinunciare a ricevere contenuti
   personalizzati. Vedi di più qui.
   Esempio di un widget Outbrain
   [S1q4BIXJQ.png]
   (a) Quali informazioni raccogliamo e perché
   Usiamo UUID, indirizzo IP e altre informazioni di utilizzo in maniera
   da poter offrire contenuti interessanti. Le raccomandazioni di Outbrain
   possono essere pagate da un inserzionista che ti collega a un nuovo
   sito web oppure possono essere organiche, nel qual caso il collegamento
   rinvia a un'altra pagina sullo stesso sito web dell'editore.
     * UUID.

   Quando in veste di Utente visiti per la prima volta un Sito partner (ad
   esempio, CNN.com), Outbrain deposita un cookie sul dispositivo al fine
   di generare un UUID (un identificativo utente univoco). Cataloghiamo e
   analizziamo i contenuti che consumi attraverso i Siti partner. Le
   nostre raccomandazioni si basano su: (i) cronologia di navigazione;
   (ii) modelli di navigazione simili di altri Utenti; (ii)
   raccomandazioni di contenuto che sono in genere popolari presso il
   pubblico di Outbrain in quel dato momento; (iv) un pizzico di casualità
   e (v) requisiti di targeting che possono essere forniti o richiesti dai
   nostri clienti Amplify. Ad esempio, Outbrain potrebbe sapere che l'UUID
   123 (che potresti essere tu che sul tuo iPhone X stai visitando il
   Guardian usando Chrome come browser) ama leggere di destinazioni di
   vacanza lontane e che alle persone che amano leggere delle medesime
   destinazioni di vacanza lontane piace leggere di cibi esotici.
   L'UUID è una sequenza di numeri e/o lettere. L'UUID viene associato al
   tuo dispositivo e varia in base al browser che utilizzi. In altre
   parole, Outbrain registra un UUID diverso a seconda del dispositivo e/o
   del browser che utilizzi per accedere ai Siti partner. Ad esempio, ciò
   significa che avrai un UUID quando visiti un Sito partner dal tuo
   telefono cellulare utilizzando Safari come browser e un UUID diverso
   quando visiti un Sito partner dal tuo iPad utilizzando Safari come
   browser. Outbrain combinerà e consoliderà un UUID da un dispositivo
   mobile (palmare o tablet) da un browser che accede quindi a
   un'applicazione (o viceversa) da quel medesimo dispositivo.
   L'assegnazione di un UUID consente a Outbrain di associare le
   visualizzazioni di pagina visitate e i click sulle raccomandazioni di
   Outbrain provenienti da tale UUID, il tutto con l'obiettivo di fornire
   contenuti interessanti.
     * Indirizzo IP e altre informazioni sull'utilizzo.

   Raccogliamo un UUID come spiegato sopra, inoltre raccogliamo le
   seguenti informazioni da te: (i) indirizzo IP (reso anonimo in base
   agli standard di settore) (ii) dati dell'agente utente: tipo di
   dispositivo (ad es. iPhone), tipo di browser (ad es. Chrome), sistema
   operativo (ad es. iOS); (iii) le pagine visitate; (iv) l'orario della
   visita; e (v) gli URL di riferimento e altre informazioni normalmente
   trasmesse nelle richieste HTTP.
   Le suddette informazioni statistiche ci forniscono informazioni su
   quanti Utenti hanno visitato una pagina specifica sui nostri Siti
   partner sui quali è installato il widget Outbrain, per quanto tempo
   ciascun Utente è rimasto su quella pagina, il tipo di contenuto su
   quella pagina sul quale hanno fatto click e, in generale, come hanno
   interagito con tale pagina. Queste informazioni costituiscono dati
   personali soltanto quando sono associati a un UUID.
   (b) Quali cookie e altre tecnologie simili utilizziamo
   Visita questa Tabella dei cookie nella sezione "Utenti" per un elenco
   dettagliato dei cookie proprietari che utilizziamo quando interagisci
   con i Siti partner nei quali è implementata la tecnologia Outbrain.
   Se fai click su un collegamento verso una delle nostre raccomndazioni,
   l'inserzionista Amplify che sponsorizza tale contenuto può installare
   cookie sul tuo dispositivo tramite reindirizzamenti prima che tu giunga
   alla pagina di destinazione della raccomandazione di contenuto o nel
   momento in cui raggiungi la pagina di destinazione. In tali casi sarai
   soggetto alla politica sulla privacy di tale inserzionista.
   Oltre al widget Outbrain visibile su Siti partner, alcuni inserzionisti
   di Outbrain possono implementare il pixel Outbrain sui loro siti web.
   Il pixel Outbrain determina se l'utente che raggiunge la pagina nella
   quale è installato il pixel dispone di un UUID Outbrain. Se esiste un
   UUID associato a tale utente finale, Outbrain consente agli
   inserzionisti di reindirizzare tali UUID e/o fornisce agli
   inserzionisti il numero totale di UUID che hanno raggiunto tale pagina.
   Se nessun UUID Outbrain ha visitato la pagina, il pixel Outbrain non
   raccoglie alcuna informazione sull'utente.
   Invitiamo gli inserzionisti a divulgare l'uso di pixel Outbrain sui
   propri siti web. Outbrain non combina le informazioni ottenute dal
   pixel con il profilo di un UUID.
   I punti dati come le visualizzazioni delle pagine e i click che sono
   collegati a un UUID specifico sono conservati per 13 mesi. Ad esempio,
   se l'UUID 123 legge un articolo il 31 dicembre 2017, il 1° febbraio
   2018 quell'articolo non farà più parte del profilo dell'UUID 123.
   (c) Come possiamo condividere le informazioni
   Outbrain non condivide i profili Utente con terzi. Tuttavia, potremmo
   condividere l'UUID con taluni partner per fini di sincronizzazione dei
   cookie oppure in base a requisiti tecnici. Consulta anche la sezione
   Condivisione della presente politica sulla privacy.
   (d) I tuoi diritti
     * Opt Out di Outbrain. Puoi rinunciare (opt-out) alle raccomandazioni
       di contenuto personalizzate di Outbrain in qualsiasi momento.
       Consulta il Profilo di interesse di Outbrain per una panoramica
       generale dei dati che Outbrain conosce su di te e può utilizzare
       per formulare le sue raccomandazioni. Il Profilo di interesse ti dà
       altresì la possibilità di decidere di rinunciare alle
       raccomandazioni personalizzate (puoi anche effettuare l’opt-out
       cliccando qui). Tieni presente che l'esclusione dei browser avviene
       tramite il Profilo di interesse di Outbrain, ma la rinuncia ai
       contenuti personalizzati nelle applicazioni avviene attraverso le
       impostazioni presenti sul tuo dispositivo (esempi di passaggi sono
       disponibili nel Profilo di interesse).

   IMPORTANTE – anche se hai rinunciato a usufruire di Outbrain:
     * Continuerai a visualizzare le raccomandazioni di Outbrain. La
       disattivazione del tracking per la personalizzazione di Outbrain
       non significa che non riceverai più raccomandazioni di contenuto da
       Outbrain. Piuttosto significa che non saranno personalizzate. Tali
       raccomandazioni continueranno a utilizzare le informazioni relative
       al documento che stai visualizzando (ad esempio informazioni
       contestuali) per fornirti consigli su quella pagina.

     * La rinuncia (opt-out) è basata su cookie ed è specifica del
       dispositivo/browser. Se navighi sul web da dispositivi e/o browser
       diversi, dovrai esprimere la rinuncia da ciascun dispositivo e/o
       browser per assicurarti di impedire il tracking per la
       personalizzazione su ciascuno di loro. Per lo stesso motivo, se
       acquisti un nuovo dispositivo, cambi browser o cancelli (o annulli)
       il cookie di rinuncia, dovrai esprimere nuovamente tale rinuncia.
       Rinunciare al tracking per la personalizzazione non equivale a
       bloccare i cookie.

     * Per garantire la cancellazione del profilo legato al tuo UUID, non
       attivare Outbrain per almeno 21 giorni. La tua rinuncia alle
       raccomandazioni personalizzate di Outbrain è efficace
       immediatamente. Tuttavia, se il tuo browser consente
       l'archiviazione locale e attivi le raccomandazioni di contenuto
       personalizzate di Outbrain entro 21 giorni dalla rinuncia, è
       possibile che il tuo profilo precedente venga riconnesso al tuo
       UUID. Se non effettui l'attivazione entro 21 giorni, il profilo
       verrà eliminato e non potrà essere ripristinato.

     * Come con la maggior parte dei casi di opt-out, anche l’opzione di
       opt-out del browser Outbrain si basa su un cookie. Il cookie di
       opt-out è inteso come persistente per rispettare le preferenze
       dell'utente. Tuttavia, la funzionalità di "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention" in iOS11 potrebbe avere un impatto sulla persistenza
       dei cookie nei siti web nelle 24 ore successive. Ti suggeriamo di
       utilizzare un altro browser o di bloccare tutti i cookie di terze
       parti dal browser in modo da essere "disattivato" senza dover
       ricorrere all'effettiva metodologia di opt-out di qualsiasi
       azienda.

     * Ulteriori opzioni di rinuncia (opt-out). Puoi anche esprimere la
       tua rinuncia a ricevere contenuti personalizzati offerti da noi o
       da altre agenzie pubblicitarie attraverso strumenti messi a
       disposizione dal settore come la NAI o le varie pagine basate su
       DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices, e/o EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
       Visitare le pagine delle scelte dei consumatori di NAI, DAA, DAAC o
       EDAA ti consente di rinunciare a tutti o parte dei servizi dei
       membri partecipanti. Come la funzione di opt out di Outbrain,
       queste rinunce non fanno sì che non riceverai più alcuna
       pubblicità, semplicemente gli annunci pubblicitari non saranno
       personalizzati per te. Puoi continuare a ricevere annunci
       pubblicitari, ad esempio, in base al sito web specifico che stai
       visualizzando (ossia annunci basati sul contesto). Inoltre, se i
       tuoi browser sono configurati per rifiutare i cookie quando visiti
       le pagine delle scelte dei consumatori DAA, DAAC o EDAA, la tua
       rinuncia potrebbe non essere efficace.

     * Base giuridica. La base giuridica di Outbrain per il trattamento
       dei dati personali dell'Utente si fonda sulla base giuridica
       determinata da ciascuno dei nostri Siti partner. Ciascun Sito
       partner si baserà sul consenso o sul legittimo interesse. Consulta
       la politica sulla privacy dei Siti partner per ulteriori
       informazioni sulla loro base giuridica. Se un Partner fa
       affidamento sul consenso, Outbrain non depositerà un cookie sul tuo
       dispositivo se non hai fornito il consenso su tale Sito partner.

   Partner commerciali: Sei un Partner commerciale quando ti registri (o
   invii un'e-mail a Outbrain) per conto dell'azienda per la quale lavori
   per utilizzare i servizi Outbrain Amplify o Outbrain Engage. Vedi di
   più qui.
   (a) Quali informazioni raccogliamo e perché
   Puoi fornire determinati dati personali (quali ad esempio indirizzo
   e-mail) quando ti registri per i servizi Amplify o Engage o altrimenti
   quando comunichi o interagisci con noi. Se presenti domanda per
   diventare un Partner commerciale, potremmo richiederti ulteriori
   informazioni tramite moduli di domanda dell'inserzionista, ordini di
   inserzione e altri moduli. Raccogliamo automaticamente informazioni in
   merito alle azioni del tuo nome utente nella dashboard di Outbrain. Ad
   esempio, in qualità di Partner commerciale Amplify, se modifichi il
   costo per click per una delle tue campagne, la traccia di controllo di
   Outbrain registrerà tutte queste azioni.
   Raccogliamo e trattiamo i dati personali di cui sopra al fine di
   adempiere ai nostri obblighi ai sensi del nostro accordo come Partner
   commerciale (o potenziale Partner commerciale) stipulato con voi, ivi
   incluso per:
     * rispondere alle tue domande e richieste;

     * fornirti accesso a determinate funzioni e caratteristiche dei
       nostri servizi Amplify o Engage (ad esempio per fornirti e
       mantenere il tuo account dashboard);

     * verificare la tua identità;

     * comunicare con te in merito al tuo account, ai nostri prodotti e
       alle promozioni disponibili pertinenti al tuo utilizzo del servizio
       Amplify o Engage.

   (b) Quali cookie e altre tecnologie simili utilizziamo
   Ti rimandiamo a questa Tabella dei cookie nella sezione "Partner
   commerciali" per un elenco dettagliato dei cookie (e dei relativi
   periodi di conservazione) che utilizziamo con i Partner commerciali.
   (c) Come possiamo condividere le informazioni con chiunque
   Potremmo divulgare determinate informazioni dei Business Partner a
   venditori, contraenti o altri soggetti che assistono Outbrain
   nell'erogazione dei servizi (ad es. trattamento delle carte di
   credito). Consulta anche la sezione Condivisione della presente
   politica sulla privacy.
   (d) I tuoi diritti
   Se in veste di Partner commerciale desideri verificare, correggere,
   aggiornare o richiedere la disattivazione delle tue informazioni, puoi
   accedere alla dashboard di Outbrain e modificare le preferenze del tuo
   profilo oppure contattarci all'indirizzo: support@outbrain.com. Se stai
   ricevendo e-mail di Outbrain, puoi "annullare l'iscrizione" a tale
   invio utilizzando un collegamento presente nell'e-mail. Nota:
   l'annullamento dell'iscrizione non comporta la rinuncia a ricevere
   notifiche critiche all'erogazione dei servizi Amplify o Engage (ad es.
   fatture inviate via e-mail).
   La base giuridica di Outbrain per il trattamento dei dati personali dei
   Partner commerciali è il legittimo interesse.
   3. Come manteniamo le informazioni al sicuro, Trasferimenti al di fuori
   del SEE, Condivisione e conservazione

                                      +

   Sicurezza
   Outbrain dispone di un team dedicato per la sicurezza. Manteniamo
   rigorosi controlli sui dati che raccogliamo, conservandoli in database
   protetti e soggetti a firewall con diritti di accesso rigorosamente
   limitati e controllati, per garantirne la sicurezza. Consulta le nostre
   norme sulla sicurezza per maggiori informazioni.
   I partner commerciali hanno accesso a determinate funzionalità protette
   da password del servizio Amplify o Engage. Loro sono responsabili del
   mantenimento della riservatezza di tale password. Ricorda che,
   sfortunatamente, la trasmissione di informazioni tramite Internet non è
   completamente sicura. Una truffa comune su Internet è nota come
   "spoofing" o "phishing" e si verifica quando ricevi un'email
   proveniente da quella che sembra essere una fonte legittima che
   richiede i tuoi dati personali. Ti preghiamo di osservare che non ti
   invieremo alcuna e-mail che ti chieda di verificare la carta di
   credito, le coordinate bancarie o eventuali altri dati personali.
   Qualora dovessi ricevere un'e-mail che sembra provenire da noi e ti
   chiede tali informazioni ti preghiamo di non rispondere e non fare
   click su nessun link presente nell'e-mail. Al contrario, inoltraci
   l'e-mail all'indirizzo legal@outbrain.com, in quanto esamineremo
   possibili casi di frodi su Internet.
   Trasferimento dei dati al di fuori dell'UE/del SEE
   Quando trasferiamo i dati personali dallo Spazio economico europeo ad
   altri paesi nei quali le leggi applicabili non offrono il medesimo
   livello di protezione della privacy dei dati offerto nei Territori
   europei, adottiamo misure atte a fornire un livello appropriato di
   protezione della privacy dei dati. In altre parole, i tuoi diritti e le
   protezioni che ti spettano rimangono associati ai tuoi dati. Ad
   esempio, utilizziamo clausole contrattuali approvate e altre misure
   studiate per garantire che i destinatari dei tuoi dati personali li
   proteggano.
   Condivisione
   Oltre alla descrizione di come possiamo divulgare i tuoi dati personali
   per ciascun tipo di utente, possiamo altresì divulgare dati personali
   nei seguenti casi:
     * all'interno della famiglia di società controllate da Outbrain per
       ragioni interne, principalmente per scopi aziendali e operativi;

     * qualora dovessimo attraversare una transizione aziendale, quale una
       fusione, un'acquisizione da parte di un'altra società oppure una
       vendita di tutte o di parte delle nostre attività, i tuoi dati
       personali saranno probabilmente inclusi tra le attività trasferite;

     * laddove ciò sia richiesto dalla legge (ad esempio, per collaborare
       con indagini delle forze dell'ordine oppure con altri procedimenti
       giudiziari); e/o

     * per rispondere a un'emergenza effettiva.

   Inoltre, combiniamo i tuoi dati personali con quelli di altri utenti al
   fine di condividere informazioni sulle tendenze e aggregare le
   statistiche degli utenti con terze parti, sempre in forma aggregata e
   anonimizzata.
   Conservazione dei dati
   Il periodo di conservazione per ciascuno dei cookie utilizzati da
   Outbrain (sia per quelli propri sia per quelli usati da terzi per
   nostro conto) è indicato nella Tabella dei cookie.
   Outbrain mantiene altresì una politica di conservazione dei dati che
   dettaglia il periodo di conservazione dei dati personali in base alla
   nostra analisi della durata ragionevolmente necessaria di tale
   conservazione, rispetto a dati specifici, tenuto conto delle finalità
   legali o commerciali. Nel momento in cui non necessitiamo più dei dati
   personali, li cancelliamo o li distruggiamo in maniera sicura. I dati
   aggregati, che non consentono di identificare un dispositivo/browser (o
   una singola persona) e sono utilizzati per finalità di reporting e
   analisi vengono conservati per tutto il tempo necessario dal punto di
   vista commerciale.
   4. Minori

                                      +

   Nessuno dei nostri servizi si rivolge a minori di 16 anni. Non
   raccogliamo consapevolmente dati personali da minori di 16 anni. Se al
   momento della raccolta dovessimo stabilire che un Visitatore del sito,
   un Utente o un Partner commerciale ha meno di 16 anni, non useremo né
   conserveremo i suoi dati personali. Qualora dovessimo venire a
   conoscenza del fatto che abbiamo raccolto inconsapevolmente dati
   personali da un minore di età inferiore ai 16 anni, attueremo ogni
   ragionevole sforzo per eliminare tali informazioni dai nostri archivi.
   Se sei un bambino, vai a giocare in giardino, non usare o interagire
   con Outbrain!
   5. Cittadini dei territori europei

                                      +

   In conformità con le leggi europee in materia di tutela della vita
   privata (privacy), in particolare con il regolamento generale europeo
   sulla protezione dei dati (GDPR), Outbrain riconosce specifici diritti
   aggiuntivi ai cittadini dei Territori europei quali il diritto di
   accesso, di rettifica, di opposizione, di reclamo, di cancellazione e
   di blocco. Più specificamente:
     * il diritto di richiedere informazioni sull'eventualità del
       trattamento in atto e su quali dati personali siano trattati da
       noi, nonché il diritto di richiedere la rettifica o la modifica di
       tali dati personali.
     * in determinate circostanze, il diritto di richiedere che i dati
       personali siano cancellati.
     * in determinate circostanze, il diritto di chiedere che il
       trattamento dei dati personali sia soggetto a limitazioni.
     * il diritto alla revoca del proprio consenso al trattamento e
       all'utilizzo dei propri dati, in tutto o in parte, in qualsiasi
       momento con applicazione per il futuro.
     * il diritto di ottenere i propri dati personali in un formato
       comune, strutturato e leggibile da un dispositivo automatico.
     * il diritto di contattare il nostro responsabile della protezione
       dei dati nel caso in cui vi siano domande, commenti, reclami o
       richieste in relazione alla nostra dichiarazione sulla protezione
       dei dati e sul trattamento dei dati personali.
     * il diritto di sporgere reclamo presso l'autorità di controllo
       responsabile qualora si ritenga che il trattamento dei propri dati
       personali avvenga in violazione della legislazione.

   In aggiunta a quanto sopra, facciamo riferimento a determinati diritti
   per i cittadini dei Territori europei nel corso della presente politica
   sulla privacy. Ai sensi del GDPR, con il termine cittadini dei
   "Territori europei" si intendono i cittadini dello Spazio economico
   europeo (SEE) e della Svizzera. Ai fini della presente Informativa
   sulla privacy, il termine "Territori europei" continuerà a includere il
   Regno Unito, anche dopo che il Regno Unito avrà lasciato lo Spazio
   economico europeo in seguito alla Brexit.
   Nel caso avessi domande su come esercitare qualsiasi dei diritti
   descritti qui sopra, scrivici al seguente indirizzo e-mail:
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com.
   6. Diritti in materia di privacy della California

                                      +

   Ai sensi degli articoli 1798.83-1798.84 del Codice Civile della
   California, i residenti californiani hanno il diritto di richiederci
   un'informativa che descriva le categorie di informazioni personali che
   condividiamo con terzi o società affiliate per finalità di marketing
   diretto di tali terzi o società affiliate. Tale informativa individuerà
   le categorie di informazioni condivise e includerà un elenco dei terzi
   e delle società affiliate con le quali sono state condivise, unitamente
   ai loro nomi e indirizzi. Se sei residente in California e desideri una
   copia di tale informativa, invia una richiesta scritta a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oppure inviala al seguente indirizzo
   postale: Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY
   10011. Si prega di consentire 30 giorni per la risposta.
   7. Comunicazione antitracciamento (“Do Not Track”)

                                      +

   Alcuni browser trasmettono segnali antitracciamento, denominati "Do Not
   Track" (DNT), ai siti web. Poiché non esiste una comprensione comune su
   come interpretare il segnale DNT, al momento Outbrain non altera,
   modifica o risponde alle richieste o ai segnali DNT di tali browser.
   Continueremo a monitorare l'attività del settore in questo contesto e
   rivaluteremo le nostre pratiche DNT se necessario. Nel frattempo, puoi
   utilizzare la gamma di altri strumenti che mettiamo a disposizione per
   controllare la raccolta e l'utilizzo dei dati, ivi inclusa la capacità
   di rinunciare a ricevere raccomandazioni personalizzate consultando la
   sezione Utenti.
   8. Come può variare la presente politica sulla privacy

                                      +

   Occasionalmente potremmo modificare la presente politica sulla privacy.
   Inseriremo un avviso in evidenza che ti sarà visibile in qualità di
   Visitatore del sito o Partner commerciale, tuttavia non disponiamo di
   mezzi per avvertire gli Utenti in merito a un aggiornamento. In tal
   caso si raccomanda di verificare periodicamente questa pagina per
   sapere se la politica sulla privacy è stata aggiornata. Visualizzeremo
   sempre la data dell'ultima modifica della politica sulla privacy nella
   parte alta della pagina affinché tu possa sapere quando è stata rivista
   l'ultima volta.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   2018年5月24日
   アウトブレインはお客様の個人データを大切に保護します。このプライバシー ポリシーは（以下「プライバシー
   ポリシー」といいます。）、アウトブレインが収集する全ての個人データも含めた情報の利用方法を定めるものです。個人データは、お客様に関わる情報であ
   って、個人を特定できる情報です。アウトブレインは、お客様の個人データを利用に際しては、適用されるすべての法令を遵守します。プライバシーチャンピ
   オンチームのもと信頼と透明性というアウトブレインの価値を守ります
   + ＋全てを広げる
   – COLLAPSE ALL
   １．私たちについて、私たちのミッション、及びアウトブレイン・アウトブレインのDPO・又は関係部署へのお問い合わせ方法
   +
   アウトブレインについて
   私たちは、米国のデラウェア州で設立された株式会社及びその関連子会社（以下合わせて「アウトブレイン」又は「私たち」といいます。）であり、本社はニ
   ューヨークにあります。アウトブレインは、12 個のグローバルオフィスを有し、世界中のパブリッシャー及びマーケッターと提携関係を組んでいます。
   アウトブレインのミッション
   アウトブレインのミッションは、ユーザーの関心に基づいて、ユーザーの興味関心に基づいてレコメンデーションを提供することです。そのミッションのため
   、次のようなパートナーと提携しています。
     * 読者に価値があるコンテンツを勧めたいオンラインパブリッシャ及びパートナー（こちらの契約をOutbrain Engageといいます。）

     * コンテンツを読者に配信することを希望するアドバタイザー（こちらの契約を Outbrain Amplifyといいます。）

   アウトブレインへのお問い合わせ
   アウトブレインはプライバシーポリシーを遵守していることを定期的に確認しております。プライバシーポリシーに関するご質問、コメント、又は他のお問い
   合わせは次の連絡先までお願いします。
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com 又は
   Attn: Privacy Questions
   Outbrain Inc.
   39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor
   New York, NY 10011
   また上記のお問い合わせ以外にもご質問がございましたら、次の連絡先までご連絡下さい。
     * 外部のData Protection Officer （以下「DPO」と言う）：ePrivacy GmbH
       担当者：クリストフ・バウワー博士
       ePrivacy GmbHには privacy@eprivacy.eu 宛てご連絡ください。

     * 欧州内のアウトブレインの担当部署である Information Commissioner’s Officer

   自主規制機関
   アウトブレインは、Digital Advertising Alliance （以下「DAA」という）及び European
   Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance（以下「EDAA
   」という）において自主規制の原則を遵守します。アウトブレインは、責任あるデータの収集とデジタル広告におけるデータの使用を定める社団Networ
   k Advertising Initiative
   (NAI)の優良メンバーであり、そのウェブとモバイルのための行動規範を遵守します。アウトブレインは、オンライン行動アドバタイジング(OAB)
   に関するInteractive Advertising Bureau (IAB)の自主規制原則及びIAB の欧州OBA原則を遵守します。
   ２．アウトブレインのユーザータイプ（オプトアウトも含む）)
   +
   このプライバシーポリシーにおいては、様々な場面ごとに、お客さまのユーザータイプに応じて、どの情報を収集し、なぜ収集するのか、なぜ、どのクッキー
   を使うのか、またどのような類似の技術を用いるのか、私たちがどのようにその情報を共有するのか、またお客様にはどのような権利があるのかということを
   ご説明します。
   ウェブサイトの訪問者：お客様はアウトブレインのOutbrain.com （又は国によるアドレス、例えばOutbrain.co.uk、
   Outbrain.fr 、Outbrain.de 、など）及び MyOutbrain.com
   のウェブサイト、ウェブページ、相互作用機能（以下すべて合わせて「アウトブレインのサイト」という）を訪問、及び相互作用する場合、サイトの訪問者に
   なります。 詳しくは こちらへ。
   ア）収集する情報及びその理由
   アウトブレインは、アウトブレインのサイトにおいてお客様がどのコンテンツに興味を持つかを理解し、且つお客様がアウトブレインのサイトを訪問しない時
   にもアウトブレインが提供するサービスを認識していただきたいと考えています。このために、お客様から（１）IP
   アドレス、（２）ユーザーエージェントデータ、あるいはデバイスの種類（例えばiPhone など）、ブラウザの種類（例えばGoogle
   Chromeなど）、オペレーティングシステム（例えばiOS など）、（３）アウトブレインのサイト のどのページを閲覧したか
   （例えば、「アウトブレインについて」のページ）、（４）閲覧した時間（対応する時差）、（５）URL のリファーラル及びHTTP
   リクエストにおいて通常に通信される情報（例えば、この情報でお客様がアウトブレインのサイトにどの経由でいらしたのかを知ることができます）の情報を
   収集します。
   イ）利用するクッキー、又は使用する技術
   お客様がアウトブレインのサイトを訪問する際に使用されるクッキー（及びその有効期間）に関する詳細については、こちらの クッキーテーブル
   のウェッブサイト訪問者の部分をご参照ください。
   ウ）情報の共有
   アウトブレインのサイトにおいて収集したお客様の情報の共有
   原則として、アウトブレインはお客様の個人データを第三者に対しそのマーケティング活動のために共有することはいたしません。しかし、アウトブレインが
   お客様に対してマーケティング及び広告配信ができるように第三者のサービス（こちらの クッキーテーブル
   に表示されます）を利用することがあります。例えば、アウトブレインのサイトにおいて、アウトブレインがお客様にマーケティング及び広告配信を行うため
   に使用するクッキーの一部は、第三者のクッキーです。アウトブレインはこれら第三者に対して、共有された情報を機密情報として取り扱わせるとともに、こ
   れらの情報をアウトブレインに対する義務の履行のためにのみ使用させるものとします。私たちは、私たちのために個人データを処理するあらゆる第三者との
   間で、個人データを私たちの指示及び適用されるデータ保護に関するあらゆる法令を遵守して処理することを義務付ける契約を締結しております。又、お客様
   がアウトブレインのブログにコメントする場合、そのコメント及び情報は開示されます。コメントを削除するためには、
   support@outbrain.comまでご連絡ください。
   アウトブレインのサイトにおける第三者のサービスの利用
   アウトブレインのサイト上には、アウトブレインが所有又は管理しないウェブサイトへのリンクがあります。アウトブレインは、他の第三者のウェブサイトの
   コンテンツ、商品、サービス、プライバシーポリシー、又はデータ処理方法を管理又は保証することができません。例えば、アウトブレインのサイトにおいて
   、アウトブレインのFacebook のページ、又はLinkedin
   のページへのクリックできるアイコンがあります。お客様がこのリンクをクリックする際にFacebook 及びLinkedin
   がお客様のデバイスに自らのクッキーを送信し、個別に個人データを収集する可能性があります。従って、お客様にはFacebook やLinkedin
   のプライバシーポリシーもご確認いただきますようお願いいたします。
   エ）お客様の権利
   アウトブレインのサイトの利用は、アウトブレインのサイトの 利用条件
   にしたがうこととされ、お客様にも適用されます。お客様は、アウトブレインのサイトを利用することをいつでもやめることができます。お客様は利用するこ
   とをやめる場合に、お客様のデバイスに送信されたクッキーを削除することもできます。お客様はアウトブレインのサイトを利用する際にお客様のメールアド
   レスを提供している場合、アウトブレインから送信されるメールの「配信停止」のオプションを利用することもできます。
   アウトブレインは、 欧州
   からのサイト訪問者のために、お客様がアウトブレインのサイトで使用されるクッキー又は他の技術に同意・不同意を表明することを可能にする同意管理プラ
   ットフォーム（「 One
   Trust」を使用する）をアウトブレインのサイトおいて実施します。アウトブレインはお客様が同意しない限りクッキーを送信しません。したがって、ア
   ウトブレインが個人データを処理するための法的根拠は、「同意」となります。お客様はいつでも同意を撤回することができます。
   ユーザー：お客様は
   、アウトブレインのウィジェットがインストールされるアウトブレインのパートナーのウェブサイトのページ（以下「パートナーサイト」といいます。）を訪
   問者をユーザーといいます。例えば、お客様はhttps://news.sky.com/uk 、www.spiegel.de、又は
   www.cnn.com
   を訪問する場合、そのウェブサイトにおいてアウトブレインのウィジェットが表示されます。アウトブレインのウィジェットにおいて、アウトブレインに言及
   するテキスト（例えばレコメンデーションの近くに「アウトブレインのおすすめ」や「アウトブレインからの」といったテキスト）があります。お客様がアウ
   トブレインに言及するリンクをクリックする場合、アウトブレインがレコメンデーションにおいて利用するデータカテゴリーを提供する
   アウトブレインのInterest プロファイルへリンクする通知
   が表示されます。お客様はプロファイルにおいてパーソナルレコメンデーションからオプトアウトすることもできます。詳しくは こちらへ.
   アウトブレインのウィジェットの例
   Outbrain Example Recommendations
   ア）収集する情報及びその理由
   アウトブレインは、価値があるレコメンデーションを提供するために、UUID、IPアドレス、及び他の情報を利用します。アウトブレインのレコメンデー
   ションは、費用を払う広告社から新しいサイトへリンクするもの、又は同じパブリッシャのページへリンクするものです。
     * UUID

   お客様は最初にパートナーサイト（例えば、CNN.com）を訪問する際に、アウトブレインがUUID（一意なユーザー識別子）を割り当てることができ
   るよう、お客様のデバイスにクッキーが送信されます。アウトブレインは、お客様がパートナーサイトにおいて表示又は閲覧するコンテンツをカテゴライズし
   、分析します。アウトブレインのレコメンデーションは、（１）ブラウザの履歴、（２）他のユーザーの類似ブラウジングパータン、（３）アウトブレインの
   ユーザーにおけるその時に人気のコンテンツ、（４）ランダム、及び（５）Amplifyの顧客が提供する又は求めるターゲット条件に基づいて提供されま
   す。例えば、アウトブレインは、UUID123（例えばiPhoneXにおいてChromeのブラウザを使用してガーディアン新聞を訪問するお客様）が
   遠い外国の旅行先について読むことが好きだということ、且つ遠い外国の旅行先について読むことが好きな人は面白い外国の食べ物についても読むことが好き
   だということを知っている可能性があります。
   UUIDは数字又は文字の配列です。UUIDはお客様のデバイスに対応し、ブラウザによって変更されます。言い換えれば、アウトブレインは、お客様がパ
   ートナーサイトを訪問する毎に、お客様のデバイス又はブラウザごとに個別のUUIDを保存します。例えば、お客様がモバイルデバイスにおいてサファリと
   いうブラウザを使用してパートナーサイトを訪問する場合にあるひとつのUUIDが割り当てられ、iPadにおいてサファリというブラウザを使用してパー
   トナーサイトを訪問する場合にまた別のUUIDが割り当てられます。アウトブレインは、モバイルデバイス（携帯端末かタブレット）上のブラウザのUUI
   Dが同じデバイスにおいてアプリにアクセスする（逆も含む）場合、そのUUIDを結合します。
   アウトブレインは、デバイス又はブラウザにUUIDを割り当てることにより、お客様に対してお客様の関心に基づくレコメンデーションを提供することがで
   きるため、そのUUIDと訪問されたページ及びアウトブレインのレコメンデーションのクリックを対応させることができます。
   IPアドレス及び他の使用情報
   アウトブレインは、上記のようにUUIDを収集し、また、（１）IPアドレス、（２）ユーザーエージェントデータ；デバイスの種類（例えば携帯電話）、
   ブラウザの種類（例えばChrome）、オペレーティングシステム（例えばiOS）、（３）訪問したページ、（４）訪問時間、及び（５）リファラURL
   及びHTTP要求において通常に通信される情報を収集します。
   この統計情報は、アウトブレインのウィジェットがインストールされるパートナーサイトのページに何人が訪問しているのかということに関する情報、そのペ
   ージの訪問時間、ユーザーにクリックされたコンテンツ、及び一般的な訪問方法に関する情報をアウトブレインに提供するものです。この情報は、UUIDと
   対応しないため、個人データには該当しません。
   イ）利用するクッキー、又は使用する技術
   アウトブレインの技術が実施されるパートナーサイトを利用する際に使用するクッキーについては、こちらのクッキーテーブルの「ユーザー」の部分をご参照
   くだい。
   お客様がアウトブレインがレコメンドしたコンテンツのリンクをクリックする場合、そのレコメンデーションの遷移先ページが表示される前に、又は遷移先ペ
   ージが表示された際に、レコメンデーションのスポンサーをするAmplifyのアドバタイザーからリダイレクトを使用してお客様のデバイスにクッキーが
   送信される可能性があります。その場合、アドバタイザーのプライバシーポリシーが適用されます。
   アウトブレインのアドバタイザーは 、 表示されるアウトブレインのウィジェットに加えて
   アウトブレインピクセルを使用する可能性があります。アウトブレインピクセルは、ピクセルが実施されるページを訪問するユーザーに対応するアウトブレイ
   ン UUIDが存在するかどうか判断します。アウトブレインはエンドユーザーに対応するアウトブレインUUID が存在する場合、アドバタイザーがその
   UUIDをリターゲットすることができる機能やページを訪問する合計の UUID
   を提供します。アウトブレインピクセルは、ページへの訪問者がアウトブレイン UUID を保持しない場合にはユーザーの情報を収集しません。
   アウトブレインは、アドバタイザーが自らのウェブサイトにおいてアウトブレインピクセルが実施されている旨を開示するよう推奨しています。アウトブレイ
   ンはピクセルから収集した情報とUUIDのプロフィールを結合しません。
   各UUIDに対応するページの閲覧、及びクリック数のようなデータポイントは 13ヶ月間保存されます。例えば、UUID123が 2017年12月
   31日に記事を閲覧したという場合、その記事は2018年 2月1日にその UUIDのプロフィールから削除されます。
   ウ）情報の共有
   アウトブレインはいかなる第三者に対してもユーザーのプロフィールを共有しません。しかし、アウトブレインはクッキーの突合又は技術的に必要となる範囲
   で第三者にUUID を共有する可能性があります。
   詳しくはこのプライバシーポリシーのデータ共有の 部分もご参照ください。
   エ）お客様の権利
     * アウトブレインのオプトアウト

   お客様は、いつでもアウトブレインのパーソナルレコメンデーションからオプトアウトすることができます。お客様の個人データ及びその個人データに基づい
   てお客様にレコメンデーションをすることに関しては、アウトブレインのinterest プロファイル
   をご参照ください。お客様は、興味プロフィールからパーソナルレコメンデーションをオプトアウトすることもできます。ブラウザ上で行うオプトアウトはア
   ウトブレインのinterest プロファイル
   上で行われるものであり、アプリ上でのパーソナルレコメンデーションのオプトアウトはお客様のデバイスの設定を通して行われるものであることにご注意く
   ださい（interest プロファイル にオプトアウトの際のステップの例があります）。
   ご注意ください アウトブレインからオプトアウトしても：
     * お客様に対してまだアウトブレインのレコメンデーションが表示されます。
       アウトブレインのパーソナルトラッキングからオプトアウトをしてもアウトブレインからのレコメンデーションが表示されなくなるわけではありませ
       ん。以降表示されるレコメンデーションはお客様に特化していないだけのものとなります。レコメンデーションは、そのページに関するレコメンデー
       ションを提供するために、お客様が閲覧している文書に関する情報を利用します。
     * オプトアウトはクッキーベースであって、デバイス及びブラウザに特有される
       ものです。お客様が複数のデバイス又はブラウザからウェブサイトを訪問する場合、お客様のすべてのデバイス又はブラウザにおいてパーソナルトラ
       ッキングがなされないようにするため、お客様ご自身ですべてのデバイス又はブラウザにおいてオプトアウトをしていただく必要があります。また、
       お客様は新しいデバイスを買い、ブラウザを変更し、又はオプトアウトのクッキーを削除する場合、再度オプトアウトしなければなりません。また、
       パーソナルトラッキングからオプトアウトすることと、クッキー自体をブロックすることとは異なりますのでご注意ください。
     * お客様は、お客様のUUID
       と対応するプロフィールの削除を保証するために、最低２１日間の間はアウトブレインをオプトインしないようにご注意ください。
       お客様のアウトブレインのパーソナルレコメンデーションからのオプトアウトは直ちに実施されます。しかし、お客様のブラウザがローカル保存をす
       る設定となっており、オプトアウトから２１日以内にアウトブレインのパーソナルレコメンデーションにオプトインする場合、お客様のUUID
       にお客様の従前のプロフィールが再接続される可能性があります。お客様が２１日間以内にオプトインしない場合、お客様のプロフィールは削除され
       、回復することができなくなります。
     * アウトブレインのオプトアウト機能はクッキーに基づくものであり、ユーザーの希望を遵守するように作成されます。しかし、iOS11の
       Intelligent Tracking
       Preventionという機能は、２４時間の範囲を超える場合にウェブサイトのクッキーに影響を与える可能性があります。アウトブレインは、
       お客様が他の会社のオプトアウト方法に依存しなくてもいいように、他のブラウザを使用し、又はブラウザから第三者のクッキーをすべてブロックす
       ることをお勧めします。
     * オプトアウトの追加のオプション

   お客様は、NAI又はDAA のページ（DAA：http://www.aboutads.info/choices 、 DAAC：
   www.youradchoices.ca/choices、及び／又は EDAA
   www.youronlinechoices.eu）のような業界のツールを通してアウトブレイン又は他のアドバタイザーからのパーソナルアドバタイジ
   ングをオプトアウトすることもできます。お客様は、 NAI 、DAA、 DAAC、又は
   EDAAのページを訪問することにより、参加するメンバーのサービスから全体的、又は部分的にオプトアウトすることができます。こちらにもオプトアウト
   することで、アウトブレインのオプトアウトと同じように、お客様に広告が表示されないようになるという意味ではなく、ただお客様にパーソナルな広告が表
   示されないという意味になります。お客様が訪問するウェブサイトに基づく広告（例えば、内容に基づく広告）はまだお客様に対して表示されます。また、お
   客様は、 DAA、DAAC、又は
   EDAAコンスマーチョイスのウェブサイトを訪問する際にブラウザがクッキーを却下するように設定される場合、お客様のオプトアウトが実施されない可能
   性があります。
     * 法的根拠：
       ユーザーの個人データを処理することに関する法的根拠は、アウトブレインの各パートナーサイトの法的根拠に基づくものです。各パートナーサイト
       は、「同意」又は「正当な利益」に基づく法的根拠があります。各パートナーサイトの法的根拠の詳細については、各パートナーサイトのプライバシ
       ーポリシーをご参照ください。アウトブレインは、パートナーが「同意」という法的根拠を採用している場合、パートナーサイトにおいてお客様が同
       意しない限りクッキーを送信しません。

   ビジネスパートナー： お客様は、会社の役割としてアウトブレインの Amplify又はEngage
   のサービスを利用できるようにに登録する（又はアウトブレインとメールのやり取りを行う）場合、ビジネスパートナーとなります。詳しくは こちらへ.
   ア）収集する情報及びその理由
   お客様は、Amplify又はEngage
   のサービスに登録又はアウトブレインとのやり取りを行う際に個人データ（例えばメールアドレスなど）をアウトブレインに提供する可能性があります。お客
   様がビジネスパートナーとなることを希望される際には、アドバタイザーの申込書、広告掲載申込書、又は他の申込書において追加の情報が要求される可能性
   があります。アウトブレインは、アウトブレインダッシュボードにおいて、お客様に対応するユーザーネームの行動に関する情報を自動的に収集します。例え
   ば、お客様がキャンペーンの CPCを変更する場合、アウトブレインの監査証跡に全てのCPCの変更に対応する行動の記録が残ります。
   アウトブレインは、お客様とのビジネスパートナー（又はなり得るビジネスパートナー）としての契約条件を遵守するために例えば下記のような目的のため上
   記のようなデータを収集し、処理します。
     * お客様からのご質問及びお問い合わせに対応すること
     * お客様にAmplify及び
       Engageサービスが提供する機能へのアクセスを提供すること（例えばお客様のダッシュボードアカウントを提供、管理すること）
     * お客様のアイデンティティーを確認すること
     * お客様にお客様のアカウント、アウトブレインのサービス、又はAmplify及び
       Engageのサービスに関するプロモーションについてご連絡すること

   イ）利用するクッキー、又は使用する技術
   アウトブレインがビジネスパートナーに対して使用するクッキー（及びその有効期間）に関する詳細については、こちらのクッキーテーブル
   の「ビジネスパートナー」の部分をご参照ください。
   ウ）情報の共有
   アウトブレインは、ベンダー、コントラクター、又はアウトブレインのサービスをサポートする他の第三者（例えば、クレジットカード処理）にビジネスパー
   トナーの情報を開示する可能性があります。詳しくはこのプライバシーポリシーの データ共有 の部分をご参照ください。
   エ）お客様の権利
   お客様がビジネスパートナーとして、個人データを確認、修正、更新、又は削除を希望する場合、アウトブレインのダッシュボードの「プロフィール設定」か
   ら行っていただくことができます。あるいは、support@outbrain.com
   までご連絡ください。お客様は、お客様にアウトブレインのメールが送信されている場合、そのメールに記載されているリンクを通して配信停止をすることも
   できます。「配信停止」によっても、アウトブレインのサービスを提供するために必要な連絡又は通知にはオプトアウトの効果は生じません（例えば、請求書
   など）。
   アウトブレインがビジネスパートナーの個人データを処理する法的根拠は「正当な利益」です。
   ３．アウトブレインの情報保持、欧州経済領域外への移転、共有及び保存
   +
   セキュリティー
   アウトブレインには専門のセキュリティーチームがあります。アウトブレインは個人データの厳密な管理体制を整備し、その個人データは、ファイアウォール
   が設けられた安全なサーバーに保存され、且つ、アクセス権が限定されます。詳しくはアウトブレインのセキュリティー規定 をご参照ください。
   ビジネスパートナーは、Amply又はEngage
   のサービスにおいてパスワードによって保護される機能に対するアクセス権が有します。ビジネスパートナーはこのパスワードを秘密情報として扱う責任があ
   ります。お客様はインターネットを通じた情報通信は完全に安全ではないということにご注意ください。「スプーフィング」又は「フィッシング」と呼ばれる
   詐欺行為もあります。「スプーフィング」又は「フィッシング」とは、信頼されている主体になりすまして個人データを求める電子メールです。アウトブレイ
   ンが、クレジットカード、銀行情報、又は他の個人データを求めるメールを送信することはありません。もしお客様が、アウトブレインになりすました個人デ
   ータを求めるメールを受信したような場合には、これに対し返事すること、又は表示されたリンクをクリックすることのないようにご注意ください。アウトブ
   レインがそのインターネットを通じた詐欺行為を確認できるように、何かありましたら、 legal@outbrain.comまでにご連絡ください。
   欧州／欧州経済領域外のデータ移転
   アウトブレインは、欧州又は欧州経済領域から、欧州と同等のデータプライバシー保護がなされていない国にデータを移転する場合、適切なデータプライバシ
   ー保護を提供できるような措置を実施します。つまり、お客様のデータはお客様の権利と一緒に移転します。例えば、私たちは承認された契約条項（標準契約
   条項）の使用やその他の個人データの受領者がお客様のデータを保護するための措置を実施します。
   共有
   以上のユーザータイプ別の個人データの開示に加えて、次の方法で個人データが開示される可能性もあります。
     * ビジネス及び業務遂行を目的として、アウトブレインの関連子会社間における開示
     * アウトブレインが合併、買収、又は事業譲渡の対象となることにより、個人データも移転対象となることによる開示
     * 法令、規則、管轄官庁の求めに応じた開示（例えば、法律の執行の又は他の訴訟手続きの協力を目的とする開示）
     * 緊急事態下における開示

   上記に加えて、アウトブレインは、傾向情報及び集合体のユーザー情報を第三者に共有できるようにお客様の個人データと他のユーザー情報を結合します。結
   合される情報は常に集合体及び匿名扱いの状態にあります。
   データ保持
   アウトブレインが使用するクッキー（自らのクッキー及び第三者のも含む）の有効期間はクッキーテーブル に記載されます。
   アウトブレインは、個人データが法律上及び取引上どの程度の期間必要とされるかという分析を踏まえて、データの保存期間を定めるデータ保持ポリシーを整
   備します。
   個人データの必要性がなくなった場合、アウトブレインは確実に個人情報を削除、又は消去します。デバイス、ブラウザ、又は個人を特定しない集合体データ
   は、報告又は分析のため、商業的な必要性がある限り保持されます。
   ４．未成年に対して
   +
   アウトブレインは16歳未満の未成年を対象とするサービスを提供しません。また、アウトブレインは、
   16歳未満の未成年の個人データを意図的に収集することは行いません。データを取集する際にサイト訪問者、ユーザー、又はビジネスパートナーが16
   歳未満の未成年であることが判明した場合、その個人データが利用され、又は保存されることはありません。アウトブレインは、意図せず
   16歳未満の未成年者の個人データを収集したことを知った場合、その個人データを削除するために必要となる合理的な対応を行います。アウトブレインは、
   未成年者はアウトブレインを利用するよりも、外で遊ぶ方が望ましいと考えています。
   ５．欧州市民
   +
   欧州の市民には、欧州のプライバシーに関する法律、特に欧州の個人データ保護規則（General Data Protection
   Regulation）（以下「
   GDPR」という）に基づいた個人データに関するアクセス、訂正、拒否、削除、ブロック、及び苦情申し立ての権利があります。具体的には、
     * お客様の個人データが処理されているか否か、されているとすれば、どの情報についてであるのかについての情報を求める権利及び個人データの修正
       あるいは訂正を求める権利
     * 状況により、自己の個人データの削除を求める権利
     * 状況により、自己の個人データの処理の限定を求める権利
     * お客様の個人データの処理及び利用に対する同意の全部または一部を撤回する権利
     * 一般的に、整理された、機械的に読み取ることができる方法で事故の個人データのコピーを取得する権利
     * アウトブレインのデータ保持及びお客様の個人データの処理に関する質問、コメント、要求、又は苦情がある場合に、アウトブレインのData
       Protection Officerと連絡する権利
     * 規則に違反した個人データの処理が行われていると信じる場合の監督機関に対する苦情申し立ての権利

   上記に加えてこのプライバシーポリシーに欧州市民の権利が参照されます。GDPRに応じて、「欧州市民」とは、欧州経済領域及びスイス連邦を意味します
   。このプライバシーポリシーにおいては、「欧州」とは、ブレグジット以降イギリスが欧州連合から脱退した後でもイギリスを含むものとします。
   上記の権利についてお問い合わせがある場合、PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com までご連絡ください。
   ６．カリフォルニア州のプライバシーポリシー
   +
   カリフォルニア州住民は、カリフォルニア州の民法1798.83
   及び1798.84号により、アウトブレインに、アウトブレインがダイレクトマーケティングできるように第三者又は関連会社と共有する個人データのカテ
   ゴリーが記載された通知書の発行を求める権利があります。その通知書には共有される情報が特定され、また共有する第三者及び関連会社、その第三者及び関
   連会社の住所が含まれます。お客様がカリフォルニア州住民の場合、この通知書を取得するためには
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.comまでご連絡ください。又は次の住所までご連絡ください。
   Outbrain Inc.
   39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor
   New York, NY 10011
   応答のために30日間かかりますのでご了承ください。
   ７．「Do Not Track」の開示
   +
   ブラウザによって「Do Not Track」（以下「DNT
   」という）の信号が通信されます。アウトブレインは、DNT信号に関して一般的な解読がないため、現在ブラウザからの DNT
   信号に対応していません。アウトブレインは、DNT 信号に関する業界活動を監視し、必要性に応じて DNT 活動を更新します。
   お客様は、アウトブレインがユーザーのところにおいて パーソナルレコメンデーションからオプトアウトすること
   も含む他の提供されるツールを利用してデータ収集及び利用を管理することができます。
   ８．プライバシーポリシーの更新
   +
   アウトブレインはこのプライバシーポリシーを随時更新します。アウトブレインはサイト訪問者又はビジネスパートナーがこれを明確に知ることができるよう
   変更のお知らせをサイト上で表示しますが、ユーザーに対し個別に通知をする方法を有していません。アウトブレインは、お客様ご自身でプライバシーポリシ
   ーの更新を確認するため、このページを定期的に閲覧されるようお願いいたします。プライバシーポリシーの更新日付は、お客様にこのプライバシーポリシー
   がいつ更新されたのかをご確認いただけるように、常にこのページの上において表示されます。

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                 Última atualização: 23 de maio de 2018

   A Outbrain tem o compromisso de proteger seus dados pessoais. Esta
   política de privacidade (“Política de Privacidade”) rege o uso pela
   Outbrain dos dados coletados por nós, incluindo todos e quaisquer dados
   pessoais. Dados pessoais são informações relacionadas a você e que
   podem identificá-lo como indivíduo. Usamos seus dados pessoais
   cumprindo todas as leis aplicáveis. Para garantir a conformidade e o
   alinhamento aos valores da Outbrain de confiança e transparência, temos
   uma equipe de especialistas responsável por implementar continuamente o
   nosso programa global de privacidade.

                                                              + EXPAND ALL

   1. Quem somos, o que fazemos, como contatar a Outbrain, nosso DPO ou as
   autoridades competentes

                                      +

   Quem somos:
   Outbrain representa a Outbrain Inc., empresa de Delaware, EUA com sede
   em Nova York; e suas subsidiárias afiliadas (coletivamente denominadas
   “Outbrain” ou “nós”, “nos”, “nosso(as)”). Operamos a partir de 12
   escritórios globalmente e trabalhamos em parceria com editores de
   conteúdo e marketing do mundo todo.
   O que fazemos:
   A missão da Outbrain é oferecer recomendações interessantes aos seus
   Usuários com base nos seus interesses. Para cumprir nossa missão,
   firmamos acordos com:
     * Produtores e editores de conteúdo on-line e parceiros que desejam
       recomendar conteúdo relevante aos seus leitores (no Outbrain
       Engage); e
     * anunciantes que desejam que leitores visualizem seu conteúdo (no
       Outbrain Amplify).

   Como nos contatar:
   Fazemos verificações regulares de conformidade com base nesta Política
   de Privacidade. Perguntas, comentários e solicitações relacionados a
   esta Política de Privacidade são bem-vindos e devem ser encaminhados a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou via correio a Outbrain Inc., 39 West
   13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, USA, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Caso a Outbrain não forneça resposta satisfatória para suas perguntas
   ou preocupações, também é possível contatar o seguinte departamento
   para orientações, suporte ou reclamações:
     * responsável externa Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) da Outbrain:
       ePrivacy GmbH, representada pelo Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. A
       ePrivacy GmbH pode ser contatada diretamente via
       privacy@eprivacy.eu; e/ou
     * o órgão público britânico Information Commissioner’s Officer, que é
       o principal serviço supervisor da Outbrain nos Territórios
       Europeus.

   Órgãos de autorregulação
   A Outbrain segue os Princípios de Autorregulação definidos pela Digital
   Advertising Alliance (DAA) e pela European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Somos membros conceituados da Network
   Advertising Initiative (NAI), associação dedicada à coleta responsável
   de dados e ao seu uso para publicidade digital. Seguimos o Code of
   Conduct for Web and Mobile (Código de Conduta para Web e Internet
   Móvel) da NAI. A Outbrain também segue os Self-Regulatory Principles
   for Online Behavioral Advertising (Princípios de Autorregulação para
   Publicidade Comportamental On-line) e o Europe OBA Framework do
   Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB).
   2. Tipos de usuários da Outbrain

                                      +

   Parte desta Política de Privacidade está dividida em seções baseadas no
   seu modo de interagir com a Outbrain portanto é necessário definir em
   qual tipo de usuário você se encaixa. Para cada tipo de usuário,
   explicamos que tipo de informação coletamos e por que, quais cookies e
   outras tecnologias similares usamos, como compartilhamos essas
   informações e quais são os seus direitos.
   Visitantes do Site: Você é um “Visitante do Site” ao visitar e
   interagir com nossos websites, páginas na web, recursos interativos,
   blogs e seus respectivos conteúdos no Outbrain.com (ou qualquer página
   derivada, como Outbrain.co.uk; Outbrain.fr; Outbrain.de, etc.) e no
   MyOutbrain.com (“Nossos Sites“). Veja mais aqui.
   (a)&Tab;Quais informações coletamos e por quê
   Queremos entender quais serviços nos Nossos Sites interessam a você e
   lembrá-lo dos serviços que oferecemos quando você não está nos Nossos
   Sites. Para fazê-lo, coletamos as seguintes informações suas: (i)
   endereço IP; (ii) dados do Agente do Usuário: tipo de dispositivo (ex.:
   iPhone), tipo de navegador (ex.: Chrome), sistema operacional (ex.:
   iOS); (iii) páginas visitadas no Nosso Site (ex.: página “Sobre nós” da
   Outbrain); (iv) horário da visita (e respectivo fuso horário); e (v)
   URLs de encaminhamento e outras informações normalmente transmitidas em
   solicitações HTTP (ex.: essas informações nos dizem como você chegou
   aos Nossos Sites).
   (b)&Tab;Quais cookies e outras tecnologias similares utilizamos
   Consulte esta Tabela de Cookies em “Visitantes do Site” para uma lista
   detalhada dos cookies (e os respectivos períodos de retenção) que
   usamos quando você visita os Nossos Sites.
   (c)&Tab;Como podemos compartilhar informações
     * Compartilhamento de informações que coletamos sobre você nos Nossos
       Sites.

   De maneira geral, não compartilhamos dados pessoais seus com terceiros
   para fins de marketing ou publicidade de terceiros. No entanto,
   recorremos a vários terceiros (todos listados nesta Tabela de Cookies)
   para nos ajudar a vender ou fazer publicidade para você. Por exemplo:
   alguns dos cookies que usamos nos Nossos Sites pertencem a terceiros
   que ajudarão a Outbrain a vender ou fazer publicidade para você.
   Exigimos que esses terceiros e empresas se comprometam a manter
   confidenciais todas as informações compartilhadas com eles e a usar as
   informações somente para cumprir suas obrigações conosco. Fazemos isso
   firmando acordos com todos os terceiros que processam dados pessoais em
   nosso nome para garantir que eles processem seus dados pessoais em
   conformidade com nossas instruções exatas e com todas as leis de
   proteção de dados aplicáveis. Se você publicar em nosso blog, seu
   comentário e suas informações ficarão visíveis publicamente. Entre em
   contato com support@outbrain.com para solicitar a remoção do seu
   comentário.
     * Usando serviços de terceiros nos Nossos Sites.

   Nossos Sites contêm links para outros websites que não operamos nem são
   de nossa propriedade. Não controlamos, recomendamos ou endossamos o
   conteúdo, os produtos, serviços, políticas de privacidade ou práticas
   desses websites de terceiros. Por exemplo: nos Nossos Sites, você
   notará ícones clicáveis que o levam à página da Outbrain no Facebook ou
   no LinkedIn. Ao escolher clicar nesses links, você deve estar ciente de
   que Facebook e LinkedIn podem enviar seus próprios cookies ao seu
   aparelho, que podem coletar dados pessoais de maneira independente. Por
   isso, é importante que você leia as políticas de privacidade do
   Facebook e/ou LinkedIn.
     * Consulte também a seção de Compartilhamento desta Política de
       Privacidade.

   (d)&Tab;Seus direitos
   Os Termos de Uso no Nosso Site regem o uso do Nosso Site e também se
   aplicam a você. Você pode interromper o uso do Nosso Site a qualquer
   momento. Ao fazê-lo, também tem a opção de remover quaisquer cookies
   que tenhamos colocado em qualquer dispositivo usado para acessar o
   Nosso Site. Se você forneceu seu endereço de e-mail durante o uso dos
   Nossos Sites, todos os e-mails que você receber da Outbrain incluirão a
   opção de se “descadastrar”.
   Para Visitantes no Território Europeu, a Outbrain implementou uma
   plataforma de gestão de consentimento (operada pela One Trust) nos
   Nossos Sites que dá aos visitantes a oportunidade de autorizar ou não
   cookies e tecnologias similares de rastreamento nos Nossos Sites. Se
   você não deu seu consentimento (especificamente em “aceitar”), a
   Outbrain não permitirá que Nosso Site instale cookies. A base legal da
   Outbrain para processar dados pessoais em Nossos Sites é o
   consentimento. Você pode retirar seu consentimento a qualquer momento
   aqui.
   Usuários: Você é um “Usuário” ao visitar uma página de um website ou
   aplicativo de um dos parceiros da Outbrain onde o widget da Outbrain
   esteja instalado (“Sites Parceiros”). Por exemplo, ao visitar
   https://news.sky.com/uk, www.spiegel.de ou www.cnn.com, o widget
   Outbrain está implementado nesses sites. Ao interagir com um widget da
   Outbrain, você é informado por um texto que faz referência à Outbrain
   (ex.: “Recomendado pela Outbrain” ou “by Outbrain” ao lado das
   recomendações). Ao clicar no link que faz referência à Outbrain, você
   verá um aviso detalhado que permite acessar o Perfil de Interesse da
   Outbrain, que fornece uma visualização geral dos tipos de categorias de
   dados da Outbrain que podem ser usados para fazer suas recomendações.
   Ele também permite optar por recusar recomendações personalizadas. Veja
   mais aqui.
   Exemplo de widget da Outbrain
   [S1q4BIXJQ.png]
   (a) Quais informações coletamos e por quê
   Usamos UUIDs, endereço IP e outras Informações de Uso para poder lhe
   oferecer recomendações interessantes. As recomendações da Outbrain
   podem ser pagas por um anunciante que redireciona você para um novo
   website ou podem ser orgânicas, com link para outra página no site do
   mesmo anunciante.
     * UUID.

   Quando, como usuário, você visita pela primeira vez um Site Parceiro
   (ex.: CNN.com), a Outbrain instala um cookie no seu dispositivo para
   gerar um UUID (identificador único de usuário). Nós catalogamos e
   analisamos o conteúdo que você consome nos Sites Parceiros. Nossas
   recomendações baseiam-se em: (i) histórico de navegação; (ii) padrões
   de navegação similares de outros Usuários; (ii) recomendações
   geralmente populares entre o público da Outbrain atualmente; (iv) um
   certo grau de aleatoriedade; e (v) requisitos de público-alvo que podem
   ser fornecidos ou solicitados por nossos clientes Amplify. Por exemplo,
   a Outbrain pode saber que o UUID 123 (que poderia ser você no seu
   iPhone X acessando o jornal Guardian usando o Chrome como navegador)
   gosta de ler sobre destinos de férias remotos e que pessoas que gostam
   de ler sobre destinos de férias remotos também gostam de ler sobre
   comida exótica.
   O UUID é uma sequência de números e/ou letras. Esse UUID vincula-se ao
   seu dispositivo e varia conforme o navegador que você usa. Em outras
   palavras, a Outbrain registra um UUID diferente dependendo do aparelho
   e/ou navegador que você está usando ao acessar os Sites Parceiros. Por
   exemplo, isso significa que você terá um UUID quando visitar um Site
   Parceiro a partir do seu celular usando o navegador Safari e outro UUID
   ao visitar um Site Parceiro do seu iPad usando o navegador Safari. A
   Outbrain combinará e consolidará o UUID de um aparelho móvel (celular
   ou tablet) por um navegador que depois acessa um aplicativo (ou
   vice-versa) a partir do mesmo dispositivo.
   Atribuir um UUID permite à Outbrain associar as visualizações das
   páginas visitadas e cliques nas recomendações da Outbrain desse UUID –
   tudo com o objetivo de fornecer recomendações interessantes.
     * Endereço IP e outras Informações de Uso.

   Coletamos um UUID conforme explicado acima e ainda as seguintes
   informações: (i) endereço IP (depois anonimizado com base nos padrões
   do setor); (ii) dados do Agente do Usuário: tipo de dispositivo (ex.:
   iPhone), tipo de navegador (ex.: Chrome), sistema operacional (ex.:
   iOS); (iii) páginas visitadas; (iv) horário da visita; e (v) URLs de
   encaminhamento e outras informações normalmente transmitidas em
   solicitações HTTP.
   As informações estatísticas acima nos fornecem dados de como muitos
   Usuários visitaram determinada página dos nossos Sites Parceiros que
   tem o widget da Outbrain instalado, quanto tempo cada Usuário ficou
   nessa página, o tipo de conteúdo na página em que clicou e como foi seu
   engajamento geral com a página em questão. Essas informações só são
   dados pessoais quando associadas a um UUID.
   (b) Quais cookies e outras tecnologias similares utilizamos
   Consulte esta Tabela de Cookies em “Usuários” para uma lista detalhada
   dos cookies internos que usamos quando você interage com Sites
   Parceiros que tenham a tecnologia Outbrain implementada.
   Ao clicar no link para uma das nossas recomendações, o anunciante
   Amplify que patrocina a recomendação pode instalar cookies no seu
   aparelho via redirecionamentos antes da chegada à página de destino das
   recomendações ou ao chegar à página de destino. Nesses casos, você
   estará sujeito à política de privacidade desse anunciante.
   Além do widget visível em Sites Parceiros da Outbrain, determinados
   anunciantes Outbrain podem implementar o pixel Outbrain nos seus
   websites. O pixel Outbrain determina se o usuário que acessa a página
   na qual o pixel está instalado possui um UUID Outbrain. Se houver um
   UUID associado a esse usuário final, a Outbrain permitirá que
   anunciantes redirecionem sua publicidade a esses UUIDs e/ou fornecerá
   aos anunciantes o número total de UUIDs que acessaram a página em
   questão. Se não houver UUID Outbrain associado ao usuário que visitou a
   página, o pixel Outbrain não coletará nenhuma informação sobre o
   usuário. Encorajamos anunciantes a comunicar o uso do pixel Outbrain
   nos seus próprios websites. A Outbrain não combina informações do pixel
   a perfis UUID.
   Pontos de dados como visualizações de páginas e cliques são vinculados
   a um UUID particular e mantidos por 13 meses. Por exemplo: se o UUID
   123 leu um artigo em 31 de dezembro de 2017, em 1º de fevereiro de 2018
   esse artigo deixará de fazer parte do perfil UUID 123.
   (c) Como podemos compartilhar informações
   A Outbrain não compartilha perfis de Usuário com nenhum terceiro.
   Contudo, podemos compartilhar o UUID com determinados parceiros para
   fins de sincronização de cookies ou com base em requisitos técnicos.
   Consulte também a seção de Compartilhamento desta Política de
   Privacidade.
   (d) Seus direitos
     * Recusa à Outbrain.

   Você pode optar por recusar as recomendações personalizadas da Outbrain
   a qualquer momento. Consulte o Perfil de Interesse da Outbrain para uma
   visualização geral dos dados que a Outbrain conhece a seu respeito e
   pode usar para fazer suas recomendações. O Perfil de Interesse também
   permite optar por recusar recomendações personalizadas (você também
   pode fazer a recusa simplesmente clicando aqui). Note que a recusa nos
   navegadores é feita pelo Perfil de Interesse da Outbrain, mas que a
   recusa de recomendações personalizadas em aplicativos é feita pelas
   configurações do seu dispositivo (veja exemplos de passo a passo no
   Perfil de Interesse).
   IMPORTANTE – mesmo fazendo a recusa à Outbrain:
     * Você ainda verá recomendações da Outbrain. Recusar o rastreamento
       para personalização da Outbrain não significa que você deixará de
       receber recomendações da Outbrain. Em vez disso, significa que as
       recomendações da Outbrain não serão personalizadas. As
       recomendações ainda usarão informações sobre o documento que você
       está visualizando (ou seja, informações contextuais) para lhe
       fornecer recomendações na página em questão.
     * A recusa baseia-se em cookies e é específica para cada
       dispositivo/navegador. Se você navegar na internet em diferentes
       dispositivos e/ou navegadores, você precisará fazer a recusa em
       cada aparelho e/ou navegador para que possamos impedir o
       rastreamento para personalização em todos eles. Pela mesma razão,
       se você comprar um novo dispositivo, mudar de navegador ou excluir
       (ou limpar) o cookie de recusa, será necessário fazer a recusa
       novamente. Recusar o rastreamento para personalização não significa
       bloquear cookies.
     * Para garantir a exclusão do perfil vinculado ao seu UUID, não
       exclua seu cookie de recusa da Outbrain por ao menos 21 dias. Sua
       recusa às recomendações personalizadas da Outbrain entra em vigor
       imediatamente. No entanto, se o seu navegador permite armazenamento
       local e você aceitar novamente as recomendações personalizadas da
       Outbrain dentro de 21 dias após sua recusa, é possível que seu
       perfil anterior seja revinculado ao seu UUID. Se você não fizer
       nova aceitação dentro de 21 dias, seu perfil será excluído e não
       poderá ser recuperado.
     * Como acontece na maioria das recusas, a recusa à Outbrain no
       navegador é feita usando um cookie. O cookie de recusa é feito para
       ser mantido, a fim de cumprir as preferências do usuário. No
       entanto, o recurso de “Prevenção de Rastreamento Inteligente” do
       Safari no iOS 11 pode impactar na persistência dos cookies entre
       websites após uma janela de 24 horas. Sugerimos usar outro
       navegador ou bloquear todos os cookies de terceiros do navegador
       para que você faça a recusa sem precisar depender de nenhuma
       metodologia de recusa de nenhuma empresa.
     * Opções adicionais de recusa.

   Você também pode optar por recusar receber anúncios personalizados
   oferecidos por nós ou outras empresas de publicidade usando ferramentas
   de entidades do setor, como as páginas da NAI ou as diversas páginas
   baseadas na DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
   www.youradchoices.ca/choices e/ou EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
   Visitando as páginas da NAI, DAA, DAAC ou EDAA pró-escolha do
   consumidor permite recusar todos ou alguns dos serviços dos membros
   participantes. Como ocorre na recusa junto à Outbrain, essas recusas
   não significam que você deixará de receber todos os anúncios: eles só
   deixarão de ser sob medida para você. Você pode continuar a receber
   anúncios; por exemplo, com base no website específico que você está
   visualizando (ou seja, anúncios baseados no contexto). E se os seus
   navegadores estiverem configurados para rejeitar cookies quando você
   visitar as páginas pró-escolha do consumidor da DAA, DAAC ou EDAA, a
   recusa também pode não funcionar corretamente.
     * Bases legais.

   Os fundamentos legais da Outbrain para processar dados pessoais de
   Usuários apoiam-se nas bases legais determinadas por cada um dos nossos
   Sites Parceiros. Cada Site Parceiro baseia-se em consentimento ou
   interesse legítimo. Consulte a política de privacidade aplicável dos
   Sites Parceiros para mais informações sobre as bases legais utilizadas.
   Se um Parceiro se basear no seu consentimento, a Outbrain não instalará
   um cookie nos seus aparelhos sem que você tenha dado seu consentimento
   no respectivo Site Parceiro.
   Parceiros Comerciais: Você é um “Parceiro Comercial” ao se cadastrar
   (ou trocar e-mails com a Outbrain) em nome da empresa para a qual
   trabalha para utilizar os serviços Outbrain Amplify ou Outbrain Engage.
   Veja mais aqui.
   (a) Quais informações coletamos e por quê
   Você pode fornecer determinados dados pessoais (como endereço de
   e-mail) ao se inscrever para os serviços Amplify ou Engage ou se
   comunicar ou interagir conosco por outros meios. Se você se inscrever
   para se tornar Parceiro Comercial, podemos solicitar informações
   adicionais suas via formulários de inscrição para anunciante, pedidos
   de inserção e outros meios. Coletamos informações automaticamente sobre
   as ações do seu nome de usuário no painel da Outbrain. Por exemplo, se
   como Parceiro Comercial Amplify você alterar o custo por clique de uma
   de suas campanhas, o registro de auditoria da Outbrain terá o histórico
   de todas essas ações.
   Coletamos e processamos os dados pessoais acima para cumprir nossas
   obrigações nos termos do nosso acordo como Parceiro Comercial (ou
   potencial Parceiro Comercial) seu, inclusive para:
   responder às suas perguntas e solicitações;
   fornecer acesso a determinadas funções e recursos dos nossos serviços
   Amplify ou Engage (ex.: para fornecimento e manutenção da sua conta no
   painel);
   verificar sua identidade;
   nos comunicar com você sobre sua conta, nossos produtos e promoções
   disponíveis relevantes para o seu uso do serviço Amplify ou Engage.
   (b) Quais cookies e outras tecnologias similares utilizamos
   Consulte esta Tabela de Cookies em “Parceiros Comerciais” para uma
   lista detalhada dos cookies (e os respectivos períodos de retenção) que
   usamos com Parceiros Comerciais.
   (c) Como podemos compartilhar informações
   Podemos revelar determinadas informações de Parceiros Comerciais a
   fornecedores, prestadores de serviços ou outros que auxiliem a Outbrain
   na prestação dos seus serviços (ex.: processamento de cartões de
   crédito). Consulte também a seção de Compartilhamento desta Política de
   Privacidade.
   (d) Seus direitos
   Se, como Parceiro Comercial, você deseja verificar, corrigir, atualizar
   ou solicitar desativação das suas informações, você pode acessar o
   painel da Outbrain para editar suas preferências de perfil ou nos
   contatar em support@outbrain.com. Se você está recebendo e-mails da
   Outbrain, você pode se “descadastrar” acessando o link nos e-mails.
   Observe que o descadastramento pode não desativar o recebimento de
   notificações importantes para o fornecimento dos serviços Amplify ou
   Engage (ex.: faturas por e-mail).
   A base legal da Outbrain para processar dados pessoais dos Parceiros
   Comerciais é o seu interesse legítimo.
   3. Como mantemos a segurança das informações, transferências fora do
   EEE, compartilhamento e períodos de retenção

                                      +

   Segurança
   A Outbrain possui uma equipe de segurança dedicada. Mantemos rigorosos
   controles sobre os dados que coletamos, mantendo-os em bancos de dados
   protegidos com firewall e permissões de acesso estritamente limitadas e
   controladas, para garantir sua segurança. Verifique nossos padrões de
   segurança para mais informações.
   Parceiros Comerciais têm acesso a certos recursos protegidos por senha
   dos serviços Amplify ou Engage. Eles são responsáveis por manter sua
   senha confidencial. Lembre-se que, infelizmente, a transmissão de
   informações via internet não é totalmente segura. Um tipo de fraude
   comum na internet é conhecido como spoofing ou phishing. Ele ocorre
   quando você recebe um e-mail de uma fonte que parece legítima
   solicitando dados pessoais seus. Tenha em mente que não lhe mandaremos
   nenhum e-mail solicitando a verificação de cartão de crédito,
   informações bancárias ou quaisquer outros dados pessoais. Se você vier
   a receber um e-mail que pareça ser nosso solicitando essas informações
   suas, não responda e não clique em nenhum link constante no e-mail. Em
   vez disso, pedimos que nos encaminhe o e-mail para legal@outbrain.com
   para que possamos investigar possíveis casos de fraude pela internet.
   Transferências de dados fora da UE/do EEE
   Quando transferimos dados pessoais do Espaço Econômico Europeu a outros
   países nos quais as leis aplicáveis não oferecem o mesmo nível de
   proteção à privacidade dos dados que nos Territórios Europeus, tomamos
   medidas para fornecer um nível adequado de proteção à privacidade dos
   dados. Em outras palavras, seus direitos e proteções são conservados
   com seus dados. Por exemplo: usamos cláusulas contratuais aprovadas e
   outras medidas criadas para garantir que os receptores dos seus dados
   pessoais os protejam.
   Compartilhamento
   Adicionalmente à descrição de como podemos revelar seus dados pessoais
   para cada tipo de usuário, também podemos divulgar dados pessoais nos
   seguintes casos:
     * Dentro do grupo de empresas controladas pela Outbrain, por razões
       internas, principalmente para fins comerciais e operacionais;
     * Se passarmos por uma transição comercial, como uma fusão, aquisição
       por outra empresa ou venda total ou parcial dos nossos ativos, seus
       dados pessoais provavelmente estarão entre os ativos transferidos;
     * Quando legalmente exigido (ex.: para cooperar com investigações
       para aplicação da lei ou outros procedimentos legais); e/ou
     * Para reagir a emergências reais.

   Adicionalmente, combinamos seus dados pessoais aos dos outros usuários
   para compartilhar informações sobre tendências e reunir estatísticas de
   usuários com terceiros, sempre de forma agregada e anonimizada.
   Retenção de dados
   O período de retenção para cada um dos cookies usados pela Outbrain
   (seja por ela mesma ou em nosso nome por terceiros) está descrito na
   Tabela de Cookies.
   A Outbrain também mantém uma Política de Retenção de Dados que detalha
   o período de retenção de dados pessoais com base em nossa análise do
   prazo razoável em que é necessário manter cada dado específico para
   fins legais ou comerciais. Quando não precisamos mais dos dados
   pessoais, os excluímos ou destruímos com segurança. Dados agregados,
   que não são capazes de identificar um dispositivo/navegador (ou
   indivíduo) e são usados para fins de relatórios e análise, são mantidos
   enquanto comercialmente necessários.
   4. Crianças

                                      +

   Nenhum dos nossos serviços é destinado a crianças menores de 16 anos.
   Não coletamos deliberadamente dados pessoais de menores de 16 anos de
   idade. Se durante a coleta constatarmos que um Visitante do Site,
   Usuário ou Parceiro Comercial é menor de 16 anos, não usaremos ou
   manteremos seus dados pessoais. Se tomarmos ciência de que
   involuntariamente coletamos dados pessoais de uma criança menor de 16
   anos, tomaremos medidas razoáveis para excluir tais informações dos
   nossos registros. Se você é criança, pedimos que vá brincar no quintal
   em vez de usar ou interagir com a Outbrain!
   5. Cidadãos do Território Europeu

                                      +

   Em conformidade com as leis de privacidade europeias, especialmente com
   o Regulamento Geral de Proteção de Dados da União Europeia (RGPD), a
   Outbrain fornece direitos adicionais específicos a cidadãos dos
   Territórios Europeus, como o direito de acesso, retificação,
   contestação, reclamação, exclusão e bloqueio. Mais especificamente:
     * o direito de perguntar se ou quais dados pessoais estão sendo
       processados por nós e o direito de solicitar que os dados pessoais
       sejam corrigidos ou alterados;
     * em determinadas circunstâncias, o direito de solicitar a exclusão
       de dados pessoais;
     * em determinadas circunstâncias, o direito de exigir restrições no
       processamento de dados pessoais;
     * o direito de cancelar seu consentimento para processamento e uso
       dos seus dados, total ou parcialmente e a qualquer momento, com
       validade para o futuro;
     * o direito de receber seus dados pessoais em formato comum,
       estruturado e mecanicamente legível;
     * o direito de contatar nosso responsável pela proteção dos dados se
       tiver perguntas, comentários, reclamações ou solicitações
       relacionadas à nossa declaração sobre proteção de dados e o
       processamento dos seus dados pessoais;
     * o direito de reclamar à autoridade supervisora responsável caso
       acredite que o processamento dos seus dados pessoais está violando
       a legislação.

   Além dos itens acima, relacionamos determinados direitos para cdadãos
   do Território Europeu ao longo desta Política de Privacidade. Nos
   termos do RGPD, são considerados “Territórios Europeus” o Espaço
   Econômico Europeu (EEE) e a Suíça. Para os fins desta Política de
   Privacidade, o termo “Territórios Europeus” deve continuar a incluir o
   Reino Unido mesmo após sua retirada do Espaço Econômico Europeu em
   decorrência do Brexit.
   Em caso de perguntas sobre o exercício de quaisquer dos direitos acima,
   envie um e-mail a privacyquestions@outbrain.com.
   6. Direitos de privacidade da Califórnia

                                      +

   Conforme o Código Civil da Califórnia, EUA, nos termos das seções
   1798.83–1798.84, os residentes da Califórnia têm direito de nos
   solicitar uma notificação que descreva quais categorias de informações
   pessoais compartilhamos com terceiros ou afiliados corporativos para os
   fins de marketing direto desses terceiros ou afiliados corporativos.
   Essa notificação identificará as categorias de informações
   compartilhadas e incluirá uma lista dos terceiros e afiliados com os
   quais foram compartilhadas, junto com os respectivos nomes e endereços.
   Se você é residente da Califórnia e gostaria de receber uma cópia dessa
   notificação, envie sua solicitação por escrito a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou ao seguinte endereço: Outbrain Inc.,
   39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, USA. Pedimos que
   aguarde 30 dias para a resposta.
   7. Comunicazione antitracciamento (“Do Not Track”)

                                      +

   Alguns navegadores transmitem sinais Do Not Track (DNT), ou Não
   Rastrear, aos websites. Como não há consenso sobre como interpretar o
   sinal DNT, a Outbrain atualmente não altera, modifica ou responde a
   solicitações ou sinais DNT desses navegadores. Continuaremos a
   monitorar a atuação do setor nesse âmbito e reavaliaremos nossas
   práticas relacionadas a DNT se necessário. Enquanto isso, você pode
   utilizar as várias outras ferramentas que fornecemos para controlar a
   coleta e o uso de dados, incluindo a possibilidade de optar por recusar
   o recebimento de recomendações personalizadas na seção Usuários.
   8. Como esta Política de Privacidade pode mudar

                                      +

   De tempos em tempos, podemos fazer alterações nesta Política de
   Privacidade. Nesse caso, colocaremos um aviso em destaque, visível para
   você como Visitante do Site ou Parceiro Comercial. Contudo, não temos
   meios para alertar Usuários sobre atualizações. Recomendamos que você
   verifique aqui periodicamente se a Política de Privacidade foi
   atualizada. Sempre exibiremos a data da última alteração da Política de
   Privacidade no topo da página, para que você saiba a última vez em que
   foi revisada.

Engage Terms

Version 2.3

Effective September 16, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   The following standard partner distribution terms (“Terms”) govern the
   implementation and use of the products, services, and technology made
   available by Outbrain to the Partner identified in a Partner Enrollment
   Form. To the extent that Partner has not yet signed a Partner
   Enrollment form (1) references to “the Agreement” shall be to the Terms
   and (2) these Terms permit the use of the Technology, but no payment
   shall accrue or be made to Partner until such Partner Enrollment Form
   is signed by both Outbrain and Partner.
    1. CERTAIN DEFINITIONS
         1. "Advertiser Recs" means Recommendations (that are not
            Recirculation Recommendations) in the Outbrain network
            submitted by Outbrain’s advertisers.
         2. "Content" means graphical, textual and/or auditory content
            (which may include text, data, information, photos, images,
            graphics, audio, video or other content).
         3. "Data" means all data collected or generated by Outbrain
            through the Technology, including any reports or other data
            made available to Partner in connection with the Agreement.
         4. "Destination Page" means any webpage or other online location
            that may be accessed by clicking on Recommendations.
         5. "End User" means individual human end users of the Partner
            Site(s).
         6. "Partner Sites" means the web properties, applications or
            platforms identified in the Partner Enrollment Form, together
            with any additional properties on which Partner elects to
            implement the Technology upon prior written approval from
            Outbrain (e-mail will suffice).
         7. "Recirculation Recs" means Recommendations (that are not
            Advertiser Recs) which link to Content on Partner Sites.
         8. "Recommendations" means the display of Content that Outbrain
            delivers to the viewer of a web page, application or platform
            on which the Technology is implemented. For clarity,
            Recommendations may include Advertiser Recs and/or
            Recirculation Recs.
         9. "Revenue" means net revenue generated from Advertiser Recs and
            charged by Outbrain for the display of such Advertiser Recs in
            the Outbrain network.
        10. "Technology" means the Javascript, API, SDK and associated
            protocols provided by Outbrain to Partner that, when
            implemented on Partner Site(s), display one or more
            Recommendation(s) and/or permit users to navigate to
            Destination Pages by clicking on such Recommendations.
    2. TECHNOLOGY; PLACEMENT AND APPEARANCE
         1. Partner shall implement the Technology pursuant to Outbrain’s
            technical instructions, including any implementation guides
            made available by Outbrain, as revised from time to time.
            Outbrain, in its sole discretion, may determine which of
            Outbrain’s available Technology (e.g., JS, API, SDK) shall be
            used in each Partner implementation. Implementations of the
            Technology must appear directly below the main Content on each
            page of the Partner Sites on which the Technology is installed
            or as otherwise mutually agreed in writing (e-mail shall
            suffice).
         2. Partner shall display the Technology in accordance with all
            self-regulatory codes and applicable laws and regulations,
            including with respect to disclosing the source or nature of
            the Recommendations. Without limiting the foregoing
            obligation, Partner agrees to comply with Outbrain’s
            instructions regarding how the Technology is to be displayed,
            labelled or identified.
         3. Outbrain may make updates, modifications or improvements to
            the Technology from time to time in its sole discretion,
            including, but not limited to, adding Ads.txt lines and any
            other similar industry standards from time to time. If
            Outbrain requests Partner to implement any such update,
            Partner will use commercially reasonable efforts to do so
            within thirty (30) days of receipt of same from Outbrain;
            provided, that if Outbrain requests Partner to implement any
            update that Partner reasonably determines would materially and
            adversely affect the performance of the Partner Site(s),
            Partner may elect to cease displaying the Technology on such
            page(s) unless Outbrain either addresses Partner’s concerns to
            its reasonable satisfaction or agrees not to require Partner
            to implement such update.
         4. During the Term, Outbrain shall be Partner's sole and
            exclusive provider of content recommendations, where “content
            recommendations” are one or more links comprised of a headline
            or phrase indicating that an End User will be driven to
            Content (regardless of whether the Destination Page displays
            content, advertorials or advertisements).
         5. Notwithstanding any other provision of the Agreement and
            unless Outbrain provides prior written consent, any
            implementation of the Technology shall include at least one
            (1) link to Advertiser Recs per page (i.e., Partner may not
            use the Technology solely to provide Recirculation Recs).
         6. Outbrain may test changes to the Technology, and based on the
            results of such testing, Outbrain may make optimisations to
            the Technology if such optimisations may result in increased
            click through rates on Advertiser Recs (as calculated by
            Outbrain in its sole discretion). Such Outbrain testing will
            be completed on the smallest percentage of Partner Site(s)
            pages that would provide statistically significant results. To
            the extent that Partner uses the API and thus controls any
            testing, Partner shall comply with such testing requests on at
            least a quarterly basis.
    3. REVENUE & PAYMENT
         1. During the Term, Partner will be paid the percentage of
            Adjusted Gross Revenue indicated on the Partner Enrollment
            Form. Outbrain shall make such payments within a certain
            number of days (as indicated on the Partner Enrollment Form)
            after the end of any calendar month during which Outbrain
            collects Revenue. For the avoidance of doubt, Revenue is net
            of, inter alia, fees for third-party data services integrated
            into Outbrain’s platform, invalid clicks/impressions, and
            advertiser and agency discounts/rebates.
         2. Partner must promptly provide Outbrain completed and accurate
            tax forms and all other similar materials Outbrain requires,
            which may include tax form W-8BEN, W-8BEN-E or W-9 if
            applicable (collectively all such forms and materials, “Tax
            Materials”). Notwithstanding anything set forth to the
            contrary in this Agreement, Outbrain may (a) withhold payments
            owed to Partner hereunder without penalty or late fee until
            Outbrain has received Partner’s Tax Materials, and (b) deduct
            any applicable withholding taxes payable by Outbrain from
            payments owed to Partner by Outbrain hereunder as required by
            law. Once Outbrain has received the Tax Materials, Outbrain
            will use commercially reasonable efforts to pay any amounts
            not paid to Partner pursuant to the foregoing subsection (a)
            as soon as reasonably practicable. All payments to Partner
            shall be subject to withholding for income taxes and similar
            deductions, as required by applicable law.
         3. To ensure proper payment, Partner is responsible for notifying
            Outbrain of accurate contact and payment information. Partner
            is also responsible for any charges assessed by Partner’s bank
            or payment provider. If the amount owed to Partner is less
            than US$50, then the amount owed will be accrued if and until
            the calendar month in which the balance of the payments due to
            Partner exceeds US$50. Any dispute regarding a payment from
            Outbrain must be submitted to Outbrain in writing within
            thirty (30) days of postage or wire transfer date of such
            payment or it shall be deemed waived.
         4. Outbrain may withhold, set off, charge or credit back payments
            to Partner, if Outbrain, in its sole reasonable discretion,
            believes that the performance related to them are fraudulent
            or invalid in nature or if Outbrain was charged or credited
            back by the advertiser. Invalid activity is determined by
            Outbrain in all cases and may include, but is not limited to,
            (i) invalid clicks on or impressions of Advertiser Recs
            generated by any person, bot, automated program or similar
            device, including through any clicks/impressions originating
            from Partner’s IP addresses or computers under Partner’s
            control; (ii) clicks/impressions solicited or generated by
            payment of money, false representation, or requests for End
            Users to click on Advertiser Recs or take other actions; (iii)
            Advertiser Recs served to End Users whose browsers have
            JavaScript disabled; and (iv) clicks/impressions co-mingled
            with a significant amount of the activity described in (i, ii,
            and iii) above.
         5. In addition to Outbrain’s other rights and remedies, Outbrain
            may (i) withhold and offset any payments owed to Partner under
            the Agreement against any fees Partner owes Outbrain under the
            Agreement or any other agreement, and/or (ii) require Partner
            to refund Outbrain within thirty (30) days of any invoice, any
            amounts Outbrain may have overpaid to Partner in prior
            periods. If an Outbrain advertiser whose Advertiser Recs are
            displayed on any Partner Site defaults on payment to Outbrain,
            Outbrain may withhold payment or charge back Partner’s
            account.
    4. PRIVACY
         1. Outbrain and Partner shall each maintain and display on their
            respective websites an easily accessible and discoverable
            privacy notice and/or policy that complies with all applicable
            laws, and with respect to Partner, that discloses usage of
            third-party technology to collect and use data in connection
            with the Partner Sites. Outbrain's privacy policy is available
            at here.
         2. The parties are independent controllers in respect of End User
            data processed via the Partner Sites(s) and each party remains
            individually responsible for compliance with relevant data
            protection laws. It is Partner’s (and not Outbrain’s)
            responsibility to comply with all data protection legislation
            in respect of the placing and use of third party cookies, upon
            which the Technology relies, and the capturing of any consent
            to cookies required to be obtained from the relevant End
            User). Partner acknowledges that Outbrain relies on Partner’s
            lawful basis for processing End User data. Accordingly,
            Partner warrants that: (i) if Publisher relies on legitimate
            interest, it has completed a legitimate interest assessment
            which has considered Outbrain’s provision of the Outbrain
            Service; and (ii) if the Publisher relies on consent, the
            Publisher shall disclose Outbrain to an End User via a consent
            management platform using the IAB methodology and pass
            Outbrain a clear consent or no consent signal (i.e., the
            Publisher must not send Outbrain a null or invalid signal via
            a consent management platform). Regardless of the foregoing,
            the parties shall provide End Users access to a user-choice
            mechanism such as the opt out page(s) of the Network
            Advertising Initiative, the Digital Advertising Alliance, the
            European Digital Advertising Alliance, and/or a direct opt out
            of Outbrain through Outbrain’s privacy policy. If an End User
            has opted out of behavioral advertising through a mechanism
            alerting Publisher (instead of Outbrain), such as device
            settings, Publisher must not pass Outbrain such End User’s
            advertiser ID or other identifying mechanism. The provisions
            of the Data Processing Agreement shall be incorporated into,
            and form part of, this Agreement.
    5. LICENSE TERMS
         1. During the Term and subject to Partner’s full compliance with
            all of the terms of the Agreement, Outbrain grants Partner a
            limited, non-exclusive, revocable, non-sublicensable,
            non-transferable licence to use the Technology to display the
            Recommendations on Partner Sites in the form and format
            provided.
            Outbrain grants Partner, during the Term, a limited,
            worldwide, non-exclusive, royalty-free licence to use and
            display Outbrain’s trademarks, service marks and logos
            (collectively, “Outbrain Marks”), as incorporated into the
            Technology, strictly in accordance with Partner’s obligations
            and rights in the Agreement. All goodwill arising out of
            Partner’s use of any of the Outbrain Marks shall inure solely
            to the benefit of Outbrain. Outbrain shall have the right to
            refer to Partner and the Partner Sites in any general listing
            of advertisers or partners (including in marketing and sales
            materials) who have implemented the Technology.
            Notwithstanding the foregoing, each party will request prior
            written consent before issuing a press release regarding the
            Agreement or using the other party’s name on its website other
            than in accordance with the Agreement.
         2. As between the parties: (a) Outbrain retains all right, title
            and interest in and to the Outbrain Marks, Technology, Data,
            and Content displayed on or made available by the Technology
            (excluding any Content from the Partner Sites which shall be
            owned by Partner); and (b) Partner retains all right, title
            and interest in and to the Partner Site(s) including the look
            and feel, excluding the items described in subparagraph (a)
            above, (including without limitation all intellectual property
            rights in them).
         3. The licences granted under the Agreement are specifically set
            forth in the Agreement; there are no implied rights. All
            rights not expressly granted to Partner in the Agreement are
            reserved by Outbrain.
    6. PROHIBITED ACTIVITY
         1. Partner will not: (i) edit, modify, truncate, filter, or
            change the order of Recommendations; (ii) obscure, modify or
            redirect Partner Site users away from a Destination Page, or
            intersperse any Content between the Recommendations and any
            Destination Page; (iii) minimise, remove or otherwise inhibit
            the full and complete display of the Technology; (iv)
            artificially inflate clicks or impressions on Recommendations,
            or encourage or require any person to click on Recommendations
            using incentives or other methods; (v) remove, deface,
            obscure, or alter any notices of intellectual property rights
            included in the Technology; (vi) access, reproduce or use the
            Technology in any manner or for any purpose other than as
            expressly permitted under the Agreement; (vii) modify, adapt,
            translate, prepare derivative works from, decompile, reverse
            engineer, disassemble or otherwise attempt to derive source
            code from the Technology, or attempt to create a substitute or
            similar service or product through use of or access to
            Technology or related proprietary information; (viii) attempt
            to interfere with or disrupt the Technology or attempt to gain
            access to any systems or networks that connect to it other
            than through the Technology as implemented pursuant to the
            Agreement; (ix) copy, cache, distribute, display, alter, or
            otherwise use any Recommendations (or authorise or assist any
            third party to do so) except as such Recommendations are
            provided through the Technology; or (x) use the Technology for
            any purpose not authorised by Outbrain, including for any
            purpose that is inconsistent with the Implementation Guides as
            provided to Partner.
         2. Partner will not deploy the Technology on any properties that
            display adult, obscene, pornographic, defamatory, libelous,
            infringing, abusive, or illegal Content, that promotes hate or
            discrimination, facilitates the sale of firearms or illegal
            drugs, or that participates or encourages participation in,
            illegal activities or is directed at children under of the age
            of 16. Outbrain reserves the right in its sole discretion to
            disable the Technology on any property at any time.
         3. Except as expressly and unambiguously authorised under the
            Agreement, Partner will not copy, rent, lease, sell, transfer,
            assign, sublicense, disassemble, reverse engineer or decompile
            (except to the limited extent expressly authorised by
            applicable statutory law), modify or alter any part of the
            Technology or otherwise use the Technology on behalf of or for
            the benefit of any third party.
    7. REGISTRATION
       Partner is not required to register on the Outbrain website to use
       the Technology. If Partner registers, it will have access to online
       reports and the Outbrain dashboard, which allows Partner to control
       certain settings for the Technology, including certain
       Recommendation functionality. To the extent that Partner registers
       and has access to the Outbrain dashboard, Outbrain may collect
       Partner’s (or individuals who act on behalf of Partner)
       personally identifiable information. Partner will be solely
       responsible for all changes to data made by it, or individuals
       acting on Partner's behalf, through the Outbrain dashboard.
       Estimates of revenue displayed in the Outbrain dashboard are
       provided solely for the Partner’s convenience. Outbrain does not
       guarantee that these estimated amounts displayed during a calendar
       month, if any, shall be precise or definitively due to be paid to
       Partner as a result of the Agreement. Access to Outbrain dashboard
       shall be solely at the discretion of Outbrain and may be
       discontinued by Outbrain at any time.
    8. SUSPENSION OF TECHNOLOGY; TERMINATION
         1. Outbrain may suspend or discontinue all or any aspect of the
            Technology, including its availability, at any time if
            required by exigent circumstances (such as a significant
            security breach, propagation of malware, other viruses to
            users, etc.) or other improper, unlawful, fraudulent or
            misleading circumstances.
         2. Either party may terminate the Agreement at any time in the
            event of a material breach by the other party of any provision
            of the Agreement that remains uncured for seven (7) days after
            the breaching party’s receipt of written notice of the breach.
         3. The Agreement is terminable on thirty (30) days prior written
            notice unless otherwise stated on the Partner Enrollment Form.
            Upon expiration or termination of the Agreement, all rights
            and obligations of the parties under the Agreement will be
            extinguished, except that Sections 9.6, 9.7, 10, 11 and 13 of
            the Terms will survive termination, as well as any other terms
            of this Agreement which, by their nature should survive
            termination, and continue to bind the parties.
    9. LIMITED WARRANTIES; INDEMNITY
         1. Each party represents and warrants to the other that: (i) it
            has all right, power, and authority necessary to enter into
            the Agreement and perform its obligations under it; and (ii)
            it will comply with all applicable laws, regulations and
            orders in its performance of the Agreement.
         2. Outbrain warrants that the Technology as provided and made
            available by Outbrain and implemented by Partner in accordance
            with the Agreement does not and will not, to the best of
            Outbrain's knowledge, infringe any Intellectual Property Right
            of any third party.
         3. Partner represents and warrants that the Partner Site(s) do
            not and will not contain any Content that is: (i) illegal;
            (ii) infringes any Intellectual Property Right of any third
            party; (iii) is obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous
            material or material that violates any person’s right of
            publicity, privacy or personality; or (iv) knowingly contains
            a misrepresentation of fact or factual inaccuracy.
         4. Nothing in the Agreement shall be construed as a promise of
            any sort of minimum traffic volumes, clicks, impressions or
            usage or any other such commitments by Outbrain to Partner.
         5. Except as expressly provided in the Agreement, neither party
            makes any representations or warranties, express or implied in
            relation to the Agreement, the Partner Sites, the Technology,
            any Content made available by Outbrain through the Technology
            or any other matters (including any implied terms relating to
            satisfactory quality or fitness for any purpose, any
            warranties of availability or uninterrupted or error free
            performance, any warranties arising out of any course of
            performance or dealing).
         6. Outbrain makes no representations or warranties concerning any
            Content contained in or accessed via the Technology, including
            without limitation Advertiser Recs, and Outbrain will not be
            responsible or liable for the contents, accuracy, intellectual
            property infringement, legality or decency of Content provided
            through the Technology or for Partner’s reliance on any of the
            foregoing.
         7. Each party (the “Indemnifying Party”) shall indemnify, defend
            and hold harmless the other party and its parent and
            affiliates, and each of its and their respective affiliates,
            directors, officers, shareholders, members, authorised
            representatives, employees and agents (collectively, the
            “Indemnified Party”) from and against any and all claims,
            losses, liabilities, damages, costs, settlements, regulatory
            findings and/or fines
            and other expenses (including reasonable legal fees)
            (collectively, “Claims”) that arise out of any third party
            claim occasioned by any breach or alleged breach of any of the
            Indemnifying Party’s representations, warranties and
            obligations of the Agreement. The Indemnified Party shall
            promptly notify the Indemnifying Party of any Claim in
            writing, provided, however, that any delay in providing such
            notice shall not relieve the Indemnifying Party of any of its
            obligations except to the extent that the Indemnifying Party
            is actually prejudiced by such delay. The Indemnified Party
            shall have the right to participate in the defence and
            settlement of the Claim with counsel of its own choosing and
            its own expense, subject to the Indemnifying Party’s control
            thereof.
   10. CONFIDENTIALITY
       Each party (the “Receiving Party”) acknowledges that it will have
       access to certain information and materials, including the terms of
       the Agreement, concerning the business, technology, products and
       services of the other party (the “Disclosing Party”) that are, or
       reasonably should be considered given the circumstances of
       disclosure to be, confidential (“Confidential Information”).
       Confidential Information will not include: (a) information known to
       the Receiving Party prior to disclosure by the Disclosing Party;
       (b) information independently developed by the Receiving Party
       without reference to Confidential Information of the Disclosing
       Party; (c) information that is or becomes publicly known through no
       fault of the Receiving Party; or (d) information disclosed to the
       Receiving Party by a third party without breach of any obligation
       of confidence. Except as permitted hereunder, the Receiving Party
       (aa) will not use any Confidential Information for its own account
       or the account of any third party, and (bb) will not disclose any
       Confidential Information to any third party other than its
       directors, employees, contractors, advisors, investors or potential
       investors who have a need to know and who have agreed not to use,
       and to maintain the confidentiality of, the Confidential
       Information consistent with this Section 10. The Receiving Party
       will return or destroy the Confidential Information promptly upon
       the Disclosing Party’s written request. Notwithstanding the
       foregoing, the Receiving Party may disclose Confidential
       Information to the extent required by applicable law or legal
       process, provided that the Receiving Party provides prompt written
       notice of any required disclosure to the Disclosing Party and
       provides reasonable cooperation (at the Disclosing Party’s expense)
       with any effort by the Disclosing Party to contest or limit the
       scope of such disclosure.
   11. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
         1. Neither Outbrain nor the Partner exclude or limit liability to
            the other for: (i) death or personal injury caused by its
            negligence or that of its employees or contractors; (ii) fraud
            or fraudulent misrepresentation; or (iii) any other liability
            which cannot lawfully be excluded or limited.
         2. Subject always to Section 11.1, neither party will be liable
            for: (a) any special, indirect, incidental or consequential
            loss or damage; (b) any loss of goodwill or reputation; (c)
            any loss of data; (d) any loss of contracts, business or
            anticipated savings; or (e) any loss of profits arising out of
            or in connection with the Agreement or any breach hereof,
            whether or not such party has been advised of the possibility
            of such loss or damage, howsoever incurred and whether under a
            theory of contract, tort (including negligence) statutory duty
            or otherwise.
         3. Subject always to Section 11.1 and except for liabilities
            arising out of a party’s violation, misappropriation or
            infringement of a party’s Intellectual Property Rights, in no
            event will either party’s aggregate liability arising out of
            or in connection with the Agreement or any breach (whether
            under a theory of contract, tort (including negligence),
            statutory duty, or otherwise) exceed the greater of: (i)
            £100,000 GBP; and (ii) 125% of the amount of Revenue paid or
            payable to the Partner in the 12-month period immediately
            preceding the event giving rise to liability (or, in the case
            of a series of connected events, the first such event).
         4. Each party acknowledges to each other that it accepts that the
            restrictions on the liability of each other party, as set out
            in the Agreement are reasonable in all the circumstances.
   12. EXPORT CONTROLS
       Partner will comply with all export laws and restrictions and
       regulations of the Department of Commerce, the United States
       Department of Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control ("OFAC"),
       or other United States or foreign agency or authority, and shall
       not export, or allow the export or re-export of the Technology in
       violation of any such restrictions, laws or regulations. By
       downloading or using the Technology, Partner agrees to the
       foregoing and represent and warrants that it is not located in,
       under the control of, or a national or resident of any restricted
       country. Partner represents and warrants that none of it, or any
       individual, entity, or organisation holding any ownership interest
       or controlling interest in Partner, including any officer or
       director, is an individual, entity, organisation with whom any
       United States law, regulation, or executive order prohibits U.S.
       companies and individuals from dealing, including, names appearing
       on the Specially Designated Nationals List.
   13. MISCELLANEOUS
       The Agreement shall be interpreted and construed in accordance with
       and governed by the laws of England and Wales, without regard to
       its conflict of law provisions or the United Nations Conventions
       for the International Sale of Goods. Any action or proceeding
       arising from or relating to the Agreement must be submitted to the
       exclusive jurisdiction of English courts. The parties agree that
       irreparable damage would occur in the event that any of the
       provisions of the Agreement is not performed in accordance with
       these specific terms. Accordingly, the parties agree that each
       shall be entitled to injunctive relief to prevent breaches of the
       Agreement and to enforce specifically the terms and provisions of
       the Agreement, in addition to any other remedy to which they are
       entitled at law or in equity. The parties are independent
       contractors, and nothing in the Agreement will be construed to
       create a partnership, joint venture, agency or other relationship
       between the parties. No failure or forbearance by a party to
       enforce any of its rights under the Agreement or insist upon
       performance of the other party’s obligations under the Agreement
       will be deemed a waiver of such rights or obligations to any
       extent, and no waiver by either party of any default or breach of
       the Agreement will constitute a waiver of any other or subsequent
       default or breach. Neither party will be liable for any failure to
       perform due to causes beyond the party's reasonable control. The
       Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties
       concerning its subject matter and supersedes all prior or
       contemporaneous agreements or understandings, written or oral,
       concerning such subject matter. The parties to this Agreement do
       not intend that any term of this Agreement should be enforceable,
       by virtue of the Contracts (Rights of Third Parties) Act 1999 or
       otherwise, by any person who is not a Party to this Agreement. The
       Partner Enrollment Form may be amended, modified or superseded,
       only by a written instrument signed by both parties. The headings
       in the Agreement are for the convenience of reference only and have
       no legal effect. The Agreement may be executed and delivered via
       electronic transmission or another means of complete and accurate
       reproduction, and copies of the Agreement delivered via such means
       will be deemed originals for all purposes. The Agreement may be
       executed in counterparts, each of which will be deemed an original,
       but all of which together will constitute one and the same
       instrument. If any provision of the Agreement is held to be
       unenforceable for any reason, such provision shall be reformed only
       to the extent necessary to make it enforceable, failing which, it
       shall be severed from the Agreement and the balance of the
       Agreement shall continue in full force and effect. Neither party
       may assign the Agreement or any of its rights or obligations
       hereunder without the other party’s prior written consent, except
       (i) due to operation of law, merger, reorganisation, or as a result
       of an acquisition or change of control, and (ii) by Outbrain to its
       subsidiaries. Subject to the foregoing, the Agreement will be
       binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties and their
       permitted successors and assigns.

Amplify Terms

Version 8.7

Effective September 4, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   These terms last revised and are current as of the effective date set
   forth above. Outbrain reserve the right to change these terms from time
   to time.
   Amplify Terms and Conditions
   These Amplify Terms and Conditions (“Terms”) are entered into by
   Outbrain Inc. (“Outbrain”) and the entity executing an Insertion Order
   or using the Outbrain dashboard (“Customer”). These Terms govern
   Customer’s use of the Outbrain service, and together with an Insertion
   Order (or the information entered through the Outbrain dashboard
   (“Dashboard”)) comprise the " Agreement " between Outbrain and
   Customer. If there is any inconsistency between: (i) the terms of a
   signed Insertion Order or those entered through the Dashboard (either “
   Campaign Details ”), and (ii) these Terms, the Campaign Details as
   applicable, shall prevail.
   1.&Tab;Services
   1.1&Tab; Outbrain partners with a network of online properties (the
   “Network”) and displays a user interface containing links that navigate
   to websites (the “Service”). Outbrain uses its proprietary algorithms
   to determine what links appear within the Service on the Network.
   1.2 Outbrain shall display links to graphical, textual, video and/or
   auditory content selected by Customer (the links and the content
   accessed from the link together are the “Content”) on the Network
   through the Service. Outbrain shall continue to distribute the Content
   on the Network until the earlier of: (i) the end date of Customer’s
   campaign, (ii) reaching Customer’s budget, or (iii) the disabling of a
   campaign (provided that Outbrain reserves the right to charge for
   additional Actions as the Content is removed from circulation – see
   FAQs for more details).
   1.3 Outbrain does not guarantee: (i) the placement, positioning or the
   timing of delivery of any Content, (ii) clicks or impressions
   (including clicks from a particular audience segment) or (iii)
   conversions. If Fees (as defined in Section 5) do not reach Customer's
   budget, Customer's sole remedies shall be to: (i) extend the end date
   of the applicable campaign, (ii) replace or add to the Content with
   other Content (also subject to Section 2 below) to complete the
   campaign; or (iii) to pay only for accrued fees on the Content. In no
   event shall Outbrain be liable for failure to deliver traffic to
   Content.
   1.4 Outbrain will make reports available to the Customer regarding the
   campaign(s). The final monthly reports (which may differ from the daily
   reports) will provide the conclusive basis for Outbrain's calculation
   of the fees owed by Customer. Customer may submit its own
   Outbrain-compatible tracker. If there is a 10% discrepancy or more
   between Customer's numbers (based on the Outbrain-compatible tracker)
   and Outbrain's numbers then the parties agree to work in good faith to
   identify the correct amount to be paid to Outbrain. If the discrepancy
   is less than 10%, Outbrain's numbers shall be conclusive.
   2.&Tab;Content
   2.1 Customer has the right and authorizes Outbrain to place the Content
   on the Network, and is solely responsible for determining the propriety
   and legality of the Content. In addition, Content selected by Customer
   must comply with Outbrain's Advertising Guidelines, as may be updated
   from time to time by Outbrain. Outbrain may at any time (at its sole
   discretion) reject or remove Content. Customer acknowledges that
   Outbrain is not responsible for the Content and that the Content may
   change during the course of a campaign due to revisions by the
   Content's author, comments from readers, or otherwise. Customer's
   recourse in the event of such change shall be to direct Outbrain to
   remove such Content from its then-current campaign and/or select other
   Content. Customer further acknowledges that, if there is an objection
   to the Content (whether from the content author or publisher, or
   otherwise) Outbrain will act in accordance with Section 2 of it's Terms
   of Use and may cease (at it's sole discretion) including the Content in
   the Service.
   2.2 Customer represents and warrants that: (i) if the Content was
   written by or under the direction of Customer or paid for by Customer,
   that fact shall be clearly disclosed on or near the Content; (ii) it is
   authorized to use and/or has approved all words of the Content’s
   headline (whether written by Customer or on Customer’s behalf); (iii)
   Content headlines accurately reflect the tone and subject matter of the
   Content; and, (iv) it is authorized to use and/or has approved any
   image(s) related to its campaign(s) with Outbrain.
   2.3 Customer shall not, directly or indirectly, provide Content that:
   (i) is obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous, pornographic,
   violent, profane, indecent or unlawful; (ii) is factually inaccurate,
   misleading or deceptive; and/or (iii) facilitates or promotes any type
   of illegal activity, including without limitation pyramid schemes,
   gambling, the sale or use of illicit drugs, or discrimination or
   harassment of any individual or group. Further, each piece of Customer
   Content shall neither (a) redirect to a destination other than as
   originally submitted to the Service, and/or (b) be substantively
   different from the Content originally submitted to the Service.
   2.4 Both parties shall implement anti-malware scanning processes of the
   Content. Upon notice, both parties shall take immediate action to
   remove any suspicious Content from the Network.
   3.&Tab;Term and Cancellation
   The Campaign Details will set forth the start and end date of a
   particular campaign. However, the Agreement, or an individual campaign
   may be suspended or terminated: (i) by Customer for any reason upon two
   (2) business days' written notice to Outbrain or within twelve (12)
   hours through the Dashboard, or (ii) by Outbrain for any reason upon
   fourteen days (14) days’ written notice to Customer. During the notice
   period, all previously contracted campaigns shall continue to run
   pursuant to the Campaign Details and Customer shall be responsible for
   paying Outbrain for all Fees accrued during such notice period.
   Outbrain also reserves the right to suspend or terminate Customer's use
   of the Service if Outbrain reasonably believes Customer is in breach of
   the terms of this Agreement.
   4.&Tab;Campaign Details
   If Customer utilizes Outbrain’s Dashboard, Customer will have access to
   certain online reports and control over its campaign(s). To the extent
   Customer registers and has access to the Dashboard, Outbrain may
   collect certain personal data of the Customer. We collect and process
   this personal data in order to respond Customer questions or requests,
   provide Customer’s with access to certain services, verify Customer’s
   identity and communicate with Customers about the use of the Service.
   Customer is solely responsible for all changes requested or approved
   (either directly or via Outbrain's API), including those made through
   the Dashboard using its login. Customer is solely responsible for
   protecting its login and password to the Dashboard. Customer can manage
   campaigns using the Dashboard by modifying the Campaign Details, and/or
   Customer may have the option of working with an Outbrain account
   manager, as determined by Outbrain.
   5.&Tab;Fees and Payment Terms
   5.1 “Fees” are based on deliverables sold via one of following payment
   methods: (i) cost-per-click (“CPC”), (ii) cost-per thousand impressions
   (“CPM”), or (iii) other desired actions agreed between the parties from
   time to time, each an “Action”. Customer shall pay Outbrain Fees for
   Customer Content delivered via the Network as measured by Outbrain's
   tracking system, and any applicable taxes. If CPC is being used for
   campaign measurement, such CPC may not be less than Outbrain’s
   then-in-effect minimum CPC (which may vary by market). If Customer is
   utilizing Outbrain’s automatic bidding feature, Customer grants
   Outbrain the right to set and modify Customer’s CPC at Outbrain’s
   discretion to aid in achieving Customer’s targets for its campaign.
   Customer shall be solely responsible for any additional fees incurred
   for utilizing third party ad serving on its campaign(s). Customer may
   increase or decrease its budget through the Dashboard or through an
   amendment to an Insertion Order.
   5.2 If Customer has signed an Insertion Order, Fees will generally be
   invoiced by Outbrain to Customer by the end of the following calendar
   month, unless otherwise set forth in an IO. Customer shall pay all
   invoices within thirty (30) days from receipt. Any portion of a charge
   not disputed in good faith must be paid in full. If Customer has
   provided the Campaign Details through the Dashboard or has signed an
   Insertion Order and has used a credit card for billing purposes,
   Outbrain shall charge the Outbrain fees (including processing fees) to
   Customer’s credit card at such intervals as Outbrain determines in its
   sole discretion. The decision as to whether to allow Customer to choose
   between invoice and credit card rests solely with Outbrain. Outbrain
   shall review all billing inquiries, including refund requests, on a
   case-by-case basis and reserves the right to approve or deny any
   request in its sole discretion.
   5.3 If Customer disputes any amount on an invoice, Customer should
   provide written notice to Outbrain (email is sufficient) within thirty
   (30) days of receipt of invoice. Customer’s email must include the
   amount disputed and provide adequate information to support any such
   claim. Within twenty (20) business days of receipt of Customer’s email,
   Outbrain will investigate and provide Customer with a written response.
   Customer may not withhold payment for any undisputed amounts, and any
   portion of a charge not disputed in good faith within thirty (30) days
   from receipt of invoice must be paid in full.
   5.4 If payment is not made when due and not properly disputed pursuant
   to Section 5.3, Outbrain may charge interest at the rate of 6% per
   annum from the due date until the date of actual payment, whether
   before or after judgment. Outbrain also reserves the right to suspend
   or terminate Customer's use of the Service until Customer has paid all
   amounts due and to charge Customer for all costs of collection,
   including collection agency and reasonable legal fees and court costs.
   Customer authorizes Outbrain to investigate Customer's credit record.
   If applicable, Customer agrees to provide such further financial
   information and documentation as may be required from time to time by
   Outbrain as a condition for the continued extension of credit. Customer
   acknowledges and agrees that any account, credit card and related
   billing and payment information which Customer provides to Outbrain may
   be shared by Outbrain with companies who work on Outbrain's behalf
   solely for the purpose of performing credit checks, effecting payment
   to Outbrain, collecting debts owed to Outbrain and/or servicing
   Customer's account. Outbrain may, in its sole discretion, extend,
   revise or revoke credit at any time.
   6.&Tab;Additional Features and Terms
   6.1 Outbrain may also make additional Service features available to
   Customer from time to time and use of such features may be subject to
   Customer’s agreement to certain additional terms and conditions
   (“Additional Terms”) (e.g., via an online click-through agreement or
   via the Dashboard). Such features will be provided at Outbrain’s
   discretion to Customer and may include fees in addition to those
   described in Section 5.1. Customer’s acceptance of the Additional Terms
   will constitute a binding and enforceable agreement as between Outbrain
   and Customer. In the event of any inconsistency between these Terms,
   the Additional Terms, and the Campaign Details, the order of precedence
   is: (i) Additional Terms, (ii) Campaign Details, and (iii) these Terms.
   Customers who choose to utilize LiveRamp services (via the Outbrain
   dashboard or otherwise) for purposes of their Outbrain campaign(s) are
   subject to LiveRamp terms.
   6.2 Subject to Customer’s compliance with Section 8 below, Customer may
   place (i) Outbrain pixel(s) (the “Outbrain Pixel”) on Customer’s
   website or application pages and/or (ii) third party pixels or tags
   (“the “Third Party Pixels”) for the purpose of providing analytics
   related to Customer’s campaign and/or enhanced targeting functionality
   (the Outbrain Pixel and Third Party Pixels together are the “Pixels”).
   Customer represents and warrants that (a) its use of the Pixels is in
   accordance with Data Protection Laws; and (b) it has provided
   appropriate notice to users regarding use of the Pixels, including an
   explanation (1) that third parties, including Outbrain, may use cookies
   or similar technologies to collect or receive information from
   Customer’s website(s), and may use that information to provide
   measurement services and target ads; and (2) as to how users opt-out of
   the collection of information for targeting purposes. Customer shall
   not use the Pixels unless and until it has complied with the provisions
   of this Section 6.2.
   6.3 If Customer utilizes third party segments for enhanced targeting
   (“3rd Party Targeting”) of its campaign(s), Customer shall pay for its
   use of 3rd Party Targeting (“3rd Party Data Costs”) including any
   applicable taxes. Customer’s invoice for each campaign shall include
   both the Fees, pursuant to Section 5.1, plus the 3rd Party Data Costs
   (if applicable) for utilizing 3rd Party Targeting. Customer agrees that
   3rd Party Data costs will be based on Outbrain’s reporting metrics. If
   Customer utilizes 3rd Party Targeting the Customer shall (i) disclose
   this to users via an appropriate notice and/or in its privacy policy
   (as applicable), and (ii) not use 3rd Party Targeting to target minors
   or other sensitive categories of data.
   7.&Tab;Confidentiality
   7.1 Each party agrees that with respect to any Confidential Information
   (as defined below) that is disclosed by one party to the other in
   connection with the Agreement, the party receiving such Confidential
   Information shall not disclose such Confidential Information to any
   third party, or use it for any purpose, except in connection with its
   rights and obligations under the Agreement. "Confidential Information"
   means all information concerning a party or any of its subsidiaries or
   affiliates that is not generally known to the public, which information
   is marked confidential or proprietary, or which under the circumstances
   ought reasonably to be treated as confidential or proprietary, and
   includes, without limitation, the terms of the Agreement.
   Notwithstanding the foregoing, Confidential Information does not
   include information that: (i) is, as of the time of disclosure, or
   thereafter becomes, part of the public domain through a source other
   than the receiving party; (ii) was lawfully in the possession of the
   receiving party as of the time of disclosure; (iii) is independently
   developed by the receiving party without reference to the Confidential
   Information; or (iv) is subsequently obtained from a third party not
   subject to an obligation of confidentiality with respect to the
   information disclosed.
   7.2 Confidential Information shall be kept in the strictest confidence
   and shall be protected by all reasonable and necessary security
   measures. Confidential Information shall not be released by the
   receiving party to anyone except an employee or agent, who has a need
   to know same, and who is bound by confidentiality obligations at least
   as restrictive as these contained herein. Neither party will use any
   portion of Confidential Information provided by the other party
   pursuant to the Agreement for any purpose other than as expressly set
   forth under the Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, either party
   may disclose Confidential Information strictly necessary to comply with
   the demands of any court order, law or governmental agency and Outbrain
   may share Confidential Information of Customer with any holding company
   of Customer or with any subsidiary company of Customer’s holding
   company.
   7.3 If Customer is acting on behalf of a Content provider, Customer
   authorizes Outbrain to grant such Content provider (or any subsequent
   third party appointed by the Content provider) access to and a right to
   use the Campaign Details.
   8.&Tab;Additional Representations and Warranties/Disclaimers
   8.1 Each party represents and warrants to the other party that: (i) it
   has all necessary rights and authority to enter into the Agreement and
   grant the rights and licenses under the Agreement; (ii) it shall comply
   with Applicable Laws and (iii) the execution or acceptance of the
   Agreement (which includes the Campaign Details), and the performance of
   its respective obligations and duties pursuant to the Agreement, do not
   and will not violate any agreement to which such party is bound.
   “Applicable Laws” means any applicable federal, state or foreign laws
   or regulations or any industry self-regulatory rules or guidelines
   (including the Interactive Advertising Bureau Guidelines, Standards &
   Best Practices, the NAI Code of Conduct, the DAA Self-Regulatory
   Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising, and the EU General Dara
   Protection Regulation (2016/679) ("GDPR"). The GDPR, together with any
   applicable national data protection are hereinafter referred to as the
   "Data Protection Laws”.
   8.2 Customer further represents and warrants that: (i) the Content does
   not violate any Applicable Laws, rules and regulations and will not
   contain any material which may be harmful, abusive, obscene,
   threatening or defamatory; (ii) it has all necessary rights to permit
   and grants Outbrain pursuant to the Agreement all such rights which are
   necessary for Outbrain to (as applicable) use, host, cache, route,
   store, copy, modify, distribute, reformat, reproduce, publish, display,
   transmit and distribute the Content; (iii) use of the Content in
   accordance with the Agreement will not infringe any intellectual
   property rights of any third party; (iv) it cannot and will not attempt
   to provide Content that is targeted to children under the age of
   thirteen; (v) it will not use the Service in a manner that provides an
   unintended advantage or interferes with the integrity and/or overall
   performance of the Service, and (vi) if using the Dashboard, Customer
   will adhere to any rules of such use as solely determined by Outbrain
   (e.g. not using source bidding to whitelist any particular Network
   source).
   8.3 If Customer is an agency (or other third party acting on behalf of
   the provider of the Content), Customer represents and warrants that:
   (i) it is the authorized agent of the provider of the Content; (ii) it
   has the legal authority to enter into the Agreement and make all
   decisions and take all actions relating to the provider of the Content;
   (iii) it has entered into a written agreement granting the agent the
   authority to represent the provider of the Content in accordance with
   (i) and (ii) above (and shall submit such agreement to Outbrain on
   demand). Customer further agrees that it is not acting on behalf of a
   French company or a foreign company whose advertising content mainly
   targets French territory exclusively through the Dashboard. If Customer
   is acting on behalf of a French content provider, please contact
   info@outbrain.com for more information on how to purchase Outbrain
   Services on behalf of a French content provider advertising mainly
   targets the French territory and in compliance with applicable French
   laws.
   8.4 EXCEPT AS MAY BE EXPRESSLY SET FORTH IN THE AGREEMENT, OUTBRAIN
   MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS OR WARRANTIES, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED -- INCLUDING
   BUT NOT LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, TITLE,
   NON-INFRINGEMENT, OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, OR ANY
   WARRANTIES ARISING FROM A COURSE OF DEALING, USAGE OR TRADE PRACTICE --
   ABOUT ITS SERVICES AND THE PERFORMANCE OR SUCCESS OF ANY CAMPAIGNS MADE
   BY IT ON BEHALF OF CUSTOMER, OR THAT THE SERVICE WILL OPERATE
   UNINTERRUPTED, SECURE OR ERROR FREE.
   9.&Tab;Data Protection
   9.1 The parties acknowledge that some or all of data used or collected
   through the Service (or use of Outbrain Pixels) may qualify as, or
   include, Personal Data, however, as of the Effective Date, Outbrain
   does not send and/or receive any end-user data to the Customer.
   9.2 In addition to complying with all the all Applicable Laws
   (including Data Protection Laws) each party shall be individually
   responsible for including the provision of relevant notices and
   obtaining relevant consents as required by Data Protection Laws. To the
   extent necessary, the parties shall (i) collaborate with respect to
   requests from Data Subjects, and (ii) implement appropriate technical
   and organizational measures which prevent accidental or unlawful
   destruction and loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure of, or access
   to Personal Data. The parties shall each maintain and display on their
   respective websites an easily accessible and discoverable privacy
   policy that (i) discloses the use of any cookies (based on redirects or
   otherwise) through the Service, and (ii) includes relevant details
   regarding each party’s security controls and international transfers.
   The terms “Data Subject”, “Personal Data”, “Personal Data Breach” and
   “Controller” shall have the meanings stated in the GDPR.
   10.&Tab;Indemnification
   10.1 Each party shall defend, indemnify and hold harmless the other
   party and its respective agents, affiliates, subsidiaries, directors,
   officers, employees, contractors, and Network partners (as applicable)
   against any and all third party claims resulting from the breach of
   such party's duties, obligations and representations under the
   Agreement.
   10.2 In connection with any such claim: (i) the indemnified party shall
   provide prompt written notice to the indemnifying party of any such
   claim (provided that the failure to provide such prompt notice shall
   not relieve the indemnifying party of its indemnification obligations
   in the Agreement, except to the extent it has been damaged thereby);
   (ii) the indemnifying party shall have sole control of the defense or
   settlement of the claim (provided that the indemnifying party may not
   enter into any settlement that may adversely affect the rights or
   obligations of the indemnified party without the indemnified party's
   prior written consent); (iii) at the indemnifying party's request and
   expense, the indemnified party cooperating in the investigation and
   defense of such claim; and (iv) the indemnified party shall have the
   right to participate in its defense with counsel of its own choosing at
   the indemnified party's expense.
   11.&Tab;Limitation of Liability
   EXCEPT WITH RESPECT TO CLAIMS ARISING FROM A PARTY'S INDEMNITY
   OBLIGATIONS, WILLFUL MISCONDUCT OR A BREACH OF THE CONFIDENTIALITY,
   DATA PROTECTION PROVISIONS AND/OR NON-PAYMENT OF FEES OWED IN THE
   AGREEMENT, THE MAXIMUM AGGREGATE LIABILITY OF EITHER PARTY AND ITS
   DIRECTORS, OFFICERS, EMPLOYEES, VENDORS, NETWORK PARTNERS OR AGENTS FOR
   ANY ACTION REGARDLESS OF THE FORM OF THE ACTION, WHETHER IN TORT OR
   CONTRACT, ARISING UNDER OR RELATED IN ANY WAY TO THE AGREEMENT OR ITS
   IMPLEMENTATION SHALL BE LIMITED TO THE GREATER OF: (I) THE AMOUNT OF
   FEES PAYABLE BY CUSTOMER UNDER THE AGREEMENT IN THE 12 MONTHS
   IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE EVENT GIVING RISE TO A CLAIM; AND (II)
   $50,000. IN NO EVENT SHALL EITHER PARTY BE LIABLE FOR CONSEQUENTIAL,
   SPECIAL, PUNITIVE OR INCIDENTAL DAMAGES OR OTHER DAMAGES OF ANY KIND,
   INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION, LOST DATA, LOST REVENUES OR LOST PROFITS,
   ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED IN ANY WAY TO THE AGREEMENT OR ITS
   IMPLEMENTATION, EVEN IF SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY
   OF SUCH DAMAGES.
   12.&Tab;Miscellaneous
   12.1 Neither Party may assign the Agreement, in whole or in part, by
   operation of law or otherwise, without the prior written consent of the
   other; provided, however that either party may assign its rights or
   delegate its duties under the Agreement, in whole or in part, without
   the other's consent, in connection with a merger, reorganization or
   sale of all, or substantially all, of the assignor's assets, provided
   that the successor entity shall have sufficient resources to fully
   perform the Agreement and shall assume the obligation to fully perform
   the Agreement.
   12.2 The Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance
   with the laws of the State of New York applicable to contracts entered
   into and wholly to be performed therein, without regard to that body of
   law relating to conflict of laws. Each party hereby irrevocably and
   unconditionally consents to submit to the exclusive jurisdiction of the
   courts of the State of New York and of the United States of America, in
   each case located in the County of New York, for any claim arising out
   of or relating to the Agreement (and agrees not to commence any claim
   relating thereto except in such courts). The prevailing party in any
   action arising out of or to enforce the Agreement shall be entitled to
   recover its reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
   12.3 No press releases or general public announcements shall be made
   without the mutual written consent of Customer and Outbrain. Outbrain
   shall have the right to include Customer’s name on Outbrain’s client
   list and in other marketing materials. Customer shall not use
   Outbrain’s name, logo or trademark without Outbrain’s prior written
   consent.
   12.4 All notices under the Agreement will be in writing and will be
   delivered by personal service, confirmed by email, express courier, or
   certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address of the
   receiving party set forth on the IO, or at such different address as
   may be designated by such party by written notice to the other party
   from time to time. Notice will be effective on receipt.
   12.5 No failure of either party to enforce any of its rights under the
   Agreement will act as a waiver of such rights. If one or more
   provisions of the Agreement are held to be unenforceable under
   Applicable Laws, then such provision(s) shall be excluded from the
   Agreement, and the balance of the Agreement shall be enforceable in
   accordance with its terms.
   12.6 Neither party shall be liable for any delay or failure to perform
   any of its obligations set forth in the Agreement due to causes beyond
   its reasonable control. Neither party shall be liable for any
   unavailability or inoperability of the Internet, technical malfunction,
   or computer error or corruption resulting in loss of data or other
   harm.
   12.7 Sections 6, 8, 9,10, 11, and 12, together with any outstanding
   undisputed payment obligation, shall survive the termination of the
   Agreement.
   12.8 Customer and Outbrain shall each act as independent contractors.
   Nothing in the Agreement shall be deemed or create or construed as
   creating a joint venture or partnership between the parties.
   12.9 The Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties
   with respect to the subject matter hereof, and may not be modified
   without the prior written consent of both parties. In no event shall
   any inconsistent or conflicting terms and conditions contained in any
   purchase order, insertion order, invoice or other document submitted by
   Customer concerning the subject matter hereof have any force or effect
   even if accepted or signed by Outbrain.

Amplify Terms

Version 8.7

Effective September 4, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   These terms were last revised as of the effective date set forth above.
   Outbrain reserve the right to change these terms from time to time.
   Amplify Terms and Conditions
   These Amplify Terms and Conditions (“Terms”) are entered into by
   Outbrain UK Limited (“Outbrain”) and the entity executing an Insertion
   Order or using the Outbrain dashboard (“Customer”). These Terms govern
   Customer’s use of the Outbrain service, and together with an Insertion
   Order (or the information entered through the Outbrain dashboard
   (“Dashboard”)) comprise the "Agreement" between Outbrain and Customer.
   If there is any inconsistency between: (i) the terms of a signed
   Insertion Order or those entered through the Dashboard (either
   “Campaign Details”) and (ii) these Terms, the Campaign Details as
   applicable, shall prevail.
   1.&Tab;Services
   1.1 Outbrain partners with a network of online properties (the
   “Network”) and displays a user interface containing links that navigate
   to websites (the “Service”). Outbrain uses its proprietary algorithms
   to determine what links appear within the Service on the Network.
   1.2 Outbrain shall display links to graphical, textual, video and/or
   auditory content selected by Customer (the links and the content
   accessed from the link together are the “Content”) on the Network
   through the Service. Outbrain shall continue to distribute the Content
   on the Network until the earlier of: (i) the end date of Customer’s
   campaign, (ii) reaching Customer’s budget, or (iii) the disabling of a
   campaign (provided that Outbrain reserves the right to charge for
   additional Actions as the Content is removed from circulation – see
   FAQs for more details).
   1.3 Outbrain does not guarantee: (i) the placement, positioning or the
   timing of delivery of any Content; (ii) clicks or impressions
   (including clicks from a particular audience segment), or (iii)
   conversions. If Fees (as defined in Section 5) do not reach Customer's
   budget, Customer's sole remedies shall be to: (i) extend the end date
   of the applicable campaign; (ii) replace or add to the Content with
   other Content (also subject to Section 2 below) to complete the
   campaign; or (iii) to pay only for accrued Fees on the Content. In no
   event shall Outbrain be liable for failure to deliver traffic to
   Content.
   1.4 Outbrain will make reports available to the Customer, which provide
   information about the number of clicks received during the campaign.
   The final monthly reports (which may differ from the daily reports)will
   provide the conclusive basis for Outbrain's calculation of the fees
   owed by Customer. Customer may submit its own Outbrain-compatible click
   tracker. If there is a 10% discrepancy or more between Customer's
   numbers (based on the Outbrain-compatible click tracker) and Outbrain's
   numbers then the parties agree to work in good faith to identify the
   correct amount to be paid to Outbrain. If the discrepancy is less than
   10%, Outbrain's numbers shall be conclusive.
   2.&Tab;Content
   2.1 Customer has the right and authorises Outbrain to place the Content
   on the Network and is solely responsible for determining the propriety
   and legality of the Content. In addition, Content selected by Customer
   must comply with Outbrain's Advertising Guidelines, as may be updated
   from time to time by Outbrain. Outbrain may at any time (at its sole
   discretion) reject or remove Content. Customer acknowledges that
   Outbrain is not responsible for the Content and that the Content may
   change during the course of a campaign due to revisions by the
   Content's author, comments from readers, or otherwise. Customer's
   recourse in the event of such change shall be to direct Outbrain to
   remove such Content from its then-current campaign and/or select other
   Content. Customer further acknowledges that, if there is an objection
   to the Content (whether from the Content author or publisher, or
   otherwise) Outbrain will act in accordance with section 2 of its Terms
   of Use and may cease (at its sole discretion) including the Content in
   the Service.
   2.2 Customer represents and warrants that: (i) if the Content was
   written by or under the direction of Customer or paid for by Customer,
   that fact shall be clearly disclosed on or near the Content; (ii) it is
   authorised to use and/or has approved all words of the Content’s
   headline (whether written by Customer or on Customer’s behalf); and
   (iii) Content headlines accurately reflect the tone and subject matter
   of the Content and, (iv) it is authorized to use and/or has approved
   any image(s) related to its campaign(s) with Outbrain.
   2.3 Customer shall not, directly or indirectly, provide Content that:
   (i) is obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous, pornographic,
   violent, profane, indecent or unlawful; (ii) is factually inaccurate,
   misleading or deceptive; and/or (iii) facilitates or promotes any type
   of illegal activity, including without limitation pyramid schemes,
   gambling, the sale or use of illicit drugs, or discrimination or
   harassment of any individual or group. Further, each piece of Customer
   Content shall neither (a) redirect to a destination other than as
   originally submitted to the Service, and/or (b) be substantively
   different from the Content originally submitted to the Service.
   2.4 Both parties shall implement anti-malware scanning processes of the
   Content. Upon notice, both parties shall take immediate action to
   remove any suspicious Content from the Network.
   3.&Tab;Term and Cancellation
   The Campaign Details will set forth the start and end date of a
   particular campaign. However, the Agreement, or an individual campaign
   may be suspended or terminated: (i) by Customer for any reason upon two
   (2) business days' written notice to Outbrain or within twelve (12)
   hours through the Dashboard; or (ii) by Outbrain for any reason upon
   fourteen days (14) days’ written notice to Customer. During the notice
   period, all previously contracted campaigns shall continue to run
   pursuant to the Campaign Details and Customer shall be responsible for
   paying Outbrain for all Fees accrued during such notice period.
   Outbrain also reserves the right to suspend or terminate Customer's use
   of the Service if Outbrain reasonably believes Customer is in breach of
   the terms of this Agreement.
   4.&Tab;Campaign Details
   If Customer utilizes Outbrain’s Dashboard, Customer will have access to
   certain online reports and control over its campaign(s). To the extent
   Customer registers and has access to the Dashboard, Outbrain may
   collect certain personal data of the Customer. Outbrain collects and
   processes this personal data in order to respond Customer questions or
   requests, provide Customer’s with access to certain services, verify
   Customer’s identity and communicate with Customers about the use of the
   Service. Customer is solely responsible for all changes requested or
   approved (either directly or via Outbrain’s API) including those made
   through the Dashboard using its login. Customer is solely responsible
   for protecting its login and password to the Dashboard. Customer can
   manage campaigns using the Dashboard by modifying the Campaign Details
   and/or Customer may have the option of working with an Outbrain account
   manager, as determined by Outbrain.
   5.&Tab;Fees and Payment Terms
   5.1 Fees” are based on deliverables sold via one of following payment
   methods: (i) cost-per-click (“CPC”), (ii) cost-per thousand impressions
   (“CPM”), or (iii) other desired actions agreed between the parties from
   time to time, each an “Action”. Customer shall pay Outbrain Fees for
   Customer Content delivered via the Network as measured by Outbrain's
   tracking system and any applicable taxes. If CPC is being used for
   campaign measurement, such CPC may not be less than Outbrain’s
   then-in-effect minimum CPC (which may vary by market). If Customer is
   utilizing Outbrain’s automatic bidding feature, Customer grants
   Outbrain the right to set and modify Customer’s CPC at Outbrain’s
   discretion to aid in achieving Customer’s targets for its campaign.
   Customer shall be solely responsible for any additional fees incurred
   for utilizing third party ad serving on its campaign(s). Customer may
   increase or decrease its budget through the Dashboard or through an
   amendment to an Insertion Order.
   5.2 If Customer has signed an Insertion Order, Fees will generally be
   invoiced by Outbrain to Customer by the end of the following calendar
   month, unless otherwise set forth in an IO. Customer shall pay all
   invoices within thirty (30) days from receipt. Any portion of a charge
   not disputed in good faith must be paid in full. If Customer has
   provided the Campaign Details through the Dashboard or has signed an
   Insertion Order and has used a credit card for billing purposes,
   Outbrain shall charge the Outbrain fees (including processing fees) to
   Customer’s credit card at such intervals as Outbrain determines in its
   sole discretion. The decision as to whether to allow Customer to choose
   between invoice and credit card rests solely with Outbrain. Outbrain
   shall review all billing inquiries, including refund requests on a
   case-by-case basis and reserves the right to approve or deny any
   request in its sole discretion.
   5.3 If Customer disputes any amount on an invoice, Customer should
   provide written notice to Outbrain (email is sufficient) within thirty
   (30) days of receipt of invoice. Customer’s email must include the
   amount disputed and provide adequate information to support any such
   claim. Within twenty (20) business days of receipt of Customer’s email,
   Outbrain will investigate and provide Customer with a written response.
   Customer may not withhold payment for any undisputed amounts, and any
   portion of a charge not disputed in good faith within thirty (30) days
   from receipt of invoice must be paid in full
   5.4 If payment is not made when due and not properly disputed pursuant
   to Section 5.3, Outbrain may charge interest at the rate of 2% per
   annum above the prevailing base rate of Barclays Bank PLC from the due
   date until the date of actual payment, whether before or after
   judgment. Outbrain also reserves the right to suspend or terminate
   Customer's use of the Service until Customer has paid all amounts due
   and to charge Customer for all costs of collection, including
   collection agency and reasonable legal fees and court costs. Customer
   authorises Outbrain to investigate Customer's credit record. If
   applicable, Customer agrees to provide such further financial
   information and documentation as may be required from time to time by
   Outbrain as a condition for the continued extension of credit. Customer
   acknowledges and agrees that any account, credit card and related
   billing and payment information which Customer provides to Outbrain may
   be shared by Outbrain with companies who work on Outbrain's behalf
   solely for the purpose of performing credit checks, effecting payment
   to Outbrain, collecting debts owed to Outbrain and/or servicing
   Customer's account. Outbrain may, in its sole discretion, extend,
   revise or revoke credit at any time.
   6. Additional Features and Terms
   6.1 Outbrain may also make additional Service features available to
   Customer from time to time and use of such features may be subject to
   Customer’s agreement to certain additional terms and conditions
   (“Additional Terms”) (e.g., via an online click-through agreement or
   via the Dashboard). Such features will be provided at Outbrain’s
   discretion to Customer and may include fees in addition to those
   described in Section 5.1. Customer’s acceptance of the Additional Terms
   will constitute a binding and enforceable agreement as between Outbrain
   and Customer. In the event of any inconsistency between these Terms,
   the Additional Terms, and the Campaign Details, the order of precedence
   is: (i) Additional Terms, (ii) Campaign Details, and (iii) these Terms.
   Customers who choose to utilize LiveRamp services (via the Outbrain
   dashboard or otherwise) for purposes of their Outbrain campaign(s) are
   subject to LiveRamp terms.
   6.2 Subject to Customer’s compliance with Section 8 below, Customer may
   place (i) Outbrain pixel(s) (the “Outbrain Pixel”) on Customer’s
   website or application pages and/or (ii) third party pixels or tags
   (“the “Third Party Pixels”) for the purpose of providing analytics
   related to Customer’s campaign and/or enhanced targeting functionality
   (the Outbrain Pixel and Third Party Pixels together are the “Pixels”).
   Customer represents and warrants that (a) its use of the Pixels is in
   accordance with Data Protection Laws; and (b) it has provided
   appropriate notice to users regarding use of the Pixels, including an
   explanation (1) that third parties, including Outbrain, may use cookies
   or similar technologies to collect or receive information from
   Customer’s website(s), and may use that information to provide
   measurement services and target ads; and (2) as to how users opt-out of
   the collection of information for targeting purposes. Customer shall
   not use the Pixels unless and until it has complied with the provisions
   of this Section 6.2.
   6.3 If Customer utilizes third party segments for enhanced targeting
   (“3rd Party Targeting”) of its campaign(s), Customer shall pay for its
   use of 3rd Party Targeting (“3rd Party Data Costs”) including any
   applicable taxes. Customer’s invoice for each campaign shall include
   both the Fees, pursuant to Section 5.1, plus the 3rd Party Data Costs
   (if applicable) for utilizing 3rd Party Targeting. Customer agrees that
   3rd Party Data costs will be based on Outbrain’s reporting metrics. If
   Customer utilizes 3rd Party Targeting the Customer shall (i) disclose
   this to users via an appropriate notice and/or in its privacy policy
   (as applicable), and (ii) not use 3rd Party Targeting to target minors
   or other sensitive categories of data.
   7.&Tab;Confidentiality
   7.1 Each party agrees that with respect to any Confidential Information
   (as defined below) that is disclosed by one party to the other in
   connection with the Agreement, the party receiving such Confidential
   Information shall not disclose such Confidential Information to any
   third party, or use it for any purpose, except in connection with its
   rights and obligations under the Agreement. "Confidential Information"
   means all information concerning a party or any of its subsidiaries or
   affiliates that is not generally known to the public, which information
   is marked confidential or proprietary, or which under the circumstances
   ought reasonably to be treated as confidential or proprietary, and
   includes, without limitation, the terms of the Agreement.
   Notwithstanding the foregoing, Confidential Information does not
   include information that: (i) is, as of the time of disclosure, or
   thereafter becomes, part of the public domain through a source other
   than the receiving party; (ii) was lawfully in the possession of the
   receiving party as of the time of disclosure; (iii) is independently
   developed by the receiving party without reference to the Confidential
   Information; or (iv) is subsequently obtained from a third party not
   subject to an obligation of confidentiality with respect to the
   information disclosed.
   7.2 Confidential Information shall be kept in the strictest confidence
   and shall be protected by all reasonable and necessary security
   measures. Confidential Information shall not be released by the
   receiving party to anyone except an employee or agent, who has a need
   to know same, and who is bound by confidentiality obligations at least
   as restrictive as these contained herein. Neither party will use any
   portion of Confidential Information provided by the other party
   pursuant to the Agreement for any purpose other than as expressly set
   forth under the Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, either party
   may disclose Confidential Information strictly necessary to comply with
   the demands of any court order, law or governmental agency and Outbrain
   may share Confidential Information of Customer with any holding company
   of Customer or with any subsidiary company of Customer’s holding
   company.
   7.3 If Customer is acting on behalf of a Content provider, Customer
   authorises Outbrain to grant such Content provider (or any subsequent
   third party appointed by the Content provider) access to and a right to
   use the Campaign Details.
   8.&Tab;Additional Representations and Warranties/Disclaimers
   8.1 Each party represents and warrants to the other party that: (i) it
   has all necessary rights and authority to enter into the Agreement and
   grant the rights and licences under the Agreement; (ii) it shall comply
   with Applicable Laws, and (iii) the execution or acceptance of the
   Agreement (which includes the Campaign Details), and the performance of
   its respective obligations and duties pursuant to the Agreement, do not
   and will not violate any agreement to which such party is bound.
   “Applicable Laws” means any applicable federal, state or foreign laws
   or regulations or any industry self-regulatory rules or guidelines
   (including the Interactive Advertising Bureau Guidelines, Standards &
   Best Practices, the NAI Code of Conduct, the DAA Self-Regulatory
   Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising, and the EU General Data
   Protection Regulation (2016/679) (“GDPR”). The GDPR, together with any
   applicable national data protection laws are hereinafter referred to as
   the “Data Protection Laws”.
   8.2 Customer further represents and warrants that: (i) the Content does
   not violate any Applicable Laws, rules and regulations and will not
   contain any material which may be harmful, abusive, obscene,
   threatening or defamatory; (ii) it has all necessary rights to permit
   and grants Outbrain pursuant to the Agreement all such rights which are
   necessary for Outbrain to (as applicable) use, host, cache, route,
   store, copy, modify, distribute, reformat, reproduce, publish, display,
   transmit and distribute the Content; (iii) use of the Content in
   accordance with the Agreement will not infringe any intellectual
   property rights of any third party; (iv) it cannot and will not attempt
   to provide Content that is targeted to children under the age of
   thirteen; and (v) it will not use the Service in a manner that provides
   an unintended advantage or interferes with the integrity and/or overall
   performance of the Service and (vi) if using the Dashboard, Customer
   will adhere to any rules of such use as solely determined by Outbrain
   (e.g. not using source bidding to whitelist any particular Network
   source)..
   8.3 If Customer is an agency (or other third party acting on behalf of
   the provider of the Content), Customer represents and warrants that:
   (i) it is the authorised agent of the provider of the Content; (ii) it
   has the legal authority to enter into the Agreement and make all
   decisions and take all actions relating to the provider of the Content;
   (iii) it has entered into a written agreement granting the agent the
   authority to represent the provider of the Content in accordance with
   (i) and (ii) above (and shall submit such agreement to Outbrain on
   demand). Customer further agrees that it is not acting on behalf of a
   French company or a foreign company whose advertising content mainly
   targets French territory exclusively through the Dashboard. If Customer
   is acting on behalf of a French content provider whose advertising
   mainly targets the French territory, please contact info@outbrain.com
   for more information on how to purchase Outbrain Services on behalf of
   a French content provider whose advertising mainly targets the French
   territory and in compliance with applicable French laws.
   8.4 No conditions, warranties or other terms apply to any Outbrain
   services supplied by Outbrain under this Agreement unless expressly set
   out in this Agreement. No implied conditions, warranties or other terms
   apply (including without limitation any implied terms as to
   satisfactory quality, fitness for purpose or conformance with
   description or any warranties arising from a course of dealing, usage
   or trade practice or regarding the performance or success of any
   campaigns made by it on behalf of the Customer or that the Services
   will operate uninterrupted, secure or error free).
   9.&Tab;Data Protection
   9.1 The parties acknowledge that some or all of data used or collected
   through the Service (or use of Outbrain Pixels) may qualify as, or
   include, Personal Data, however, as of the Effective Date, Outbrain
   does not send and/or receive any end-user data to the Customer.
   9.2 In addition to complying with all applicable laws (including Data
   Protection laws) each party shall be responsible for including the
   provision of relevant notices and obtaining relevant consents as
   required by Data Protection Laws. To the extent necessary, the parties
   shall (i) collaborate with respect to requests from Data Subjects, and
   (ii) each party shall implement appropriate technical and
   organizational measures which prevent accidental or unlawful
   destruction and loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure of, or access
   to Personal Data. The parties shall each maintain and display on their
   respective websites an easily accessible and discoverable privacy
   policy that (i) discloses the use of any cookies (based on redirects or
   otherwise) through the Service, and (ii) includes relevant details
   regarding each party’s security controls and international transfers.
   The terms “Data Subject”, “Personal Data”, “Personal Data Breach” and
   “Controller” shall have the meanings stated in the GDPR.
   10.&Tab;Indemnification
   10.1 Each party shall defend, indemnify and hold harmless the other
   party and its respective agents, affiliates, subsidiaries, directors,
   officers, employees, contractors and Network partners (as applicable),
   against any and all third party claims resulting from the breach of
   such party's duties, obligations and representations under the
   Agreement.
   10.2 In connection with any such claim: (i) the indemnified party shall
   provide prompt written notice to the indemnifying party of any such
   claim (provided that the failure to provide such prompt notice shall
   not relieve the indemnifying party of its indemnification obligations
   in the Agreement, except to the extent it has been damaged thereby);
   (ii) the indemnifying party shall have sole control of the defense or
   settlement of the claim (provided that the indemnifying party may not
   enter into any settlement that may adversely affect the rights or
   obligations of the indemnified party without the indemnified party's
   prior written consent); (iii) at the indemnifying party's request and
   expense, the indemnified party cooperating in the investigation and
   defense of such claim; and (iv) the indemnified party shall have the
   right to participate in its defense with counsel of its own choosing at
   the indemnified party's expense.
   11.&Tab;Limitation of Liability
   11.1 Nothing in the Agreement excludes or limits either party’s
   liability: (i) for death or personal injury resulting from the
   negligence of either party or their servants, agents or employees; (ii)
   for fraud or fraudulent misrepresentation; (iii) for anything which
   cannot be excluded or limited by law.
   11.2 Except with respect to claims arising from the indemnity
   obligations or a breach of clause 6 (confidentiality), data protection
   provisions, and/or non-payment of fees owed, the maximum aggregate
   liability of either party and its’ directors, officers, employees,
   Network partners, vendors or agents arising from any given event or
   series of connected events arising under or related in any way to this
   Agreement or its implementation shall be limited to the greater of: (i)
   £50,000; and (ii) 100% of the amount of fees paid or payable by
   Customer under Agreement in the 12 months immediately preceding the
   month in which the event (or first in a series of connected events)
   occurred.
   11.3 In no event shall either party be liable for: (i) loss of
   revenues; (ii) loss of profits; (iii) loss of contracts; (iv) loss of
   business or anticipated savings; (v) loss of data; (vi) loss of
   goodwill or reputation; or (vii) for any consequential, special or
   indirect losses whether or not such losses were within the
   contemplation of the parties at the date of this Agreement, suffered or
   incurred by that party arising out of or in connection with the
   provisions of, or any matter under, this Agreement.
   12.&Tab;Miscellaneous
   12.1 Neither Party may assign the Agreement, in whole or in part, by
   operation of law or otherwise, without the prior written consent of the
   other; provided, however that either party may assign its rights or
   delegate its duties under the Agreement, in whole or in part, without
   the other's consent, in connection with a merger, reorganisation or
   sale of all, or substantially all, of the assignor's assets, provided
   that the successor entity shall have sufficient resources to fully
   perform the Agreement and shall assume the obligation to fully perform
   the Agreement.
   12.2 This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance
   with English law and the parties hereby submit to the exclusive
   jurisdiction of the English courts in respect of any dispute or matter
   arising out of or connected with this Agreement. The prevailing party
   in any action arising out of or to enforce this Agreement shall be
   entitled to recover its reasonable legal fees and costs.
   12.3 No press releases or general public announcements shall be made
   without the mutual written consent of Customer and Outbrain. Outbrain
   shall have the right to include Customer's name on Outbrain's client
   list and in other marketing materials. Customer shall not use
   Outbrain’s name, logo or trademark without Outbrain’s prior written
   consent.
   12.4 All notices under the Agreement will be in writing and will be
   delivered by personal service, confirmed by email, express courier, or
   certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address of the
   receiving party set forth on the IO, or at such different address as
   may be designated by such party by written notice to the other party
   from time to time. Notice will be effective on receipt.
   12.5 No failure of either party to enforce any of its rights under the
   Agreement will act as a waiver of such rights. If one or more
   provisions of the Agreement are held to be unenforceable under
   Applicable Laws, then such provision(s) shall be excluded from the
   Agreement, and the balance of the Agreement shall be enforceable in
   accordance with its terms.
   12.6 Neither party shall be liable for any delay or failure to perform
   any of its obligations set forth in the Agreement due to causes beyond
   its reasonable control. Neither party shall be liable for any
   unavailability or inoperability of the Internet, technical malfunction,
   or computer error or corruption resulting in loss of data or other
   harm.
   12.7 Sections 6, 8, 9, 10 and 11 and 12 together with any outstanding
   undisputed payment obligation, shall survive the termination of the
   Agreement.
   12.8 Customer and Outbrain shall each act as independent contractors.
   Nothing in the Agreement shall be deemed or create or construed as
   creating a joint venture or partnership between the parties.
   12.9 The Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties
   with respect to the subject matter hereof, and may not be modified
   without the prior written consent of both parties. In no event shall
   any inconsistent or conflicting terms and conditions contained in any
   purchase order, insertion order, invoice or other document submitted by
   Customer concerning the subject matter hereof have any force or effect
   even if accepted or signed by Outbrain.

Cookies

Version 4.4

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   OUTBRAIN'S COOKIE TABLE
   This Cookie Table provides you with information about the cookies and
   other similar technologies Outbrain and/or its partners may use, their
   purpose and the retention period associated with such cookie. Where a
   third party partner drops a cookie, they determine the purpose for
   which that cookie is dropped and the relevant retention period.
   We may place cookies or similar files such as pixel tags and web
   beacons on the devices you use to engage with Outbrain for security
   purposes, to facilitate site navigation and to personalize your
   experience when you engage with Outbrain as a Site Vistior, a User or a
   Business Partner. Cookies allow us to collect technical and
   navigational information, such as browser type, time spent by you
   engaging with Outbrain and pages visited. Please read the Privacy
   Policy to further understand how we use data collected by these
   cookies.
   For even more information about cookies, we recommend visiting:
   https://cookies.insites.com/about-cookies/
   Users
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same page
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Site Visitors
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Unbounce

     Ubvt

     Ubvs

     ubpv
   These cookies are associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.

     3 days

     3 days

     5 months
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It is variation of the _gat cookie
   which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by Google on high
   traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Google Univesral Analytics
     * _ga
     * _gid

     This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports.

     This cookie is associated with Google Universal Analytics. No
   information is available from Google however, it appears to store and
   update a unique value for each page visited.
     * 2 years
     * a day

   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar. It uniquely identifies a visitor during a single browser
   session and indicates they are included in an audience sample.
   Session
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Piwik
     * _pk_id*
     * _pk_ses*

   These cookies are set by Piwiki and are used to help website owners
   track visitor behaviour and measure site performance. They are a
   pattern type cookie, where the prefix is followed by a short series of
   numbers and letters, which is believed to be a reference code for the
   domain setting the cookie.
     * 1 year
     * 24 minutes

   Kissmetrics

     km_lv

     km_uq

     km_ai
   These cookies are set by Kissmetrics analytics service. They are used
   to provide site owners with information about how visitors use the
   site.
   5 years
   Bing
     * MUIDB
     * MUID

   This domain is owned by Mircosoft - it is the site for the search
   engine Bing.
   a year
   JSESSIONID
   This domain is controlled by New Relic, which provides a platform for
   monitoring the performance of web and mobile applications.
   Session
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   obuid
   This cookie is used to hold an anonymous user's ID. IT is used for
   tracking user actions.
   3 months
   c
   This domain is owned by IPONWEB and is used to provide a real time
   bidding platform for online advertising.
   1 year
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   1 year
   TheTradeDesk
     * TDID
     * TDCPM

   This domain is owned by TheTradeDesk. The main business activity is: Ad
   Serving Platform
   1 year
   _uv_id
   This domain is owned by LinkedIn. It is used to provide services for
   embedding slide presentations into websites. Information collected via
   cookies on this domain can also be used for targeted advertising
   purposes.
   2 years
   YouTube
     * HSID
     * Demographics
     * VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
     * PREF
     * LOGIN_INFO
     * GPS
     * YSC

   YouTube collects user data through videos embedded in websites, which
   is aggregated with profile data from other Google services in order to
   display targeted advertising to web visitors. These cookies are:
     * Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user
       account and most recent login time
     * Used for demographic profiling and targeting for advertising
     * This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of
       videos
     * Stores user preference, can be used to personalise ads on google
       searches
     * Used for targeted advertising to web visitors across a broad range
       of their own and other websites.

     1 year

     1 year

     1 month

     5 years

     2 years

     a month

     Session
   Linkedin
     * BizoID
     * Lidc
     * __utmv
     * __utmz
     * __utmb
     * __utmt
     * Bcookie
     * Lang
     * __utma
     * SERVERID
     * language
     * bscookie__qca
     * __qca
     * __utmc
     * UserMatchHistory
     * visit

   These cookies are associated with Linkedin It typically acts as a third
   party host where website owners have placed one of its content sharing
   buttons in their pages, although its content and services can be
   embedded in other ways. Although such buttons add functionality to the
   website they are on, cookies are set regardless of whether or not the
   visitor has an active Linkedin profile, or agreed to their terms and
   conditions. For this reason it is classified as a primarily
   tracking/targeting domain.

     30 days

     1 month

     8 months

     6 months

     21 minutes

     a few seconds

     8 months

     Session

     2 years

     Session

     Session

     8 months

     2 months

     Session

     2 days

     8 months

   Facebook

     datr

     fr

     lu
   These cookies are owned by Facebook:

     It is not directly tied to individual Facebook the user. It is used
   to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially around
   detection of bots trying to access the service. This cookie is also
   read via Like and other Facebook buttons and tags placed on many
   different websites.

     This is used to serve targeted advertising to its users when logged
   into its services. In 2014 it also started serving up behaviourally
   targeted advertising on other websites, similar to most dedicated
   online marketing companies. Contains browser and user unique ID
   combination, used for targeted advertising.

     This is used to serve targeted advertising to its users when logged
   into its services. In 2014 it also started serving up behaviourally
   targeted advertising on other websites, similar to most dedicated
   online marketing companies. Contains browser and user unique ID
   combination, used for targeted advertising

     1 year

     3 months

     1 year
   Twitter
     * auth_token
     * twll
     * secure_session
     * guest_id
     * personalization_id
     * remember_checked
     * remember_checked_on
     * lang

   This domain is owned by Twitter. The main business activity is: Social
   Networking Services. Where twitter acts as a third party host, it
   collects data through a range of plug-ins and integrations, that is
   primarily used for tracking and targeting.

     15 years

     5 years

     15 years

     a year

     2 years

     5 years

     4 years

     session
   Google
     * APISID
     * SSID
     * NID
     * SAPISID

   This cookies are owned by Google Inc. It uses the data gathered from
   most of these services to profile the interests of web users and sell
   advertising space to organisations based on such interest profiles as
   well as aligning adverts to the content on the pages where its
   customer's adverts appear.

     2 years

     8 months

     5 months

     2 years
   AA003
   This domain is owned by Atlas Solutions which is in turn owned by
   Facebook. Atlas is an online advertising business, targeting users
   through tracking their web activity. From September 2014 the company
   re-launched under the ownership of Facebook, promising the ability to
   reach known users and target adverts based on profiles generated using
   Facebook's user data.
   2 months
   u
   This domain is owned by Aggregate Knowledge, which has been acquired by
   Neustar Inc. Aggregate Knowledge provides a data management platform
   which enables real time targeting and consumer profiling functionality.
   a month
   __cfduid
   This domain is owned by AddToAny. The main business activity is: Social
   Sharing Services and Tracking
   1 year
   rlas3
   This domain is owned by Live Ramp Inc, providers of a platform for
   targeted marketing and profiling.
   1 year
   Bluekai
     * bku
     * bkdc
     * bkpa

   This domain is owned by Blue Kai. The main business activity is:
   Advertising/Audience Targeting
   5 months
   d
   This domain is owned by Quantcast. The main business activity is:
   Market and Audience Segmentation, Targeted advertising services
   2 months
   Adobe Audience Manager
     * demdex
     * dpm

   This domain is owned by Adobe - Audience Manager.
   The main business activity is: Online profiling for targeted marketing
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
     * 6 months
     * 5 months

   tuuid_lu
   This domain is owned by IPONWEB and is used to provide a real time
   bidding platform for online advertising.
   1 year
   Amazon
     * ad-id
     * ad-privacy

   This domain is owned by online retailer Amazon and is used as part of
   its affiliate marketing programme.
     * 8 months
     * 8 months

   Doubleclick
     * id
     * IDE

   This domain is owned by Doubleclick (Google). The main business
   activity is: Doubleclick is Googles real time bidding advertising
   exchange
     * 8 months
     * 2 years

   OnAudience
     * cookie
     * done_redirects161

   This domain is owned by OnAudience. The company provides a range of
   marketing and advertising services.
     * a year
     * a month

   uuid2
   This domain is owned by AppNexus Inc. The company provides a range of
   online advertising technology and services.
   2 months
   pxcr
   This domain is owned by Live Ramp Inc, providers of a platform for
   targeted marketing and profiling.
   a month
   MediaMath
     * uuidc
     * uuid

   This domain is owned by MediaMath Inc. a US based digital advertising
   business.
   a year
   comScore
     * UID
     * UIDR

   This domain is owned by ScorecardResearch (comScore). The main business
   activity is: Advertising. The cookies in this domain have lifespans of
   2 years.
     * a month
     * 2 years

   ruds
   This domain is owned by Rocketfuel. The main business activity is:
   Advertising
   Session
   ab
   This domain is owned by Aggregate Knowledge, which has been acquired by
   Neustar Inc. Aggregate Knowledge provides a data management platform
   which enables real time targeting and consumer profiling functionality.
   Session
   ATN
   This domain is owned by Atlas Solutions which is in turn owned by
   Facebook. Atlas is an online advertising business, targeting users
   through tracking their web activity. From September 2014 the company
   re-launched under the ownership of Facebook, promising the ability to
   reach known users and target adverts based on profiles generated using
   Facebook's user data.
   2 years
   uvc
   This domain is owned by AddToAny. The main business activity is: Social
   Sharing Services and Tracking
   a month
   custom_data
   This domain is owned by BidSwitch. The company provides a range of
   marketing and advertising services.
   10+ years
   eud
   This domain is owned by Rocketfuel. The main business activity is:
   Advertising
   a year
   EE
   This domain is owned by Exelate. The main business activity is:
   Advertising Data Aggregation
   3 months
   _kuid_
   This domain is owned by Krux Digital, a US company providing a data
   management platform which enables real time profiling of visitor
   interests.
   5 months
   pi
   This domain appears to be connected to a company called Bombora, a USA
   based audience targeting and intelligence business.
   a year
   uid
   This domain is owned by Adform. The main business activity is: Real
   time bidding for display advertising to targeted audiences.
   a month
   ud
   This domain is owned by Exelate. The main business activity is:
   Advertising Data Aggregation
   3 months
   tuuid
   This domain is owned by IPONWEB and is used to provide a real time
   bidding platform for online advertising.
   a year
   Quantcast
     * mc
     * d

   This domain is owned by Quantcast. The main business activity is:
   Market and Audience Segmentation, Targeted advertising services
   2 months
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   recs_xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
   This is a pattern type cookie with the root being recs_ and the rest of
   the name being a unique, 32-length alphanumeric string. This cookie is
   used to store recommended documents so that the same document isn't
   recommended twice.
   1 minute or refresh
   ___distillery
   This cookie may be set by the website itself, or by Wistia, to support
   video functionality that may be found throughot the website. In
   addition to keeping track of the website visitor's position in a video
   should playback be interrupted, this cookie also notes user behavior
   regarding the video itself.
   1 year
   Vimeo
     * player
     * vuid

   This domain is owned by Vimeo. The main business activity is: Video
   Hosting/Sharing
     * 1 year
     * 2 years

   Business Partners
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Outbrains Cookie-Tabelle
   In dieser Cookie-Tabelle erhalten Sie verständliche und umfassende
   Informationen über die Cookies und ähnliche Technologien, die wir
   verwenden.
   Gegebenenfalls setzen wir auf den Geräten, die Sie zur Interaktion mit
   Outbrain verwenden, Cookies oder ähnliche Dateien wie Pixel-Tags und
   Web-Beacons, und zwar aus Sicherheitsgründen, zur leichteren
   Website-Navigation und zur Personalisierung Ihrer Erfahrung bei der
   Interaktion mit Outbrain als Websitebesucher, Nutzer oder
   Geschäftspartner. Cookies ermöglichen uns, technische oder für die
   Navigation erforderliche Informationen zu erfassen, beispielsweise
   Browsertyp, die Zeit, die Sie mit der Interaktion mit Outbrain
   verbracht haben, oder die besuchten Seiten. Bitte lesen Sie die
   Datenschutzbestimmungen, damit Sie genauer verstehen, wie wir Daten
   verwenden.
   Nutzer
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Websitebesucher
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Geschäftspartner
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Tabla de cookies de Outbrain
   La presente Tabla de cookies te facilita información clara y completa
   sobre las cookies y otras tecnologías similares que utilizamos.
   Es posible que introduzcamos cookies o archivos similares, como
   etiquetas de píxel y balizas web (web beacons), en los dispositivos que
   utilices para interactuar con Outbrain por motivos de seguridad, para
   facilitar la navegación por el sitio y para personalizar tu experiencia
   cuando interactúes con Outbrain como Visitante del Sitio, Usuario o
   Socio comercial. Las cookies nos permiten recopilar información técnica
   y de navegación, como el tipo de navegador, el tiempo que interactúas
   con Outbrain y las páginas visitadas. Por favor, lee la Política de
   privacidad para entender mejor cómo utilizamos los datos.
   Utenti
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visitantes del sitio
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Socios comerciales
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Table des cookies d’Outbrain
   Cette Table des cookies vous donne des informations claires et
   détaillées sur les cookies et autres technologies similaires que nous
   utilisons.
   Nous sommes susceptibles de déposer des cookies ou autres fichiers
   similaires comme des balises pixel ou des balises Web sur les appareils
   que vous utilisez en lien avec Outbrain pour des raisons de sécurité,
   pour faciliter la navigation dans le site, ou personnaliser votre
   expérience quand vous interagissez avec Outbrain en tant que Visiteur
   du Site, Utilisateur ou Partenaire commercial. Les cookies nous
   permettent de collecter des données techniques et de navigation, comme
   le type de navigateur, le temps passé à interagir avec Outbrain et les
   pages visitées. Veuillez lire la Politique de confidentialité pour
   mieux comprendre comment nous utilisons les cookies suivants.
   Utilisateurs
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visiteurs du site
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Partenaires commerciaux
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Tabella dei cookie di Outbrain
   La presente tabella dei cookie fornisce informazioni chiare complete
   sui cookie e su altre tecnologie simili che utilizziamo.
   Possiamo installare cookie o file analoghi quali pixel tag e web beacon
   sui dispositivi che utilizzi per interagire con Outbrain per finalità
   di sicurezza, per facilitare la navigazione sul sito e per
   personalizzare la tua esperienza quando interagisci con Outbrain in
   veste di Visitatore del sito, Utente o Partner commerciale. I cookie ci
   consentono di raccogliere informazioni tecniche e sulla navigazione,
   quali il tipo di browser, il tempo che hai trascorso interagendo con
   Outbrain e le pagine visitate. Si raccomanda di leggere la politica
   sulla privacy per capire meglio come utilizziamo i dati.
   Utenti
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visitatori del sito
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Partner commerciali
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   TABELA DE COOKIES DA OUTBRAIN
   Esta tabela de cookies fornece informações claras e completas sobre os
   cookies e outras tecnologias similares usadas por nós.
   Podemos instalar cookies ou arquivos similares como pixel tags ou web
   beacons nos aparelhos que você usa para interagir com a Outbrain, por
   fins de segurança, para facilitar a navegação no site e para
   personalizar sua experiência ao interagir com a Outbrain como Visitante
   do Site, Usuário ou Parceiro Comercial. Cookies nos permitem coletar
   informações técnicas e relacionadas à navegação, como tipo de
   navegador, tempo gasto por você na interação com a Outbrain e páginas
   visitadas. Leia a Política de Privacidade para compreender melhor como
   usamos os dados.
   Usuários
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visitantes do Site
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Parceiros Comercials
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Amplify Terms

Version 8.3

Effective September 3, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   Estes Termos e Condições foram revisados e estão atualizados na data
   efetiva estabelecida acima. Outbrain reserva-se o direito de alterar
   esses Termos e Condições de tempos em tempos.
   Termos e Condições
   Estes Termos e Condições Amplos (“Termos”) são celebrados pela Outbrain
   Inc. (“Outbrain”) e a entidade executante de uma Ordem de Inserção
   (“Cliente”). Estes Termos regem o uso pelo Cliente dos serviços da
   Outbrain e, juntamente com um Pedido de Inserção (ou as informações
   inseridas através do painel de controle da Outbrain (“Painel de
   Controle”)) constitui o “Contrato” entre a Outbrain e o Cliente. Se
   houver qualquer inconsistência entre: (i) os termos de uma ordem de
   inserção assinados ou aqueles inseridos através do Painel de Controle
   (outros que os “Detalhes da Campanha”), e (ii) os Detalhes da Campanha,
   estes Termos, conforme aplicável, deverão prevalecer.
   1.&Tab;Serviços
   1.1&Tab; A Outbrain tem uma parceria com uma rede de propriedades
   online (a “Rede”) e exibe uma interface de usuários que contém links
   para conteúdos que navegam para os sites onde tal conteúdo é mantido (o
   “Serviço”). A Outbrain usa seus algoritmos para determinar quais links
   de conteúdo aparecem dentro do serviço na rede.
   1.2 A Outbrain deve exibir links para conteúdo gráfico, textual, video
   e/ou sonoro selecionado pelo Cliente (os links e conteúdos acessados a
   partir do link em conjunto são o “Conteúdo”) na Rede através do
   Serviço. A Outbrain deve continuar distribuindo o conteúdo na Rede até
   os segunites fatos, prevalecendo o que acontecer primeiro: (i) o fim do
   prazo da Campanha do Cliente, ou (ii) quando alcançado o orçamento do
   Cliente, ou (iii) quando desativada a campanha. A incidência das
   alíneas (i), ) e (ii) desta cláusula serão especificados pelo Cliente
   nas configurações da Campanha . A Outbrain reserva o direito de cobrar
   por Ações adicionais caso o Conteúdo seja retirado de circulação - ver
   FAQs para maiores detalhes.
   1.3 A Outbrain não garante: (i) a colocação, posicionamento ou o tempo
   de entrega de qualquer Conteúdo, (ii) cliques ou impressões de qualquer
   Conteúdo (incluindo cliques de um segmento de público específico), ou
   (iii) conversões. Se os honorários, conforme definidos na Cláusula 5,
   não atingirem o orçamento do Cliente, as únicas opções do Cliente são:
   (i) prorrogar a data final da campanha, (ii) substituir ou complementar
   o conteúdo com outro Conteúdo (sujeito à Cláusula 2 abaixo ) para
   completar a campanha; ou (iii) pagar apenas pelos cliques reais sobre o
   Conteúdo. Em nenhum caso a Outbrain será responsabilizada por não
   entregar o tráfego para o Conteúdo.
   1.4 A Outbrain disponibilizará relatórios para o Cliente relativamente
   a(s) campanha(s). Os relatórios finais mensais (os quais podem ser
   diferentes dos relatórios diários) servirão de base para o cálculo
   conclusivo dos honorários de serviço devidos pelo Cliente à Outbrain. O
   Cliente pode enviar o seu próprio rastreador de cliques compatível com
   a Outbrain. Se houver um desvio de 10% ou mais entre os números do
   Cliente (baseado no rastreador de cliques compatível com a Outbrain) e
   os números da Outbrain, então as partes concordam em trabalhar de
   boa-fé para identificar a quantidade correta a ser paga à Outbrain. Se
   a discrepância for inferior a 10%, os números da Outbrain serão
   definitivos.
   2.&Tab;Conteúdo
   2.1 O Cliente tem o direito e autoriza a Outbrain a colocar o Conteúdo
   na Rede e é o único responsável por determinar a propriedade, direitos
   de todas as naturezas, e legalidade do Conteúdo. Além disso, o Conteúdo
   selecionado pelo cliente deve estar de acordo com as Diretrizes de
   Publicidade da Outbrain, que podem ser atualizadas de tempos em tempos
   unilateralmente pela Outbrain. A Outbrain pode, a qualquer tempo,
   unilateralmente rejeitar ou remover o Conteúdo. O Cliente reconhece que
   a Outbrain não é responsável pelo Conteúdo e que o Conteúdo pode mudar
   durante o curso da campanha devido as revisões realizadas por seu
   autor, aos comentários dos leitores ou outras razões. O recurso do
   Cliente, em caso de tal mudança, será direcionar a Outbrain no sentido
   de remover tal Conteúdo de sua campanha atual e/ou selecionar outro
   Conteúdo. O Cliente reconhece ainda que, se houver objeção em relação
   ao Conteúdo (seja em relação ao Conteúdo do autor, editor o qualquer
   outro Conteúdo), a Outbrain irá atuar de acordo com a Cláusula 2 dos
   seus Termos de Uso, e poderá unilateralmente cessar,
   discricionariamente , a inclusão do Conteúdo no Serviço.
   2.2 O Cliente declara e garante que: (i) se o conteúdo foi escrito por
   ou sob direção do Cliente ou pago pelo Cliente, que possui todos os
   direitos e autorizações necessárias para usá-lo e reproduzi-lo, esse
   facto deve ser claramente divulgado no ou próximo ao Conteúdo; (ii) é
   autorizado a usar e/ou aprovou todas as palavras do título do Conteúdo
   (quer tenha sido escrito pelo Cliente ou em nome do Cliente); (iii) o
   título do Conteúdo corresponde precisamente ao objeto e ao assunto do
   Conteúdo; e (iv) está autorizado a usar e/ou aprovou toda e qualquer
   imagem relacionada às suas campanhas com a Outbrain.
   2.3&Tab; O Cliente não deverá, direta ou indiretamente, fornecer
   Conteúdo que: (i) seja obsceno, difamatório, calunioso, pornográfico,
   violento, profano, indecente ou ilegal; (ii) seja factualmente
   impreciso ou enganoso e/ou; (iii) facilite ou promova qualquer tipo de
   atividade ilegal, incluindo, sem hierarquia, o jogo, a venda ou o
   consumo de drogas ilícitas, ou discriminação ou assédio de qualquer
   indivíduo ou grupo. Ademais, cada parte do Conteudo do Cliente não
   poderá (a) redirecionar para um destino diferente daquele originalmente
   submetido ao Serviço, e/ou (b) ser substancialmente diferente do
   Conteúdo originalmente submetido ao Serviço.
   2.4 Ambas as partes devem implementar processos de verificação
   anti-malware do Conteúdo. Mediante notificação, ambas as partes devem
   tomar medidas imediatas para remover qualquer Conteúdo suspeito da
   Rede.
   3.&Tab;Termos e Cancelamento
   Nos Detalhes da Campanha ficarão estabelecidas a data de início e fim
   de uma campanha em particular. No entanto, o Contrato ou uma campanha
   individual podem ser suspensos ou cancelados: (i) pelo Cliente por
   qualquer motivo, mediante aviso prévio por escrito de dois (2) dias
   úteis para a Outbrain ou no prazo de 12 (doze) horas através do Painel
   de Controle, ou (ii) pela Outbrain por qualquer motivo mediante trinta
   (30) dias de aviso prévio por escrito para o Cliente. Durante o período
   de aviso prévio, todas as campanhas anteriormente contratadas devem
   continuar a funcionar de acordo com o estabelecido em Detalhes da
   Campanha e o Cliente será responsável pelo pagamento à Outbrain de
   todos os cliques recebidos durante esse período de aviso prévio. A
   Outbrain também se reserva o direito de suspender ou terminar o uso do
   Serviço por parte do Cliente se a Outbrain razoalvemente acreditar que
   o Cliente está em violação dos termos deste Acordo.
   4.&Tab;Detalhes da Campanha
   Se o Cliente utilizar o Painel da Outbrain, o Cliente terá acesso a
   determinados relatórios online e controle sobre sua(s) campanha(s). Na
   medida em que o Cliente registre e tenha acesso ao Painel, a Outbrain
   pode coletar certas informações pessoalmente identificáveis do Cliente.
   A Outbrain coleta e processa esses dados pessoais com a finalidade de
   responder questões ou solicitações do Cliente, proporcionar ao Cliente
   o acesso a certos serviços, verificar a identidade do Cliente e para
   comunicar-se com o Cliente sobre o uso do Serviço. O Cliente é o único
   responsável por todas as alterações solicitadas ou aprovados
   (diretamente ou via API - Interface de Programação de Aplicativos - da
   Outbrain), inclusive as efetuadas através do Painel de Controle usando
   seu login. O Cliente é o único responsável por proteger o seu login e
   sua senha para o uso do Painel de Controle. O Cliente pode gerenciar
   campanhas usando o Painel para modificar Detalhes da Campanha, e/ou o
   Cliente pode ter a opção de trabalhar com um gerente de contas da
   Outbrain, conforme determinado pela Outbrain.
   5.&Tab;Honorários e Pagamento
   5.1 Os “Honorários” serão fixados com base na venda de produtos
   entregue através de um dos seguintes métodos de pagamento: (i) custo
   por click (“CPC”), (ii) custo por mil impressões (“CPM”) ou (iii)
   outras ações desejadas e acordadas entre as partes, de tempos em
   tempos, cada uma denominada"Ação”. O Cliente deve pagar Honorários e
   taxas incidentes à Outbrain pelo Conteúdo do Cliente entregue, na Rede,
   e medida pelo sistema de rastreamento da Outbrain. Caso o CPC esteja
   sendo utilizado para medir a campanha o CPC não deverá ser menor que o
   CPC mínimo em vigor da Outbrain na época (o qual pode variar de acordo
   com o mercado).
   Se o Cliente estiver utilizando a ferramenta obrigatória automática da
   Outbrain, o Cliente concede à Outbrain o direito de definir e modificar
   o CPC do Cliente, a critério da Outbrain, para que e Outbrain possa
   ajudar a alcançar as metas do Cliente para sua campanha. O Cliente será
   o único responsável por quaisquer honorários adicionais devidos pela
   utilização da veiculação de anúncios de terceiros em suas campanhas. O
   Cliente pode aumentar ou diminuir seu orçamento através do Painel de
   Contrôle ou através do aditamento do Pedido de Inserção.
   5.2 Se o Cliente assinou uma Ordem de Inserção, os honorários serão
   geralmente faturados pela Outbrain ao Cliente no no último dia do
   calendário do mês seguinte, salvo se de outra forma estabelecido em uma
   Ordem de Iinserção. O Cliente deverá pagar todas as faturas no prazo de
   trinta (30) dias a partir do recebimento. Qualquer valor de uma
   cobrança não contestada de boa fé deve ser paga na íntegra. Se o
   Cliente forneceu os Detalhes da Campanha através do Painel de Controle
   ou assinou uma Ordem de Inserção e usou um cartão de crédito para fins
   de faturamento, a Outbrain deverá cobrar suas taxas (incluindo taxas de
   processamento) através do cartão de crédito do Cliente em intervalos
   determinados pela Outbrain, a seu exclusivo critério. A decisão sobre
   permitir ou não ao cliente escolher entre fatura e cartão de crédito
   recai exclusivamente sobre a Outbrain. A Outbrain deve analisar todos
   os pedidos de faturação, incluindo os pedidos de reembolso, caso-a-caso
   e se reserva o direito de aprovar ou negar qualquer pedido a seu
   exclusivo critério.
   5.3 Se o Cliente contestar qualquer quantia em uma fatura, o Cliente
   deverá fornecer um aviso por escrito à Outbrain (por e-mail é
   suficiente) no prazo de trinta (30) dias após o recebimento da fatura.
   O e-mail do cliente Cliente deve incluir o valor contestado e fornecer
   informações adequadas para apoiar tal reivindicação. Dentro de vinte
   (20) dias úteis após o recebimento do e-mail do Cliente, a Outbrain
   investigará e fornecerá uma resposta por escrito ao Cliente. O Cliente
   não pode reter o pagamento de quaisquer quantias não contestadas, e
   qualquer parte de uma cobrança não contestada de boa fé deve ser paga
   integralmente dentro de trinta (30) dias a partir do recebimento da
   fatura.
   5.4 Se o pagamento não for realizado no prazo previsto e não for
   devidamente contestado de acordo com a Cláusula 5.3, a Outbrain pode
   cobrar juros de mora à taxa de 12% ao ano, a partir da data de
   vencimento até a data do efetivo pagamento, bem como correção monetária
   conforme a variação positiva do IGPM/FGV no período, seja antes ou após
   o julgamento. A Outbrain também se reserva o direito de suspender ou
   cancelar o uso do Cliente do Serviço até que o Cliente pague todos os
   valores devidos e de cobrar do Cliente todos os custos de cobrança,
   incluindo a agência de cobrança e honorários advocatícios e custos
   judiciais. O Cliente autoriza a Outbrain a investigar o histórico de
   crédito do Cliente. Se aplicável, o Cliente concorda em fornecer essas
   informações financeiras e documentação que possam ser solicitadas de
   tempos em tempos pela Outbrain como condição para a contínua extensão
   de crédito. O Cliente reconhece e concorda que qualquer conta, cartão
   de crédito e informações relacionadas a cobrança e pagamento que o
   Cliente forneça à Outbrain pode ser compartilhado pela Outbrain com
   empresas que trabalhem em seu benefício com a exclusiva finalidade de
   executar verificações de crédito, efetuar pagamento em favor da
   Outbrain, coletar dívidas para a Outbrain e/ou para fins de manutenção
   de conta do Cliente. A Outbrain pode, a seu exclusivo critério,
   prorrogar, rever ou revogar o crédito a qualquer tempo.
   5.5 Caso o cliente solicite à um terceira parte segmentos para uma
   segmentação aprimorada (3ª Parte) da sua(s) campanha(s), o Cliente
   concorda que deverá efetuar o pagamento dos honorários por click para a
   3ª Parte (geralmente varia de $0.05 e $0.95 por click), baseados no
   preço de um segmento em particular fixado pelo provedor de dados da 3ª
   Parte (Custos dos Dados da 3ª Parte) para uso da 3ª Parte nas sua(s)
   campanhas (s), incluindo ainda todas os impostos e taxas aplicáveis. As
   notas fiscais emitidas pelo Cliente para cada campanha deverão incluir
   os honorários devidos à Outbrain, em conformidade com a cláusula 5.1 e
   o Custos dos Dados da 3ª Parte pelo uso dos mesmo pela 3ª Parte. A
   Outbrain deverá pagar ao Provedor de Dados da 3ª Parte em nome do
   Cliente. O Cliente concorda que todos os clicks utilizados no cálculo
   dos custos do Provedor de Dados da 3ª Parte serão fundamentados no
   relatório de métricas da Outbrain.
   6.&Tab;Recursos e Termos Adicionais
   6.1 6.1 Outbrain também pode disponibilizar, de tempos em tempos,
   recursos adicionais de Serviços ao Cliente, os quais poderão estar
   sujeitos à concordância do Cliente de certos termos e condições
   adicionais (“Termos Adicionais”) (por exemplo, através de um acordo via
   acesso online ou através do Painel de Controle). Esses recursos serão
   fornecidos a critério da Outbrain, ao Cliente, e podem incluir
   honorários adicionais de CPC, além dos descritos na Cláusula 5.1. A
   aceitação, pelo Cliente, dos Termos Adicionais constituirá acordo
   vinculativo e executável entre a Outbrain e o Cliente. Na hipótese de
   um conflito entre estes Termos, os Termos Adicionais e os Detalhes da
   Campanha, a ordem de precedência será a seguinte: (i) Termos
   Adicionais, (ii) Detalhes da Campanha, e (iii) estes Termos. Os
   Clientes que escolherem utilizar os serviços LiveRamp (através do
   Painel de Controle da Outbrain ou de outra forma), para fins da sua
   campanha na Outbrain, estão sujeitos aos Termos da Outbrain LiveRamp.
   6.2 Sujeito ao cumprimento pelo Cliente o disposto na Cláusula 8
   abaixo, o Cliente poderá (i) colocar o(s) pixel(s) da Outbrain
   (“Outbrain Pixel”) no site ou nas páginas do aplicativo do Cliente e/ou
   (ii) Tags ou Pixel de terceiros (“Pixels de Terceiros”) com a
   finalidade de proporcionar análises relacionadas à campanha do Cliente
   e/ou à funcionalidade de segmentação aprimorada (os Pixels da Outbrain
   e os Pixels de Terceiros são chamados conjuntamente de “Pixels”) . O
   Cliente declara e garante que: (a) o uso dos Pixels está em
   conformidade com as Leis de Proteção de Dados, e (b) providenciou a
   devida notificação aos usuários a respeito do uso de pixels, incluindo
   explicações a respeito: (1) de que terceiros, incluindo a Outbrain,
   poderão utilizar cookies ou outras tecnologias similares para coletar
   ou receber de informações do site(s) do Cliente e que estas informações
   poderão ser utilizadas para proporcionar medidas de serviços e
   propaganda direcionada; e (2) como os usuários podem recusar a coleta
   de informações para fins de direcionamento de conteúdo. O Cliente
   declara estar ciente de que não poderá utilizar pixels sem antes
   cumprir com o disposto nesta Cláusula 6.2.
   6.3 Caso o Cliente tenha solicitado segmentos de terceiros para
   segmentação aprimorada (“Segmentação de Terceiros”) da sua campanha(s)
   o Cliente deverá pagar pelo uso da Segmentação de Terceiros (“Custos de
   Dados de Terceiros ”), incluindo as taxas e os impostos. A nota fiscal
   do Cliente, para cada uma das campanhas, deve incluir tanto os
   honorários da Outbrain, de acordo com a cláusula 5.1, como os Custos de
   Dados de Terceiros (caso seja aplicável), pela utilização de
   Segmentação de Terceiros. O Cliente concorda que todos os cliques, para
   fins de cálculo dos Custos de Dados de Terceiros, serão baseados nos
   relatórios métricos da Outbrain. Caso o Cliente utilize Segmentação de
   Terceiros, o Cliente deverá: (i) revelar o uso aos usuários, através da
   notificação cabível e/ou nas suas políticas de privacidade
   (aplicáveis), e (ii) não utilizar Segmentação de Terceiros para atingir
   categorias de dados menores e sensíveis.
   7. Confidencialidade
   7.1 Cada parte concorda em respeitar qualquer Informação Confidencial
   (como definido abaixo) que seja revelada de uma parte para a outra em
   relação ao Contrato, a parte que receber tal Informação Confidencial
   não a divulgará para quaisquer terceiros ou irá usá-la para qualquer
   fim exceto se relacionado a seus direitos e obrigações dentro do
   Contrato. “Informação Confidencial” significa toda informação relativa
   à parte ou quaisquer de suas subsidiárias ou afiliadas que não seja
   geralmente conhecida pelo público, a informação que seja marcada como
   confidencial ou de propriedade, ou como informações confidenciais ou de
   propriedade, ou que, sob as circunstâncias, deveriam razoavelmente ser
   tratadas como confidenciais ou de propriedade, e inclui, sem limitação,
   os termos do Contrato. Não obstante o acima descrito, Informações
   Confidenciais não incluem informações que: (i) a partir do momento da
   divulgação, ou após essa data tornam-se de domínio público através de
   uma fonte que não seja a parte que a recebeu; (ii) esteja legalmente em
   posse da parte que a recebeu a partir do momento da divulgação; (iii)
   tenha sido desenvolvida de forma independente pela parte receptora sem
   referência à Informação Confidencial; ou (iv) seja posteriormente
   obtida por um terceiro não sujeito a uma obrigação de confidencialidade
   com relação à informação divulgada.
   7.2 Informações Confidenciais serão mantidas em sigilo estrito e devem
   ser protegidas com todas as medidas de segurança necessárias e
   razoáveis. Informações Confidenciais não serão liberadas pela parte
   receptora a ninguém, exceto um funcionário ou agente que tenha
   necessidade de conhecê-la e que esteja vinculado por obrigações de
   confidencialidade pelo menos tão restritas quanto estas aqui contidas.
   Nenhuma das partes vai usar qualquer porção das informações
   confidenciais fornecidas pela outra parte, nos termos do Contrato, para
   qualquer outra finalidade que não aquelas expressamente definidas no
   âmbito do Contrato. Não obstante, quaisquer das partes pode divulgar
   Informações Confidenciais estritamente necessárias para cumprir as
   exigências de qualquer ordem judicial, lei ou agência governamental e a
   Outbrain pode compartilhar informações confidenciais de Cliente com
   qualquer empresa holding do Cliente ou com qualquer empresa subsidiária
   da holding do Cliente.
   7.3 Se o Cliente estiver agindo em nome de um provedor de Conteúdo, o
   Cliente autoriza a Outbrain a conceder a tal provedor de Conteúdo (ou
   qualquer terceiro subsequente nomeado pelo provedor de conteúdo) o
   acesso e o direito de usar os Detalhes da Campanha.
   8.&Tab;Representações adicionais e Garantias / Isenções de
   responsabilidade
   8.1&Tab; Cada parte representa e garante à outra parte que: (i) possui
   todos os direitos e poderes necessários para celebrar o Contrato e
   garantir os direitos e licenças no âmbito do Contrato; (ii) cumprirá as
   Leis Aplicáveis; e (iii) a execução ou aceitação do Contrato (que
   inclui os Detalhes da Campanha), e o desempenho das suas respectivas
   obrigações e deveres nos termos do Contrato não irá violar qualquer
   contrato a qual tal parte esteja vinculada. “Leis Aplicáveis” significa
   quaisquer leis ou regulamentos federais, estaduais ou estrangeiros
   aplicáveis ou quaisquer regras ou diretrizes de autorregulamentação do
   setor (incluindo Diretrizes, Padrões e Melhores Práticas do Interactive
   Advertising Bureau, o Código de Conduta da NAI, os Princípios de
   Autorregulação da DAA para Publicidade Comportamental Online, a
   Proteção de Geral de Dados da UE (2016/679) (“GDPR’). A GDPR juntamente
   com qualquer proteção nacional de dados são doravante designadas como
   “Leis de Proteção de Dados”.
   8.2 O Cliente adicionalmente representa e declara que: (i) o Conteúdo
   não viola quaisquer Leis Aplicáveis, regras e regulamentos aplicáveis e
   não contêm qualquer material que possa ser prejudicial, abusivo,
   obsceno, ameaçador ou difamatório; (ii) possui todos os direitos
   necessários para permitir e garantir a Outbrain nos termos do Acordo
   todos os direitos que sejam necessários para a Outbrain (conforme
   aplicável) usar, hospedar, ocultar, percorrer, armazenar, copiar,
   modificar, distribuir, reformatar, reproduzir, publicar, exibir,
   transmitir e distribuir o Conteúdo; (iii) o uso do Conteúdo de acordo
   com o Contrato não irá infringir quaisquer direitos de propriedade
   intelectual de terceiros; (iv) não pode e não tentará fornecer conteúdo
   destinado a crianças menores de treze (13) anos; (v) não usará o
   Serviço de maneira a obter uma vantagem inesperada ou interferir com a
   integridade e/ou perfomance geral do Serviço; e (vi) se estiver usando
   o Painel de Controle, o Cliente adere a quaisquer regras de uso tal
   como determinado pela Outbrain (por exemplo, não usando “source
   bidding” para listar em “whitelist” qualquer fonte de Rede particular).
   8.3 Se o Cliente é uma agência (ou outro tipo de terceiro agindo em
   nome do provedor do Conteúdo), o Cliente declara e garante que: (i) é o
   agente autorizado do provedor do Conteúdo; (ii) tem a autoridade legal
   para entrar no Contrato e tomar todas as decisões e ações relacionadas
   ao provedor do Conteúdo; (iii) firmou um contrato por escrito que
   concede à agência autoridade para representar o provedor do Conteúdo,
   de acordo com (i) e (ii) acima (e deve submeter esse contrato à
   Outbrain sob demanda). O Cliente também concorda que não está agindo,
   através do Painel de Controle, em nome de uma empresa francesa ou
   estrangeira cujo conteúdo de propaganda visa atingir principalmente o
   território francês. Se o Cliente está agindo em nome de um provedor que
   visa atingir o territorio francês, por favor, entre em contato com
   info@outbrain.com para obter mais informações sobre como adquirir
   Serviços Outbrain em nome de um provedor de conteúdo francês cujo a
   propaganda vise atingir o território frances e em conformidade com as
   leis francesas aplicáveis.
   8.4&Tab; EXCETO SE EXPRESSAMENTE EXPOSTO ADIANTE NO CONTRATO, A
   OUTBRAIN NÃO FAZ QUAISQUER DECLARAÇÕES OU GARANTIAS, EXPRESSAS OU
   IMPLÍCITAS – INCLUSIVE, MAS NÃO LIMITANDO-SE À GARANTIAS DE
   COMERCIALIZAÇÃO, TÍTULO, NÃO-VIOLAÇÃO, OU ADEQUAÇÃO A UM DETERMINADO
   FIM, OU QUAISQUER GARANTIAS DECORRENTES DE UM CONTRATO, USO OU PRÁTICA
   COMERCIAL – SOBRE SEUS SERVIÇOS E O DESEMPENHO OU ÊXITO DE QUALQUER
   CAMPANHA REALIZADA EM BENEFÍCIO DO CLIENTE, OU QUE O SERVIÇO FUNCIONE
   ININTERRUPTAMENTE, DE FORMA SEGURA E SEM ERROS.
   9.&Tab; Proteção de Dados
   9.1 As partes reconhecem que alguns ou todos os dados usados ou
   coletados por meio do Serviço (ou uso dos Pixels da Outbrain) poderão
   se qualificar como ou incluir Dados Pessoais. Contudo, até a Data
   Efetiva a Outbrain não envia e/ou recebe quaisquer Dados Pessoais do
   usuário final ao Cliente.
   9.2 Além de cumprir com todas as Leis Aplicáveis (incluindo-se as Leis
   de Proteção de Dados) cada parte deve se responsabilizar,
   individualmente, por incluir as previsões de notificações relevantes e
   obter o devido consentimento como requerido nas Leis de Proteção de
   Dados e, na medida do necessário, as partes devem: (i) colaborar no que
   diz respeito às solicitações dos Titulares dos Dados e (ii) implementar
   medidas técnicas e organizacionais apropriadas medidas para prevenir,
   de forma acidental ou ilegal, a destruição, perda, alteração,
   divulgação não autorizada ou acesso de Dados Pessoais. As partes
   deverão manter e exibir em seus respectivos sites uma política de
   privacidade facilmente acessível e identificável que divulgue o uso de
   cookies (baseados em redirecionamento ou qualquer outro meio) através
   do Serviço e (ii) que inclua detalhes relevantes sobre os controles de
   segurança e transferências internacionais de cada parte. Os termos
   “Titulares dos Dados”, “Dados Pessoais”, “Violação de Dados Pessoais” e
   “Controlador” terão os significados declarados no GDPR.
   10.&Tab;Indenização
   10.1&Tab; Cada parte defenderá, indenizará e segurará a outra de
   qualquer má conduta assim como seus agentes representativos, afiliadas,
   subsidiárias, diretores, representantes legais, empregados,
   contratados, e sócios da Rede (se aplicável) em caso de toda e qualquer
   demanda de terceiros que resulte da quebra das obrigações e
   representações do Contrato.
   10.2 Em relação a quaisquer de tais demandas : (i) a parte a ser
   indenizada proverá uma pronta notificação por escrito para a parte a
   indenizar sobre quaisquer de tais demandas ( visto que a falha em
   prover tal pronta notificação não exonerará a parte a indenizar de suas
   obrigações de indenização no Contrato, exceto à medida em que já tenha
   sofrido dano ); (ii) a parte a indenizar deverá ter sozinha o controle
   de defesa e regularização da demanda (dado que a parte a indenizar não
   pode entrar em qualquer acordo que possa afetar de forma adversa os
   direitos e obrigações da parte a ser indenizada sem o consentimento
   prévio por escrito da parte a ser indenizada); (iii) a pedido e
   despesas da parte a indenizar, a parte a ser indenizada cooperará com a
   investigação e defesa de tal demanda; e (iv) a parte a ser indenizada
   terá o direito de participar na sua defesa com o advogado de sua
   própria escolha, a despesas da parte a ser indenizada.
   11.&Tab;Limitação de Responsabilidade
   EXCETO COM RELAÇÃO A DEMANDAS DECORRENTES DE OBRIGAÇÕES DE INDENIZAÇÃO
   , DOLO OU VIOLAÇÃO DA NORMA DE CONFIDENCIALIDADE E/OU NÃO PAGAMENTO DOS
   ENCARGOS DEVIDOS NO CONTRATO POR UMA DAS PARTES, A RESPONSABILIDADE
   TOTAL MÁXIMA AGREGADA DE UMA PARTE E SEUS DIRETORES, EXECUTIVOS,
   FUNCIONÁRIOS, FORNECEDORES, SÓCIOS DA REDE OU, AGENTES PARA QUALQUER
   AÇÃO, INDEPENDENTEMENTE DA FORMA DA AÇÃO, SEJA EM RESPONSABILIDADE
   CIVIL OU CONTRATO, SURGIDA OU RELACIONADA DE QUALQUER FORMA AO CONTRATO
   OU SUA APLICAÇÃO SERÁ LIMITADA AO MAIOR DE: (I) O VALOR DAS TAXAS A
   SEREM PAGAS PELO CLIENTE NO ÂMBITO DO CONTRATO NOS 12 MESES
   IMEDIATAMENTE ANTERIORES AO EVENTO QUE ORIGINE UMA DEMANDA; E (II) US $
   50.000,00. EM NENHUMA HIPÓTESE QUALQUER UMA DAS PARTES SERÁ RESPONSÁVEL
   POR DANOS CONSEQUENCIAIS, ESPECIAIS, PUNITIVOS OU FORTUITOS OU POR
   OUTROS DANOS DE QUALQUER NATUREZA, INCLUINDO, SEM SE LIMITAR A, PERDA
   DE DADOS, PERDA DE RECEITAS OU PERDA DE LUCROS, DECORRENTES DE OU DE
   ALGUMA FORMA RELACIONADOS AO CONTRATO OU SUA EXECUÇÃO, MESMO QUE TAL
   PARTE TENHA SIDO AVISADA DA POSSIBILIDADE DE TAIS DANOS.
   12.&Tab;Disposições Gerais
   12.1 Nenhuma das partes poderá outorgar o Contrato, no todo ou em
   parte, por força da lei ou de outra forma, sem o prévio consentimento
   por escrito da outra parte; previsto entretanto que, quaisquer das
   partes pode outorgar seus direitos ou delegar a sua competência no
   âmbito do Contrato, no todo ou em parte, sem o consentimento do outro,
   se em caso de fusão, reorganização ou venda de todos ou
   substancialmente todos os ativos da outorgante, desde que a entidade
   sucessora disponha de recursos suficientes para executar plenamente o
   Contrato e assumir a obrigação de cumpri-lo plenamente.
   &Tab;12.2&Tab; O presente Contrato será regido e interpretado de acordo
   com as leis do Estado de Nova York aplicáveis aos contratos celebrados
   e inteiramente executados dentro dele, sem levar em conta o corpo de
   lei relativo ao conflito de leis. Cada parte neste contrato de forma
   irrevogável e incondicional consente submeter-se à jurisdição exclusiva
   dos tribunais do Estado de Nova York e dos Estados Unidos da América,
   em cada caso localizado no Município de Nova York, para qualquer
   demanda resultante ou relacionada ao Contrato (e concorda em não
   começar qualquer reivindicação que lhe diga respeito que não seja em
   tais tribunais). A parte prevalecente em qualquer demanda decorrente do
   contrato terá o direito de recuperar taxas e custos razoáveis de seu
   advogado.
   12.3&Tab; Notas de imprensa ou anúncios públicos gerais não devem ser
   feitos sem o consentimento mútuo do Cliente e da Outbrain. A Outbrain
   terá o direito de incluir o nome do Cliente na lista de clientes da
   Outbrain e em outros materiais de marketing. Clientes não poderão usar
   o nome, logo ou a marca registrada da Outbrain sem a autorização prévia
   e por escrito da mesma.
   12.4 Todas as notificações no âmbito do Contrato devem ser por escrito
   e serão entregues por um serviço personalizado, fax confirmado, e-mail,
   correio expresso, ou carta registrada, com aviso de recebimento, para o
   endereço do destinatário definido na Ordem de Inserção, ou em qualquer
   outro endereço como pode ser indicado mediante notificação por escrito
   à outra parte, de tempos em tempos. A notificação será eficaz no
   recebimento.
   12.5&Tab; Nenhuma falha de quaisquer das partes em aplicar quaisquer de
   seus direitos ao abrigo do Contrato atuará como uma renúncia a tais
   direitos. Se uma ou mais disposições do Contrato forem considerados
   aplicáveis sob as Leis Aplicáveis, então essa (s) disposição (s) deve
   (m) ser excluída (s) do acordo, e o saldo do Contrato será executável
   de acordo com seus termos.
   12.6&Tab; Nenhuma das partes será responsável por qualquer atraso ou
   falha em cumprir quaisquer de suas obrigações estabelecidas no Contrato
   devido a causas que estejam fora de seu controle razoável. Nenhuma das
   partes será responsável por qualquer indisponibilidade ou
   inoperabilidade da Internet, falha técnica ou erro ou corrupção de
   computador resultando em perda de dados ou outros danos.
   12.7 As Cláusulas 6, 8, 9, 10, 11 e 12, em conjunto com qualquer
   disputa pendente de obrigação de pagamento sobreviverão à rescisão do
   Contrato.
   12.8&Tab; Nada no Contrato será considerado ou será interpretado como
   agindo para a criação de um empreendimento conjunto ou parceria entre
   as partes.
   12.9&Tab; O Contrato constitui a totalidade do acordo entre as partes
   com relação ao assunto aqui tratado e não pode ser modificado sem o
   prévio consentimento por escrito de ambas as partes. Em nenhuma
   hipótese, quaisquer termos e condições inconsistentes ou conflitantes
   contidos em qualquer ordem de compra, ordem de inserção, fatura ou
   outro documento enviado pelo Cliente relativo ao assunto aqui tratado,
   tem qualquer força ou efeito, ainda que aceito e assinado pela
   Outbrain.

Amplify Terms

Version 9.3

Effective December 7, 2018

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

                           Amplify 取引条件書

   本取引条件書は、上記の発効日に修正され、上記の発効日から現在の取引条件書となる。アウトブレインジャパン株式会社は本取引条件書を変更、修正、又は
   更新することができる。
   本Amplify取引条件書（以下「本条件書」という）は、アウトブレインジャパン株式会社（以下「アウトブレイン」という）と広告掲載申込書またはア
   ウトブレインのダッシュボードを利用する事業主体（以下「顧客」という）との間で締結される。本条件書に準じて顧客はアウトブレインサービスを利用し、
   本条件書及び顧客の作成する広告掲載申込書あるいはアウトブレインダッシュボード（以下「ダッシュボード」という）を通じて入力された情報が両当事者間
   の全ての合意事項（以下「本合意事項」という）を構成するものとする。特別の定めがある場合を除き、
   (i)広告掲載申込書の条件あるいはダッシュボードを通じて入力された条件（以下「キャンペーン詳細」という）と(ii)
   本条件書との間に齟齬がある場合には、キャンペーン詳細が優先される。
   1. サービス
   1.1
   アウトブレインはオンライン資産のネットワーク（以下「ネットワーク」という）と提携し、ウェブサイトへ誘導するコンテンツへのリンクを含んだユーザー
   インターフェイスを表示する（以下「サービス」という）。アウトブレインは独自のアルゴリズムを用いて、ネットワーク上のサービスに、どのコンテンツリ
   ンクを表示するか決定する。
   1.2
   アウトブレインは、サービスを通じてネットワーク上に顧客の選択するグラフィック、テキスト、映像及び／又は音声コンテンツへのリンク（リンクとリンク
   からアクセスできるコンテンツを合わせて「コンテンツ」という）を表示する。顧客はコンテンツのクリック数分のみ請求される。料金は、クリック数をキャ
   ンペーン詳細で顧客が決定するクリック単価（以下「CPC」という）で乗じた金額となるが、CPCはその時点でアウトブレインの定める最低CPCを下回
   ってはならない。顧客がアウトブレインの自動入札機能を利用した配信機能を使用する場合、キャンペーンに対する顧客のKPIを達成するため、アウトブレ
   インが自らの裁量で顧客のCPCを設定、及び／又は変更することができる。アウトブレインは、(i)顧客のキャンペーンの
   終了日、又は(ii)顧客の予算に達した時点、若しくは (iii)
   キャンペーンが無効になった時点のいずれかのうち、最も早い時点までネットワークでのコンテンツ配信を継続する。尚、(i)及び(ii)はそれぞれ、キ
   ャンペーン詳細で顧客によって指定されるものとする。（但し、アウトブレインは配信停止されたコンテンツに対する追加クリック分を請求することができる
   。これについては、 FAQを参照)
   1.3 アウトブレインは、キャンペーン中のクリック数の情報に関するレポートを顧客に提供する。最終月次レポート(
   日次レポートとは異なる場合もある)は、顧客の支払うべき料金のアウトブレインの計算の根拠となる。顧客はアウトブレインと互換性のある自らのクリック
   トラッカーを提出することができる。顧客の計測値（アウトブレインと互換性のあるクリックトラッカーに基づく）とアウトブレインの計測値の間に10％以
   上の乖離がある場合には、両当事者は誠意を持って協力し、アウトブレインに支払われるべき正確な金額を確定させる。乖離が10%に満たない場合にはアウ
   トブレインの数値を最終的な数値とする。
   1.4 アウトブレインは、 (i) コンテンツの配置、位置、提供のタイミング、(ii)
   コンテンツ上のクリック（特定セグメントのクリックも含む）、(iii)
   コンバージョンを保証しない。コンテンツが予算に至るクリック数を得られない場合、顧客の要求できる救済措置は、(i)
   適用されるキャンペーンの終了日を延期する、(ii)
   キャンペーンを完了させるためにコンテンツを別のコンテンツに置き換える、又は別のコンテンツを追加する（下記第2節に従う）、(iii)
   コンテンツに対する実際のクリック分だけ支払いを行う、のいずれかのみである。アウトブレインはいかなる場合にも、クリック数が得られなかったことにつ
   いて賠償責任を負わない。
   1.5アウトブレインは追加のサービスに関する機能を顧客に提供する。この提供される機能を使用する場合、顧客は追加の条件（「追加条件」という）に同
   意することもある（例えば,ダッシュボード、又はオンラインのクリックスルー条件書）。その機能はアウトブレインの裁量で提供され、5.1条に記載され
   る料金以外のCPCを含むこともある。追加条件を同意する場合、顧客とアウトブレインの間に拘束力及び執行力がある契約になる。本条件書、追加条件、及
   びキャンペーン詳細の間に異なる部分がある場合、（ア）追加条件、（イ）キャンペーン詳細、（ウ）本条件書の順番で優先される。
   1.6
   顧客は、下記第8節に従い、顧客のウェブサイト又はアプリのページにアウトブレインピクセルを設置することができる。アウトブレインピクセルは、顧客の
   キャンペーン分析、及び／又はターゲティング機能の向上を目的とする。
   2. コンテンツ
   2.1
   顧客はアウトブレインに、コンテンツをネットワークに掲載することを許可する権利を有し、自らコンテンツの妥当性と合法性を判断する責任を負う。さらに
   顧客の選択するコンテンツはアウトブレインのアドバタイジングガイドラインに準拠しなければならない。アウトブレインは随時アドバタイジングガイドライ
   ンを改定することがある。アウトブレインは何ときでも、理由を問わずコンテンツを拒否又は除外することができる。顧客は、アウトブレインがコンテンツに
   責任を負わないことを理解し、またコンテンツの作者による見直し、読者からのコメント等によりキャンペーン中にコンテンツが変更される場合があることを
   認識する。こうした変更の場合に顧客が行う措置は、顧客のキャンペーンの当該コンテンツを停止するようアウトブレインに指示し、及び／又は他のコンテン
   ツを選択することである。コンテンツの作者又はパブリッシャーから異議申し立てがあった場合には、顧客はアウトブレインが当該コンテンツをサービスから
   除外することを了承する。
   2.2 顧客は(i)
   コンテンツは顧客により、あるいは顧客の指示に基づいて作成され、あるいは顧客により支払われていることを表明し、保証する。この事実はコンテンツ上ま
   たはその傍らに明確に表示されるものとする。また、顧客は、(ii)
   コンテンツの見出し（顧客または顧客の代理人、もしくは代理店によって作成されたかを問わない）を使用する権利があること、及び／又はコンテンツの見出
   しに使われている表現を承認すること、 (iii) コンテンツの見出しがコンテンツの基調および主題を正確に反映していること、並びに(iv)
   アウトブレインのキャンペーンに関するイメージ、画像、及び映像を使用することの権利があることを表明し保証する。
   2.3 顧客は、直接的にも間接的にも、 (i)
   わいせつな内容、誹謗、中傷、名誉棄損、ポルノ、暴力的・冒涜的内容を含む社会通念上好ましくない、あるいは非合法なコンテンツ、(ii)
   事実に関して不正確で誤解を招く、あるいは欺瞞的なコンテンツ、(iii)
   ねずみ講、賭博、違法薬物の販売ないし使用、特定の個人ないし集団に対する差別または嫌がらせなど、非合法活動を奨励又は推進するコンテンツを提供しな
   いものとする。更に、顧客のコンテンツは、入稿時と異なるリンク先にリダイレクトしてはならず、及び入稿時と記載内容を変更してはならない。
   2.4
   両当事者は、コンテンツに対してアンチマルウェアのスキャン処理を行うものとする。指摘された場合、両当事者は直ちにネットワークから不審なコンテンツ
   の削除を行う。
   3. 期間と解除
   キャンペーン詳細は、個別のキャンペーンの開始日と終了日を定める。ただし、(i)
   顧客は理由を問わず2営業日前までにアウトブレインに文書で、又はダッシュボードを通じて12時間前までに予告することにより、又(ii)
   アウトブレインは理由を問わず30日前までに顧客に文書で予告することにより、本契約あるいは個別のキャンペーンを中断または中止することができる。予
   告期間中、それ以前に契約されたキャンペーンはキャンペーン詳細に従って継続されるものとし、顧客は予告期間中に得られた全クリック数についてアウトブ
   レインに対し支払いを行う責任を負う。また、顧客が本契約の定めに違反していると合理的に判断した場合、アウトブレインは、顧客が本サービスを利用する
   ことを停止、もしくは終了することができる。
   4. キャンペーン詳細
   顧客は、アウトブレインのダッシュボードを通じ、オンラインレポート及びキャンペーンを管理することができる。尚、アウトブレインはダッシュボードに登
   録された顧客の個人データを取扱うことができる。顧客は、自らログインし、ダッシュボードから、要求又は承認したすべての変更（直接的、又は間接的にア
   ウトブレインのAPIを介して行った変更を含む）について単独で責任を負う。顧客はそのダッシュボードへのログインとパスワードの保護について単独で責
   任を負う。顧客はダッシュボードを用いてキャンペーン詳細を変更することでキャンペーンを管理し、アウトブレインの定める通り、アウトブレインアカウン
   トマネージャと相互に協力し合う。
   5. 料金及び支払い条件
   5.1顧客は、（アウトブレインのトラッキングで測定したクリック数にCPCを乗じた金額に基づき）アウトブレイン料金を支払う。顧客はダッシュボード
   から、あるいは広告掲載申込書での変更により予算を増額することができる。
   5.2
   顧客が広告掲載申込書に署名したという条件において、料金は通常、各暦月の末日から30日以内に、前月中に発生したクリック数がアウトブレインから顧客
   に請求される。顧客は当該暦月の末日から60日以内にすべての請求金額を支払うものとする。料金請求に対し異議がない場合、全額支払わないとならない。
   顧客がダッシュボードからキャンペーン詳細を設定し、又は広告掲載申込書に署名をし、料金請求のためにクレジットカードを使用した場合には、アウトブレ
   インは、アウトブレインが自らの裁量で設定する間隔をあけて顧客のクレジットカードにアウトブレイン費用を請求する。但し、通常請求とクレジットカード
   請求の決定権はアウトブレインにある。アウトブレインは払い戻し請求を含め、すべての請求に関する照会をケースバイケースで見直し、その裁量で請求を承
   認又は拒否する権利を有する。
   5.3
   顧客は、請求書に対し異議がある場合、請求書受領日から30日以内にアウトブレインに文書又は電子メールで告知するものとする。顧客の告知メールは、異
   議がある金額及びその異議の証拠となる情報を含むものとする。アウトブレインは顧客からの告知受領日から20日以内に検証し、文書で回答する。顧客は異
   議がない請求額に対し、期限内に全額支払うものとする。
   5.4.
   支払期日までに支払いが為されない、又は第5.3節により告知されない場合には、判決の前後にかかわらずアウトブレインは支払期日から実際に支払いが為
   される日まで年利6％の利息を請求することができる。またアウトブレインは、顧客が支払い義務のあるすべての金額を支払うまで顧客によるサービスの利用
   を停止又は終了させ、回収会社や合理的な弁護士費用、裁判費用を含むあらゆる改修費用を顧客に請求する権利を有する。顧客はアウトブレインが顧客のクレ
   ジット履歴を調査することを許可する。場合によっては、顧客はアウトブレインがクレジットの拡大の条件として適時要求することがある金融情報や書類を提
   供することに同意する。顧客は、自らがアウトブレインに提供する口座情報、クレジットカード情報、関連する請求・支払い情報を、クレジットの確認、アウ
   トブレインへの支払いの履行、アウトブレインへの負債の回収及び／又は顧客の口座への支払いのみを目的として、アウトブレインがアウトブレインの協力会
   社と共有することを認識し、同意する。アウトブレインは何ときでも、自らの裁量でクレジットを拡大、修正、又は取り下げることができる。
   5.5
   顧客は、キャンペーンにおいて第三者セグメントのターゲティング向上（第三者ターゲティング）を求める場合、クリックあたりの第三者ターゲティング料金
   （第三者データプロバイダにより設定された特定セグメントの税込の金額、通常クリックあたり$0.05 and $0.95）を支払うものとする。
   第三者ターゲティングのクリック数はアウトブレインのレポーティング数値を利用することとする。なお、アウトブレインが第三者プロバイダの料金を立て替
   えるため、顧客に対する各キャンペーンの請求書には上記5.1 のアウトブレイン料金及び第三者ターゲティング料金が含まれる。
   6. 守秘義務
   6.1
   各当事者は、本契約に関連して一方の当事者から他方の当事者に開示された機密情報（以下に定義する）に関して、機密情報の開示を受けた側の当事者は、か
   かる機密情報を第三者に漏洩せず、また本契約に基づくその権利と義務に関連する目的以外に使用しないことに合意する。「機密情報」とは、当事者又はその
   子会社ないし系列会社に関する情報で、一般に知られておらず、秘密又は所有権ありとの記載があり、あらゆる状況で機密又は所有権のあるものとして扱われ
   るすべての情報を意味し、本契約の規定も機密情報に含まれる。ただし以下の(i)～(iv)のいずれかに該当する情報は機密情報に含まれない。(i)
   開示の時点ですでに公知であった情報又は開示後に被開示者以外の情報源から公知となった情報。(ii)
   開示の時点で被開示者が合法的に所持していた情報。(iii) 機密情報を参照することなく被開示者が独自で開発した情報。(iv)
   開示された情報に関する守秘義務を負わない第三者から後に取得した情報。
   6.2
   機密情報は厳密に秘密のままに維持し、あらゆる合理的かつ必要な措置により保護されるものとする。被開示者は、機密情報を知る必要がありかつ本契約書に
   記載の守秘義務と同等以上の守秘義務に拘束される自らの従業員、代理人、もしくは代理店以外の者に機密情報を開示しないものとする。各当事者は、本契約
   に従って他方の当事者により提供される機密情報のいかなる部分をも、本契約に基づき明確に規定されている目的以外の目的に用いないものとする。ただし各
   当事者は裁判所の命令、法律または政府機関の要求に従うために必要な機密情報は開示することができ、アウトブレインは顧客の親会社や顧客の親会社の子会
   社との間で顧客の機密情報を共有することができる。
   6.3
   顧客がプロバイダの代理人もしくは代理店の場合、顧客はアウトブレインに、このコンテンツプロバイダ（又はコンテンツプロバイダが指定する第三者）のキ
   ャンペーン詳細の閲覧及び使用権を付与することを認める。
   7. 追加表明及び保証／免責事項
   7.1 各当事者は他方の当事者に対し、次のことを表明し保証する。(i)
   自らが本契約を締結し、本契約に基づく権利とライセンスを付与するために必要なすべての権利と権限を有すること、(ii)
   適用されるいかなる法律、規則、規制も遵守すること、(iii)
   本契約（キャンペーン詳細を含む）の締結と受け入れ、及び本契約に基づく自らの債務と義務の履行が自らが締結している別の契約と抵触しないこと、及び(
   iv)
   各当事者は、自己又はその代表者、責任者若しくは実質的に経営権を有する者が、暴力団、暴力団員、暴力団関係者、総会屋その他の反社会的勢力ではないこ
   と。尚、「適用されるいかなる法律、規則、規制」とは本条件書において当事者の義務に対し適用されるいかなる連邦、州、又は外国の法律、規則、又は業界
   の自主規制、又は自主ガイドライン等（Interactive Advertising Bureau Guidelines, Standards
   & Best Practices、 NAI Code of Conduct、 DAA Self-Regulatory Principles
   for Online Behavioral Advertising、 EU Directive 95/46/EC、EU Directive
   2002/58/EC、the General Data Protection Regulation （以下「
   GDPR」という）を含む）を意味する。GDPR又はGDPRに基づき国ごとに制定されるデータ保護に関する法律は以下「欧州データ保護法」という。
   7.2 顧客はさらに次のことを表明し、保証する。(i)
   コンテンツが、適用されるいかなる法律、規則、規制にも違反せず、有害、暴言、わいせつ、脅迫的あるいは名誉棄損と捉えられる可能性のある内容を含まな
   いこと。(ii)
   アウトブレインがコンテンツを使用し、そのホストとなり、キャッシュをとり、ルーティング、保存、コピー、変更、配信、再フォーマット、複製、公開、表
   示、転送するために必要なすべての権利を本契約に基づいてアウトブレインに許可するための権利を自らが有していること。(iii)
   本契約に基づくコンテンツの利用が第三者の知的財産権を侵害しないこと。(iv) 13歳以下の子供に向けるコンテンツを提供しないこと。(v)
   サービスを通じて目的外の利益を得ようとしないこと、またはサービスの一体性および（または）総合的性能を阻害しないこと。(vi)
   ダッシュボードを使用する場合、顧客が、アウトブレインから自らの裁量で定義されるダッシュボードの使用に関するルールを守ること（例えば、個別のネッ
   トワークソースをホワイトリストするための入札を使用してはいけない）。
   7.3 顧客が代理人、もしくは代理店（コンテンツプロバイダの間に入る第三者）である場合には、顧客は次のことを表明し、保証する。(i)
   自らが正式に認められたコンテンツプロバイダの代理人、もしくは代理店であること(ii)
   自らが、本契約を締結し、コンテンツプロバイダに関するあらゆる意思決定をし、あらゆる行為を行う法的権限を有すること(iii)
   上記(i)及び(ii)に従ってコンテンツプロバイダの代理する権利を付与する書面により契約を締結していること（要求があればこの契約書をアウトブレ
   インに提出すること）。
   7.4
   本契約に明記されているものを除き、アウトブレインは商品性、権原、非侵害、特定目的への適合性についての保証あるいは取引の過程、使用あるいは取引慣
   行に起因する保証を含め、そのサービス、顧客の代理として実施するキャンペーンの履行ないし成功について明示・黙示を問わずいかなる表明も保証も行わな
   い。アウトブレインのサービスが途切れることなく続き、安全、又はエラーが発生しないという表明や保証も行わない。
   8. データ保護
   両当事者は、サービス（又はアウトブレインピクセルの設置）において利用された、又は収集されたデータの全部もしくは一部が個人データであるものと合意
   する。各当事者は、(i) 個人データを処理する場合に欧州データ保護法を遵守し、及び(ii)
   独立的な管理者として個人データを処理するものとする。顧客は疑義が生じないように、アウトブレインのパートナーに提供する顧客データ、及び／又はサー
   ビスにおいて実施されるクッキー（リダイレクトに基づくものかどうかに関わらず）に対する法的根拠がなければならない。両当事者は、必要性がある限り、
   (i) データ主体に関する要求に協力し、(ii)
   いかなる個人データの侵害も各当事者に開示するものとする。各当事者は、ウェブサイトの簡単にアクセス、又は発見できる箇所にプライバシーポリシーを継
   続的に表示するものとする。そのプライバシーポリシーはいかなる法律、規則、規制に遵守し、また各当事者のセキュリティー管理及び国際移転に関する情報
   を含む。また用いる際に、顧客のプライバシーポリシーはアウトブレインピクセルの利用を開示とするものとする。尚、「データ主体」、「個人データ」、「
   個人データの侵害」、「情報管理者」はGDPRに定義づけられる。
   9. 補償
   9.1
   各当事者が本契約に基づく自らの義務及び表明に対する違反から生ずる第三者の請求から、他方の当事者、その代理人、もしくは代理店、関連会社、子会社、
   取締役、役員、従業員、その他契約関係に該当する場合はネットワークパートナーを保護及び、補償し、損失を与えないよう保つものとする。
   9.2かかる請求に関連して、(i)
   被補償当事者は迅速に書面で補償当事者に請求があった旨を通知する（迅速な通知が為されなかった場合にも補償当事者が補償義務を免れることはないが、迅
   速な通知が為されなかったことにより補償当事者が被った損害についてはこの限りでない）。(ii)
   補償当事者は単独で請求に対する防御を行い、又は和解をすることができる（ただし補償当事者は、被補償当事者の書面による事前の同意がない限り、被補償
   当事者の権利または義務に悪影響を及ぼす可能性がある和解を行うことはできない）。(iii)
   補償当事者が要求し、その費用を負担するときには、被補償当事者はかかる請求に関する調査検討及びこれに対する防御に協力する。(iv)
   被補償当事者は自らの費用負担により自ら選択する弁護士を使って、自らの権利の防御をする権利を有する。
   10. 賠償責任の制限
   当事者の補償義務、故意の違法行為あるいは本契約の守秘義務違反、及び/又は費用の未払に起因する請求に関する場合を除き、不法行為によるものであれ契
   約によるものであれ形態にかかわらず、本契約あるいはその履行に起因し、あるいは何らかの形でこれに関連して生じるあらゆる訴訟に関する各当事者とその
   取締役、役員、従業員、納入業者、ネットワークパートナー、代理人、もしくは代理店の賠償責任総額の上限は、(i)
   賠償請求の原因となった事象に先立つ12ヶ月間に本契約に基づいて顧客が支払うべき料金の額と(ii)
   500万円のうち、いずれか大きいほうを上限とする。各当事者は、たとえ損害の可能性について事前に知らされていた場合であっても、結果損害賠償、特別
   損害賠償、懲罰的損害賠償、付随的損害賠償や、本契約又はその履行に起因ないし関連して生じるデータの消失、逸失収益、逸失利益などその他いかなる損害
   についても責任を負わない。
   11. 雑則
   11.1
   いずれの当事者も、法律の効果あるいはそれ以外の方法により、他方の当事者の書面による事前の同意なく第三者に対し本契約の全部又は一部を譲渡すること
   はできない。ただし譲受人が本契約を履行するに十分な能力を有し、本契約の履行義務を引き受ける場合には、一方の当事者は、他方の当事者の同意を要する
   ことなく、合併、再生、資産の全部ないしその大半の譲渡を行い、本契約に基づく自らの権利の全部又は一部を譲渡し、義務の全部又は一部を承継させること
   ができる。
   11.2
   本契約は、日本法に準拠し、それに従って解釈されるものとする。当事者は、本契約に起因又は関連して生じるあらゆる紛争について、東京地方裁判所裁判所
   を専属的合意管轄裁判所とすることに合意する。かかる訴訟において勝訴をした当事者は、敗訴当事者に対し、合理的な範囲内の弁護士費用及び訴訟費用の支
   払いを求めることができる。
   11.3いかなる新聞発表又は一般公告も、顧客とアウトブレインの相互の合意なく行わないものとする。アウトブレインは自らの顧客リスト及びその他のマ
   ーケティング資料に顧客の名称を記載する権利を有する。顧客は、アウトブレインの事前の承認を得ずにアウトブレインの名称、ロゴまたは商標を使用するこ
   とはできない。
   11.4本契約に基づいて為されるすべての通知は文書で行うものとし、手渡し、ファックス、電子メール、速達、配達証明付書留郵便により、広告掲載申込
   書に記載の相手方当事者の住所又は相手方が適時文書で指定するその他の住所に配布する。通知は受理された時点をもって有効となる。
   11.5一方の当事者が本契約に基づく自らの権利の1つを行使しなかった場合においても、かかる権利を放棄したものとはみなされない。本契約の1つまた
   は複数の条項が準拠法に基づいて強制不能であると解釈される場合には、かかる条項は本契約から除外され、合意の残りの条項は効力を失わない。
   11.6いずれの当事者も、その合理的に制御できない事由により本合意事項に記載された自らの義務の履行が遅滞する場合、あるいは履行不能となる場合に
   は、この履行遅滞、又は履行不能に賠償責任を負わない。また、いずれの当事者も、インターネットへの接続や操作の失敗、技術的不具合、コンピュータのエ
   ラー、データ損傷によるデータの紛失その他の損害を受けた場合に賠償責任を負うことはない。
   11.7第6節、第9節、第10節、第11節及び異議の生じていない未払いに対する支払い義務は、本契約の終了後も存続する。
   11.8顧客とアウトブレインは相互に独立した契約当事者である。本合意事項に記載のいかなる文言も、両当事者間に合弁関係や提携関係を作るものと解釈
   されてはならない。
   11.9本契約はその主題に関する両当事者の完全なる合意をあらわし、両当事者の書面による事前の合意がない限り修正することはできない。広告掲載申込
   書、請求書あるいは本合意事項の主題に関して顧客が提出するその他の書類に矛盾または相反する規定がある場合は、アウトブレインがそれら書類を受諾また
   は署名したとしても、一切効力を持たない。
   本取引条件書は、上記の発効日に修正され、上記の発効日から現在の取引条件書となる。アウトブレインは本取引条件書を変更、修正、又は更新することがで
   きる.

Engage Terms

Version 1.2

Effective March 26, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   パートナー登録フォームに記載されているパートナーがOutbrainの商品、サービスおよびテクノロジーを実装ならびに使用する際には、以下の標準的
   なパートナー配信規約（以下「利用規約」という。）が適用される。パートナー登録フォームに署名がなされていない場合、（1）「本契約」とは利用規約を
   意味し、（2）利用規約に準じてテクノロジーの使用はできるが、当該パートナー登録フォームにOutbrainおよびパートナーの両当事者が署名するま
   で、パートナーに対する支払は一切行われない。
    1. 定義
         1. 「本コンテンツ」とは、グラフィック、テキストおよび（または）オーディオコンテンツ（テキスト、データ、情報、写真、画像、グラフ
            ィック、オーディオ、動画その他のコンテンツを含む場合がある）をいう。
         2. 「本コンテンツレコメンデーション」とは、テクノロジーが実装されているウェブページ、アプリまたはプラットフォームの閲覧者に対し
            て配信される本コンテンツへのリンクをいう。本コンテンツレコメンデーションには、プロモーションコンテンツおよび（または）サイト
            内回遊リンクが含まれる。
         3. 「データ」とは、Outbrainのテクノロジーを通じて収集または作成されるすべてのデータを意味し、これには、本契約に基づいて
            パートナーに提供されるレポートまたは他のデータが含まれる。
         4. 「デスティネーションページ」とは、本コンテンツレコメンデーションをクリックすることによってアクセスされるあらゆるウェブページ
            またはオンライン上のページをいう。
         5. 「エンドユーザー」とは、パートナーのウェブサイトを閲覧する個人ユーザーをいう。
         6. 「知的財産権」とは、特許権、著作権、商標、企業秘密、ノウハウおよびいずれの司法管轄地域においても知的財産と認められているその
            他一切の権利をいい、かかる権利の登録、出願、更新および延長を含む。
         7. 「本パートナーウェブサイト」とは、パートナー登録フォームに明記されているウェブプロパティ、アプリまたはプラットフォーム、なら
            びに、事前に書面で（Eメール可）Outbrainの承認を受けてパートナーがテクノロジーの実装を決めた追加的プロパティ
            をいう。
         8. 「本プロモーションコンテンツ」とは、エンドユーザーによる正当なクリックにより収益が得られる本コンテンツレコメンデーションをい
            う。
         9. 「本プロモーション収益」とは、本プロモーションコンテンツの配信を目的にOutbrainのカスタマーからOutbrainに支払
            われる収益をいう。
        10. 「サイト内回遊リンク」とは、本プロモーションコンテンツではない本コンテンツレコメンデーションを指し、パートナー自らが選択およ
            び承認した本パートナーウェブサイト上の本コンテンツへパートナーの意向に従いOutbrainが挿入するリンクをいう。
        11. 「テクノロジー」とは、Outbrainがパートナーに提供するJavaScript, API, SDK
            および関連プロトコルをいい、本パートナーウェブサイトに実装することにより、1つまたは複数の本コンテンツレコメンデーションが表
            示され、当該本コンテンツレコメンデーションをクリックすることにより、ウェブページ閲覧者はデスティネーションページにナビゲーシ
            ョンすることができる。
    2. テクノロジー、位置および外観
         1. テクノロジーは、本パートナーウェブサイトの各ページ上のメインの本コンテンツのすぐ下、もしくは、書面にて（Eメール可）両当事者
            が合意した場所に配置されるものとする。
         2. パートナーは、本コンテンツレコメンデーションのソースまたは内容の開示に関するものを含むすべての適用法および規則に準じてテクノ
            ロジーを表示しなければならない。上記の義務のみならず、パートナーは、テクノロジーの表示、表記または識別の仕方についてOutb
            rainの指示に従うことに同意する。
         3. Outbrainは、随時、自らの裁量で、テクノロジーをアップデート、変更、または改良することができる。 Outbrain
            が、パートナーに対して当該アップデートを実装するよう要請した場合、パートナーは、Outbrainからその要請を受領した後30
            日以内に、商業的見地からみて合理的な努力を用いて、そのアップデートを実装することとする。ただし、Outbrainが、パートナ
            ーに対して、本パートナーウェブサイトのパフォーマンスに重大な悪影響を及ぼすとパートナーが合理的に判断したアップデートを実装す
            るよう要請した場合、Outbrainがパートナーの懸念を合理的に満足いく程度に解消しない限り、または当該アップデートの実装を
            求めないことに同意しない限り、パートナーは、当該ページ上でテクノロジーの表示を停止することを選択できる。
         4. 契約期間中、Outbrainはパートナーの唯一かつ排他的なコンテンツレコメンデーションのプロバイダとなる。「コンテンツレコメ
            ンデーション」は、見出しまたはエンドユーザーが本コンテンツ（デスティネーションページがコンテンツ、アドバトリアルまたは広告を
            問わない）へ誘導されることを示すフレーズを含む1つまたは複数のリンクのことをいう。
         5. 本契約の他の規定にかかわらず、Outbrainの書面による事前の同意がない限り、テクノロジーの実装によって各ページに最低1つ
            の本プロモーションコンテンツが含まれなければならない（即ち、パートナーは、サイト内回遊リンクのみの目的でテクノロジーを使用す
            ることはできない）。
    3. 収益および支払
         1. 調整済み総所得にパートナー登録フォームで定めたパーセンテージを掛けた金額がパートナーに支払わる。支払い条件はパートナー登録フ
            ォームの4.収益および支払いに準ずる。
         2. パートナーに対して支払われるべき金額が1万円を下回る場合は、パートナーに対して支払うべき金額が累計1万円を超える月まで支払わ
            れないものとする。かかる支払は、適用される法律の定めに準じて、源泉所得税ならびに各種控除の対象となる。Outbrainの支払
            に関するクレームの一切は、Outbrainに対して、当該支払が振り込まれた日から30日以内に書面で提起されなければならない。
            かかる期間経過後は、パートナーは、当該支払にかかるクレームを放棄したものとみなす。Outbrainが、合理的な裁量でパートナ
            ーのパフォーマンスが不正なもの、もしくは無効なものであると考えるとき、またはそれらの点でOutbrainの顧客から費用もしく
            はクレジットバックの支払を求められたときは、Outbrainはパートナーに対する手数料およびクレジットバックの支払を留保する
            権利を有する。
            かかる場合、パートナーからの要請があれば、Outbrainはかかる決定に至った証拠をパートナーに提示する。無効な操作とは、以
            下の行為を含むがこれに限らない：（i）本プロモーションコンテンツの無効なクリックが人物、ボット、自動プログラムまたは類似のデ
            バイスにより生成された場合（これには、パートナーのIPアドレスまたはパートナーの管理下にあるコンピューターからなされたクリッ
            クを含む）、（ii）金銭の支払いを伴うクリック、虚偽表示によるクリック、もしくは、エンドユーザーに本プロモーションコンテンツ
            のクリックなどを要請してなされたクリックの場合、　（iii）本プロモーションコンテンツをクリックしたエンドユーザーのブラウザ
            のJavaScriptが無効に設定されている場合、および（iv）以下第6条に記載されている禁止行為が行われた場合。また、Ou
            tbrainが有する権利および救済措置に加えて、Outbrainは、（i）
            本契約書の下でOutbrainがパートナーに支払うべき金額を保留すること、および、かかる金額と本契約書または他の契約書の下で
            パートナーがOutbrainに支払うべき金額とを相殺することができ、そして（また）（ii）Outbrainからパートナーへの
            書面による（Eメール可）通知後30日以内に、パートナーから過払い金の払い戻しを受ける請求することができる。本パートナーウェブ
            サイト上に本プロモーションコンテンツを表示させているOutbrainの顧客がOutbrainに対して支払を怠った場合、両当事
            者は誠意をもって協議し、解決策を見出す。支払いを確実にするために、パートナーはOutbrainに正確な連絡先および支払情報を
            通知しなければならない。また、パートナーは、パートナーの金融機関または決済サービスプロバイダの手数料を負担するものとする。
         3. Outbrainはパートナーに管理画面を開放することができ、パートナーは推定収益を確認することができる。疑義を避けるために明
            記するが、Outbrainは、当該月における推定収益が本契約の下でパートナーに対して最終的に支払われる正確な金額であることを
            保証しない。
    4. プライバシー
         1. Outbrainおよびパートナーは、適用法に準じたプライバシーポリシーを各々のウェブサイト上に表示する。パートナーは、Out
            brainの指示に従い、本パートナーウェブサイトにおける個人情報の収集および取扱いについて説明を行う。Outbrainのプラ
            イバシーポリシーは以下のページに記載している：https://www.outbrain.com/legal/privacy.
         2. パートナーは、テクノロジーの実装にあたっては、Outbrainが個人情報保護法を遵守するために必要だと判断する合理的な指示に
            従うものとする。パートナーは、テクノロジーの使用がパートナーに適用される個人情報保護法に適合していることについて、自ら責任を
            負うことを了解する。とりわけ、テクノロジーが依拠する第三者クッキーの配置および使用、ならびに、クッキーの使用についてエンドユ
            ーザーから同意を得ることなどを含み、Outbrainは、これらに関して一切責任を負わない。
    5. ライセンス規約
         1. 本契約期間中、パートナーが本契約の定めを遵守することを条件に、Outbrainはパートナーに対して、限定的、非排他的、取り消
            し可能でサブライセンス権がない、譲渡不可能のライセンスを付与し、パートナーは、本パートナーウェブサイト上で本コンテンツレコメ
            ンデーションを既定のフォームおよびフォーマットで表示するテクノロジーを使用することができる。パートナーにOutbrainのA
            PIまたはSDKの使用が許諾された場合、パートナーは、当該APIまたはSDKをOutbrainが随時提供する実装ガイドに準じ
            て使用するものとする。Outbrainは、通知の上、当該実装ガイドを随時改訂することができる。
         2. Outbrainは、本契約期間中、パートナーに対して、限定的、世界規模、非排他的、ロイヤルティフリーのライセンスを付与し、パ
            ートナーは、テクノロジーに組み込まれているOutbrainの商標、サービスマークおよびロゴ（併せて「Outbrainマーク」
            という。）を本契約に基づくパートナーの権利および義務に厳格に従って使用および表示することができる。Outbrainマークの使
            用から生じるグッドウィルはOutbrainにのみ帰属する。パートナーの事前の書面による同意を得ることを条件に（Eメール可）、
            Outbrainはテクノロジーを実装したカスタマーまたはパートナーの総リストにパートナーおよび本パートナーウェブサイトの名前
            を載せることができる（マーケティングおよび販売資料を含む）。同様に、各当事者は本契約に関するプレスリリース、または、本契約で
            定める以外の自己のウェブサイト上で相手方当事者の名前を使用する場合は、相手方当事者の書面による同意を事前に得るものとする。
         3. 当事者間の権利関係は以下のとおりとする。（a）Outbrainは、Outbrainマーク、テクノロジー、データおよびテクノロ
            ジーにより表示または使用可能となる本コンテンツ（ただし、パートナーが所有権を有する、本パートナーウェブサイトからの本コンテン
            ツは除く）に関する一切の権利、権限および利益を保持する。また（b）パートナーは、ルック＆フィールを含む本パートナーウェブサイ
            トに関する一切の権利、権限および利益を保有するが、前号（a）に記載された項目（かかる項目の知的財産権のすべてなどを含む）は除
            外される。
         4. 本契約のもと付与されるライセンスは、本契約によって具体的に定められ、黙示の権利は一切存在しない。本契約で明示的にパートナーに
            付与されていない権利は、すべてOutbrainが留保するものとする。
    6. 禁止行為
         1. パートナーは、（i）本コンテンツレコメンデーションを編集、修正、切り捨て、フィルター処理、または本コンテンツレコメンデーショ
            ンの順序を変える行為（ii）デスティネーションページを曖昧にし、変更し、またはエンドユーザーをデスティネーションページからリ
            ダイレクトさせる行為、もしくは、本コンテンツレコメンデーションとデスティネーションページの間に本コンテンツを点在させる行為（
            iii）テクノロジー本来の表示を縮小、削除または阻害する行為（iv）人為的に本コンテンツレコメンデーションのクリックを水増し
            する行為、または、インセンティブもしくは他の方法を用いて本コンテンツレコメンデーションのクリックを勧奨したり要請したりする行
            為（v）テクノロジーに含まれる知的財産権に関する通知の一切を削除し、毀損し、曖昧にし、または変更する行為（vi）本契約で明示
            的に規定されている方法や目的以外に、テクノロジーにアクセス、複製または使用する行為（vii）テクノロジーの変更、翻案、翻訳、
            二次的著作物の作成、逆コンパイル、リバースエンジニアリング、逆アセンブル、その他テクノロジーのソースコードを抽出しようと試み
            る行為、また、テクノロジーまたはそれに関連する機密情報の使用またはアクセスを通じて、代替物または類似サービスもしくは製品を作
            成する行為（viii）テクノロジーの干渉または妨害を試み、または本契約に準じて実装されたテクノロジーを通じた方法以外の方法で
            、システムまたはネットワークへのアクセスを確立しようとする行為、（ix）テクノロジーを通じて送信された本コンテンツレコメンデ
            ーションを複製、キャッシュ、配信、表示、変更、その他使用する行為（または、第三者の当該行為を承認または幇助する行為）。ただし
            、テクノロジーを通じて提供された本コンテンツレコメンデーションは除く。または（x）テクノロジーをOutbrain
            が許可しない目的で使用する行為。APIまたはSDKについては、パートナーに配布されたAPIまたはSDKの実装ガイドに矛盾する
            目的で使用する行為を含む。
         2. パートナーは、テクノロジーをアダルトコンテンツ、猥褻なコンテンツ、性的コンテンツ、名誉を毀損するコンテンツ、中傷的コンテンツ
            、侵害的コンテンツ、虐待的コンテンツ、並びに、ヘイトスピーチまたは差別の勧奨、銃器および不法薬物の売買、または不法行為の参加
            を促すような不法コンテンツを表示するページに実装しない。Outbrainは、独自の裁量で、いつでも、テクノロジーを無効にする
            権利を留保する。
         3. 本契約で明確に許可された場合を除き、パートナーは、第三者の代理または利益のために、テクノロジーを複製、賃借、賃貸、売買、移譲
            、譲渡、サブライセンスの付与、逆アセンブル、リバースエンジニアリング、または逆コンパイル（適用される制定法によって限られた範
            囲内で明確に許可されている場合を除く）、修正、もしくはテクノロジーの一部の改ざんを行ってはならない。
    7. 登録
       パートナーは、Outbrainウェブサイト上で登録手続きをしなくてもテクノロジーを使用することができる。登録後、オンラインリポートの閲
       覧ならびにOutbrainダッシュボードへのアクセスが可能となり、パートナーは自ら本コンテンツレコメンデーションのファンクションを含む
       数々の管理・設定を行うことができる。登録手続きを済ませてパートナーがOutbrainダッシュボードにアクセスした場合、Outbrain
       ダッシュボードを通してなされた変更に対する責任はすべてパートナーが負うものとする。Outbrainは、パートナーに書面で事前通知するこ
       とにより（Eメール可）、Outbrainダッシュボードへのアクセスを中止することができる。
    8. テクノロジーの停止および終了
         1. 緊急事態が発生した場合（重大なセキュリティの侵害、ユーザーへのマルウェアその他のウィルスの拡散、不適切・不法・不正な使用など
            ）、Outbrainは、随時、テクノロジーの全部または一部を停止もしくは打ち切ることができる（テクノロジーの使用を不可にする
            などの措置を含む）。
         2. いずれの当事者も、相手方当事者が本契約の定めについて重大な違反を犯し、違反当事者が書面による違反通知を受領してから15日経過
            しても当該違反が治癒されない場合、本契約を解除することができる。
         3. 本契約は、パートナー登録フォームに別段の定めがない限り、30日前の書面による通知をもって終了することができる。本契約が満了ま
            たは終了された場合、本契約上の権利および義務の一切は消滅するものとする。ただし、本契約第9条f、第9条g、第10条、第11条
            および第13条は、その規定に従い、存続し、当事者を拘束し続けるものとする。
    9. 限定保証および補償
         1. 各当事者は相手方当事者に対して以下の事項を表明し保証する。（a）本契約を締結し、かつ、本契約に基づく義務を履行する権利、能力
            および権限の一切を保有していること。（ｂ）本契約の履行に際して、適用される法律、規則および命令の一切を遵守すること。
         2. Outbrainは、Outbrainの商標の所有者であり、本契約の定めに従ってパートナーが実装するテクノロジーに関する知的財
            産を所有していることを保証する。
         3. パートナーは、本パートナーウェブサイトが、（i）違法なコンテンツ、（ii）第三者の持つ権利を侵害するコンテンツ、または（ii
            i）猥褻なコンテンツ、名誉を毀損するコンテンツ、誹謗的なコンテンツ、中傷的なコンテンツ、いかなる者のパブリシティ権、プライバ
            シー権もしくは人格権を侵害するコンテンツを含んでおらず、そして将来においても含まないことを表明し保証する。
         4. 本契約に規定されたいかなる事項も、Outbrainが最低限のトラフィック量、クリック数または使用数などをパートナーに約束する
            ものと解釈されてはならない。
         5. 本契約で明確に表明された場合を除き、いずれの当事者も、本契約、本パートナーウェブサイト、テクノロジー、データ、テクノロジーを
            通じて使用可能な本コンテンツそしてその他の事項（目的の如何を問わずクォリティまたは適合性が満足いくものであること、サービスを
            中断またはエラーもなく常時使用できること、サービスまたは取引に際して生じる保証など）に関して、明示的もしくは黙示的かを問わず
            、一切、表明または保証を行わない。
         6. Outbrainは、テクノロジーに組み込まれている本コンテンツ、またはテクノロジーを通してアクセスする本コンテンツ（本プロモ
            ーションコンテンツ等を含む）に関して一切の表明または保証を行わない。Outbrainは、テクノロジーを介して配信される本コン
            テンツの内容、正確性、本コンテンツのよる知的財産権の侵害、合法性または品位について一切責任を負わず、また、パートナーが前述事
            項を当てにしていた場合でも、Outbrainは一切責任を負わない。
         7. 各当事者（以下「補償当事者」という。）は、相手方当事者、相手方当事者の親会社および関連会社、ならびに当該会社の取締役、役員、
            株主、社員、代表者、従業員および代理人（以下あわせて「被補償当事者」という。）を、本契約で定めた補償当事者の表明、保証または
            義務の違反、もしくは違反疑惑が原因で第三者により提起された訴えに関するすべての請求、損失、責任、損害、費用、和解金およびその
            他の支出（合理的な弁護士費用を含む）（以下あわせて「本クレーム」という。）について補償し、防御し、何ら損失を被らせないものと
            する。被補償当事者は、本クレームを補償当事者に速やかに通知しなければならない。ただし、かかる通知の遅滞は、その遅滞により補償
            当事者が実際に損害を被った場合を除き、補償当事者の義務を一切軽減しない。被補償当事者は、補償当事者の指揮の下、自らが選任し、
            費用を負担する弁護士と本クレームの防御および和解に参加する権利を有する。
   10. 秘密保持
       各当事者（以下「受領当事者」という。）は、相手方当事者（以下「開示当事者」）の営業、技術、製品およびサービスに関して、開示された状況を
       斟酌すると、当然、秘密情報とみなされる特定の情報および資料（本契約の条項を含む）（以下「秘密情報」という。）にアクセスすることを承認す
       る。秘密情報には以下のものは含まれない。（a）受領当事者が、開示者当事者による開示前に既に知得していた情報、（b）開示当事者の秘密情報
       を参照することなく、受領当事者が独立して開発した情報、（c）受領当事者の責めに帰さずして、公知もしくは公知となった情報、（d）秘密保持
       義務に一切違反することなく、第三者から受領当事者に開示された情報。本契約で許可されている場合を除き、受領当事者は（aa）秘密情報を自己
       または第三者の利益のために一切使用せず、（bb）本第１０条に従い秘密情報を使用しないこと、および秘密情報の秘密性を保持することに合意し
       た、受領当事者の取締役、従業員、請負業者、顧問、投資家または潜在的な投資家以外には、秘密情報を一切開示しない。受領当事者は、開示当事者
       の書面による要請があった場合、速やかに、秘密情報を返還または廃棄する。前述の定めにかかわらず、受領当事者は、適用法律または法的手続きに
       より必要となった範囲で、秘密情報を開示することができる。ただし、受領当事者は、かかる開示請求があったことを速やかに開示当事者に通知し、
       開示当事者が当該開示に異議を申し立て、または開示範囲を限定する旨を求めた場合は、開示当事者に対し、開示当事者の費用をもって妥当な協力を
       する。
   11. 責任制限
         1. いずれの当事者も、以下の場合、相手方当事者に対する賠償責任を除外または制限するものではない。（i）当事者、または自己の従業員
            もしくは請負業者の過失により引き起こされた死亡または人身傷害、（ii）詐欺または詐欺的不実表示、もしくは（iii）法律上、除
            外または制限することを禁じられているその他の責任。
         2. 本契約で規定されている当事者の補償義務を除き、いずれの当事者も、本契約に関連して生じる特別損害または本契約違反について（デー
            タの損失または代替品の調達費用を含む）、当該当事者がかかる損害賠償の可能性について助言を受けたかどうかを問わず、法的責任を一
            切負わない。
         3. 本契約で規定されている当事者の補償義務、当事者の知的財産の違反、不正使用または侵害、いずれかの当事者による本契約第10条の違
            反、もしくは重大な過失または故意の過失の場合を除き、本契約の下で当事者が負う賠償責任限度額は、1000万円もしくは当該行為が
            行われた直近12ヶ月間（複数行為が行われた場合は、最初の行為日を基準とする）にパートナーに対して支払われたまたは支払われるべ
            き調整済み総所得のどちらか大きい方の金額を上限とする。
   12. 反社会勢力の排除
         1. 各当事者は、以下に列挙する人物・事項に現在該当しないことを表明する：暴力団、暴力団員、暴力団員でなくなってから５年が経過して
            いない者、暴力団関連企業、総会屋、社会運動標榜ゴロ、特殊知能暴力集団及びこれらに相当するもの。
         2. 当事者が虚偽の表明をした場合、相手方当事者は、他の権利及び救済手段に影響を与えることなく、本契約を終了することができる。
   13. 一般条項

   本契約は、日本法に準拠し、日本法に従って解釈される。各当事者は、本契約に関連して生じる一切の紛争については、東京簡易裁判所および東京地方裁判所
   を専属的合意管轄裁判所とする。本契約に関連して訴訟が提起された場合、勝訴当事者は、当該提訴に関して発生した合理的範囲内の弁護士報酬および費用を
   請求する権利がある。当事者は、本契約のいずれかの規定が特別に定められた条件に従い実行されなかった場合、またはその他の違反があった場合、回復不可
   能な損害が生じる可能性があることに同意する。従って、いずれの当事者も、法律において講じることのできるその他の救済措置に加えて、本契約違反の防止
   および本契約の特別な定めを確実なものとするために、差止命令を求めることができる。当事者は、独立した契約者であり、本契約のいかなる事項も、パート
   ナーシップ、ジョイントベンチャー、代理人その他の関係を当事者間に形成するものと解釈しない。一方の当事者が本契約に基づく自らの権利の一部を行使し
   ない場合または本契約に基づく他の一方の当事者の義務の履行を求めない場合にも、これらの権利ないし義務が放棄されたとはみなされず、またいずれかの当
   事者が本契約に対するある不履行ないし違反を免責されたとしても、その事実によってそれ以外のまたはそれ以降の不履行ないし違反が免責されるわけではな
   い。支払い義務を除き、いずれの当事者も、その妥当な制御能力を超えた事由により本契約に基づく当該当事者の義務のいずれかを履行できない場合、かかる
   不履行に対する責任を一切負わない。本契約は、本契約の主題に関して、当事者間の完全かつ唯一の合意を構成するものであり、書面によるか口頭によるかを
   問わず、かかる主題に関する本契約締結前または締結時におけるすべての合意または了解に優先する。本契約書は、両当事者が署名した文書によってのみ、変
   更、修正または取り換えることができる。本契約の条項に関する見出しは全て、参照の目的においてのみ挿入され、いかなる法的影響力も持たないものとする
   。本契約書は、電子的な送信または忠実に再現できるその他の手段により履行および配達することができ、かかる手段により配達された本契約書は、本契約書
   において原本とみなされるものとする。本契約は、複数の副本で締結することができ、それぞれの副本は原本とみなされるが、当該副本全ては、１個の、かつ
   同一の文書を構成する。本契約の規定のうち、所有権、保証免責および責任制限などに関する規定など、本契約終了後も本質的に存続すべき規定は、本契約の
   終了後においても存続する。本契約の規定が、何らかの理由により、法的強制力がないものと判断された場合、かかる規定は、法的強制を可能とするために必
   要な範囲に限り修正され、それができない場合は、本契約から分離され、本契約の残りの規定引き続き完全で有効であるものとする。いずれの当事者も、相手
   方当事者の書面による事前同意を得ずに、本契約または本契約に基づく権利または義務を譲渡することはできない。ただし、（i）法に基づく手続き、合併、
   再編成もしくは支配権の取得または変更があった場合、（ii）OutbrainからOutbrainの子会社への譲渡の場合はこの限りでなない。上記の
   規定に従い、本契約は，両当事者及びその認めらえた承継人および譲受人に対して拘束力を有し、またこれらの利益のために効力を生じる。

Engage Terms

Version 2.4

Effective July 18, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   Termos de Uso Padrão
   Os seguintes Termos de Uso Padrão (“Termos”) regem a implementação e
   uso dos produtos, serviços, e tecnologia fornecidos pela Outbrain ao
   Divulgador identificado no Contrato de Distribuição para Divulgadores.
   Na medida em que o Divulgador ainda não tenha assinado um Contrato de
   Distribuição para Divulgadores, (1) as referências a "Contrato" deverão
   ser aos Termos, e (2) estes Termos permitem o uso da Tecnologia, mas
   nenhum pagamento deve ser acumulado ou ser feito ao Divulgador até que
   tal Contrato de Distribuição para Divulgadores seja assinado por
   Outbrain e pelo Divulgador.
    1. DEFINIÇÕES.
         1. “Recomendações de Anunciantes” significa Recomendações na rede
            da Outbrain submetidas pelos anunciantes da Outbrain.
         2. “Conteúdo” significa conteúdo gráfico, textual e/ou auditivo
            (que poderá incluir texto, dados, informações, fotos, imagens,
            gráficos, conteúdo de áudio, vídeo ou outro conteúdo).
         3. “Dados” significa todos os dados coletados ou gerados pela
            Outbrain através do Serviço, incluindo relatórios ou outros
            dados disponibilizados ao Divulgador com relação a este
            Contrato.
         4. “Página de Destino” significa qualquer página da internet ou
            outra localização online que possa ser acessada ao clicar nas
            Recomendações de Conteúdo.
         5. “Usuário Final” significa pessoa física usuária do(s) Site(s)
            do Divulgador.
         6. “Sites do Divulgador” significa propriedades da Web,
            aplicativos, ou plataformas identificadas no Contrato de
            Distribuição para Divulgadores, juntamente com qualquer ou
            quaisquer propriedades adicionais nas quais o Divulgador
            escolha implementar a Tecnologia com autorização prévia e por
            escrito da Outbrain (sendo a autorização por e-mail
            suficiente).
         7. “Recomendações de Recirculação” significa Recomendações que
            não são Recomendações de Anunciantes e que conectam ao
            Conteúdo por meio de Sites do Divulgador.
         8. “Recomendações" significa a exibição de Conteúdo que a
            Outbrain entrega ao visualizador de uma página da Web,
            aplicativo ou plataforma na qual a Tecnologia é implementada.
            Importante esclarecer que as Recomendações podem incluir
            Recomendações de Anunciantes e/ou Recomendações de
            Recirculação.
         9. “Receita” significa a receita líquida coletada pela Outbrain
            de Recomendações de Anunciantes e cobradas pela Outbrain para
            a exibição de tais Recomendações de Anunciantes da rede da
            Outbrain.
        10. “Tecnologia” significa o Javascript, API, SDK e protocolos
            relacionados fornecidos pela Outbrain ao Divulgador que,
            quando implementados no(s) Site(s) do Divulgador, exibem uma
            ou mais Recomendação(ões) e/ou permite aos usuários navegar
            para a Página de Destino clicando em tais Recomendações.
    2. TECNOLOGIA; POSICIONAMENTO E APARÊNCIA.
         1. Implementações da Tecnologia deverão aparecer diretamente
            abaixo do Conteúdo principal de cada página dos Sites do
            Divulgador nos quais a Tecnologia é instalada ou de outra
            forma mutualmente acordada por escrito (sendo a autorização
            por e-mail suficiente).
         2. O Divulgador deverá exibir a Tecnologia de acordo com todas as
            leis e regulamentos aplicáveis, inclusive com respeito à
            divulgação da origem ou natureza das Recomendações. Sem
            prejuízo da obrigação anterior, o Divulgador concorda em
            cumprir as instruções da Outbrain relativas a como a
            Tecnologia deve ser exibida, marcadas ou identificadas.
         3. A Outbrain pode fazer atualizações, modificações ou melhorias
            da Tecnologia de tempos em tempos, a seu critério exclusivo.
            Caso a Outbrain solicite ao Divulgador que implemente tais
            atualizações, o Divulgador empregará esforços comerciais
            razoáveis para o fazer em trinta (30) dias do recebimento de
            tais atualizações da Outbrain; desde que, se a Outbrain
            solicitar que o Divulgador implemente qualquer Atualização que
            o Divulgador razoavelmente entenda afetar de forma
            significativa e adversa o desempenho da(s) Página(s) do
            Divulgador, o Divulgador poderá optar por deixar de exibir a
            Tecnologia em tal(is) página(s), a menos que Outbrain atenda
            às preocupações do Divulgador para a sua satisfação razoável
            ou concorde em não exigir que o Divulgador implemente tal
            Atualização.
         4. Durante o Prazo, a Outbrain deverá ser o único e exclusivo
            provedor de recomendações de conteúdo do Divulgador, tendo que
            “recomendações de conteúdo" são um ou mais links compostos por
            uma manchete ou frase indicando que um Usuário Final será
            conduzido ao Conteúdo (independentemente de a Página de
            Destino exibir conteúdo, publicidades ou propagandas).
         5. Não obstante qualquer outra disposição do Contrato e a menos
            que Outbrain forneça o consentimento prévio por escrito,
            qualquer implementação da Tecnologia deve incluir pelo menos
            um (1) link por página de Recomendações de Anunciantes (ou
            seja, o Divulgador não pode usar a Tecnologia apenas para
            fornecer Recomendações de Recirculação).
         6. Durante o Prazo, o Outbrain poderá testar mudanças na exibição
            da Tecnologia. Esses testes de Outbrain serão concluídos na
            menor porcentagem de páginas de Site(s) do Divulgador que
            proporcionem resultados estatisticamente significativos. Com
            base nos resultados de tais testes, Outbrain pode sugerir
            modificações na exibição das Recomendações e Tecnologia; tais
            modificações serão efetivadas apenas após o consentimento
            prévio do Divulgador (o qual não deverá ser indevidamente
            protelado). Na medida em que o Divulgador faça uso da API e,
            portanto, controle qualquer teste, o Divulgador deve cumprir
            esses pedidos de teste pelo menos trimestralmente.
    3. RECEITA E PAGAMENTO.
         1. Durante o Prazo, o Divulgador será pago a percentagem da
            Receita Bruta Ajustada indicada no Contrato de Distribuição
            para Divulgadores. A Outbrain deverá fazer esses pagamentos
            dentro de um certo número de dias (conforme indicado no
            Contrato de Distribuição para Divulgadores) após o final de
            qualquer mês do calendário durante o qual o Outbrain cobre
            Receita. Para evitar dúvidas, a Receita é líquida, entre
            outras, de taxas de serviços de dados de terceiros integrados
            na plataforma da Outbrain, cliques/impressões inválidos e
            descontos/reembolsos de anunciantes e agências.
         2. O Divulgador deve fornecer prontamente a Outbrain formulários
            fiscais completos e precisos e todos os outros materiais
            similares que Outbrain exija, que podem incluir o formulário
            de imposto W-8BEN, W-8BEN-E ou W-9, se aplicável
            (coletivamente, todos esses formulários e materiais,
            "Materiais Fiscais"). Não obstante qualquer disposição
            estabelecida em contrário neste Contrato, o Outbrain pode: (a)
            reter os pagamentos devidos ao Divulgador nestes Termos, sem
            multa ou taxa de atraso até que o Outbrain tenha recebido os
            Materiais Fiscais do Divulgador, e (b) deduzir quaisquer
            impostos retidos na fonte a pagar por Outbrain dos pagamentos
            devidos aos Divulgadores por Outbrain, conforme exigido por
            lei. Uma vez que Outbrain receba os Materiais Fiscais,
            Outbrain usará esforços comercialmente razoáveis para pagar os
            montantes em aberto ao Divulgador de acordo com a subseção
            acima (a), assim que razoavelmente praticável. Todos os
            pagamentos ao Divulgador estarão sujeitos a retenção de
            imposto de renda e deduções similares, conforme exigido pela
            lei aplicável.
         3. Para assegurar pagamento adequado, o Divulgador é responsável
            por notificar a Outbrain de informações precisas sobre contato
            e pagamento. O Divulgador também é responsável por quaisquer
            encargos avaliados pelo banco do Divulgador ou pelo provedor
            de pagamento. Se o montante devido ao Divulgador for inferior
            a R$ 150,00 (cento e cinquenta Reais), tal valor será
            acumulado até o mês calendário em que o saldo dos pagamentos
            devidos ao Divulgador exceda R$ 150,00 (cento e cinquenta
            Reais). Qualquer controvérsia em relação a um pagamento da
            Outbrain deve ser submetida à Outbrain por escrito dentro de
            trinta (30) dias após a data de postagem ou transferência
            eletrônica desse pagamento ou a mesma será considerada
            renunciada.
         4. A Outbrain poderá reter, cobrar ou efetuar devolução
            pagamentos na forma de crédito ao Divulgador caso a Outbrain,
            a seu critério único e razoável, acredite que sua realização
            seja fraudulenta ou inválida por natureza, ou caso a Outbrain
            tenha sido cobrada ou recebido crédito de volta do anunciante
            a esse respeito. A atividade inválida é determinada pela
            Outbrain em todos os casos e pode incluir, mas não está
            limitada a: (i) cliques inválidos ou impressões de
            Recomendações de Anunciantes gerados por qualquer pessoa, bot,
            programa automatizado ou dispositivo similar, inclusive
            através de quaisquer cliques/impressões originados dos
            endereços de IP do Divulgador ou dos computadores sob o
            controle do Divulgador; (ii) cliques/impressões solicitados ou
            gerados pelo pagamento de dinheiro, representação falsa ou
            pedidos de Usuários Finais para clicar em Recomendações de
            Anunciantes ou tomar outras ações; (iii) Recomendações de
            Anunciantes servidas para Usuários Finais cujos navegadores
            tenham o JavaScript desativado; e (iv) cliques/impressões
            misturadas com uma quantidade significativa da atividade
            descrita em (i, ii e iii) acima.
         5. Além dos outros direitos e remédios da Outbrain, a Outbrain
            pode (i) reter e compensar quaisquer pagamentos devidos ao
            Divulgador no Contrato contra qualquer taxa que o Divulgador
            deva à Outbrain sob o Contrato ou qualquer outro contrato,
            e/ou (ii) exigir que o Divulgador reembolse a Outbrain Dentro
            de trinta (30) dias de qualquer fatura, qualquer montante que
            a Outbrain possa ter pago em excesso ao Divulgador em períodos
            anteriores. Se um anunciante do Outbrain cujas Recomendações
            de Anunciantes sejam exibidas em qualquer Site do Divulgador
            não efetue pagamento à Outbrain, a Outbrain poderá reter o
            pagamento ou cobrar a conta do Divulgador.
    4. PRIVACIDADE.
         1. A Outbrain e o Divulgador deverão manter e exibir em seus
            respectivos websites política de privacidade de fácil acesso e
            localização que deverá cumprir todas as leis aplicáveis, e que
            no que respeita ao Divulgador, deverá divulgar o use de
            tecnologia de terceiros para coletar e utilizar informações
            com relação às Páginas do Divulgador. A política de
            privacidade da Outbrain está disponível em
            https://www.outbrain.com/legal/privacy.
         2. O Serviço conforme implementado nos termos deste instrumento
            não coletará quaisquer informações de identificação pessoal,
            tais como número de conta, número de seguridade social, nome,
            endereço ou endereço eletrônico. O Divulgador reconhece que os
            usuários da Tecnologia poderão escolher se registrar no
            Outbrain por meio do website da Outbrain e que esse registro
            poderá resultar na coleta de informação pessoal identificável.
            O Divulgador deverá implementar a Tecnologia de acordo com
            todas as instruções da Outbrain que sejam razoáveis e por ela
            determinadas como necessárias para permitir que a Outbrain
            cumpra com as leis de proteção de dados aplicáveis. O
            Divulgador reconhece e concorda que é responsabilidade do
            Divulgador (e não da Outbrain) garantir que o uso da
            Tecnologia pelo Divulgador atenda a toda a legislação de
            proteção de dados aplicável ao Divulgador (incluindo,
            especialmente, a colocação e uso de cookies de terceiros, do
            qual a Tecnologia dependa, e a captura de qualquer
            consentimento para os cookies necessários a serem obtidos do
            Usuário Final relevante). Além disso, as partes devem fornecer
            aos Usuários Finais o acesso a um mecanismo de escolha do
            usuário, como a página de exclusão da Iniciativa da
            Publicidade em Rede (Network Advertising Initiative), a
            Aliança da Publicidade Digital (Digital Advertising Alliance),
            a Aliança Europeia da Publicidade Digital Interactiva
            (European Digital Advertising Alliance) e/ou uma exclusão
            direta da Outbrain através da política de privacidade da
            Outbrain. Se um Usuário Final optar por não ter publicidade
            comportamental através de um Site de Divulgador (ou um
            mecanismo do Divulgador), o Divulgador não poderá passar à
            Outbrain a ID do anunciante do Usuário Final ou outro
            mecanismo de identificação.
    5. TERMOS DA LICENÇA.
         1. Durante o Prazo e sujeita ao cumprimento integral dos termos
            do Contrato pelo Divulgador, a Outbrain concede ao Divulgador
            uma licença limitada, não exclusiva, revogável, não
            sublicenciável e não transferível para exibição da Tecnologia
            e das Recomendações de Conteúdo nos Sites do Divulgador na
            forma e formato fornecidos pela Tecnologia, para uso da
            Tecnologia para mostrar as Recomendações em Sites do
            Divulgador na forma e formato fornecidos. O Divulgador deve
            implementar a Tecnologia de acordo com as instruções técnicas
            da Outbrain, incluindo quaisquer guias de implementação
            disponibilizadas pela Outbrain, que podem ser revisados de
            tempos em tempos mediante notificação da Outbrain. A Outbrain,
            a seu exclusivo critério, pode determinar qual das
            implementações de tecnologia da Outbrain disponíveis (por
            exemplo, JS, API, SDK) devem ser usadas em cada implementação
            do Divulgador (ou seja, o SDK deve ser usado para qualquer
            instalação baseada em aplicativos).
         2. A Outbrain concede ao Divulgador, durante o Prazo, uma licença
            limitada, mundial, não exclusiva e isenta de royalties para
            uso e exibição das marcas, marcas de serviço e logotipos da
            Outbrain (conjuntamente, as “Marcas Outbrain”), conforme
            incorporadas à Tecnologia, estritamente de acordo com as
            obrigações e direitos do Divulgador nos termos deste
            instrumento. Todo fundo de comércio decorrente da utilização,
            pelo Divulgador, de quaisquer das Marcas Outbrain será
            revertido exclusivamente em benefício da Outbrain. A Outbrain
            terá o direito de se referir ao Divulgador e aos Sites do
            Divulgador em qualquer listagem geral de clientes ou parceiros
            (incluindo em materiais de marketing e vendas) que tenham
            implementado a Tecnologia. Não obstante o disposto acima, cada
            parte terá de requerer consentimento prévio escrito antes de
            emitir comunicados à imprensa relativamente a este Contrato ou
            usar o nome da outra parte no seu website de forma não
            prevista neste instrumento.
         3. Conforme estabelecido entre as partes: (a) a Outbrain retém
            todos os direitos, titularidades e participações nas Marcas
            Outbrain, Tecnologia, Dados e Conteúdo mostrados no ou por
            meio da Tecnologia (excluindo qualquer Conteúdo dos Sites do
            Divulgador que seja de propriedade do Divulgador); e (b) o
            Divulgador retém todos os direitos, titularidades e
            participações no(s) Site(s) do Divulgador incluindo o formato
            e a aparência do(s) mesmo(s), excluindo os itens descritos no
            subparágrafo (a) acima, incluindo todos os Direitos de
            Propriedade Intelectual neste instrumento.
         4. As licenças concedidas nos termos deste Contrato são
            especificamente previstas neste instrumento; não existem
            direitos implícitos. Todos os direitos não concedidos
            expressamente ao Divulgador neste Contrato são reservados pela
            Outbrain.
    6. ATIVIDADES PROIBIDAS.
         1. O Divulgador não: (i) editará, modificará, truncará, filtrará
            ou alterará a ordem das Recomendações; (ii) obscurecerá,
            modificará ou redirecionará os usuários do Site do Divulgador
            para outra página que não uma Página de Destino nem
            intercalará nenhum Conteúdo entre a Tecnologia e qualquer
            Página de Destino; (iii) minimizará, removerá ou de outra
            forma inibirá a exibição total e completa da Tecnologia; (iv)
            inflacionará artificialmente os cliques nas Recomendações ou
            Conteúdo Promovido, ou incentivará ou exigirá que qualquer
            pessoa clique em Recomendações ou Conteúdo Promovido
            utilizando incentivos ou outros métodos fraudulentos; (v)
            removerá, deformará, obscurecerá ou alterará nenhuma
            notificação de Direitos de Propriedade Intelectual inclusos na
            Tecnologia; (vi) acessará, reproduzirá ou utilizará a
            Tecnologia de qualquer modo ou para qualquer fim que não
            conforme ao expressamente permitido neste instrumento; (vii)
            modificará, adaptará, traduzirá, preparará trabalhos
            derivativos de, descompilará, aplicará engenharia reversa,
            desarmará ou de outra forma tentará derivar o código fonte da
            Tecnologia, nem tentará criar um serviço ou produto substituto
            ou semelhante por meio da utilização ou do acesso à Tecnologia
            ou a informações exclusivas a eles relacionadas; (viii)
            tentará interferir ou interromper a Tecnologia nem tentará
            obter acesso a nenhum sistema ou rede que se conecte a ele,
            exceto por meio da Tecnologia implementada de acordo com este
            Contrato; (ix) copiará, ocultará, distribuirá, exibirá,
            alterará ou de outra forma utilizará nenhuma Recomendação ou
            Conteúdo Promovido transmitidos por meio da Tecnologia(nem
            autorizará ou auxiliará nenhum terceiro a fazê-lo), exceto
            conforme essas Recomendações e Conteúdo Promovido forem
            fornecidas por meio da Tecnologia; ou (x) usará a Tecnologia
            para qualquer outro fim que não o autorizado pela Outbrain,
            incluindo no que respeita ao API, para qualquer fim que não
            seja consistente com o Guia de Implementação API facultado ao
            Divulgador.
         2. O Divulgador não instalará a Tecnologia em nenhum website que
            mostre conteúdo exclusivo para adultos, obsceno, pornográfico,
            difamatório, calunioso, transgressor, abusivo, ou ilegal, que
            promova o ódio ou a descriminação, facilite a venda de armas
            de fogo ou drogas ilegais, ou que participe ou incentive à
            participação em atividades ilegais ou que seja direcionado a
            menores de 13 anos. A Outbrain se reserva o direito de
            desativar a Tecnologia a seu exclusivo critério em qualquer
            site a qualquer momento.
         3. Exceto quando autorizado expressamente e sem ambiguidades
            neste Contrato, o Divulgador não copiará, alugará, alugará em
            sistema de lease, venderá, transferirá, atribuirá,
            sublicenciará, desarmará, aplicará engenharia reversa ou
            descompilará (exceto na medida expressamente autorizada por
            lei), modificará ou alterará nenhuma parte da Tecnologia, ou
            Dados, ou de outra forma usará a Tecnologia ou Dados em nome
            de ou para benefício de qualquer terceira parte.
    7. REGISTRO. O Divulgador não é obrigado a registrar-se no Site para
       usar a Tecnologia. Se o Divulgador se registrar para usar o Site,
       terá acesso a relatórios online e ao painel da Outbrain, que
       permite ao Divulgador controlar certas configurações da Tecnologia,
       incluindo a funcionalidade de Recomendação. À medida em que o
       Divulgador se registre e tenha acesso ao painel da Outbrain, a
       Outbrain poderá coletar informações de identificação pessoal de tal
       Usuário Final e o Divulgador terá a responsabilidade exclusiva por
       todas as mudanças aplicáveis feitas através do painel da Outbrain
       por esse Usuário Final. As estimativas de receita apresentadas no
       painel da Outbrain são fornecidas apenas para a conveniência do
       Divulgador. A Outbrain não garante que esses valores estimados e
       exibidos durante um determinado mês de calendário sejam precisos ou
       definitivamente devidos a serem pagos ao Divulgador como resultado
       do Contrato. A disponibilização do acesso ao painel da Outbrain
       fica a exclusivo critério da Outbrain e poderá ser encerrada a
       qualquer momento.
    8. SUSPENSÃO DO SERVIÇO; RESCISÃO.
         1. A Outbrain poderá suspender ou interromper todo ou qualquer
            aspecto da Tecnologia, incluindo a sua disponibilidade, a
            qualquer momento, se for exigido por circunstâncias
            imperativas (tais como uma violação significativa de
            segurança, propagação de malware, outros vírus para usuários,
            etc.) ou quaisquer outras circunstâncias impróprias, ilegais
            fraudulentas ou enganosas.
         2. Qualquer uma das partes pode rescindir o Contrato a qualquer
            momento em caso de violação material pela outra parte de
            qualquer disposição do Contrato que permaneça sem remediação
            por quinze (15) dias após o recebimento pela parte violadora
            de aviso por escrito notificando o descumprimento.
         3. O Contrato pode ser rescindido em pré-aviso escrito com trinta
            (30) dias de antecedência, salvo indicação em contrário no
            Formulário de Inscrição do Divulgador. Após o vencimento ou
            encerramento do Contrato, todos os direitos e obrigações das
            partes nos termos do Contrato serão extintos, exceto as
            cláusulas 9.6, 9.7, 10, 11 e 13 dos Termos, as quais
            sobreviverão e continuarão a vincular as partes de acordo com
            seus termos.
    9. GARANTIAS LIMITADAS; INDENIZAÇÃO
         1. Cada parte declara e garante à outra que: (i) possui todo
            direito, poder e autoridade necessários para celebrar este
            Contrato e cumprir suas obrigações nos termos deste
            instrumento; e (ii) cumpre todas as leis, regulamentos, e
            quaisquer exigências aplicáveis no cumprimento deste Contrato.
         2. O Outbrain garante que a Tecnologia, conforme fornecida e
            disponibilizada pela Outbrain e implementada pelo Divulgador
            de acordo com o Contrato, não infringe e não irá infringir, de
            acordo com o melhor conhecimento de Outbrain, qualquer Direito
            de Propriedade Intelectual de qualquer terceiro.
         3. O Divulgador declara e garante que o(s) Site(s) do Divulgador
            não conterá(rão) nenhum conteúdo ilegal ou que (i) seja
            ilegal; (ii) infrinja qualquer Direito de Propriedade
            Intelectual de qualquer terceiro; (iii) contenha qualquer
            material obsceno, difamatório, calunioso, injurioso ou que
            viole o direito de qualquer pessoa à publicidade, privacidade
            ou individualidade; ou (iv) contenha uma falsa declaração de
            fato ou imprecisão factual.
         4. Nada no Contrato deve ser interpretado como uma promessa de
            qualquer tipo de volume de tráfego mínimo, cliques, impressões
            ou uso ou quaisquer outros compromissos desse tipo da Outbrain
            ao Divulgador.
         5. Exceto quando estabelecido expressamente neste instrumento,
            nenhuma das partes faz nenhuma declaração ou garantia expressa
            ou implícita com relação a este contrato, o(s) Site(s) do
            Divulgador, a Tecnologia, qualquer conteúdo disponibilizado
            pela Outbrain através da Tecnologia ou quaisquer outros
            assuntos (incluindo qualquer termo implícito relacionado à
            satisfação de qualidade ou adequação a determinada finalidade,
            quaisquer garantias de disponibilidade ou desempenho
            ininterrupto ou livre de erros, quaisquer garantias que surjam
            no decurso de qualquer desempenho, negociação ou utilização
            comercial).
         6. A Outbrain não faz nenhuma declaração ou garantia no que diz
            respeito aos Dados ou qualquer Conteúdo que consta ou é
            acessado por meio da Tecnologia, incluindo, entre outros,
            Recomendações do Divulgador, e a Outbrain não será responsável
            ou responsabilizada pelos conteúdos, precisão, respeito a
            direitos de propriedade intelectual, legalidade ou decoro do
            Conteúdo acessados por meio da Tecnologia ou pela confiança do
            Divulgador em um dos itens ora mencionados.
         7. Cada parte (a “Parte Indenizadora”) deverá indenizar, defender
            e isentar a outra parte, suas controladoras, afiliadas e cada
            uma de suas respectivas afiliadas, conselheiros, diretores,
            acionistas, membros, representantes autorizados, empregados e
            prepostos (conjuntamente, a “Parte Indenizadora”) de e contra
            todas e quaisquer reivindicações, perdas, responsabilidades,
            danos, custos, acordos e outras despesas (incluindo honorários
            advocatícios razoáveis) (conjuntamente, “Reivindicações”) que
            surjam de qualquer reivindicação por terceiros ocasionada por
            qualquer violação ou suposta violação de qualquer das
            declarações, garantias ou obrigações da Parte Indenizadora
            estabelecidas neste Contrato. A Parte Indenizada deverá
            notificar imediatamente a Parte Indenizadora sobre qualquer
            Reivindicação, estabelecido, contudo, que qualquer atraso na
            entrega dessa notificação não isentará a Parte Indenizadora de
            nenhuma de suas obrigações, salvo na medida em que a Parte
            Indenizadora for de fato prejudicada por esse atraso. A Parte
            Indenizadora terá direito ao controle da defesa e acordo de
            qualquer Reivindicação indenizada, estabelecido que a Parte
            Indenizada terá direito de participar da defesa e acordo da
            Reivindicação com o advogado de sua própria escolha e às suas
            próprias expensas, sujeita ao controle da Parte Indenizadora a
            esse respeito.
   10. CONFIDENCIALIDADE
       Cada parte (a “Parte Receptora”) reconhece que terá acesso a certas
       informações e materiais, incluindo os termos do Contrato, relativos
       ao negócio, tecnologia, produtos e serviços da outra parte (a
       “Parte Divulgadora”) que são, ou razoavelmente devam ser
       consideradas, tendo em conta as circunstâncias da divulgação,
       confidenciais (“Informações Confidenciais”). As Informações
       Confidenciais não incluirão: (a) informações conhecidas da Parte
       Receptora antes da divulgação pela Parte Divulgadora; (b)
       informações obtidas de forma independente pela Parte Receptora sem
       referência a Informações Confidenciais da Parte Divulgadora; (c)
       informações que são ou tornam-se publicamente conhecidas sem culpa
       da Parte Receptora; ou (d) informações divulgadas à Parte Receptora
       por um terceiro sem violação de qualquer obrigação de confiança.
       Exceto conforme permitido a seguir, a Parte Receptora (aa) não
       usará Informações Confidenciais para sua própria conta ou a conta
       de terceiros, e (bb) não divulgará nenhuma Informação Confidencial
       a terceiros que não sejam seus diretores, funcionários,
       contratados, conselheiros, investidores ou potenciais investidores
       que precisam saber de tal Informação Confidencial e que concordaram
       em não usar e manter a confidencialidade das Informações
       Confidenciais consistentes com esta cláusula 10. A Parte Receptora
       retornará ou destruirá as Informações Confidenciais prontamente
       sobre pedido escrito da Parte Divulgadora. Não obstante o acima
       exposto, a Parte Receptora pode divulgar Informações Confidenciais
       na medida exigida por lei aplicável ou por decisão judicial, desde
       que a Parte Receptora forneça aviso prévio de qualquer divulgação
       necessária à Parte Divulgadora e forneça uma cooperação razoável
       (às custas da Parte Divulgadora) com qualquer esforço da Parte
       Divulgadora para contestar ou limitar o alcance dessa divulgação.
   11. LIMITAÇÃO DE RESPONSABILIDADE
        11. Nem Outbrain nem o Divulgador excluem ou limitam a
            responsabilidade do outro por: (i) morte ou ferimento pessoal
            causado por sua negligência ou a de seus empregados ou
            contratados; (ii) fraude ou representação fraudulenta; ou
            (iii) qualquer outra responsabilidade que não possa ser
            legalmente excluída ou limitada.
        12. EXCETO COM RELAÇÃO ÀS OBRIGAÇÕES DE INDENIZAÇÃO DE UMA DAS
            PARTES NESTE INSTRUMENTO, NENHUMA DAS PARTES SERÁ RESPONSÁVEL
            POR NENHUM DANO ESPECIAL, EMERGENTE OU CONSEQUENTE DECORRENTE
            OU COM RELAÇÃO A ESTE CONTRATO OU POR QUALQUER VIOLAÇÃO DESTE
            INSTRUMENTO (INCLUINDO POR PERDAS DE DADOS, LUCROS OU CUSTOS
            DE COBERTURA), TENHA SIDO OU NÃO TAL PARTE AVISADA DA
            POSSIBILIDADE DE TAIS DANOS, E SEJA SOB UMA TEORIA DE
            CONTRATO, ATO ILÍCITO (INCLUINDO NEGLIGÊNCIA), OU DE OUTRA
            FORMA.
        13. EXCETO NO QUE DIZ RESPEITO ÀS OBRIGAÇÕES DE INDENIZAÇÃO NESTE
            INSTRUMENTO OU ÀS RESPONSABILIDADES LEGAIS DE UMA PARTE
            DECORRENTES DA VIOLAÇÃO DE DIREITOS, APROPRIAÇÃO INDEVIDA OU
            INFRAÇÃO DOS DIREITOS DE PROPRIEDADE INTELECTUAL DE UMA PARTE,
            EM HIPÓTESE ALGUMA A RESPONSABILIDADE TOTAL DECORRENTE OU COM
            RELAÇÃO A ESTE CONTRATO OU QUALQUER VIOLAÇÃO DESTE INSTRUMENTO
            (SOB UMA TEORIA DE CONTRATO, ATO ILÍCITO (INCLUINDO
            NEGLIGÊNCIA), GARANTIA, OU DE OUTRA FORMA) POR QUALQUER UMA
            DAS PARTES SERÁ SUPERIOR A R$200.000 OU O MONTANTE DA RECEITA
            BRUTA AJUSTADA PAGA OU PAGÁVEL AO DIVULGADOR NO PERÍODO DE 12
            (DOZE) MESES IMEDIATAMENTE ANTERIOR AO EVENTO QUE MOTIVA A
            RESPONSABILIDADE (OU, NO CASO DE UMA SÉRIE DE EVENTOS
            CONECTADOS, O PRIMEIRO DE TAIS EVENTOS).
   12. CONTROLES DE EXPORTAÇÃO
       O Divulgador irá cumprir todas as leis de exportação e restrições e
       regulamentos do Departamento de Comércio, do Departamento de
       Tesouraria dos Estados Unidos do Escritório de Controle de Ativos
       Estrangeiros ( Department of Commerce, the United States Department
       of Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control - OFAC) ou de outra
       agência ou autoridade dos Estados Unidos ou estrangeiros, e não
       deverá exportar, ou permitir a exportação ou reexportação da
       Tecnologia em violação a tais restrições, leis ou regulamentos. Ao
       fazer o download ou utilizar a Tecnologia, o Divulgador concorda
       com o que precede e declara sob as penas da lei que não está
       localizado, ou sob o controle de, nacional ou residente de qualquer
       país restrito. O Divulgador declara sob as penas da lei que nenhum
       deles, ou qualquer entidade ou organização que detenha qualquer
       participação no Divulgador, incluindo qualquer funcionário ou
       diretor, é um indivíduo, entidade, organização com quem qualquer
       lei, regulamento ou ordem executiva proíba as empresas e os
       indivíduos dos Estados Unidos de negociar, inclusive os nomes que
       aparecem na Lista de Nacionais Especialmente Designados ( Specially
       Designated Nationals List).
   13. DISPOSIÇÕES GERAIS
       Este Contrato será interpretado e regido pelas leis da República
       Federativa do Brasil, sem considerar as disposições de conflito de
       leis ou as Convenções das Nações Unidas para a Venda Internacional
       de Mercadorias. As partes elegem o Foro Central da Comarca da
       Capital do Estado de São Paulo para a resolução de quaisquer
       controvérsias decorrentes deste Contrato, excluindo quaisquer
       outros. As partes concordam que dano irreparável poderia ocorrer em
       caso de descumprimento ou violação de qualquer das disposições do
       Contrato. Por conseguinte, as partes concordam que cada um terá
       direito a uma medida cautelar para evitar violações do Contrato e
       para fazer cumprir especificamente os termos e disposições do
       Contrato, além de qualquer outro remédio para o qual tenham
       direito. As partes são contratadas independentes, e nenhuma
       disposição neste Contrato será interpretada de forma a criar uma
       parceria, joint venture, agenciamento ou outra relação entre as
       partes. A omissão de uma das Partes em fazer valer, a qualquer
       tempo, quaisquer disposições deste instrumento, ou de pleitear
       quaisquer direitos ou exercer qualquer opção prevista, não deverá
       ser considerada como uma renúncia a tais disposições, direitos ou
       opções, nem afetará de nenhuma maneira a validade deste Contrato ou
       de qualquer disposição do mesmo. Nenhuma das partes será
       responsável por qualquer falha em realizar devido a causas além do
       controle razoável da mesma parte. Este Contrato constitui o acordo
       integral entre as partes com relação a seu objeto e cancela e
       substitui todos os acordos ou entendimentos anteriores ou
       contemporâneos, escritos ou verbais com relação a esse objeto. O
       Contrato de Distribuição para Divulgador pode ser alterado,
       modificado ou substituído, apenas por um instrumento escrito
       assinado por ambas as partes. Os títulos neste instrumento e no
       Contrato são apenas para fins de conveniência de referência e não
       têm nenhum efeito legal. Este Contrato poderá ser celebrado e
       entregue por meio de transmissão eletrônica ou outro meio de
       reprodução completa e precisa, e as cópias do Contrato entregues
       por esses meios serão consideradas originais para todos os fins.
       Este Contrato poderá ser celebrado em vias, cada uma das quais será
       considerada um original, porém todas juntas constituirão um único e
       mesmo instrumento. Todas as disposições do Contrato que, por sua
       natureza, deveriam sobreviver à rescisão, sobreviverão à rescisão,
       incluindo, sem limitação, provisões de propriedade, indenizações de
       garantia e limitações de responsabilidade. Caso qualquer disposição
       deste Contrato seja considerada inexequível por qualquer motivo,
       essa disposição será reformada apenas na medida em que necessário
       para torná-la exequível, caso contrário, ela será separada do
       Contrato e o restante do Contrato continuará em vigor e a produzir
       efeitos. Nenhuma das partes pode ceder o Contrato ou qualquer dos
       seus direitos ou obrigações de acordo sem o consentimento prévio e
       por escrito da outra parte, exceto (i) devido à operação de lei,
       fusão, reorganização ou como resultado de uma aquisição ou mudança
       de controle, ou (ii) pela Outbrain às suas subsidiárias. Sujeito ao
       acima exposto, o Contrato será vinculativo e operante para o
       benefício das partes e seus sucessores e cessionários que sejam
       permitidos.

3rd Party Targeting Terms

Version 9.1

Effective January 23, 2018

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   By accepting these terms you agree that:
     * You and/or the company you represent ("Customer") has requested
       third party segments for enhanced targeting (“3rd Party Targeting”)
       of its Outbrain Amplify campaign(s). You are authorized to act on
       behalf of and bind Customer.
     * Customer shall pay the per-click fee for the 3rd Party Targeting
       (generally ranging between $0.05 and $0.95 per click), based on the
       price of a particular segment set by the 3rd party data provider
       (“3rd Party Data Costs”) for use of the 3rd Party Targeting on
       Customer's Amplify campaign(s), including any applicable taxes.
     * Customer’s invoice for each campaign shall include both the
       Outbrain Fees, pursuant to Amplify Terms (or Customer's customized
       terms), plus the 3rd Party Data Costs for utilizing 3rd Party
       Targeting. Outbrain shall pay the 3rd Party Data provider on
       Customer’s behalf.
     * Customer agrees that all clicks for the purposes of calculating 3rd
       Party Data costs will be based on Outbrain’s reporting metrics.

Impressum & Nutzungsbedingungen

Version 1.2

Effective September 3, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   aktualisiert: August 2012
   Impressum
   https://www.outbrain.com/de/ wird angeboten von
   Outbrain UK Limited
   5th Floor, The Place
   175 High Holborn
   London
   WC1V 7AA
   United Kingdom
   Register-Nummer
   7479183 (London)
   Ust-IdNr. (VAT): GB115005961
   Vertretungsberechtigter (Geschäftsführer)
   / Authorized Representative (Managing Director):
   Yaron Galai
   Anschrift des Vertretungsberechtigten:
   100 New Oxford Street
   London WC1A 1HB
   UK
   Kontakt:
   infouk@outbrain.com
   © Outbrain UK Limited 2017
   Allgemeine Nutzungsbedingungen
   1. EINLEITUNG.
   Die folgenden Nutzungsbedingungen (diese „Nutzungsbedingungen“) regeln
   Ihre (im Folgenden Sie, Ihr, Benutzer) Benutzung der Produkte, Dienste
   und Leistungen, die über die Website mit der URL www.outbrain.com (die
   „Website“) zur Verfügung gestellt werden. Diese Website wurde und wird
   von Outbrain Inc. („Outbrain“) erstellt, kontrolliert und betrieben.
   Wie weiter unten näher beschrieben, enthält die Website Outbrains
   firmeneigene und geschützte Empfehlungstechnologie in ihren diversen
   Ausformungen (insgesamt der „Service“). Der Service kann auf der
   Website oder auf Ihrer Website bzw. denen Ihrer Partner mittels eines
   Programmcodes genutzt werden, den wir Ihnen in seiner jeweils aktuellen
   Form zur Verfügung stellen (ein solcher Benutzer wird im Folgenden als
   „Partner“ bezeichnet) und den Sie gemäß vorliegenden
   Nutzungsbedingungen verwenden dürfen. Indem Sie auf diese Website gehen
   oder einen beliebigen Teil des Services nutzen, erklären Sie Ihr
   Einverständnis damit, dass diese Nutzungsbedingungen für Sie
   verbindlich sind. Wenn Sie mit diesen Nutzungsbedingungen nicht
   einverstanden sind, dann dürfen Sie nicht auf die Website zugreifen
   oder den Service nutzen. Ihr Recht zur Benutzung der Website und des
   Services ist ausdrücklich an Ihre Zustimmung zu allen Regelungen aus
   vorliegenden Nutzungsbedingungen gebunden und schließt jegliche
   sonstigen Regelungen aus. Dieser Service steht nur Personen im Alter
   von mindestens 18 Jahren zur Verfügung, egal ob sie im eigenen Namen
   oder als bevollmächtigte Angestellte oder Vertreter eines Unternehmens
   oder einer anders gearteten geschäftlichen Einheit handeln. Wenn Sie
   diese Voraussetzung nicht erfüllen, dann versuchen Sie bitte nicht,
   sich für die Nutzung des Services zu registrieren.
   2. ÄNDERUNGEN DER NUTZUNGSBEDINGUNGEN.
   Outbrain behält sich das Recht vor, diese Nutzungsbedingungen jederzeit
   nach alleinigem Ermessen zu verändern oder durch andere zu ersetzen.
   Sie sollten diese Nutzungsbedingungen von Zeit zu Zeit wieder aufrufen
   und durchsehen, denn Sie sind alleinverantwortlich für die
   Kenntnisnahme und Berücksichtigung eventueller Änderungen. Die Nutzung
   des Services durch Sie bringt gemäß vorliegender Mitteilung Ihr
   Einverständnis mit den jeweils modifizierten Nutzungsbedingungen zum
   Ausdruck. Dies gilt auch dann, wenn Sie sich bereits zuvor für die
   Nutzung des Services für Ihre Website registriert hatten und diese
   Website fortgesetzt nicht erneut besuchen.
   3. BESCHREIBUNG DES SERVICES.
   Der Service liefert Ihnen Empfehlungen („Empfehlungen“) für neue
   Artikel, Grafiken, Fotografien, Bilder, Illustrationen und Software
   sowie Audio- und Videoclips („Content“). Manche Empfehlungen können
   Content betreffen, für den wir gegen Bezahlung seitens unserer Kunden
   werben („Promoteter Content“). Diese Empfehlungen generieren Einnahmen
   („Werbeeinnahmen“) für die Websites solcher Kunden, die Outbrain nach
   alleinigem Ermessen dafür auswählt. Wenn Sie den Service nutzen, ohne
   sich auf der Website zu registrieren, wird diese Empfehlungs-Funktion
   automatisch als Teil des Services zur Verfügung gestellt. Wenn Sie sich
   auf der Website registrieren, können Sie die Einstellungen für die
   Empfehlungs-Funktion festlegen, so wie auf Outbrains Dashboard und
   weiter unten in Abschnitt 6 beschrieben.
   4. LIZENZ FÜR DEN SERVICE VON OUTBRAIN.
   A. LIZENZGEWÄHRUNG. Unter der Voraussetzung Ihrer uneingeschränkten
   Zustimmung zu allen Klauseln und Bedingungen aus diesen
   Nutzungsbedingungen gewährt Ihnen Outbrain eine begrenzte,
   nicht-exklusive, widerrufbare, nicht unterlizenzierbare und nicht
   übertragbare Lizenz zur Nutzung (i) des Services; (ii) sämtlicher
   Programmierschnittstellen der Anwendung oder anderer Programmcodes, die
   wir jeweils zum gegebenen Zeitpunkt seitens Outbrains zur Verfügung
   stellen (zusammengefasst das „Programm“); (iii) jeglicher Dokumentation
   Outbrains für Endanwender, wenn diese mit dem Service einhergeht; (iv)
   sämtlicher Upgrades, Aktualisierungen und neuer Versionen des Services,
   so wie weiter unten ausgeführt. Eine solche Lizenz umfasst das Recht
   zur Nutzung sämtlicher Schutz- und Urheberrechte Outbrains, die mit der
   Verwendung des Programms in Verbindung stehen oder mit anderen Aspekten
   einhergehen, die mit dem Service zusammenhängen. Ebenso umfasst sie die
   Benutzung der Schutz- und Urheberrechte für die Dokumentation Outbrains
   für Endanwender, doch ausschließlich in Verbindung mit der in den FAQ
   erläuterten Nutzung des Services.
   B. BERECHTIGUNG ZUR VERGABE VON UNTERLIZENZEN. In Anknüpfung an
   obenstehenden Abschnitt 4.A. sind Sie dazu berechtigt, (i) Berater und
   Auftragnehmer unter Vertrag zu nehmen, die dem alleinigen Zweck dienen,
   für die Benutzung des Services und des Programms durch Sie die
   notwendige Entwicklungsarbeit, Herstellung von Komponenten und
   Durchführung von Testaufgaben für Sie zu leisten sowie den Support der
   Anwendung für Sie zu übernehmen; (ii) Ihren Endanwendern gemäß den
   Regelungen aus untenstehendem Abschnitt 4.H. Unterlizenzen zu gewähren.
   Ausgenommen wie in Abschnitt 4.B. vorgesehen, sind Sie nicht dazu
   berechtigt, irgendwelche der Ihnen von diesen Nutzungsbedingungen
   zugestandenen Rechte an Berater, Auftragnehmer oder sonstige Dritte
   unterzulizenzieren.
   C. LIZENZBESCHRÄNKUNGEN. Sie dürfen das Programm nicht in Verbindung
   mit oder zum Bewerben von Produkten, Leistungen, Diensten oder Material
   verwenden die in einen der folgenden Bereiche fallen, dafür werben oder
   vorwiegend dafür verwendet werden, um in diesen Bereichen tätig zu
   sein: Spyware, Adware oder sonstige Schadprogramme, gefälschte Waren
   und Produkte, einem U.S.-Embargo unterliegende Produkte,
   unaufgeforderte und massive Verbreitung von E-Mails („Spam“),
   Multi-Level-Marketingangebote, hetzerisches Material, Material für das
   Hacking oder die Überwachung von Systemen, das Abfangen von Daten oder
   das Entschlüsseln von Codes, beleidigende, diffamierende, obszöne,
   pornografische, mit sexuellem Missbrauch in Verbindung stehende oder
   sonst wie anstößige Inhalte, Prostitution, Körperteile, Organe oder
   Körperflüssigkeiten, gestohlene Produkte und Gegenstände, die für
   Diebstahl und Raub verwendet werden, Feuerwerkskörper, Sprengstoff,
   Gefahrenstoffe, Ausweispapiere, Gegenstände für den polizeilichen
   Gebrauch, Glücksspiel, im Rahmen staatlicher Lizenzierungen regulierte
   Bereiche, Waffen und Waffenzubehör. Sie müssen den Service fristgerecht
   gemäß allen vertretbaren Anweisungen zur Anwendung bringen, die
   Outbrain Ihnen zum gegebenen Zeitpunkt vorgibt.
   D. PLATZIERUNG, OPTIK UND HAPTIK DES SERVICE. Sie werden den Service
   direkt unterhalb der Hauptinhalte auf allen Seiten Ihrer Website
   platzieren, auf denen der Service installiert ist. Kein anderer Service
   zur Content-Empfehlung darf parallel zu oder über Outbrains Service auf
   den Seiten Ihrer Website erscheinen, auf denen der Service installiert
   ist. Zudem müssen Sie den Service so zur Anwendung bringen, dass sein
   Aussehen und der erweckte Eindruck nicht zu Verwechslungen mit
   ähnlichen Content-Empfehlungsdiensten anderer Anbieter auf Ihrer
   Website führen kann.
   E. WEITERE EINSCHRÄNKUNGEN. Sofern in diesen Nutzungsbedingungen nicht
   ausdrücklich und eindeutig gestattet, sind Sie zu Folgendem nicht
   befugt: (i) Kopieren, Vermieten, Leasen, Verkaufen, Übertragen,
   Übereignen, Unterlizenzieren, Zerlegen, Rückentwickeln oder
   Dekompilieren (ausgenommen in dem begrenzten Maße, das vom anwendbaren
   Gesetzesrecht ausdrücklich zugelassen wird), Modifizieren oder
   Manipulieren von Teilen von (a) gemeinschaftlich erhobenen Daten und
   den zugehörigen Berichten (zusammengefasst „Daten“), die Outbrain Ihnen
   in verschiedenen Formaten zur Verfügung stellen kann, oder des (b)
   Programms; (ii) zur Benutzung des Programms oder des Services im
   Auftrag Dritter. Ausgenommen wie weiter unten in Abschnitt 4.G.
   dargelegt, geben Ihnen diese Nutzungsbedingungen keinerlei Anrecht auf
   die Benutzung von Markenzeichen, Dienstleistungsmarken, Handelsnamen
   oder andere markenrechtlich geschützte Elemente Outbrains oder anderer
   Lizenzgeber. Außer den ausdrücklich hier festgelegten Rechten und
   Lizenzen werden keine sonstigen Rechte und Lizenzen gewährt. Wenn Sie
   gegen eine der vorgenannten Einschränkungen verstoßen, ist Outbrain der
   Eigentümer aller Rechte, Ansprüche und Anteile, die mit jeglichen/m
   abgeleiteten Werken, Erfindungen und Entwicklungen, Werken mit
   Autorenrechten, Designs, Know-how, Ideen und Informationen in
   Verbindung stehen, die ganz oder teilweise mit der Nutzung des Services
   oder des Programms entstanden sind bzw. erworben, in die Praxis
   umgesetzt oder entwickelt wurden. Sie erklären sich hiermit dazu
   bereit, alle notwendigen Anweisungen zu geben, um die Erfüllung der
   vorgenannten, eigentumsrechtlichen Bedingungen zu gewährleisten.
   F. NEUE VERSIONEN UND UPGRADES. Outbrain kann Aktualisierungen,
   Upgrades und neue Versionen des Services oder des Programms
   herausbringen. Gleiches gilt für mit dem Service in Verbindung stehende
   Software. Die Einführung erfolgt jeweils gemäß den Anleitungen in den
   FAQ. Sie stimmen zu, dass jeglicher Zugriff auf oder Zugang zu
   Software, der Ihnen im Rahmen dieser Nutzungsbedingungen gewährt wird,
   nicht Outbrains Recht einschränkt, solcherlei Software in künftigen
   Versionen des Services zu verändern oder zu ersetzen. Die Ihnen hier
   gewährte Lizenz beinhaltet solcherlei Elemente.
   G. MARKENRECHTLICHE LIZENZ. Outbrain gewährt Ihnen hiermit eine
   persönliche, begrenzte, nicht-exklusive, nicht übertragbare und
   kostenpflichtige Lizenz zur Benutzung der Marken Outbrains (wie weiter
   unten in Abschnitt 18 definiert). Sie können Outbrains Marken in
   Verbindung mit Ihrer Nutzung des Programms, der Daten oder des Services
   auf jeder Ihrer Websites oder den Websites Ihrer Partner nutzen, über
   die Teile des Services abgewickelt werden. Sie können jederzeit und
   ohne Outbrains zusätzliche Genehmigung Blog-Beiträge in Ihrem Blog oder
   denen Ihrer Partner veröffentlichen, bei denen Outbrains Marken
   verwendet werden. Dies jedoch unter der Voraussetzung, dass Sie
   vernünftig vertretbare Anstrengungen unternehmen, Outbrain die
   Blog-Beiträge vor ihrer Veröffentlichung oder zeitgleich mit ihr
   zuzusenden. Nichts in vorliegender Vereinbarung gewährt Ihnen
   Eigentumsrechte oder sonstige Rechte bezüglich des Gebrauchs der Marken
   Outbrains, die nicht ausdrücklich aus vorliegender Lizenzgewährung
   hervorgehen. Unter keinerlei Umständen dürfen Sie die Marken Outbrains
   in Verruf bringen oder auf andere Art missbrauchen. Ebenso dürfen Sie
   unter keinen Umständen gegen die Verhaltensregeln für Benutzer
   verstoßen, die weiter unten in Abschnitt 5 dargelegt werden. Die Ihnen
   im Rahmen vorliegender Lizenzgewährung gewährten Rechte erlöschen mit
   vorliegenden Nutzungsbedingungen. Sollten diese gekündigt oder außer
   Kraft gesetzt werden, stellen Sie die Nutzung der Marken Outbrains ein.
   H. KEINE SONSTIGEN LIZENZEN. Alle im Rahmen dieser Vereinbarung
   gewährten Lizenzen sind ausdrücklich hier erwähnt. Es werden keine
   sonstigen Lizenzen oder Rechte eingeräumt, weder stillschweigend noch
   durch Rechtsverwirkung.
   I. ENDBENUTZER-LIZENZEN. Sie erklären sich damit einverstanden, dass
   jede Ihrer Websites und/oder jedes Ihrer Softwareprodukte, für die oder
   mit denen die in vorliegender Vereinbarung gewährten Rechte genutzt
   werden, allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen enthalten muss, die Folgendes
   sicherstellen: (i) Der Service, die Daten und das Programm müssen
   mindestens gleichwertig geschützt sein, wie Ihre firmeneigenen
   Softwareanwendungen, und (ii) solcherlei firmeneigene
   Softwareanwendungen Outbrains sind durch die Nutzungsbedingungen Ihrer
   Website ebenfalls geschützt. Darüber hinaus muss die
   Datenschutzrichtlinie der betreffenden Website und/oder der
   betreffenden Softwareprodukte erklären, dass die Daten zu einer dritten
   Partei geroutet werden, die der Eigentümer der betreffenden Daten ist,
   dass dieses Routing jedoch keinerlei die Person identifizierende
   Informationen enthält. Sie erklären sich damit einverstanden, dass Sie
   in solcherlei allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen für die Nutzung des
   Services außerhalb der Vereinigten Staaten jegliche erforderlichen,
   landesspezifischen Regelungen aufnehmen werden, die notwendig sind, um
   die vorgenannten Regelungen wirksam zu machen. Sie erklären sich
   weiterhin damit einverstanden, dass Sie die allgemeinen
   Geschäftsbedingungen für die unter dieser Lizenz gewährte Nutzung des
   Services, der Daten und des Programms auch durchsetzen werden.
   5. VERHALTENSREGELN FÜR BENUTZER.
   Als Bedingung für die Benutzung verpflichten Sie sich dazu, den Service
   oder die Daten zu keinerlei ungesetzlichen, zu von diesen
   Nutzungsbedingungen ausgeschlossenen oder solchen Zwecken zu verwenden,
   die von Outbrain nach vernünftigem Ermessen nicht beabsichtigt sind.
   Hier ohne Anspruch auf Vollständigkeit einige Beispiele für Nutzungen,
   von denen Sie gemäß dieser Vereinbarung Abstand nehmen:
     * Missbrauch, Belästigung, Bedrohung, Vortäuschung einer fremden
       Indetität oder Einschüchterung anderer Benutzer von Outbrain oder
       von Content-Anbietern;
     * auf in irgendeiner Form verletzende, beleidigende, diffamierende,
       obszöne, pornografische, missbräuchliche, anstößige oder auf andere
       Art die Gesetze oder die Rechte Dritter verletzende Art und Weise;
     * für illegale oder unerlaubte Zwecke. Sie versichern, dass Sie alle
       vor Ort geltenden Gesetze hinsichtlich des Verhaltens im Internet
       und zulässiger Inhalte beachten werden;
     * zum Posten oder zur Weitergabe von Mitteilungen oder
       Aufforderungen, die dazu bestimmt oder entwickelt sind, Passwörter
       bzw. Kontoinformation oder private Angaben von Outbrain-Benutzern
       zu beschaffen. Ebenso sind Handlungen zu unterlassen, die das
       Posten oder die Weitergabe solcher Mitteilungen veranlassen;
     * das Erstellen oder Versenden von Spam an andere Outbrain-Benutzer
       oder URLs;
     * gesetzliche Vorschriften in Ihrer Gerichtsbarkeit zu verletzen
       (darunter zum Beispiel auch Gesetze zum Urheberrechtsschutz);
     * das Einsenden von Texten oder Kommentaren, die zu Partnerprogrammen
       verlinken, zu Angeboten im Bereich Multi-Level-Marketing,
       Websites/Blogs zur Wiederverwertung von Content und Geschichten
       (sogenannte Source-Hops) oder zu nicht zum Thema gehörenden
       Inhalten;
     * der Zugang zur Website unter Verwendung von Robotersystemen,
       Webcrawlern, Scrapern oder anderen automatisierten Funktionen,
       ausgenommen dies wurde ausdrücklich und schriftlich genehmigt;
     * solche Tätigkeiten ausführen, die nach unserem alleinigen
       Dafürhalten eine unangemessene und überdimensional große Belastung
       für die Infrastruktur des Services bedeuten oder bedeuten könnten;
     * das einwandfreie Funktionieren der Website oder anderer Funktionen
       und über die Website abgewickelter Aktivitäten beeinträchtigen oder
       zu beeinträchtigen versuchen;
     * das Umgehen jeglicher Art von Maßnahmen, mit deren Hilfe wir den
       Zugang zur Website verhindern oder einschränken;
     * Handlungen mit der Absicht, die Empfehlungen oder sonstige Dienste
       Outbrains künstlich zu verändern oder zu manipulieren. Dazu zählt
       etwa auch das Einrichten mehrerer Benutzerkonten, um die Dienste
       Outbrains künstlich zu verfälschen, das vorsätzliche Aufblähen von
       Klick-Zahlen oder Empfehlungen zu promotetem Content sowie die
       Beteiligung an jeglicher sonstigen Art von organisierten
       Bemühungen, die darauf abzielen, die Ergebnisse und Funktionsweise
       des Services zu verfälschen.

   Den folgenden Websites ist die Benutzung des Services streng verboten
   und Outbrain wird die Benutzung des Services durch solche Sites aktiv
   unterbinden, von denen das Unternehmen der Ansicht ist, dass sie gegen
   dieses Verbot verstoßen: Websites, die nur für Erwachsene bestimmte,
   obszöne, pornografische, beleidigende, verletzende, zum Missbrauch
   auffordernde oder diffamierende Inhalte zeigen oder daran beteiligt
   sind. Gleiches gilt für solche Websites, die illegale Aktivitäten
   fördern oder begünstigen, zu Hass und Diskriminierung aufrufen oder
   diese fördern sowie dem Verkauf von Feuerwaffen oder illegalen Drogen
   dienen oder diesen Verkauf fördern. Zusätzlich behält sich Outbrain das
   Recht vor, den Service auf jeglicher Site im alleinigen Ermessen zu
   deaktivieren.
   Outbrain kann jederzeit nach alleinigem Ermessen und aus beliebigen
   Gründen Content von der Website entfernen (darunter unter anderem etwa
   auf Beschwerden hin oder bei Einwänden Dritter oder von Behörden
   hinsichtlich solcher Inhalte). Wenn Sie Verstöße gegen diese
   Nutzungsbedingungen melden möchten, wenden Sie sich bitte per E-Mail an
   abuse@outbrain.com.
   6. REGISTRIERUNG.
   Zur Nutzung des Services ist es nicht notwendig, dass Sie sich auf der
   Website registrieren. Diese Nutzungsbedingungen sind für Sie jedoch
   auch dann verbindlich, wenn Sie sich nicht registrieren und den Service
   in Anspruch nehmen und nutzen. Wenn Sie sich auf der Website
   registrieren, haben Sie Zugang zu Online-Berichten und zum
   Outbrain-Dashboard, welches Ihnen die Kontrolle über eine Reihe von
   Einstellungen des Services ermöglicht. Um sich zu registrieren, müssen
   Sie bestimmte Angaben machen. Wenn Sie Blogger sind, müssen Sie zudem
   eine gültige Blog-URL angeben. Wenn Sie Partner sind, müssen Sie
   zusätzliche Kontaktangaben machen, darunter unter anderem auch Namen,
   Anschrift und eine gültige E-Mail-Adresse und weitere Kontaktangaben.
   Bevor Sie Ihre Registrierung abschließen, senden wir Ihnen an Ihre
   E-Mail-Adresse einen Link, den Sie anklicken müssen, um Ihr
   Outbrain-Konto zu aktivieren.
   7. PROMOTETER CONTENT.
   Durch Ihre Registrierung auf der Website haben Sie die Möglichkeit, das
   Outbrain-Dashboard zu benutzen und darüber neben weiteren Einstellungen
   diejenigen für die Empfehlungs-Funktion festzulegen. Wenn Sie die
   Option wählen, promoteten Content zuzulassen, können Sie zudem eine
   gemeinnützige Einrichtung oder Organisation wählen (aus einer Liste im
   Outbrain-Dashboard), der ein Teil Ihrer Einnahmen aus Werbung auf Ihrer
   Website und durch die Nutzung des Services zukommen soll. Outbrain
   zahlt nur dann einen Anteil an Werbeeinnahmen an Partner, wenn eine
   schriftliche, von vorliegenden Nutzungsbedingungen getrennte
   Einverständniserklärung Outbrains vorliegt.
   8. EIGENTUMSRECHTE.
   Sämtliche Rechte an, Ansprüche auf und Beteiligungen an der Website,
   dem Service, Zusammenstellungen, digitalen Speicherungen bzw.
   Umwandlungen, Software und sonstigem mit dem Service in Verbindung
   stehendem Material sind und bleiben stets exklusives Eigentum Outbrains
   und stehen unter dem Schutz der anwendbaren Gesetze und Abkommen zum
   geistigen Eigentum und Urheberrecht. Sämtliche im Zusammenhang mit der
   Website stehenden oder durch den Service über jede beliebige Website
   erhobenen Daten sind stets alleiniges Eigentum Outbrains. Sie nehmen
   zur Kenntnis, dass Sie keinerlei Eigentumsrechte am Service oder den
   über den Service gewonnenen und vermittelten Daten erwerben.
   Outbrain behält sich sämtliche Rechte vor, die Ihnen im Rahmen
   vorliegender Nutzungsbedingungen nicht ausdrücklich gewährt werden.
   9. EINGESANDTER UND ÜBER DEN SERVICE VERFÜGBAR GEMACHTER CONTENT.
   Eingeschränkte Lizenz zur Nutzung von Content. Wenn Sie Partner sind
   und Content einsenden, gewähren Sie Outbrain hiermit ein beschränktes,
   nicht-exklusives, in voller Höhe beglichenes, lizenzfreies und
   weltweites Recht zur Nutzung besagten Contents sowie Ihrer
   registrierten und nicht registrierten Markenzeichen,
   Dienstleistungsmarken, Handelsaufmachungen, Grafiken oder Logos
   („Partner-Marken“) für alle folgenden Bereiche: (i) auf der Website
   sowie in sämtlichen Blogs und Newslettern Outbrains; (ii) im Rahmen
   jeder Geschäftsentwicklung, in Verkaufsmaterialien oder
   Pressemitteilungen; (iii) als beliebiger Bestandteil des Services; (iv)
   in jeder sonstigen, vernünftig vertretbaren Art und Weise, von der ein
   Partner ausgehen kann, dass Outbrain die Partner-Marken entsprechend
   verwendet.
   10. GEWÄHRLEISTUNGSAUSSCHLUSS.
   Sie bestätigen, dass Outbrain über Folgendes keinerlei Kontrolle hat
   und hinsichtlich folgender Aspekte in keiner Weise tätig werden muss:
   welche Benutzer auf den Service zugreifen; welche Auswirkungen der
   Service für Sie, Ihre Website oder Ihre Geräte und Systeme haben kann;
   die Richtigkeit des Services oder der Daten bzw. wie Sie diese
   interpretieren, sich auf sie verlassen oder diese verwenden. Dazu
   gehören zum Beispiel auch ein eventueller Ansehensverlust oder
   Rückgänge bei den Besucherzahlen Ihrer Website oder irgendwelcher
   Websites Ihrer Partner; Handlungen und Maßnahmen, die Sie in Folge
   Ihrer Nutzung des Services tätigen oder ergreifen. Sie bestätigen
   darüber hinaus und stimmen zu, dass Outbrain weder direkt oder indirekt
   verantwortlich oder haftbar ist für Schäden oder Verluste, die faktisch
   oder vorgeblich im Zusammenhang stehen mit der Benutzung von oder der
   Berücksichtigung von Content, Gütern oder Leistungen, die auf solchen
   Websites Dritter zugänglich sind, die mit dem Service verlinkt sind
   oder auf die über den Service oder über mit dem Service in Zusammenhang
   stehenden Daten hingewiesen wird. Sie stellen Outbrain von jeglicher
   Haftung hinsichtlich des Services sowie jeglicher Inhalte oder Daten
   frei, die über den Service oder die Website verfügbar gemacht werden
   oder zugänglich sind. Die Website kann Informationen oder Content
   enthalten, die von manchen Personen als beleidigend, anstößig oder
   unangebracht empfunden werden können, bzw. die Website kann zu Websites
   weiterleiten, die solcherlei Informationen oder Content enthalten.
   Outbrain enthält sich jeglicher Stellungnahme zu Daten oder Content,
   die über den Service oder die Website zugänglich oder in/auf ihnen
   erhältlich sind, darunter unter anderem auch promoteter Content.
   Outbrain ist weder verantwortlich noch haftbar für die Inhalte, ihre
   Richtigkeit, urheberrechtliche Gesetzmäßigkeit, Legalität oder
   Schicklichkeit des Contents Dritter oder der Dienste und Leistungen,
   die über den Service oder die Website zugänglich sind. Ebenso ist
   Outbrain nicht verantwortlich oder haftbar, wenn Sie sich auf solchen
   Content verlassen. DER SERVICE, DAS PROGRAMM UND DIE DATEN WERDEN IHNEN
   „IN VORLIEGENDER FORM“ ZUR VERFÜGUNG GESTELLT, OHNE JEGLICHE
   GEWÄHRLEISTUNG AUSGENOMMEN DERJENIGEN, DASS OUTBRAIN GEWÄHRLEISTET, IM
   BESITZ ALLER NOTWENDIGEN RECHTE, ANRECHTE UND BETEILIGUNGEN
   HINSICHTLICH SERVICE, WEBSITE UND PROGRAMM ZU SEIN, UM IHNEN DIE RECHTE
   UND LIZENZEN ZU GEWÄHREN, DIE GEGENSTAND VORLIEGENDER
   NUTZUNGSBEDINGUNGEN SIND. WENN IN VORLIEGENDER VEREINBARUNG NICHT
   ANDERSLAUTEND FESTGELEGT UND IM GESETZLICH ZULÄSSIGEN MASSE ÜBERNEHMEN
   OUTBRAIN UND SEINE VERTRETER KEINERLEI AUSDRÜCKLICHE, STILLSCHWEIGENDE
   ODER GESETZLICHE GEWÄHRLEISTUNGEN HINSICHTLICH DES SERVICES, DES
   PROGRAMMS ODER DER DATEN. DIESER GEWÄHRLEISTUNGSAUSSCHLUSS BETRIFFT
   UNTER ANDEREM AUCH ALLE IMPLIZITEN GEWÄHRLEISTUNGEN HINSICHTLICH
   MARKTGÄNGIGKEIT, RICHTIGKEIT, NUTZUNGSERGEBNISSEN, VERLÄSSLICHKEIT,
   EIGNUNG FÜR BESTIMMTE ZWECKE, BESITZANSPRÜCHEN, BEEINTRÄCHTIGUNGEN DER
   UNGESTÖRTEN NUTZUNG UND NICHTVERLETZUNG DER RECHTE DRITTER. OUTBRAIN
   ÜBERNIMMT KEINE GEWÄHRLEISTUNG DAFÜR, DASS IHRE NUTZUNG DES SERVICE,
   DES CODES ODER DER DATEN STETS UNUNTERBROCHEN UND FEHLERFREI SEIN WIRD.
   EINIGE STAATEN GESTATTEN DIE EINSCHRÄNKUNG DES ZEITRAUMS FÜR
   STILLSCHWEIGENDE GARANTIEN NICHT, SO DASS DIE OBENSTEHENDEN
   EINSCHRÄNKUNGEN EVENTUELL NICHT AUF SIE ZUTREFFEN.
   11. HAFTUNGSBESCHRÄNKUNG.
   UNABHÄNGIG DAVON, OB ANDERE HIER FESTGELEGTE RECHTSMITTEL IHREN ZWECK
   VERFEHLEN ODER OB ANDERE UNVORHERGESEHENE FÄLLE EINTRETEN, UND
   AUSGENOMMEN IM FALL VON KÖRPERVERLETZUNG, SIND OUTBRAIN ODER SEINE
   VERTRETER IHNEN ODER DRITTEN GEGENÜBER UNTER KEINEN UMSTÄNDEN IM RAHMEN
   VON SCHADENSERSATZRECHT ODER VERTRAGSANGELEGENHEITEN, WEGEN
   FAHRLÄSSIGKEIT ODER GEFÄHRDUNGSHAFTUNG ODER UNTER SONSTIGEN
   RECHTSTHEORETISCHEN BZW. VERGLEICHBAREN KONZEPTEN HAFTBAR FÜR (I)
   GEWINNEINBUSSEN, DATENVERLUST ODER BESCHÄDIGUNG VON DATEN,
   COMPUTERAUSFÄLLE ODER FUNKTIONSSTÖRUNGEN VON COMPUTERN, UNTERBRECHUNGEN
   DER GESCHÄFTSTÄTIGKEIT ODER ANDERE SPEZIFISCHE ODER INDIREKTE NEBEN-
   ODER FOLGESCHÄDEN JEDWEDER ART, DIE SICH AUS DER NUTZUNG ODER
   NICHTVERFÜGBARKEIT DER WEBSITE, DES SERVICES ODER DER DATEN ERGEBEN.
   DAS GILT AUCH DANN, WENN OUTBRAIN ÜBER DIE MÖGLICHKEIT INFORMIERT
   WURDE, DASS SOLCHE VERLUSTE ODER SCHÄDEN ENTSTEHEN KÖNNEN, UND ES GILT
   UNABHÄNGIG DAVON, OB SOLCHE VERLUSTE ODER SCHÄDEN VORHERSEHBAR WAREN,
   ODER (II) FÜR JEGLICHE ART VON DIREKTEN SCHÄDEN IM WERT VON MEHR ALS
   (ZUSAMMENGEFASST) 1.000 $. FORDERUNGEN IM ZUSAMMENHANG MIT DIESEN
   NUTZUNGSBEDINGUNGEN MÜSSEN VOR ABLAUF EINES (1) JAHRES NACH DEM MOMENT
   ERFOLGEN, IN DEM DER ENTSPRECHENDE VORFALL STATTGEFUNDEN HAT. OUTBRAIN
   ÜBERNIMMT KEINE HAFTUNG FÜR VERTRETER OUTBRAINS EGAL WELCHER ART.
   MANCHE STAATEN ERLAUBEN KEINEN HAFTUNGSAUSSCHLUSS FÜR NEBENSCHÄDEN ODER
   FOLGESCHÄDEN. IN DIESEM FALL KOMMEN DIE ENTSPRECHENDEN DER
   OBENSTEHENDEN HAFTUNGSAUSSCHLÜSSE NICHT ZUR ANWENDUNG.
   SIE HABEN VERSTANDEN UND STIMMEN ZU, DASS IHR EINZIGES RECHT GEGENÜBER
   UND GEGEN OUTBRAIN DARIN BESTEHT, DIE NUTZUNG DES SERVICES ZU BEENDEN.
   12. SCHADLOSHALTUNG.
   Sie erklären sich damit einverstanden, Outbrain, seine
   Dachgesellschaften, Filialen, Partner, Kunden und Verkäufer sowie die
   jeweiligen Führungskräfte, Geschäftsführer und Angestellten gegen jede
   Art von Haftung, Schäden, Kosten oder Gebühren (darunter auch
   Anwaltskosten) schadlos zu halten, die sich folgendermaßen ergeben
   können: (i) Ansprüche oder Forderungen Dritter, die sich aus Ihrem
   Zugriff auf und Zugang zur Website ergeben; (ii) durch Ihre Nutzung des
   Services, des Programms oder der Daten sowie einen durch Sie begangenen
   Verstoß gegen die Nutzungsbedingungen; (iii) durch einen durch Sie oder
   Dritte begangenen Verstoß bei der Benutzung Ihres Outbrain-Kontos,
   einen Verstoß gegen Urheberrechte oder andere Rechte von Personen oder
   Rechtspersonen. Dies gilt allerdings unter der Voraussetzung, dass Sie
   nicht versucht haben, einen solchen Verstoß durch die Anwendung von
   Outbrains Datenschutzrichtlinie zu berichtigen und abzustellen, so wie
   in Abschnitt 19 weiter unten beschrieben.
   13. GELTUNGSDAUER UND BEENDIGUNG.
   Die Geltungsdauer der Nutzungsbedingungen und das Ende dieser
   Geltungsdauer werden in diesem Abschnitt festgelegt. Outbrain kann
   Benutzerkonten nach alleinigem Ermessen jederzeit, aus jedem beliebigen
   Grund oder auch ohne Grund und ohne Vorankündigung stornieren oder
   kündigen, ohne dass Ihnen daraus ein Haftungsanspruch erwächst. Mit der
   Kündigung Ihres Kontos erlöschen augenblicklich Ihre Nutzungsrechte für
   den Service. Wenn diese Nutzungsbedingungen aus beliebigem Grund
   gekündigt oder außer Kraft gesetzt werden, müssen Sie sämtliche Kopien
   des Services und des Programms sowie alle Daten umgehend von allen
   Ihren Computern und Festplatten, aus Ihren Netzwerken und von allen
   sonstigen Speichermedien löschen. Auf Wunsch Outbrains müssen Sie
   Outbrain bestätigen, dass dies erfolgt ist. Wenn Sie Ihr Konto bei
   Outbrain kündigen wollen, können Sie einfach die Nutzung des Services
   einstellen. All diejenigen Regelungen aus vorliegenden
   Nutzungsbedingungen, die ob ihres Inhalts über die Kündigung/Beendigung
   der Vereinbarung hinaus Bestand haben müssen, haben über die Beendigung
   der Vereinbarung hinaus uneingeschränkt Bestand. Dazu gehören unter
   anderem sämtliche Eigentumsregelungen, Haftungsausschlüsse,
   Schadloshaltungsklauseln und Haftungsbeschränkungen.
   14. BENUTZUNG DURCH REGIERUNG UND BEHÖRDEN.
   Wenn Sie einer Behörde, Abteilung oder Einrichtung der Regierung der
   Vereinigten Staaten („Regierung“) angehören, ist das Kopieren,
   Reproduzieren, Veröffentlichen, Modifizieren, Weitergeben oder
   Übertragen des Services bei zivilen Behörden entsprechend den Federal
   Acquisition Regulations eingeschränkt, und bei militärischen
   Einrichtungen und Behörden gemäß dem Defense Federal Acquisition
   Regulation Supplement. Der Service und die Daten sind jedes für sich
   „Handelsartikel“, „gewerbliche Computersoftware“ und „Dokumentation zu
   gewerblicher Computersoftware“. In Übereinstimmung mit diesen
   Regelungen richtet sich die Verwendung solcher Artikel durch die
   Regierung ausnahmslos nach diesen Nutzungsbedingungen.
   15. EXPORTKONTROLLEN.
   Sie müssen sämtliche für den Export maßgeblichen Gesetze und
   Beschränkungen sowie die Vorschriften des Department of Commerce
   (Handelsministerium), des United States Department of Treasury Office
   of Foreign Assets Control („OFAC“) oder sonstiger Behörden der
   Vereinigten Staaten bzw. anderer Länder befolgen und einhalten. Sie
   dürfen den Service nicht unter Verstoß gegen irgendeine/s solcher
   Handelsbeschränkungen, Gesetze oder Vorschriften exportieren oder
   seinen Export zulassen. Durch das Herunterladen oder die Nutzung des
   Services oder von Daten stimmen Sie dem Vorangehenden zu, und darüber
   hinaus erklären und gewährleisten Sie, dass Sie nicht in einem Land
   ansässig sind oder unter dessen Kontrolle stehen, das Beschränkungen
   irgendwelcher Art unterliegt, und dass Sie kein Bürger oder Bewohner
   eines solchen Landes sind.
   16. VERSCHIEDENES.
   Diese Nutzungsbedingungen sind den Vertragsgegenstand betreffend die
   vollständige und ungeteilte Vereinbarung zwischen Ihnen und Outbrain.
   Sie ersetzen jegliche schriftlichen und mündlichen Vereinbarungen
   hinsichtlich des Vertragsgegenstands. Im Rahmen dieser
   Nutzungsvereinbarung wird keinerlei Filiale, Partnerschaft, Joint
   Venture oder Angestelltenverhältnis begründet und Sie haben keinerlei
   Vollmachten oder Zuständigkeiten irgendwelcher Art, die Outbrain zu
   irgendetwas verpflichten könnten. Diese Nutzungsbedingungen und
   jegliche Streitfälle, die daraus oder hinsichtlich ihrer Auslegung
   erwachsen können, sind gemäß den Gesetzen des Bundesstaats New York zu
   entscheiden und zu interpretieren, so wie diese Gesetze bei Verträgen
   und Vereinbarungen zwischen Anwohnern New Yorks zur Anwendung kommen,
   die dort ihren Gerichtsstand haben. Kollisionsrechtlich bleiben dabei
   Konflikte mit anderen Gesetzen und Gerichtsbarkeiten unberücksichtigt
   und auch die Regelungen aus dem UN-Kaufrecht (United Nations
   Conventions for the International Sale of Goods) bleiben
   unberücksichtigt. Ausgenommen Outbrain legt an anderer Stelle
   Abweichendes fest, sind sämtliche Klagen oder Verfahren, die sich aus
   oder im Zusammenhang mit dieser Vereinbarung ergeben, bei einem
   Bundesgericht im Southern District of New York oder einem
   bundesstaatlichen Gericht in New York County, New York, vorzubringen.
   Beide Parteien unterstellen sich für Klagen, Verfahren und gerichtliche
   oder rechtliche Schritte jedweder Art unwiderruflich der
   Gerichtsbarkeit und dem Gerichtsstand der genannten Gerichte. Bei
   rechtlichen oder gerichtlichen Auseinandersetzungen im Zusammenhang mit
   dieser Vereinbarung hat die obsiegende Partei das Recht auf Erstattung
   der Anwaltshonorare und Kosten. Diese Nutzungsbedingungen können nur
   schriftlich und durch Outbrain verändert werden. Sollte eine Regelung
   aus vorliegender Vereinbarung sich aus beliebigem Grund als
   undurchsetzbar erweisen, so wird diese Regelung nur in dem Maße
   abgeändert, das notwendig ist, um sie durchsetzbar zu machen. Wenn
   Outbrain bei einem durch Sie oder Dritte begangenen Verstoß gegen diese
   Nutzungsbedingungen nicht tätig wird, so impliziert dies keinen
   Verzicht auf den betreffenden Anspruch und schränkt in keiner Weise
   Outbrains Rechte ein, die sich aus einem solchen Verstoß oder
   eventuellen neuen Verstößen ergeben. Diese Nutzungsbedingungen gelten
   für Sie persönlich und können aus keinerlei Gründen abgetreten oder
   übertragen werden (unter anderem auch nicht wegen, durch oder bei
   Abtretung kraft Gesetz, Fusionen, Unternehmenssanierungen, in Folge
   einer Geschäftsübernahme oder wegen eines Sie betreffenden
   Führungswechsels), es sei denn, Outbrain habe dies vorab schriftlich
   genehmigt. Jegliche Handlungen oder Verhaltensweisen, die
   Voranstehendem zuwiderhandeln, gelten als ungültig und bleiben
   unwirksam. Outbrain behält sich ausdrücklich das Recht vor, die
   vorliegenden Nutzungsbedingungen abzutreten und seine sich aus ihnen
   ergebenden Verpflichtungen zu übertragen.
   17. DATENSCHUTZRICHTLINIE OUTBRAIN.
   Outbrains geltende Datenschutzrichtlinie ist verfügbar unter
   https://www.outbrain.com/legal/privacy, und Sie gilt kraft vorliegender
   Erwähnung als in vorliegende Vereinbarung aufgenommen.
   18. HANDELSMARKEN.
   OUTBRAIN und Outbrains sonstige Marken, Grafiken, Logos, Designs,
   Seitenköpfe, Buttons-Icons, Scripts und Bezeichnungen von Diensten und
   Leistungen umfassen registrierte und nicht-registrierte Handelsmarken,
   Dienstleistungsmarken und Handelsaufmachungen Outbrains in den USA
   und/oder anderen Ländern („Outbrains Marken“). Sonstige Handelsmarken,
   Dienstleistungsmarken und Handelsnamen, die im Service verwendet
   werden, sind Eigentum ihrer jeweiligen Eigentümer. Sie erklären sich
   damit einverstanden, Outbrains Marken ohne Outbrains vorherige
   schriftliche Genehmigung nicht wiederzugeben oder in anderer Art und
   Weise zu verwenden. Ein Partner darf jedoch über seine Benutzung des
   Services jederzeit bloggen, ohne dafür eine solche Genehmigung zu
   benötigen, sofern der Partner den Blog-Eintrag Outbrain vorab oder im
   Moment der Veröffentlichung zukommen lässt.
   19. URHEBERRECHTLICHE BESCHWERDEN.
   Wir respektieren die Urheberrechte anderer und erwarten dasselbe von
   denjenigen, die den Service nutzen. Wenn Sie der Meinung sind, dass
   Ihre urheberrechtlich geschützte Arbeit auf eine Art und Weise kopiert
   oder wiedergegeben wurde, die eine Urheberrechtsverletzung darstellt,
   dann informieren Sie darüber bitte Outbrains weiter unten aufgeführten,
   gemäß Digital Millennium Copyright Act, 17 U.S.C. Section 512(c)(2)
   benannten Urheberrechts-Beauftragten und machen Sie dabei die folgenden
   Angaben:
     * die Unterschrift der Person, die ermächtigt ist, im Namen des
       Urheberrechtsinhabers zu handeln;
     * eine Beschreibung der urheberrechtlich geschützten Arbeit, von der
       Sie behaupten, Ihre Rechte seien verletzt worden;
     * eine Beschreibung, wo im Service das Ihrer Ansicht nach das
       Urheberrecht verletzende Material zu finden ist;
     * Ihre Anschrift, Telefonnummer und E-Mail-Adresse;
     * eine Erklärung Ihrerseits, dass Sie nach Treu und Glauben der
       Ansicht sind, dass die beanstandete Verwendung nicht vom Inhaber
       der Urheberrechte genehmigt wurde, die entsprechende Begründung
       oder das zugrundeliegende Gesetz;
     * eine eidesstattliche Erklärung Ihrerseits, dass die oben genannten,
       Ihre Eingabe begleitenden Angaben korrekt sind und dass Sie der
       Eigentümer der Urheberrechte oder dazu befugt sind, im Namen des
       Eigentümers der Urheberrechte zu handeln.

   Copyright-Beauftragter:
   Outbrain Inc., c/o legal counsel, 39 West 13th Street, New York, New
   York 10011, USA; legal@outbrain.com
   FRAGEN UND ANMERKUNGEN
   Mit Fragen oder Anmerkungen zum oder Problemen mit dem Service wenden
   Sie sich bitte an den Website-Administrator unter admin@outbrain.com.

Outbrain Terms of Use

Version 1.3

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   Welcome to Outbrain’s Terms of Use (the “Terms”). These Terms govern
   your (hereafter “ you”, “your” or “user ”) use of this website and the
   products and services available at this website, www.outbrain.com, and
   any related website linked to this URL address, including pages related
   to Outbrain’s Engage and Amplify services (collectively the “ Site”)
   and/or created, controlled or operated by Outbrain Inc. (hereafter
   “Outbrain ”, “we” “us ” or “our”). The Site features Outbrain's
   proprietary recommendation technology in its various forms and other
   services Outbrain may make available from time to time (collectively,
   the “Service"). By accessing the Site or using any part of the Service,
   you agree to be bound by these Terms. If you do not agree to these
   Terms, then you may not access the Site or use the Service.
   1. General Use.
   Subject to these Terms, Outbrain hereby grants you a limited,
   non-exclusive, and non-transferable license to use the Site. You can
   simply visit and use the Site and you do not need to register with
   Outbrain to do so. We reserve the right to modify these Terms at any
   time. By continuing to access or use the Site or Service, you agree to
   such modifications.
   2. Intellectual Property, Digital Millennium Copyright Act (DMCA) and
   Takedown Notice.
   2.1 Intellectual Property Ownership and Use. You acknowledge and agree
   that all of our trademarks, logos, copyrights, and all other
   intellectual property rights in all material or content contained
   within the Site shall remain at all times vested in us. You may not
   modify, edit, copy, reproduce, create derivative works of, reverse
   engineer, alter, enhance or in any way exploit any of the Site or its
   materials in any manner. In cases where we use material or content
   under authority from a third party, such rights remain vested in the
   owner of such material or content. All Site content and all materials
   contained within the Site are owned by Outbrain or used by Outbrain
   under authorization, and are protected by applicable trademark and
   copyright laws.
   2.2. DMCA. If you believe that your work has been copied and posted on
   the Site or through Outbrain’s Service in a way that constitutes
   copyright infringement, please provide us with the following
   information:
   (a) an electronic or physical signature of the person authorized to act
   on behalf of the owner of the copyright interest;
   (b) a description of the copyrighted work that you claim has been
   infringed;
   (c) a description of where the material that you claim is infringing is
   located on the Site or in our Service;
   (d) your address, telephone number, and email address;
   (e) a written statement by you that you have a good faith belief that
   the disputed use is not authorized by the copyright owner, its agent,
   or the law; and
   (f) a statement by you, made under penalty of perjury, that the above
   information in your notice is accurate and that you are the copyright
   owner or authorized to act on the copyright owner's behalf.
   Please send all of the above information to:
   By e-mail: dmca@outbrain.com
   By mail: Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, New York, NY 10011; ATTN:
   DMCA Agent and Legal Department
   If you do not send us all of the required information, your
   notice/request may not be valid.
   2.3. If you believe any of your other intellectual property rights,
   have been violated, please follow the same information and a takedown
   request sent to: ipviolations@outbrain.com.
   2.4 Notice and Takedown. Outbrain does not control the content on its
   network however, we require our advertisers to comply with our
   Advertiser Guidelines. Despite various safeguards, Outbrain recognises
   that from time to time advertiser content may be in breach of relevant
   copyright laws, contain references which may be regarded as defamatory,
   promote fake news and/or contain fraudulent or misleading information
   or links. If you have identified content of this nature, please email
   ipviolations@outbrain.com with the following information (i) your
   contact details (ii) the full details of the material in question (iii)
   the URL where you found the material and; (iv) the reason for your
   request e.g. complaint about defamatory content. Upon receipt of your
   notification, Outbrain will comply with the following Notice and
   Takedown procedure: (a) Outbrain will endeavour to acknowledge receipt
   of your complain by email and within 48 hours of receipt. (b) Following
   confirmation of receipt, Outbrain will commence an investigation to
   access the validity and plausibility of the complaint. If Outbrain
   determines that the initial complain may be valid pending further
   investigation, Outbrain may temporarily suspend or remove a particular
   campaign from its network. (c) Outbrain may contact the relevant
   advertiser who is responsible for the content, it relevant. If Outbrain
   does so, the advertiser will be notified that their content is subject
   to a complaint, under what grounds and will be encouraged to address
   the complaints concerned. If relevant, the complaint and the advertiser
   will be encouraged to resolve the issue swiftly and amicably and to the
   satisfaction of both parties. (d) Following the finalization of
   Outbrain's investigation, Outbrain may: - allow the advertiser to
   continue to display the content unchanged; or - allow the advertiser to
   continue to display the content with changes; or - permanently remove
   the content from its network permanently and usually within 48 hours of
   Outbrain determining this is the appropriate course of action.
   3. Privacy and Cookie Policy; Other Terms.
   Your use of the Site or Service is also governed by Outbrain’s Privacy
   Policy. By using the Site or Service, you agree to the terms set forth
   in that policy. Your use of Outbrain’s Engage or Amplify services will
   further be subject to other terms specific to those services.
   In addition, we may use cookies or other automated means of data
   collection. Please read our Privacy Policy and Cookie Glossary for more
   information.
   4. Disclaimer of Warranties and Limitation of Liability.
   OUTBRAIN EXPRESSLY DISCLAIMS ANY AND ALL LIABILITY IN CONNECTION WITH
   THE SITE. EXCEPT FOR BODILY INJURY, IN NO EVENT WILL OUTBRAIN OR ITS
   AGENTS BE LIABLE TO YOU OR TO ANY THIRD PARTY UNDER ANY TORT, CONTRACT,
   NEGLIGENCE, STRICT LIABILITY OR OTHER LEGAL OR EQUITABLE THEORY (I) FOR
   ANY LOST PROFITS, LOST OR CORRUPTED DATA, COMPUTER FAILURE OR
   MALFUNCTION, INTERRUPTION OF BUSINESS, OR OTHER SPECIAL, INDIRECT,
   INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES OF ANY KIND ARISING OUT OF THE USE
   OR INABILITY TO USE THE SITE, THE SERVICE, AND THE DATA, WHETHER OR NOT
   SUCH LOSS OR DAMAGES ARE FORESEEABLE; (II) ANY UNAUTHORIZED ACCESS TO
   OR USE OF THE SITES; OR (III) FOR ANY DIRECT DAMAGES IN EXCESS OF (IN
   THE AGGREGATE) $1,000. ANY CLAIM ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THESE
   TERMS MUST BE BROUGHT WITHIN ONE (1) YEAR AFTER THE OCCURRENCE OF THE
   EVENT GIVING RISE TO SUCH CLAIM. OUTBRAIN DISCLAIMS ALL LIABILITY OF
   ANY KIND OF OUTBRAIN'S AGENTS. SOME STATES DO NOT ALLOW THE EXCLUSION
   OR LIMITATION OF INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES, SO THE ABOVE
   LIMITATIONS AND EXCLUSIONS MAY NOT APPLY TO YOU. YOU UNDERSTAND AND
   AGREE THAT YOUR SOLE RIGHT AND REMEDY AGAINST OUTBRAIN IS TO
   DISCONTINUE USE OF THE SITE.
   5. Indemnity.
   You agree to indemnify, defend and hold harmless Outbrain, its parents,
   subsidiaries, affiliates, customers and vendors, and their respective
   officers, directors and employees from any liability, damage, cost, or
   fees (including reasonable attorneys' fees) arising from: (i) any claim
   or demand made by any third party due to or arising out of your access
   to the Site; (ii) your use of the Service or Site, and/or violation of
   the Terms; (iii) or the infringement by you, or any third party using
   your Outbrain account, of any intellectual property or other right of
   any person or entity.
   6. Governing Law.
   6.1. These Terms shall be governed by and construed in accordance with
   the laws of the State of New York in the United States, without regard
   to its choice of law provisions. You agree to submit to personal
   jurisdiction in the State of New York and further agree that any cause
   of action arising from or relating to the use of the Site or these
   Terms shall be brought exclusively in the Federal or State Courts
   residing in New York, New York.
   To the fullest extent of the law, you agree that any claim or cause of
   action arising from or relating to use of the Site or these Terms must
   be filed within one (1) year after such claim or cause of action arose,
   or be forever barred.
   6.2. Und er California Civil Code Section 1789.3, residents of
   California who use the Site are entitled to know that they may file
   grievances and complaints with: Complaint Assistance Unit of the
   Division of Consumer Services of the California Department of Consumer
   Affairs, in writing at 400 R Street, Suite 1080, Sacramento, California
   95814, or by telephone at (916) 445-1254 or (800) 952-5210, or by email
   at dca@dca.ca.gov.
   7. Termination.
   Outbrain, in its sole discretion, may terminate or suspend use of the
   Sites at any time for any reason or for no reason at all, without prior
   notice or liability to you. All provisions of these Terms which by
   their nature should survive termination shall survive termination,
   including, without limitation, ownership provisions, warranty
   disclaimers, indemnity, and limitations of liability.
   8. Miscellaneous.
   8.1. We are not responsible for the availability of any websites,
   applications, or other offerings owned or controlled by third-parties.
   We do not endorse and are not responsible or liable for, directly or
   indirectly, the operation of such third-party websites, their privacy
   practices and/or the content (including misrepresentative or defamatory
   content), including (without limitation) any advertising, products, or
   other materials or services on or available from such websites or
   resources; nor for any damage, loss, or offense caused or alleged to be
   caused by, or in connection with, the use of or reliance on any such
   content, goods, or services available on such third-party external
   sites or resources.
   8.2 When using the Site, you agree to comply with all laws in your
   jurisdiction (including but not limited to copyright laws) and not use
   the Site for any purpose that is unlawful or prohibited by these Terms.
   By way of example, you shall not: (i) post or transmit any
   communication or solicitation intended to obtain password, account, or
   private information from any Outbrain user; (ii) create or submit spam
   to any Outbrain users or any URL; (iii) use any robot, spider, scraper
   or other automated means to access the Site for any purpose without our
   express written permission; (iv) interfere or attempt to interfere with
   the proper working of the Site or any activities conducted on the Site
   or Service; and (v) bypass any measures we may use to prevent or
   restrict access to the Site.
   8.3. If any part of these Terms shall be deemed unlawful, void, or for
   any reason unenforceable, then that provision shall be deemed to be
   severable from these Terms and shall not affect the validity and
   enforceability of any of the remaining provisions of the Terms.
   9. Electronic Communications.
   Please send any questions or concerns regarding these Terms to
   legal@outbrain.com . By communicating with us electronically you
   acknowledge that communications by email are not considered
   confidential.

LiveRamp Terms

Version 1.0

Effective November 26, 2018

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   By accepting these terms you agree that:
     * You and/or the company you represent ("Customer") has opted to use
       certain services provided by LiveRamp Inc. (the " LiveRamp
       Services") via the Outbrain dashboard. Pursuant to Customer's use
       of the LiveRamp Services, the customer may use the LiveRamp Quick
       Onboard API Service ("Quick Onboard Services") which allows a
       Customer to upload personal data associated with a particular
       audience ("Customer Data") into the Outbrain dashboard to be passed
       on to LiveRamp by Outbrain. You are authorized to act on behalf of
       the bind Customer.
     * Customer acknowledges and agrees that:
          + Customer is prohibited from the further resale or providing
            access to third parties of the LiveRamp Services;
          + Customer is prohibited from sending the following data to
            LiveRamp pursuant to the LiveRamp Services including (i) a
            government issued identification number (ii) a financial or
            customer account number, including financial institution or
            bank account number or a credit or debit card number; (iii)
            information regarding an individual’s sexual orientation,
            religion, or health or medical condition (iv) unique biometric
            data or digital representation of biometric data; (v) an
            individual’s full date of birth; (vi) maiden name of the
            individual's mother; (vii) individual's digitized or other
            electronic signature; (viii) a user name, email address or
            other unique electronic identifier or routing code, which is
            sent in combination with a personal identification code,
            password, or security question and answer that would permit
            access to an online account, (ix) any data associated with an
            individual’s status as a person under the age of eighteen, or
            (x) any information that would permit Client to uniquely
            re-identify (a) specific individuals, (b) specific households
            or (c) groups smaller than 25 individuals or values. If
            Customer does transfer any of the aforementioned data,
            Customer shall promptly notify Outbrain in writing.
          + LiveRamp is the intended third party beneficiary with respect
            to the Customer Data and accordingly has the right to enforce
            its term (Insert link to terms) directly against Customer. ;
            and
          + Customer may only use the Quick Onboard Services for the
            purposes of ad targeting, suppression and measures on the
            Customer’s platform and no other purposes.In order for the
            Customer to use the LiveRamp Services, LiveRamp requires that
            the Customer grant Outbrain a non-exclusive, recoverable,
            sub-licensable license to Outbrain to (a) access, download and
            receive Customer Data (b) store, reproduce, modify and use
            Customer Data in connection with the LiveRamp Services. Any
            Customer Data received by Outbrain, and passed by Outbrain to
            LiveRamp, will be encrypted so that Outbrain will not be able
            to identify the Customer Data once uploaded by the Customer
            via the dashboard. Customer represents, warrants and
            undertakes that it has (a) all necessary consents, licenses
            and/or authority to grant Outbrain the aforementioned license
            in respect of the Customer Data and; (b) has the appropriate
            lawful basis and/or consents to allow Outbrain and LiveRamp to
            access and/or use such Customer Data.

     * In order for the Customer to use the LiveRamp Services, LiveRamp
       requires that the Customer grant Outbrain a non-exclusive,
       recoverable, sub-licensable license to Outbrain to (a) access,
       download and receive Customer Data (b) store, reproduce, modify and
       use Customer Data in connection with the LiveRamp Services. Any
       Customer Data received by Outbrain, and passed by Outbrain to
       LiveRamp, will be encrypted so that Outbrain will not be able to
       identify the Customer Data once uploaded by the Customer via the
       dashboard. Customer represents, warrants and undertakes that it has
       (a) all necessary consents, licenses and/or authority to grant
       Outbrain the aforementioned license in respect of the Customer Data
       and; (b) has the appropriate lawful basis and/or consents to allow
       Outbrain and LiveRamp to access and/or use such Customer Data.
     * The Customer provides such Customer Data to Outbrain at its own
       risk and shall indemnify, keep indemnified and hold harmless
       Outbrain in respect of any loss and/or damage which arises as a
       result of the Customer’s breach of the terms set out herein and/or
       in respect of any third party claim (whether by an individual,
       government authority or otherwise) which arises pursuant to the
       Customer’s use of the LiveRamp Services via the Outbrain dashboard.
     * Outbrain has the right, by providing at least 10 business days
       written notice and at its own expense, to audit the Customer’s
       compliance with these terms.

Outbrain Health Segment

Version 1.0

Effective December 12, 2018

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   Outbrain:
     * Health/Aging
     * Health/Allergies
     * Health/Beauty
     * Health/Cold_and_Flu
     * Health/Dentistry
     * Health/Fitness
     * Health/Nutrition
     * Health/Weight_Loss
     * Health/Womens_Health
     * Health/Men's Health

   Currently Outbrain also utilizes Crossix segments. (more information on
   Crossix available via their website: https://www.crossix.com/)

Gambling Terms (United States)

Version 1.1

Effective January 8, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   Gambling Content (United States)
   “Acceptable Gambling Content” means: (i) Content related to sports
   betting or casino gaming; (ii) Content providing sports betting or
   casino gaming related tutorials, information, or tips; and (iii))
   online fantasy sports Content.
   Customer acknowledges and agrees that:
   1) Customer has and will maintain the necessary and valid gambling
   license or authorization which permits Customer to operate its business
   and promote the Acceptable Gambling Content in the states or countries
   in which Customer operates and runs Acceptable Gambling Content(the
   “Gambling License”). Customer shall provide a copy of its Gambling
   License or other materials necessary for Outbrain to evaluate
   Customer’s ability to market with Outbrain, prior to running
   campaign(s) relating to Acceptable Gambling Content. Outbrain may
   refuse Acceptable Gambling Content for any reason, including if it is
   not satisfied of the validity of the Gambling License provided by the
   Customer; and
   2) the Customer represents and warrants that it is not currently
   subject to any consent decree, regulatory investigation, or other legal
   action relating to the legality of Customer’s services and/or
   practices, and that its Gambling License will remain valid for the
   duration of its campaign(s) and all other agreements entered into
   between Outbrain and Customer relating to Acceptable Gambling Content;
   and
   3) During the term of any campaign(s) relating to Acceptable Gambling
   Content, Customer must notify Outbrain of any a) expiration,
   revocation, change in status, or other actual or threatened invalidity
   of Customer’s Gambling License, or b) regulatory or government
   investigation, or legislative or legal action relating to the current
   or future legality of Customer’s business and/or practices or Content.
   Upon notification of any of the preceding events, Outbrain shall be
   permitted to immediately terminate or suspend any such active
   campaign(s) and immediately taken down any Content. In the event of
   such termination, Customer will remain responsible for all fees due
   pursuant to the agreement governing its campaign(s)and
   4) Customer shall only provide Outbrain with Acceptable Gambling
   Content. Customer shall not promote or provide or make available
   Content that a) is false or misleading, including, without limitation,
   the advertising of overstated, inaccurate, or unrepresentative odds,
   prizes, or winnings; c) depicts minors or anyone appearing to be under
   21; d) contains any other content which is likely to be determined as
   sensitive or controversial gambling content; and
   5) all Acceptable Gambling Content provided by the Customer shall
   comply with all applicable laws, regulations, and industry guidelines;
   and
   6) it shall at all times display responsible gambling information on
   its online properties including the properties to which the Acceptable
   Gambling Content links to; and
   7) Outbrain reserves the right in its sole discretion to remove any
   Acceptable Gambling Content for any reason.
   8) Approval of Content or administration of any campaign or Insertion
   Order by Outbrain does not warrant compliance with any law, regulation,
   industry guideline, or these terms. Customer shall remain fully
   responsible at all times for its Content and campaign, including with
   respect to any geographic, age, or demographic targeting.
   9) Customer shall defend, indemnify and hold harmless Outbrain and its
   respective agents, affiliates, subsidiaries, directors, officers,
   employees, contractors, and Network partners (as applicable) against
   any and all third party claims arising from or relating to Customer’s
   business or the nature of its gaming services; Customer’s Content or
   Campaign, including without limitation the delivery of Content in
   violation of applicable laws or regulations; or the breach or alleged
   breach of any of these terms.

Gambling Terms (United Kingdom Only)

Version 1.0

Effective January 7, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   Gambling Content (United Kingdom Only)
   “Acceptable Gambling Content” means: (i) Content related to sports
   betting; (ii) lottery related Content; (iii) Content providing gambling
   related tutorials and tips; (iv) gambling related Content such as odds
   and tips; and (iv) online fantasy sports Content.
   Customer acknowledges and agrees that:
   1) the validity of this Insertion Order is conditional on the Customer
   having and maintaining the necessary and valid gambling licence which
   permits Customer to operate its business and promote the Acceptable
   Gambling Content in accordance with this Insertion Order (and more
   particularly regarding targeting UK) (the “Gambling Licence”). Customer
   shall provide a copy of its Gambling Licence prior to signing an
   Outbrain insertion order relating to Acceptable Gambling Content.
   Outbrain may refuse to sign any insertion order relating to Acceptable
   Gambling Content if it is not satisfied of the validity of the Gambling
   Licence provided by the Customer; and
   2) the Customer is solely responsible for ensuring that its Gambling
   Licence remains valid for the duration of this Insertion Order and all
   other insertion orders entered into between Outbrain and Customer
   relating to Acceptable Gambling Content; and
   3) Customer shall only provide Outbrain with Acceptable Gambling
   Content. Customer shall not promote or provide or make available
   Content related to “free bets” or “free money”, content related to
   fixed odds betting terminals or any other Content which is likely to be
   classed as sensitive or controversial gambling content; and
   4) all Acceptable Gambling Content provided by the Customer shall
   comply with all applicable laws and regulations (including without
   limitation the CAP code and the Gambling Commission’s National Gambling
   Industry Code for Socially Responsible Advertising); and
   5) it shall at all times display responsible gambling information on
   its online properties including the properties to which the Acceptable
   Gambling Content links to; and
   6) Outbrain reserves the right in its sole discretion to remove any
   Acceptable Gambling Content for any reason.

LiveRamp Terms

Version 1.0

Effective January 7, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   LiveRamp Terms
     * You and/or the company you represent ("Customer") has opted to use
       certain services provided by LiveRamp Inc. (the " LiveRamp Services
       ") via the Outbrain dashboard. Pursuant to Customer's use of the
       LiveRamp Services, the customer may use the LiveRamp Quick Onboard
       API Service ("Quick Onboard Services") which allows a Customer to
       upload personal data associated with a particular audience
       ("Customer Data") into the Outbrain dashboard to be passed on to
       LiveRamp by Outbrain. You are authorized to act on behalf of the
       bind Customer.
     * Customer acknowledges and agrees that:
          + Customer is prohibited from the further resale or providing
            access to third parties of the LiveRamp Services;
          + Customer is prohibited from sending the following data to
            LiveRamp pursuant to the LiveRamp Services including (i) a
            government issued identification number (ii) a financial or
            customer account number, including financial institution or
            bank account number or a credit or debit card number; (iii)
            information regarding an individual’s sexual orientation,
            religion, or health or medical condition (iv) unique biometric
            data or digital representation of biometric data; (v) an
            individual’s full date of birth; (vi) maiden name of the
            individual's mother; (vii) individual's digitized or other
            electronic signature; (viii) a user name, email address or
            other unique electronic identifier or routing code, which is
            sent in combination with a personal identification code,
            password, or security question and answer that would permit
            access to an online account, (ix) any data associated with an
            individual’s status as a person under the age of eighteen, or
            (x) any information that would permit Client to uniquely
            re-identify (a) specific individuals, (b) specific households
            or (c) groups smaller than 25 individuals or values. If
            Customer does transfer any of the aforementioned data,
            Customer shall promptly notify Outbrain in writing.
          + LiveRamp is the intended third party beneficiary with respect
            to the Customer Data and accordingly has the right to enforce
            these terms directly against Customer; and
          + Customer may only use the Quick Onboard Services for the
            purposes of ad targeting, suppression and measures on the
            Customer’s platform and no other purposes.In order for the
            Customer to use the LiveRamp Services, LiveRamp requires that
            the Customer grant Outbrain a non-exclusive, recoverable,
            sub-licensable license to Outbrain to (a) access, download and
            receive Customer Data (b) store, reproduce, modify and use
            Customer Data in connection with the LiveRamp Services. Any
            Customer Data received by Outbrain, and passed by Outbrain to
            LiveRamp, will be encrypted so that Outbrain will not be able
            to identify the Customer Data once uploaded by the Customer
            via the dashboard. Customer represents, warrants and
            undertakes that it has (a) all necessary consents, licenses
            and/or authority to grant Outbrain the aforementioned license
            in respect of the Customer Data and; (b) has the appropriate
            lawful basis and/or consents to allow Outbrain and LiveRamp to
            access and/or use such Customer Data.

     * In order for the Customer to use the LiveRamp Services, LiveRamp
       requires that the Customer grant Outbrain a non-exclusive,
       recoverable, sub-licensable license to Outbrain to (a) access,
       download and receive Customer Data (b) store, reproduce, modify and
       use Customer Data in connection with the LiveRamp Services. Any
       Customer Data received by Outbrain, and passed by Outbrain to
       LiveRamp, will be encrypted so that Outbrain will not be able to
       identify the Customer Data once uploaded by the Customer via the
       dashboard. Customer represents, warrants and undertakes that it has
       (a) all necessary consents, licenses and/or authority to grant
       Outbrain the aforementioned license in respect of the Customer Data
       and; (b) has the appropriate lawful basis and/or consents to allow
       Outbrain and LiveRamp to access and/or use such Customer Data.
     * The Customer provides such Customer Data to Outbrain at its own
       risk and shall indemnify, keep indemnified and hold harmless
       Outbrain in respect of any loss and/or damage which arises as a
       result of the Customer’s breach of the terms set out herein and/or
       in respect of any third party claim (whether by an individual,
       government authority or otherwise) which arises pursuant to the
       Customer’s use of the LiveRamp Services via the Outbrain dashboard.
     * Outbrain has the right, by providing at least 10 business days
       written notice and at its own expense, to audit the Customer’s
       compliance with these terms.

Data Processing Agreement

Version 1.2

Effective September 11, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   DATA PROCESSING AGREEMENT
   This Data Processing Agreement (“DPA”) is entered into by the Outbrain
   entity (“Outbrain”) and the individual or company (the “Partner”)
   identified in the Partner Enrollment Form and governs the processing of
   personal data pursuant to the provision of services by Outbrain. From
   the Effective Date stipulated on the Partner Enrollment Form, this DPA
   shall apply to any and all agreements between the parties and their
   Affiliates from time to time.
   This DPA is incorporated into the Engage Terms (as amended from time to
   time) and constitutes a legally binding agreement between the parties.
   Collectively, the DPA, the Partner Enrolment Form and the Engage Terms
   are referred to as the “Agreement”. In the event of any conflict or
   inconsistency between any of the terms of the Agreement the following
   order of preference shall prevail: (i) the Partner Enrollment Form (ii)
   the DPA; and (iii) the Engage Terms.
    1. Definitions and Interpretation. The following definitions apply to
       this DPA:

   1.1 “Affiliate(s)” means in respect of either party at any time, any
   person or legal entity controlled by or controlling or under the common
   control of that party. Any reference to the parties shall include
   reference to their Affiliates;
   1.2 “Data Subject” means the individual to whom the Personal Data
   relates;
   1.3 “Data Protection Laws” means any applicable Data Protection Laws.
   It shall include ePrivacy Directive 2002/58/EC as implemented by
   countries within the EEA, (b) the General Data Protection Regulation
   (EU) 2016/679 (“GDPR”) and/or (c) other laws or subordinate legislation
   that implement or amend the laws that are identified in (a) and (b)
   above from time to time;
   1.4 “EEA” means the European Economic Areas;
   1.5 “End User” means individual human end users who interact with the
   Outbrain widget on the Partner sites;
   1.6 “End User Personal Data” means information about an End User which
   Outbrain collects from End Users directly via the Outbrain widget,
   including Outbrain’s own UUID, IP address (which Outbrain translates
   into geo-location and deletes the last octet) and some other user agent
   data (for example, information about which device and browser the End
   User is using to access the widget);
   1.7 “Partner Personal Data” means the personal data (such as the
   Partner’s employee’s name and email address) which the Partner provides
   to Outbrain in order to use the Outbrain services and which Outbrain
   requires in order to service the Partner’s account.
   1.8 "Partner Sites" means the web properties, applications or platforms
   identified in the Partner Enrolment Form;
   1.9 “Personal Data” means any information about an identified and/or
   identifiable natural person which Outbrain processes pursuant to the
   Agreement and which may include the End User Personal Data and/or the
   Customer Personal Data (as applicable);
   1.10 “Personal Data Breach” means a breach of security leading to the
   accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorized
   disclosure of, or access to, End User Persona Data or Partner Personal
   Data transmitted, stored or otherwise processed by Outbrain;
   1.11 “Sub-processor” means sub-contractors and/or replacement
   sub-contractors (as the case may be) which process personal data on
   behalf of Outbrain from time to time; and
   1.12 The terms “Data Controller”, “Data Processor”, “Data Subject”,
   “Personal Data”, and “Processing” shall have the same meaning ascribed
   to them under the GDPR.
    2. Nature and Scope of Processing. The parties agree to process
       Personal Data pursuant to the purposes set forth in this DPA and
       per applicable laws. Outbrain shall process Personal Data for the
       following purposes:

   2.1 End User Personal Data to provide online recommendations to End
   Users who interact with the Outbrain’s Partner Sites; and
   2.2 Partner Personal Data to provide the services to the Partner
   pursuant to the Agreement.
    3. Role of Parties. The parties acknowledge and agree that they are
       each independent controllers in respect of End User Personal Data
       and Partner Personal Data. Each Party shall be individually and
       separately responsible for complying with the obligations that
       apply to it as an independent Controller under Data Protection
       Laws.
    4. Lawful Basis.

   4.1 End User Personal Data. Partner acknowledges that Outbrain relies
   on Partner’s lawful basis for processing End User Personal Data as
   Outbrain does not have a direct relationship with an End User.
   Accordingly, Partner warrants that: (i) if Partner relies on legitimate
   interest, it has completed a legitimate interest assessment which has
   considered Outbrain’s provision of the services; and (ii) if the
   Partner relies on consent, the Partner shall disclose Outbrain to an
   End User via a consent management platform per the IAB methodology and
   must pass Outbrain a clear consent or no consent signal (i.e. the
   Partner must not send Outbrain a null or invalid signal if a consent
   management platform is implemented).
   4.2 Partner Personal Data. Partner acknowledges that Outbrain’s lawful
   basis for processing Partner Personal Data is contractual, as the
   Partner Personal Data is required in order for Outbrain to perform its
   obligations under the Agreement.
    5. Data Subject Rights. As independent controllers, the parties
       acknowledge and agree that each party shall promptly inform the
       other if it receives a request from a Data Subject exercising its
       rights under the Data Protection Laws. To the extent applicable,
       each party shall direct the Data Subject to the other party in
       order to enable such party to respond directly to such Data
       Subject’s request. Taking into account the nature of the
       processing, each party shall (if requested in writing and at the
       requesting party’s sole cost and expense) provide reasonable
       assistance to the other party, to fulfil the Data Subject’s request
       and/or in relation to any mandatory obligations applicable to the
       other party as an independent controller under Data Protection
       Laws.
    6. Transparency Obligations The parties acknowledge their respective
       transparency obligations where Personal Data being processed is
       obtained directly from the Data Subject or where such Personal Data
       is obtained from a third party. To that effect, the parties shall
       display appropriate privacy notices to Data Subjects (as required
       by applicable laws) or at the minimum comply with the requirements
       under Art 13 and/or 14 GDPR. The contact email for Outbrain for
       matters relating to Data Subject rights is
       privacyquestions@outbrain.com.
    7. Personnel. Outbrain agrees that any Outbrain personnel engaged in
       the processing of Personal Data shall be informed of the
       confidential nature of the Personal Data, receive appropriate
       training and have executed confidentiality agreements. In addition,
       Outbrain shall restrict personnel’s access to Personal Data to only
       those who require access to such data in order to provide the
       services pursuant to the Agreement.
    8. Sub-processors. Outbrain shall ensure that (i) each of its
       Sub-processors enter into a written agreement subjecting such
       sub-processor to equivalent obligations with respect to Personal
       Data as imposed under this DPA and Data Protection Laws; and (ii)
       the foregoing written agreement shall contain terms which require
       the Sub-processor to put in place appropriate technical and
       organisational measures. Partner acknowledges that Outbrain may
       engage third parties (including its Affiliates) in connection with
       the provision of the services pursuant to the Agreement.
    9. Sharing of Personal Data. In respect of the Personal Data, the
       Partner agrees that it shall not share personal data with Outbrain
       which (i) except for Partner Personal Data, allows Data Subjects to
       be directly identified (for example, name and e-mail address)
       and/or (ii) contains any Special Categories of Personal Data.
   10. Data Security. Outbrain shall maintain appropriate technical and
       organisational measures for the protection of the security,
       confidentiality and integrity of the Personal Data. The security
       measures Outbrain uses to protect Personal Data are outlined in our
       Security Statement. If Outbrain becomes aware of a Personal Data
       Breach in respect of the Personal Data it shall notify the Partner
       in writing as soon as reasonably practicable (and no later than 48
       hours after discovery), and Outbrain shall take such steps as it
       deems necessary and reasonable in order to remediate the cause of
       the Personal Data Breach.
   11. Data Retention. Outbrain shall delete Partner Personal Data when
       requested by the Partner. In respect of End User Personal Data, the
       retention period for each of the cookies Outbrain uses (whether its
       own or on our behalf by third parties) is stated on the Cookie
       Table. Outbrain shall not retain an individual data point for more
       than 13 months.
   12. Compliance. At the Partner’s sole cost and expense, Outbrain shall
       upon prior written request, make available to the Partner such
       information reasonably necessary to demonstrate Outbrain’s
       compliance with the obligations under this DPA. In addition the
       parties shall notify the other party in writing (i) if, in its
       opinion, an instruction from the other party infringes Data
       Protection Laws; and (ii) if a party receives a complaint, notice
       or allegation from any data protection authority or similar body
       alleging non-compliance with Data Protection Laws in relation to
       this DPA or services rendered under the Agreement.
   13. International Transfers. Outbrain may transfer or otherwise process
       Personal Data outside of the EEA (including via a Sub-processor)
       provided that such transfer is made in compliance with Data
       Protection Laws, including, if applicable, EU Standard Contractual
       Clauses, certification under the EU-US Privacy Shield or a European
       Commission positive adequacy decision under Article 45 of the GDPR.
       Outbrain is EU-US Privacy Shield certified and has in place the EU
       Standard Contractual Clauses for inter-company transfers.
   14. Term and Termination. This DPA shall commence on the Effective Date
       and shall continue as long as the Technology is implemented on the
       Partner Site(s).
   15. Miscellaneous.

   15.1 Neither Party shall be in breach of this DPA nor liable for delay
   in performing, or failure to perform, any of its obligations under the
   Agreement if such delay or failure results from events, circumstances
   or causes beyond its reasonable control.
   15.2 Failure or delay in exercising any right or remedy under this DPA
   shall not constitute a waiver of such (or any other) right or remedy.
   15.3 The Partner shall not assign or otherwise transfer its rights or
   its obligations under this Agreement, in whole or in part, without the
   prior written consent of Outbrain.
   15.4 Except as expressly stated otherwise, nothing in this DPA shall
   create or confer any rights or other benefits in favor of any person
   other than a party to this DPA.
   15.5 The invalidity, illegality, or unenforceability of any term of
   this DPA shall not affect the remainder of the DPA.
   15.6 This DPA shall be governed by the laws specified in the Engage
   Terms.

   Interest-Based Ads (and Opt-Out Preferences)Advertising
   GuidelinesPrivacy PolicySecurityPatentsTerms of Use

   Copyright © 2019 Outbrain Inc. All rights reserved.
   Outbrain is a trademark of Outbrain Inc. - IMPRESSUM
     __________________________________________________________________

   Legal Center powered by PactSafe

   Copyright © 2019, Outbrain Inc.
[outbrain-logo.png] Privacy Center

   Error

Contracts

     * Privacy Policy
     * Cookies

   [English (United States)  ]

          Privacy Policy
          Cookie Table

Privacy Policy

Version 2.3

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   Last Updated May 24, 2018
   Outbrain is committed to protecting your personal data. This privacy
   policy (“Privacy Policy ”) governs Outbrain’s use of data collected by
   us, including any and all personal data. Personal data is information
   that relates to you and may identify you as an individual. We use your
   personal data in line with all applicable laws. To ensure compliance
   and to align with Outbrain’s values around Trust & Transparency, we
   have a team of privacy champions responsible for continuously
   implementing our global privacy program.
   + EXPAND ALL
   – COLLAPSE ALL
   1. Who we are, What we do, How you can contact Outbrain, our DPO or the
   relevant authorities
   +
   Who we are:
   Outbrain means Outbrain Inc., a Delaware, USA corporation with
   headquarters in New York; and its affiliated subsidiaries
   (collectively, “Outbrain,” or “we“, “us“, “our“). We operate out of 12
   global offices and we partner with publishers and marketers across the
   globe.
   What we do:
   Outbrain’s mission is to serve interesting recommendations to its Users
   based on their interests. To achieve our mission we enter into
   agreements with:
     * online publishers and partners who want to recommend relevant
       content to their readers (this is Outbrain Engage); and
     * advertisers who want readers to view their content (this is
       Outbrain Amplify).

   How to contact us:
   We regularly review our compliance with this Privacy Policy. Questions,
   comments and requests regarding this Privacy Policy are welcomed and
   should be addressed to PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com or by mail to
   Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011,
   Attn: Privacy Questions.
   If Outbrain does not satisfactorily answers your questions or concerns,
   you may also contact the following for advice, support or complaints:
     * Outbrain’s external Data Protection Officer (“DPO”): ePrivacy GmbH,
       represented by Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. ePrivacy GmbH can be
       reached directly at privacy@eprivacy.eu ; and/or
     * the Information Commissioner’s Officer, which is Outbrain’s lead
       supervisory service within the European Territories.

   Self-Regulatory Bodies
   Outbrain adheres to the Self-Regulatory Principles set forth by the
   Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) and the European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). We are members in good standing of the
   Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), an association dedicated to
   responsible data collection and its use for digital advertising. We
   adhere to the NAI Code of Conduct for Web and Mobile. Outbrain also
   adheres to the Interactive Advertising Bureau’s (IAB) Self-Regulatory
   Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising, and the IAB Europe OBA
   Framework.
   2. Outbrain User Types (including Opt Out Options)
   +
   Much of this Privacy Policy is divided into sections based on the way
   you may interact with Outbrain. Please determine what user type you
   are. For each user type we’ve explained what information we collect and
   why, what cookies and other similar technologies we use, how we share
   such information, and your rights.
   Site Visitors: You are a Site Visitor when you visit and interact with
   our web sites, web pages, interactive features, blogs and their
   respective contents at Outbrain.com (or any derivation, such as
   Outbrain.co.uk; Outbrain.fr; outbrain.de etc.) and MyOutbrain.com (“Our
   Sites“). See more here.
   (a) What information we collect and why
   We want to understand what services on Our Sites interest you and we
   want to remind you about the services we offer when you are not on Our
   Sites. To do this, we collect the following information from you: (i)
   IP address; (ii) User Agent data: device type (e.g., iPhone), browser
   type (e.g., Chrome), operating system (e.g., iOS); (iii) the pages
   visited on Our Site (e.g., the Outbrain “About” page); (iv) the time of
   visit (and corresponding timezone); and (v) referring URLs and other
   information normally transmitted in HTTP requests (e.g., this
   information tells us how you arrived on Our Sites).
   (b) What cookies and other similar technologies we use
   Please see this Cookie Table under “Site Visitors” for a detailed list
   of the cookies (and their corresponding retention periods) we use when
   you visit Our Sites.
   (c) How we may share information
     * Sharing Information we learn about you on Our Sites.

   In general, we do not share personal data about you with third parties
   for third party marketing or advertising purposes. However, we use
   various third parties (each listed on this Cookie Table) to help us
   market or advertise to you. For example, some of the cookies we use on
   Our Sites belong to third parties that will help Outbrain market or
   advertise to you. We require that these third parties and companies
   agree to keep all information shared with them confidential and to use
   the information only to perform their obligations to us. We do this by
   entering into agreements with all third parties who process personal
   data on our behalf to ensure that they process your personal data in
   accordance with our strict instructions and all applicable data
   protection laws. If you post on our blog, your comment and information
   will be publicly available. Please contact support@outbrain.com to
   remove your comment.
     * Using Third Party Services on Our Sites.

   Our Sites contain links to other websites that we do not own or
   operate. We do not control, recommend or endorse the content, products,
   services, privacy policies or practices of these third party websites.
   For example, on Our Sites you will notice clickable icons which take
   you to the Outbrain Facebook page or the Outbrain LinkedIn page. If you
   choose to click on these links, you should know that Facebook and
   Linkedin may send their own cookies to your device and they may
   independently collect personal data. It is therefore important that you
   read the Facebook and/or LinkedIn privacy policies.
     * Also see the Sharing section of this Privacy Policy.

   (d) Your rights
   The Terms of Use on Our Site govern the use of Our Site and also apply
   to you. You can stop using Our Site at any time. If you do, you may
   also want to remove any cookies that we have placed on any device used
   to access Our Site. If during your use of Our Sites you provided your
   email address, any email you receive from Outbrain includes an
   “unsubscribe” option.
   For European Territory Visitors, Outbrain has implemented a consent
   management platform (powered by One Trust) on Our Sites that provide
   visitors the opportunity to consent, or not consent, to cookies and
   similar tracking technologies on Our Sites. Upon accessing Our Sites,
   you will see a banner on the bottom of the page with information about
   the cookies we use. You may click the banner to reject any cookies that
   are not strictly necessary. Pressing “accept” on the banner or
   scrolling/clicking on Our Sites is an indication of your acceptance.
   Accordingly, Outbrain’s lawful basis for processing personal data on
   Our Sites is consent. You may withdraw your consent at any time here.
   Users: You are an User when you visit a page of a website or
   application of one of Outbrain’s partners where the Outbrain widget is
   installed (“Partner Sites”). For example, if you visit
   https://news.sky.com/uk, www.spiegel.de or www.cnn.com, the Outbrain
   widget is implemented on those websites. You know you are engaging with
   an Outbrain widget when you see text referencing Outbrain (e.g.,
   “Recommended by Outbrain”, “by Outbrain” near recommendations). If you
   click on the hyperlinked reference to Outbrain you will see a detailed
   notice that enables you to navigate to Outbrain’s Interest Portal,
   which provides a general visualization of the types of Outbrain data
   categories that may be used to make its recommendations. It also gives
   you the ablity to opt out of personalized recommendations. See more
   here.
   Example of an Outbrain Widget.
   Outbrain Example Recommendations
   (a) What information we collect and why
   We use UUIDs, IP Address and other Usage Information so that we can
   serve interesting recommendations. Outbrain’s recommendations may be
   paid for by an advertiser linking you to a new website or they may be
   organic such that the link is to another page on the same publisher’s
   website.
     * UUID.

   When as a User you first visit a Partner Site (e.g., CNN.com), Outbrain
   drops a cookie on your device in order to generate a UUID (a Unique
   User Identifier). We catalog and analyze the content you consume across
   Partner Sites. Our recommendations are based on: (i) browsing history;
   (ii) similar browsing patterns of other Users; (ii) recommendations
   that are generally popular with Outbrain’s audience at this time; (iv)
   some randomness, and (v) targeting requirements that may be provided or
   requested by our Amplify clients. As an example, Outbrain may know that
   UUID 123 (which could be you on your iPhone X on the Guardian using
   Chrome as your browser) likes to read about far away holiday
   destinations and that people who like to read about far away holiday
   destinations also like to read about exotic food.
   The UUID is a sequence of numbers and/or letters. This UUID attaches
   itself to your device and varies depending on which browser you use. In
   other words, Outbrain records a different UUID depending on which
   device and/or which browser you use when accessing the Partner Sites.
   For example, this means that you will have one UUID when you visit a
   Partner Site from your mobile phone using the browser Safari, and a
   different UUID when you visit a Partner Site from your iPad using the
   browser Safari. Outbrain will combine and consolidate a UUID from a
   mobile device (handheld or tablet) from a browser that then accesses an
   application (or vice versa) from the that same device.
   Assigning a UUID allows Outbrain to associate the page views visited
   and clicks on Outbrain’s recommendations from such UUID – all with the
   goal of providing interesting recommendations.
     * IP Address and Other Usage Information.

   We collect a UUID as explained above, we also collect the following
   information from you: (i) IP address; (ii) User Agent data: device type
   (e.g., iphone) , browser type (e.g., chrome), operating system e.g
   iOS); (iii) the pages visited; (iv) the time of visit; and (v)
   referring URLs and other information normally transmitted in HTTP
   requests .
   The above statistical information provides us with information about
   how many Users visited a specific page on our Partner Sites on which
   the Outbrain widget is installed, how long each User stayed on that
   page, the type of content on that page they clicked on and how they
   generally engaged with that page. This information is only personal
   data when it is associated to a UUID.
   (b) What cookies and other similar technologies we use
   Please see this Cookie Table under “Users” for a detailed list of the
   first party cookies we use when you interact with Partner Sites where
   the Outbrain technology is implemented.
   If you click on a link to one of our recommendations, the Amplify
   advertiser sponsoring the recommendation may place cookies on your
   device through redirects prior to arriving on the destination page of
   the recommendations or upon reaching the destination page. In such
   cases you will be subject to that advertiser’s privacy policy.
   In addition to Outbrain’s visible widget on Partner Sites, certain
   Outbrain advertisers may implement the Outbrain pixel on their
   websites. The Outbrain pixel determines whether the user reaching the
   page where the pixel is installed has an Outbrain UUID. If there is a
   UUID associated with such end user, Outbrain allows advertisers to
   retarget those UUIDs and/or provides advertisers with the total number
   of UUIDs that reached such page. If there was no Outbrain UUID on the
   page, the Outbrain pixel does not collect any information about the
   user.
   We encourage advertisers to disclose use of the Outbrain pixel on their
   own websites. Outbrain does not combine pixel information with a UUID’s
   profile.
   Data points such as page views and clicks are connected to a particular
   UUID are retained for 13 months. For example, if UUID 123 read an
   article on December 31, 2017, on February 1, 2018 that article will no
   longer be part of UUID 123’s profile.
   (c) How we may share information
   Outbrain does not share User profiles with any third parties. However,
   we may share the UUID with certain partners for the purpose of cookie
   syncing, or based on technical requirements. Also see the Sharing
   section of this Privacy Policy.
   (d) Your rights
     * Outbrain Opt Out.

   You may opt out of Outbrain’s personalized recommendations at any time.
   Please see Outbrain’s Interest Profile for a general visualization the
   data Outbrain knows about you and may use to make its recommendations.
   The Interest Profile also gives you the ability to opt out of
   personalized recommendations. Note that opting out of browsers is
   through the Outbrain Interest Profile , but opting out of personalized
   recommendations in applications is through the settings on your device
   (examples of steps are in the Interest Profile ).
   IMPORTANT – even though you have opted out of Outbrain:
     * You will still see Outbrain recommendations. Opting out of Outbrain
       personalization tracking does not mean you will no longer receive
       recommendations from Outbrain. Instead, it means that Outbrain’s
       recommendations will not be personalized. The recommendations will
       still use information about the document you are viewing (i.e.,
       contextual information) to provide you recommendations on that
       page.
     * The opt out is cookie based and device/browser specific. If you
       browse the web from several devices and/or browsers, you will need
       to opt out from each device and/or browser to ensure that we
       prevent personalization tracking on all of them. For the same
       reason, if you buy a new device, change browsers or delete (or
       clear) the opt out cookie, you will need to opt-out again. Opting
       out of personalization tracking is not the same as blocking
       cookies.
     * To ensure deletion of the profile tied to your UUID, do not opt in
       to Outbrain for at least 21 days. Your opt out from Outbrain’s
       personalized recommendations is effective immediately. However, if
       your browser permits local storage and you opt into Outbrain’s
       personalized recommendations within 21 days of your opt out, it is
       possible your prior profile will be reconnected to your UUID. If
       you do not opt in within 21 days, your profile will be deleted and
       cannot be recovered.
     * As with most opt out cookies, the Outbrain browser opt out relies
       upon a cookie. The opt-out cookie is intended to be persistent to
       honor the user’s preferences. However, the "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention" feature in iOS11 may impact the persistence of cookies
       across websites post a 24 hour window. We suggest using another
       browser or considering blocking all 3rd party cookies from the
       browser so that you are "opted out" without needing to rely on any
       company's actual opt out methodology.

     * Additional Opt-Out Options.

   You may also opt out of receiving personalized ads served by us or
   other advertising companies through industry powered tools such as the
   NAI or the various DAA-based pages (DAA,
   http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC, www.youradchoices.ca/choices ,
   and/or EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu) . Visiting the NAI, DAA, DAAC, or
   EDAA consumer choice pages allows you to opt out of all some or all of
   the participating members’ services. Like Outbrain’s opt out, these opt
   outs do not mean you will no longer receive any advertising – the
   advertisements will just not be tailored to you. You may continue to
   receive advertisements, for example, based on the particular website
   that you are viewing (i.e., contextually based ads). Also, if your
   browsers are configured to reject cookies when you visit the DAA, DAAC
   or EDAA consumer choice pages, your opt out may not be effective.
   • Lawful Basis. Outbrain’s lawful basis for processing a User’s
   personal data is based on the lawful basis determined by each of our
   Partner Sites. Each Partner Site will rely on consent or legitimate
   interest. Please consult the applicable Partner Sites’ privacy policy
   for more information about their lawful basis. If a Partner is relying
   on consent, Outbrain will not drop a cookie on you if you have not
   provided consent on such Partner Site.
   Business Partners: You are a Business Partner when you register (or
   email with Outbrain) on behalf of the company you work for to use the
   Outbrain Amplify or Outbrain Engage Services. See more here.
   (a) What information we collect and why
   You may provide certain personal data (such as email address) when you
   sign up for the Amplify or Engage services or otherwise communicate or
   interact with us. If you apply to become a Business Partner, we may
   request additional information from you via advertiser application
   forms, insertion orders and other forms. We automatically collect
   information about your username’s actions in the Outbrain dashboard. As
   an example, as an Amplify Business Partner if you change the
   cost-per-click for one your campaigns, Outbrain’s audit trail will have
   a record of all those actions.
   We collect and process the personal data above in order to perform our
   obligations under our agreement as a Business Partner (or prospective
   Business Partner) with you including to:
     * respond to your questions and requests;
     * to provide you with access to certain functions and features of our
       Amplify or Engage services (e.g., to provide and maintain your
       dashboard account);
     * verify your identity;
     * communicate with you about your account, our products, and
       available promotions relevant to your use of the Amplify or Engage
       service.

   (b) What cookies and other similar technologies we use
   Please see this Cookie Table under “Business Partners” for a detailed
   list of the cookies (and their corresponding retention periods) we use
   with Business Partners.
   (c) How we may share information with anyone
   We may disclose certain Business Partner information to vendors,
   contractors, or others who assist Outbrain in delivering the services
   (e.g., credit card processing). Also see the Sharing section of this
   Privacy Policy.
   (d) Your rights
   If as a Business Partner you wish to verify, correct, update or request
   the deactivation of your information, you may go the to the Outbrain
   dashboard edit your profile preferences or contact us at
   support@outbrain.com. If you are receiving Outbrain emails, you may
   “unsubscribe” using a link in the email. Note unsubscribing shall not
   opt you out notifications critical to providing the Amplify or Engage
   services (e.g., email invoices).
   Outbrain’s lawful basis for processing personal data of Business
   Partners is legitimate interest.
   3. How We Keep Information Safe, Transfers Outside the EEA, Sharing and
   Retention
   +
   Security
   Outbrain has a dedicated security team. We maintain tight controls over
   the personal data we collect, retaining it in firewalled and secured
   databases with strictly limited and controlled access rights, to ensure
   it is secure. Please see our security standards for more information.
   Business Partners have access to certain password-protected features of
   the Amplify or Engage service. They are responsible for keeping this
   password confidential. Please remember that unfortunately, the
   transmission of information via the internet is not completely secure.
   A common Internet scam is known as "spoofing" or "phishing." This
   occurs when you receive an email from what appears to be a legitimate
   source requesting personal data from you. Please be aware that we will
   not send you any emails requesting you to verify credit card, bank
   information, or any other personal data. If you ever receive an email
   that appears to be from us requesting such information from you, do not
   respond to it, and do not click on any links appearing in the email.
   Instead, please forward the email to us at legal@outbrain.com, as we
   will investigate instances of possible Internet fraud.
   Data Transfers Outside the EU/EEA
   When we transfer personal data from the European Economic Area to other
   countries in which applicable laws do not offer the same level of data
   privacy protection as in the European Territories, we take measures to
   provide an appropriate level of data privacy protection. In other
   words, your rights and protections remain with your data. For example,
   we use approved contractual clauses and other measures designed to
   ensure that the recipients of your personal data protect it.
   Sharing
   In addition to the description of how we may disclose your personal
   data for each user type, we may also disclose personal data as follows:
     * Within the family of companies controlled by Outbrain for internal
       reasons, primarily for business and operational purposes;
     * If we go through a business transition, such as a merger,
       acquisition by another company, or sale of all or a portion of our
       assets, your personal data will likely be among the assets
       transferred;
     * When legally required to do so (e.g., to cooperate with law
       enforcement investigations or other legal proceedings); and/or
     * To respond to a genuine emergency.

   In addition, we combine your personal data with those of other users in
   order to share trend information and aggregate user statistics with
   third parties, always in aggregated and anonymized form.
   Data Retention
   The retention period for each of the cookies Outbrain uses (whether its
   own or on our behalf by third parties) is stated on the Cookie Table.
   Outbrain also maintains a Data Retention Policy that details the
   retention period for personal data based on our analysis of how long
   the specific data is reasonably required for legal or business
   purposes. When we no longer need personal data, we securely delete or
   destroy it. Aggregated data, which cannot identify a device/browser (or
   individual) and is used for purposes of reporting and analysis, is
   maintained for as long as commercially necessary.
   4. Children
   +
   None of our services are directed to children under 16. We do not
   knowingly collect personal data from anyone under 16 years of age. If
   we determine upon collection that a Site Visitor, a User or a Business
   Partner is under 16, we will not use or maintain his/her personal data.
   If we become aware that we have unknowingly collected personal data
   from a child under the age of 16, we will make reasonable efforts to
   delete such information from our records. If you’re a kid, please go
   play in the yard, don’t use or interact with Outbrain!
   5. European Territory Citizens
   +
   In compliance with European privacy laws, in particular the European
   General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), Outbrain provides specific
   additional rights for citizens of the European Territories such as the
   right to access, rectification, right to object, to complaint, erasure
   and blockage. More specifically:
     * the right to request information about whether and which personal
       data is processed by us, and the right to demand that personal data
       is rectified or amended.
     * under certain circumstances, the right to request that personal
       data should be deleted.
     * under certain circumstances, the right to demand that the
       processing of personal data should be restricted.
     * withdraw your consent to the processing and use of your data
       completely or partially at any time with future application.
     * have the right to obtain your personal data in a common, structured
       and mechanically readable format.
     * contact our data protection officer if there are any questions,
       comments, complaints or requests in connection with our statement
       on data protection and the processing of your personal data.
     * the right to complain to the responsible supervisory authority if
       believed that the processing of your personal data is in violation
       of the legislation.

   In addition to the above, we reference certain rights for European
   Territory citizens throughout this Privacy Policy. Pursuant to the
   GDPR, citizens from "European Territories" mean the European Economic
   Area (EEA) and Switzerland. For the purpose of this Privacy Policy, the
   term "European Territories" shall continue to include the United
   Kingdom, even after the United Kingdom leaves the European Economic
   Area following Brexit.
   Please email PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com with any questions about
   exercising any of the above rights.
   6. California Privacy Rights
   +
   Under California Civil Code sections 1798.83-1798.84, California
   residents are entitled to ask us for a notice describing what
   categories of personal information we share with third parties or
   corporate affiliates for those third parties or corporate affiliates'
   direct marketing purposes. That notice will identify the categories of
   information shared and will include a list of the third parties and
   affiliates with which it was shared, along with their names and
   addresses. If you are a California resident and would like a copy of
   this notice, please submit a written request to
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com or send to the following address:
   Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011.
   Please allow 30 days for a response.
   7. “Do Not Track” Disclosure
   +
   Some browsers transmit Do Not Track (DNT) signals to websites. Because
   there is no common understanding of how to interpret the DNT signal,
   Outbrain does not currently alter, change, or respond to DNT requests
   or signals from these browsers. We will continue to monitor industry
   activity in this area and reassess our DNT practices as necessary. In
   the meantime, you can use the range of other tools we provide to
   control data collection and use, including the ability to opt out of
   receiving personalized recommendations in the Users section.
   8. How This Privacy Policy May Change
   +
   We may change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will place a
   prominent notice that will be visible to you as a Site Visitor or
   Business Partner, but we do not have a means of advising Users of an
   update. You should check back here periodically to see if the Privacy
   Policy has been updated. We will always show the date of the latest
   modification of the Privacy Policy at the top of the page so you can
   tell when it was last revised.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Letzte Aktualisierung: 23. Mai 2018
   Outbrain ist dem Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten verpflichtet.
   Diese Datenschutzbestimmungen („Datenschutzbestimmungen“) gelten für
   die Verwendung durch Outbrain der von uns erfassten Daten,
   einschließlich aller personenbezogenen Daten, durch Outbrain.
   Personenbezogene Daten sind Informationen, die sich auf Sie beziehen
   und Sie persönlich identifizieren können. Wir verwenden Ihre
   personenbezogenen Daten entsprechend den geltenden Gesetzen. Im Sinne
   der Compliance und der Übereinstimmung mit Outbrains Werten rund um
   Vertrauen und Transparenz verfügt Outbrain über ein Team von
   Datenschutz-Champions, die für die kontinuierliche Umsetzung unseres
   weltweit gültigen Maßnahmenkatalogs zum Datenschutz verantwortlich
   sind.

                                                          + ALLE ERWEITERN

                                                 – ALLEX ZUSAMMENBRECHEN

   1. Wer wir sind, Was wir tun, Wie Sie Outbrain kontaktieren können,
   unser Datenschutzbeauftragter oder die zuständigen Behörden

                                      +

   Wer wir sind:
   Outbrain bedeutet Outbrain Inc., ein Unternehmen nach dem Recht von
   Delaware, USA, mit Hauptsitz in New York, und dessen verbundene
   Tochterunternehmen (zusammen bezeichnet als: „Outbrain“ oder „wir“,
   „uns“, „unser“). Wir haben Niederlassungen in zwölf Ländern weltweit
   und arbeiten mit Publishern und Vermarktern auf der ganzen Welt
   zusammen.
   Was wir tun:
   Outbrains Mission ist es, für Nutzer relevante Empfehlungen anhand
   ihrer Interessen bereitzustellen. Zu diesem Zweck schließen wir
   Vereinbarungen mit:
     * Online-Publishern und Partnern, die ihren Lesern relevanten Content
       empfehlen wollen (dabei handelt es sich um Outbrain Engage); und

     * Werbetreibenden, die erreichen wollen, dass Leser ihren Content
       ansehen (hierbei handelt es sich um Outbrain Amplify).

   Wie Sie Kontakt mit uns aufnehmen:
   Unsere Compliance bezüglich dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen überprüfen
   wir regelmäßig. Wir freuen uns über Ihre Fragen, Anmerkungen und
   Anfragen zu diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen. Richten Sie diese bitte an
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oder auf postalischem Weg an Outbrain
   Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, Attn: Privacy
   Questions / Datenschutzanfrage.
   Sollte Outbrain Ihre Fragen oder Anliegen nicht zu Ihrer Zufriedenheit
   beantworten, können Sie sich auch an folgende Ansprechpartner wenden,
   um Rat oder Unterstützung zu erhalten bzw. Beschwerden vorzubringen:
     * Outbrains externen Datenschutzbeauftragten: ePrivacy GmbH,
       vertreten durch Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. Die ePrivacy GmbH können
       Sie direkt erreichen unter privacy@eprivacy.eu und/oder
     * den Information Commissioner’s Officer, die für Outbrain zuständige
       federführende Aufsichtsbehörde in den europäischen Ländern.

   Selbstkontrollgremien
   Outbrain befolgt die im Rahmen der Selbstverpflichtung formulierten
   Grundsätze der Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) und der European
   Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Wir sind
   vollberechtigte Mitglieder der Network Advertising Initiative (NAI),
   eines Verbands, der sich der verantwortungsvollen Erfassung von Daten
   und deren Verwendung in der Digitalwerbung verpflichtet hat. Wir
   befolgen die Verhaltensregeln der NAI für Web- und Mobilwerbung.
   Outbrain befolgt ebenfalls die im Rahmen der Selbstverpflichtung
   formulierten Grundsätze für die verhaltensgesteuerte Online-Werbung des
   Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) sowie die Rahmenbedingungen für
   die verhaltensgesteuerte Online-Werbung des IAB Europe.
   2. Outbrain-Nutzertypen (inklusive Deaktivierung/Opt-Out)

                                      +

   Ein Großteil dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen ist in einzelne Abschnitte
   unterteilt, die sich daran orientieren, wie Sie mit Outbrain
   interagieren. Bitte entscheiden Sie, welcher Nutzertyp Sie sind.
   Entsprechend den einzelnen Nutzertypen erläutern wir, welche
   Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun, welche Cookies und
   andere vergleichbare Technologien wir nutzen, wie wir diese
   Informationen weitergeben und über welche Rechte Sie verfügen.
   Websitebesucher: Sie sind ein Websitebesucher, wenn Sie unsere
   Websites, Internetseiten, interaktiven Funktionen, Blogs und deren
   jeweiligen Content auf Outbrain.com (oder einer darauf basierenden
   Ableitung wie Outbrain.co.uk, Outbrain.fr, Outbrain.de usw.) und
   MyOutbrain.com („unsere Websites“) besuchen und mit diesen
   interagieren. Sehen Sie hier mehr.
   (a) Welche Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun
   Wir möchten wissen, welche Dienstleistungen auf unseren Websites Sie
   interessieren, und Sie an die von uns angebotenen Services erinnern,
   wenn Sie nicht auf unseren Websites sind. Zu diesem Zweck erfassen wird
   folgende Informationen von Ihnen: (i) IP-Adresse; (ii)
   User-Agent-Daten: Gerätetyp (z.B. iPhone), Browsertyp (z.B. Chrome),
   Betriebssystem (z.B. iOS); (iii) die auf unserer Website besuchten
   Seiten (z.B. die Seite „Über Outbrain“); (iv) den Zeitpunkt des Besuchs
   (und die entsprechende Zeitzone); und (v) die verweisenden URLs und
   andere normalerweise bei HTTP-Anfragen übertragenen Informationen (z.B.
   wissen wir durch diese Information, wie Sie auf unsere Websites gelangt
   sind).
   (b) Cookies und andere vergleichbare Technologien, die wir nutzen
   In der Cookie-Tabelle unter „Site Visitors (Websitebesucher)“ erhalten
   Sie eine detaillierte Liste der Cookies (und ihrer jeweiligen
   Speicherfristen), die wir bei Ihrem Besuch unserer Websites verwenden.
   (c) So geben wir unter Umständen Informationen weiter
     * Weitergabe von Informationen, die wir auf unseren Websites von
       Ihnen erhalten.

   Im Allgemeinen geben wir keine personenbezogenen Daten über Sie an
   Dritte für deren Marketing- oder Werbezwecke weiter. Wir nutzen jedoch
   verschiedene Dritte (jeweils in der Cookie-Tabelle aufgeführt) zur
   Unterstützung unserer Marketing- oder Werbetätigkeit Ihnen gegenüber.
   So gehören einige der Cookies, die wir auf unseren Websites verwenden,
   Dritten, die Outbrain bei unserer Marketing- oder Werbetätigkeit Ihnen
   gegenüber unterstützen. Wir verlangen, dass diese Dritten und externen
   Unternehmen einwilligen, sämtliche an sie weitergegebenen Informationen
   vertraulich zu behandeln und nur zur Erfüllung ihrer Pflichten uns
   gegenüber zu verwenden. Zu diesem Zweck schließen wir Vereinbarungen
   mit allen Dritten, die für uns personenbezogene Daten verarbeiten,
   damit gewährleistet ist, dass sie Ihre personenbezogenen Daten in
   Übereinstimmung mit unseren strengen Anweisungen und allen geltenden
   Datenschutzgesetzen verarbeiten. Wenn Sie einen Post auf unserem Blog
   hinterlassen, sind Ihr Kommentar und Ihre Informationen öffentlich
   zugänglich. Bitte wenden Sie sich an support@outbrain.com, um Ihren
   Kommentar zu entfernen.
     * Verwendung von Dienstleistungen Dritter auf unseren Websites.

   Unsere Websites enthalten Links zu anderen Websites, die uns nicht
   gehören und die wir nicht betreiben. Wir kontrollieren, empfehlen oder
   billigen den Content, die Produkte, Dienstleistungen,
   Datenschutzbestimmungen oder -maßnahmen dieser Websites Dritter nicht.
   Auf unseren Websites sehen Sie beispielsweise anklickbare Symbole, über
   die Sie auf die Facebook-Seite von Outbrain oder die LinkedIn-Seite von
   Outbrain gelangen. Sofern Sie entscheiden, diese Links anzuklicken,
   sollten Sie sich dessen bewusst sein, dass Facebook und LinkedIn unter
   Umständen ihre eigenen Cookies auf Ihr Gerät senden und unabhängig
   personenbezogene Daten erfassen. Daher ist es wichtig, dass Sie die
   Datenschutzbestimmungen von Facebook und/oder LinkedIn lesen.
     * Beachten Sie auch den Abschnitt dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen über
       die Weitergabe von Daten.

   (d) Ihre Rechte
   Die Nutzungsbedingungen auf unserer Website regeln die Nutzung unserer
   Website und gelten auch für Sie. Sie können die Nutzung unserer Website
   jederzeit beenden. In diesem Fall können Sie auch die Cookies
   entfernen, die wir auf jedem für den Zugriff auf unsere Website
   verwendeten Gerät gesetzt haben. Falls Sie während Ihrer Nutzung
   unserer Websites Ihre E-Mail-Adresse übermitteln, enthält jede E-Mail,
   die Sie von Outbrain erhalten, eine Option zum Abbestellen des
   E-Mail-Empfangs.
   Für Besucher aus dem europäischen Gebiet hat Outbrain auf unseren
   Websites eine Plattform für das Zustimmungs-Management eingerichtet
   (betrieben durch One Trust), über die Nutzer die Möglichkeit haben,
   ihre Zustimmung zu Cookies und vergleichbaren Trackingtechnologien auf
   unseren Websites zu geben oder zu verweigern. Wenn Sie auf unsere
   Website zugreifen, sehen Sie einen Banner am unteren Ende der Seite,
   das Informationen über die Cookies, die wir einsetzen, enthält. Sie
   können auf das Banner klicken und sämtliche Cookies verweigern, die
   nicht absolut notwendig sind. Der Klick auf "Akzeptieren"/"Accept" auf
   dem Banner oder das Scrollen/Klicken auf unseren Seiten ist ein Zeichen
   Ihres Einverständnisses. Entsprechend basiert Outbrains Rechtmäßigkeit
   der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten auf unseren Websites auf
   Zustimmung. Sie können Ihre Zustimmung jederzeit widerrufen.
   Nutzer: Sie sind ein Nutzer, wenn Sie eine Seite einer Website oder
   Anwendung eines Partners von Outbrain besuchen, auf der das
   Outbrain-Widget installiert ist („Partner-Websites“). Falls Sie
   beispielsweise die Seiten https://news.sky.com/uk, www.spiegel.de oder
   www.cnn.com besuchen, wird das Outbrain-Widget in diese Websites
   eingebunden. Dass Sie mit einem Outbrain-Widget verbunden sind,
   erkennen Sie an dem Text, der auf Outbrain verweist (z.B. „Empfohlen
   von Outbrain“, „von Outbrain“ neben den Empfehlungen). Wenn Sie auf die
   Verlinkung zu Outbrain klicken, sehen Sie einen detaillierten Hinweis ,
   der Ihnen erlaubt, zum Interessenprofil von Outbrain zu navigieren, wo
   Sie eine allgemeine Darstellung der Arten von Datenkategorien finden,
   die Outbrain für die Abgabe seiner Empfehlungen verwendet. Sie haben an
   dieser Stelle auch die Möglichkeit, personalisierte Empfehlungen zu
   deaktivieren. Sehen Sie hier mehr.
   Beispiel eines Outbrain-Widgets
   Outbrain Example Recommendations
   (a) Welche Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun
   Wir verwenden UUIDs, IP-Adressen und andere Nutzungsdaten, damit wir
   Ihnen interessante Empfehlungen unterbreiten können. Outbrains
   Empfehlungen werden unter Umständen von einem Werbetreibenden bezahlt,
   der Sie auf eine neue Website leitet, oder es handelt sich um eigene
   Empfehlungen des Publishers, sodass der Link auf eine andere Seite
   desselben Publishers führt.
     * UUID.

   Wenn Sie als Nutzer erstmalig eine Partner-Website (z.B. CNN.com)
   besuchen, setzt Outbrain zur Erzeugung einer eindeutigen Nutzerkennung,
   UUID (Unique User Identifier), ein Cookie auf Ihrem Gerät. Wir
   katalogisieren und analysieren den Content, den Sie auf
   Partner-Websites konsumieren. Unsere Empfehlungen basieren auf: (i) dem
   Browserverlauf; (ii) ähnlichen Surfmustern anderer Nutzer; (ii)
   Empfehlungen, die bei Outbrains Adressaten zur gegebenen Zeit beliebt
   sind; (iv) einem gewissen Maß an Zufälligkeit und (v)
   Zielanforderungen, die durch unsere Amplify-Kunden bereitgestellt oder
   von ihnen verlangt werden. Beispielsweise weiß Outbrain, dass UUID 123
   (wobei es sich um Sie handeln kann, während Sie mit Ihrem iPhone X und
   dem Chrome-Browser auf der Spiegel-Website surfen) gern Texte über
   ferne Reiseziele liest und dass Personen, die gern von fernen
   Reisezielen lesen, sich auch für Artikel über exotisches Essen
   interessieren.
   Die UUID stellt eine Abfolge von Ziffern und/oder Buchstaben dar. Diese
   UUID ist an Ihr Gerät gebunden und variiert je nach verwendetem
   Browser. Mit anderen Worten: Outbrain erfasst verschiedene UUIDs
   abhängig davon, welches Gerät und/oder welchen Browser Sie für den
   Zugriff auf die Websites des Partners verwenden. Dies bedeutet
   beispielsweise, dass Sie eine UUID haben, wenn Sie eine Partner-Website
   von Ihrem Mobiltelefon aus mit dem Safari-Browser besuchen, und eine
   andere UUID, wenn Sie eine Partner-Website von Ihrem iPad aus mit dem
   Safari-Browser besuchen. Outbrain kombiniert und konsolidiert eine UUID
   von einem Mobilgerät (Handgerät oder Tablet) von einem Browser, der
   dann von demselben Gerät auf eine Anwendung (oder umgekehrt) zugreift.
   Durch die Zuweisung einer UUID kann Outbrain die besuchten Seiten und
   die Klicks auf Outbrains Empfehlungen von dieser UUID kombinieren, was
   alles dem Ziel dient, interessante Empfehlungen bereitzustellen.
     * IP-Adressen und andere Nutzungsdaten.

   Wir erfassen eine UUID wie oben erläutert, und wir erfassen auch die
   folgenden Daten: (i) IP-Adresse (wird nach Industriestandards
   anonymisiert); (ii) User-Agent-Daten: Gerätetyp (z.B. iPhone),
   Browsertyp (z.B. Chrome), Betriebssystem, z.B. iOS); (iii) die
   besuchten Seiten; (iv) den Zeitpunkt des Besuchs und (v) die
   verweisenden URLs und andere normalerweise bei HTTP-Anfragen
   übertragenen Informationen.
   Durch die oben genannten statistischen Daten erhalten wir Informationen
   darüber, wie viele Nutzer eine bestimmte Seite auf unseren
   Partner-Websites, auf denen das Outbrain-Widget installiert ist,
   besucht haben, wie lange jeder Nutzer auf der Seite blieb, die Art des
   Contents auf der Seite, die er angeklickt hat, und wie der Nutzer sich
   auf der Seite allgemein verhalten hat. Diese Informationen sind nur
   dann personenbezogene Daten, wenn sie mit einer UUID verbunden sind.
   (b) Cookies und andere vergleichbare Technologien, die wir nutzen
   Diese Cookie-Tabelle enthält unter „Nutzer“ eine detaillierte Liste der
   Erstanbieter-Cookies, die wir bei Ihrer Interaktion mit
   Partner-Websites, auf denen die Outbrain-Technologie implementiert ist,
   verwenden.
   Wenn Sie auf einen Link zu einer unserer Empfehlungen klicken, setzt
   der Amplify-Werbetreibende, der die Empfehlung finanziert, unter
   Umständen durch Weiterleitungen vor der Ankunft auf der Zielseite der
   Empfehlungen oder bei Erreichen der Zielseite Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät.
   In diesen Fällen gelten für Sie die Datenschutzbestimmungen des
   Werbetreibenden.
   Zusätzlich zu Outbrains sichtbarem Widget auf Partner-Websites
   implementieren bestimmte Outbrain-Werbetreibende gegebenenfalls das
   Outbrain-Pixel auf ihren Websites. Das Outbrain-Pixel ermittelt, ob der
   Nutzer, der auf die Seite mit dem installierten Pixel gelangt, über
   eine Outbrain-UUID verfügt. Falls es eine mit diesem Endnutzer
   verbundene UUID gibt, kann Outbrain den Werbetreibenden erlauben, diese
   UUIDs erneut anzusprechen, und/oder den Werbetreibenden die Gesamtzahl
   der UUIDs, die diese Seite erreicht haben, übermitteln. Sofern es auf
   der Seite keine Outbrain-UUID gab, erfasst das Outbrain-Pixel keine
   Daten über den Nutzer.
   Wir legen Werbetreibenden nahe, die Verwendung des Outbrain-Pixels auf
   ihren eigenen Websites offenzulegen. Outbrain kombiniert keine
   Pixelinformationen mit dem Profil einer UUID.
   Datenpunkte wie Seitenaufrufe und Klicks sind mit einer bestimmten UUID
   verbunden und werden 13 Monate lang gespeichert. Falls beispielsweise
   UUID 123 am 31. Dezember 2017 einen Artikel gelesen hat, ist dieser
   Artikel am 1. Februar 2018 nicht mehr Teil des Profils von UUID 123.
   (c) So geben wir unter Umständen Informationen weiter
   Outbrain leitet keine Nutzerprofile an Dritte weiter. Wir geben jedoch
   unter Umständen die UUID an bestimmte Partner zum Zweck der
   Cookie-Synchronisierung oder aufgrund technischer Anforderungen weiter.
   Beachten Sie bitte auch den Abschnitt dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen
   über die Weitergabe von Daten.
   (d) Ihre Rechte
     * Outbrain-Deaktivierung/Opt-Out. Sie können Outbrains
       personalisierte Empfehlungen jederzeit deaktivieren. In Outbrains
       Interessenprofil finden Sie eine allgemeine Darstellung, welche
       Ihrer Daten Outbrain kennt und gegebenenfalls für Empfehlungen
       nutzt. Über das Interessenprofil haben Sie auch die Möglichkeit,
       personalisierte Empfehlungen zu deaktivieren (Sie können ein
       solches Opt-Out auch hier vornehmen). Bitte beachten Sie, dass die
       Deaktivierung von Browsern über Outbrains Interessenprofil
       stattfindet, die Deaktivierung von personalisierten Empfehlungen in
       Anwendungen jedoch über die Einstellungen in Ihrem Gerät (Beispiele
       für die Schritte erhalten Sie im Interessenprofil).

   WICHTIG – obwohl Sie Outbrain deaktiviert haben:
     * Sie sehen weiterhin Outbrains Empfehlungen. Die Deaktivierung von
       Outbrains Personalisierungsverfolgung bedeutet nicht, dass Sie
       keine weiteren Empfehlungen von Outbrain erhalten. Stattdessen
       bedeutet es, dass Outbrains Empfehlungen nicht mehr personalisiert
       sind. Die Empfehlungen nutzen nach wie vor Informationen über das
       von Ihnen betrachtete Dokument (z.B. Kontextinformationen), um
       Ihnen auf dieser Seite Empfehlungen zu unterbreiten.

     * Die Deaktivierung basiert auf Cookies und ist spezifisch für das
       Gerät/den Browser. Sofern Sie im Web von verschiedenen Geräten
       und/oder Browsern aus surfen, müssen Sie eine Deaktivierung von
       jedem Gerät und/oder Browser aus vornehmen, damit dafür gesorgt
       ist, dass wir auf allen die Personalisierungsverfolgung verhindern.
       Aus demselben Grund müssen Sie, wenn Sie ein neues Gerät kaufen,
       den Browser wechseln oder das Deaktivierungs-Cookie löschen, eine
       erneute Deaktivierung vornehmen. Die Deaktivierung der
       Personalisierungsverfolgung ist nicht dasselbe wie die Blockierung
       von Cookies.

     * Um die Löschung des mit Ihrer UUID verbundenen Profils
       sicherzustellen, sollten Sie Outbrain über mindestens 21 Tage nicht
       aktivieren. Ihre Deaktivierung der personalisierten Empfehlungen
       durch Outbrain ist sofort wirksam. Falls Ihr Browser jedoch die
       lokale Speicherung zulässt und Sie innerhalb von 21 Tagen nach
       Ihrer Deaktivierung Outbrains personalisierte Empfehlungen
       aktivieren, wird Ihr vorheriges Profil möglicherweise wieder mit
       Ihrer UUID verbunden. Sofern Sie nicht innerhalb von 21 Tagen eine
       neue Aktivierung vornehmen, wird Ihr Profil gelöscht und kann nicht
       wiederhergestellt werden.

     * Wie bei den meisten Opt-Outs basiert auch der Outbrain
       Browser-Opt-Out auf einem Cookie. Das Cookie ist dazu bestimmt,
       bestehen zu bleiben, damit die Präferenz des Nutzers durchgesetzt
       werden kann. Allerdings kann die „Intelligent Tracking Prevention“
       (das Verhindern von Aufzeichnungen) für Safari in iOS 11 das
       Fortbestehen von Cookies über ein 24-Stunden-Zeitfenster hinaus
       beeinträchtigen. Wir empfehlen die Nutzung eines anderen Browsers
       oder das Blockieren aller 3rd-Party-Cookies in dem Browser, sodass
       Ihr Opt-Out-Wunsch berücksichtigt wird, ohne dass Sie sich auf die
       Opt-Out-Methodik eines einzelnen Unternehmens verlassen müssen.

     * Zusätzliche Deaktivierungsoptionen. Sie können auch den Erhalt
       personalisierter Werbung durch uns oder andere Werbeunternehmen
       über branchenbetriebene Tools deaktivieren, beispielsweise NAI oder
       die verschiedenen DAA-basierten Seiten (DAA,
       http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices, und/oder EDAA
       www.youronlinechoices.eu). Durch den Besuch der Seiten für
       Verbraucherwahlmöglichkeiten NAI, DAA, DAAC oder EDAA können Sie
       einige oder alle Leistungen der teilnehmenden Mitglieder
       deaktivieren. Wie auch die Deaktivierung von Outbrain bedeuten auch
       diese Deaktivierungen nicht, dass Sie gar keine Werbung mehr
       erhalten, sondern lediglich, dass die Werbung nicht mehr auf Sie
       zugeschnitten ist. Möglicherweise erhalten Sie weiterhin Werbung,
       beispielsweise anhand der speziellen Website, die Sie betrachten
       (d. h. kontextbasierte Werbung). Falls durch die Einstellungen
       Ihrer Browser zudem Cookies abgewiesen werden, wenn Sie die
       Verbraucherseiten DAA, DAAC oder EDAA besuchen, ist Ihre
       Deaktivierung unter Umständen nicht wirksam.
     * Rechtsgrundlage. Outbrains Rechtmäßigkeit der Verarbeitung
       personenbezogener Daten eines Nutzers gründet auf der durch unsere
       Partner-Websites festgelegten Rechtmäßigkeit. Jeder Partner-Website
       liegt Zustimmung oder berechtigtes Interesse zugrunde. Bitte lesen
       Sie die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen der Partner-Websites, um
       weitere Informationen über deren Rechtmäßigkeit zu erhalten. Falls
       bei einem Partner eine Zustimmung erforderlich ist, setzt Outbrain
       kein Cookie bei Ihnen, wenn Sie der Partner-Website keine
       Zustimmung erteilt haben.

   Geschäftspartner: Sie sind ein Geschäftspartner, wenn Sie sich im Namen
   des Unternehmens, für das Sie arbeiten, registrieren (oder Outbrain per
   E-Mail kontaktieren), um die Dienstleistungen Outbrain Amplify oder
   Outbrain Engage zu nutzen. Sehen Sie hier mehr.
   (a) Welche Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun
   Womöglich übermitteln Sie bestimmte personenbezogene Daten (wie die
   E-Mail-Adresse), wenn Sie sich für die Amplify- oder
   Engage-Dienstleistungen registrieren oder anderweitig mit uns
   kommunizieren oder interagieren. Wenn Sie sich bei uns als
   Geschäftspartner bewerben, benötigen wir gegebenenfalls weitere Daten
   von Ihnen über Anmeldebögen für Werbetreibende, Werbeaufträge und
   andere Formulare. Wir erfassen automatisch Informationen über die
   Aktivitäten Ihres Nutzernamens im Outbrain-Dashboard. Wenn Sie
   beispielsweise als Amplify-Geschäftspartner die Kosten pro Klick für
   eine Ihrer Kampagnen ändern, findet sich im Audit Trail von Outbrain
   eine Aufzeichnung all dieser Maßnahmen.
   Wir erfassen und verarbeiten die oben genannten personenbezogenen
   Daten, um unsere Verpflichtungen aus unserem Vertrag mit Ihnen als
   Geschäftspartner (oder zukünftiger Geschäftspartner) zu erfüllen, unter
   anderem:
     * Beantwortung Ihrer Fragen und Anforderungen;

     * Gewährung Ihres Zugriffs auf bestimmte Funktionen und Eigenschaften
       der Amplify- und Engage-Dienstleistungen (z.B. Bereitstellung und
       Pflege Ihres Dashboard-Kontos);

     * Verifizierung Ihrer Identität;

     * Kommunikation mit Ihnen über Ihr Konto, unsere Produkte und die für
       Ihre Nutzung der Amplify- oder Engage-Dienstleistung relevanten
       Werbeaktionen.

   (b) Cookies und andere vergleichbare Technologien, die wir nutzen
   In der Cookie-Tabelle unter „Geschäftspartner“ erhalten Sie eine
   detaillierte Liste der Cookies (und ihrer jeweiligen Speicherfristen),
   die wir für Geschäftspartner verwenden.
   (c) So geben wir unter Umständen Informationen weiter
   Wir legen bestimmte Informationen über Geschäftspartner gegenüber
   Anbietern, Auftragnehmern oder anderen offen, die Outbrain bei der
   Erbringung der Dienstleistungen unterstützen (z.B.
   Kreditkartenabwicklung). Beachten Sie bitte auch den Abschnitt dieser
   Datenschutzbestimmungen über die Weitergabe von Daten.
   (d) Ihre Rechte
   Sofern Sie als Geschäftspartner Ihre Daten verifizieren, berichtigen,
   aktualisieren oder deren Deaktivierung veranlassen möchten, können Sie
   Ihre Profileinstellungen im Outbrain-Dashboard editieren oder uns unter
   support@outbrain.com kontaktieren. Falls Sie von Outbrain E-Mails
   erhalten, können Sie den Empfang über einen Link in der E-Mail
   abbestellen. Bitte beachten Sie, dass Sie durch das Abbestellen nicht
   den Erhalt von Benachrichtigungen deaktivieren, die kritisch für die
   Erbringung der Amplify- oder Engage-Dienstleistungen sind (z.B.
   E-Mail-Rechnungen).
   Outbrains Rechtmäßigkeit der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten von
   Geschäftspartnern gründet in berechtigtem Interesse.
   3. Datensicherheit, Übertragungen außerhalb des EWR, Weitergabe und
   Speicherfristen

                                      +

   Sicherheit
   Outbrain verfügt über ein dezidiertes Sicherheitsteam. Wir führen eine
   strenge Kontrolle der durch uns erfassten Daten durch und speichern
   diese in durch Firewalls geschützten und sicheren Datenbanken mit
   streng begrenzten und kontrollierten Zugriffsrechten, damit deren
   Sicherheit gewährleistet ist. Weitere Informationen können Sie unseren
   Sicherheitsstandards entnehmen.
   Geschäftspartner haben Zugang zu bestimmten passwortgeschützten
   Funktionen der Dienstleistungen Amplify oder Engage. Sie sind für die
   Geheimhaltung dieses Passworts verantwortlich. Bitte denken Sie daran,
   dass die Informationsübertragung über das Internet leider nicht
   vollständig sicher ist. Ein häufig vorkommender Internetbetrug wird als
   „Spoofing“ oder „Phishing“ bezeichnet. Dabei erhalten Sie eine E-Mail,
   die von einer vertrauenswürdigen Quelle zu stammen scheint und in der
   Ihre personenbezogenen Daten erfragt werden. Bitte beachten Sie, dass
   wir Ihnen keine E-Mails senden, in denen wir Sie um die Überprüfung
   Ihrer Kreditkarten- oder Bankdaten oder anderer personenbezogener Daten
   bitten. Sollten Sie jemals eine E-Mail erhalten, die den Anschein
   erweckt, von uns zu sein, und in der derartige Daten von Ihnen
   angefordert werden, antworten Sie nicht darauf und klicken Sie auch auf
   keine Links in dieser E-Mail. Leiten Sie stattdessen diese E-Mail an
   uns unter legal@outbrain.com weiter, da wir Fälle möglichen
   Internetbetrugs untersuchen.
   Datenübertragungen außerhalb der EU/des EWR
   Wenn wir personenbezogene Daten aus dem Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum in
   andere Länder übertragen, deren geltende Gesetze nicht über dasselbe
   Datenschutzniveau wie in den europäischen Gebieten verfügen, sorgen wir
   durch eigene Maßnahmen für ein geeignetes Datenschutzniveau. Für Ihre
   Daten gelten somit weiterhin Ihre Rechte und Ihr Datenschutz.
   Beispielsweise verwenden wir anerkannte Vertragsklauseln und weitere
   Maßnahmen, durch die für den Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten durch
   die Empfänger gesorgt ist.
   Weitergabe von Daten
   Zusätzlich zu der beschriebenen Offenlegung Ihrer personenbezogenen
   Daten der einzelnen Nutzerarten legen wir personenbezogene Daten unter
   Umständen wie folgt offen:
     * Innerhalb der durch Outbrain kontrollierten Unternehmensgruppe aus
       internen Gründen, vorrangig für geschäftliche und betriebliche
       Zwecke;

     * Bei einem Geschäftsübergang, wie einer Fusion, dem Erwerb durch ein
       anderes Unternehmen oder dem teilweisen oder vollständigen Verkauf
       unserer Vermögenswerte, gehören Ihre personenbezogenen Daten
       wahrscheinlich zu den übertragenen Vermögenswerten;

     * Bei entsprechenden rechtlichen Anforderungen (z.B. zur
       Unterstützung strafrechtlicher Ermittlungen oder anderer
       Rechtsverfahren); und/oder

     * Als Reaktion auf einen echten Notfall.

   Außerdem kombinieren wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten mit denen anderer
   Nutzer, um Trendinformationen weiterzugeben und Nutzerstatistiken mit
   Dritten zu verbinden, jedoch stets in zusammengefasster und
   anonymisierter Form.
   Datenspeicherung
   Die Speicherfrist für jedes durch Outbrain verwendete Cookie (gleich ob
   unser eigenes oder für uns durch Dritte) ist in der Cookie-Tabelle
   genannt.
   Outbrain verfügt zudem über eine Richtlinie zur Datenspeicherung, in
   der die Speicherfrist für personenbezogene Daten aufgeführt ist, die
   auf unserer Analyse basiert, welche Speicherfrist für bestimmte Daten
   aus rechtlichen oder geschäftlichen Gründen angemessen ist. Wenn wir
   personenbezogene Daten nicht mehr benötigen, löschen oder vernichten
   wir diese auf sichere Weise. Zusammengefasste Daten, durch die kein
   Gerät/Browser (oder keine Person) identifiziert werden kann und die für
   die Berichterstattung und Analyse benötigt werden, behalten wir so
   lange, wie dies wirtschaftlich nötig ist.
   4. Kinder

                                      +

   Keine unserer Dienstleistungen richtet sich an Kinder unter 16 Jahren.
   Wir erfassen wissentlich keine personenbezogenen Daten von Personen
   unter 16 Jahren. Stellen wir bei der Datenerfassung fest, dass ein
   Websitebesucher, ein Nutzer oder ein Geschäftspartner unter 16 ist,
   verwenden oder behalten wir seine/ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht.
   Wenn wir davon Kenntnis erlangen, dass wir unwissentlich
   personenbezogene Daten von einem Kind im Alter von unter 16 erfasst
   haben, ergreifen wir angemessene Anstrengungen zur Löschung dieser
   Daten aus unseren Verzeichnissen. Wenn du ein Kind bist, nutze Outbrain
   nicht, verlasse diese Seite und geh lieber spielen!
   5. Bürger des europäischen Gebiets

                                      +

   In Übereinstimmung mit europäischen Datenschutzgesetzen, insbesondere
   der europäischen Datenschutz-Grundverordnung (DSGVO), gewährt Outbrain
   Bürgern der europäischen Gebiete bestimmte zusätzliche Rechte wie das
   Recht auf Zugriff, Berichtigung, Einspruch, Beschwerde, Löschung und
   Blockierung. Insbesondere:
     * das Recht auf Auskunft darüber, ob und welche personenbezogenen
       Daten von uns verarbeitet werden, sowie das Recht, die Berichtigung
       oder Änderung personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen.
     * unter bestimmten Umständen das Recht, die Löschung
       personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen.
     * unter bestimmten Umständen das Recht, die Einschränkung der
       Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen.
     * den jederzeitigen vollständigen oder teilweisen Widerruf Ihrer
       Zustimmung zur Verarbeitung und Nutzung Ihrer Daten mit zukünftiger
       Gültigkeit.
     * das Recht auf Erhalt Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten in einem
       üblichen, strukturierten und mechanisch lesbaren Format.
     * Kontaktaufnahme mit Ihrem Datenschutzbeauftragten bei Fragen,
       Anmerkungen, Beschwerden oder Anfragen im Zusammenhang mit unserer
       Datenschutzerklärung und der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen
       Daten.
     * das Recht auf Beschwerde bei der zuständigen Aufsichtsbehörde,
       falls Sie der Auffassung sind, dass die Verarbeitung Ihrer
       personenbezogenen Daten gesetzeswidrig ist.

   Neben dem oben Genannten weisen wir in diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen
   auf bestimmte Rechte für Bürger des europäischen Gebiets hin. Laut der
   DSGVO bezeichnet die Formulierung „Bürger aus europäischen Gebieten“
   den Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum (EWR) und die Schweiz. Im Sinne dieser
   Datenschutzbestimmungen umfasst der Begriff „europäische Gebiete“
   weiterhin das Vereinigte Königreich, auch nachdem dieses den
   Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum im Anschluss an den Austritt (Brexit)
   verlässt.
   Bitte senden Sie eine Nachricht an PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com, wenn
   Sie Fragen zur Ausübung dieser Rechte haben.
   6. Datenschutzrechte in Kalifornien

                                      +

   Laut dem California Civil Code, Abschnitte 1798.83-1798.84, sind
   Einwohner Kaliforniens berechtigt, von uns darüber Auskunft zu
   erhalten, welche Kategorien personenbezogener Daten wir an Dritte oder
   verbundene Unternehmen für diese Dritten oder für direkte
   Marketingzwecke verbundener Unternehmen weiterleiten. In dieser
   Auskunft werden die Kategorien der weitergeleiteten Daten
   identifiziert, einschließlich einer Liste der Dritten und verbundenen
   Unternehmen, an die die Daten weitergeleitet wurden, und deren Namen
   und Adressen. Falls Sie Ihren Wohnsitz in Kalifornien unterhalten und
   Sie diese Auskunft einholen möchten, senden Sie bitte eine schriftliche
   Anforderung an PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oder an die folgende
   Anschrift: Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY
   10011. Sie erhalten eine Antwort innerhalb von 30 Tagen.
   7. „Do Not Track“-Angabe

                                      +

   Einige Browser senden an Websites „Do Not Track (DNT)“-Signale, mit
   denen der Website mitgeteilt wird, dass die Aktivitäten des Nutzers
   nicht verfolgt werden sollen. Es besteht jedoch kein allgemeingültiges
   Verständnis darüber, wie DNT-Signale zu interpretieren sind, und daher
   findet durch Outbrain derzeit keine Modifizierung, Änderung oder
   Reaktion auf die DNT-Anforderungen oder -Signale von diesen Browsern
   statt. Wir beobachten weiterhin die Branchenaktivitäten in diesem
   Bereich und bewerten unsere DNT-Verfahren bei Bedarf neu.
   Zwischenzeitlich können Sie eine Reihe anderer durch uns
   bereitgestellter Tools zur Kontrolle der Datenerfassung und -nutzung
   einsetzen, unter anderem die Möglichkeit, im Nutzerbereich den Erhalt
   personalisierter Empfehlungen zu deaktivieren.
   8. Mögliche Änderungen dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen

                                      +

   Wir ändern diese Datenschutzbestimmungen zu gegebener Zeit. Darüber
   informieren wir durch einen deutlichen Hinweis, der für Sie als
   Websitebesucher oder Geschäftspartner erkennbar ist. Wir haben jedoch
   keine Möglichkeit, Nutzern gegenüber eine Aktualisierung anzukündigen.
   Sie sollten diesen Bereich regelmäßig daraufhin überprüfen, ob die
   Datenschutzbestimmungen aktualisiert worden sind. Wir zeigen stets das
   Datum der letzten Änderung der Datenschutzbestimmungen oben auf der
   Seite an, damit Sie wissen, wann diese zuletzt überarbeitet wurden.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                Última actualización: 23 de mayo de 2018

   Outbrain se compromete a proteger tus datos personales. Esta Política
   de privacidad («Política de privacidad») rige el uso por parte de
   Outbrain de los datos recopilados por nosotros, incluyendo todos y cada
   uno de los datos personales. Los datos personales son información que
   se relaciona contigo y que puede identificarte como individuo.
   Utilizamos tus datos personales de conformidad con todas las leyes
   aplicables. Para garantizar el cumplimiento y estar en sintonía con los
   valores de Outbrain en materia de confianza y transparencia, contamos
   con un equipo de defensores de la privacidad responsables de la
   implementación continua de nuestro programa de privacidad global.

                                                           + EXPANDIR TODO

   1. Quiénes somos, qué hacemos, cómo ponerse en contacto con Outbrain,
   nuestro RPD o las autoridades competentes

                                      +

   Quiénes somos:
   Outbrain significa Outbrain Inc, una sociedad de Delaware (EE.UU.) con
   sede en Nueva York y sus filiales (colectivamente, «Outbrain», o
   «nosotros», «nos», «nuestro»). Operamos desde 12 oficinas globales y
   colaboramos con editores y vendedores de todo el mundo.
   Qué hacemos:
   La misión de Outbrain es facilitar recomendaciones interesantes a sus
   usuarios basadas en sus intereses. Para lograr nuestra misión firmamos
   acuerdos con:
     * editores y socios en línea que desean recomendar contenido
       relevante a sus lectores (Outbrain Engage), y
     * anunciantes que quieren que los lectores vean su contenido
       (Outbrain Amplify).

   Cómo ponerse en contacto con nosotros:
   Revisamos regularmente nuestro cumplimiento de la presente Política de
   privacidad. Las preguntas, comentarios y solicitudes relacionadas con
   esta Política de privacidad son bienvenidas y deben dirigirse a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com o por correo postal a Outbrain Inc. 39
   West 13th Street, 3rd floor, Nueva York, NY 10011, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Si Outbrain no responde satisfactoriamente a tus preguntas o
   inquietudes, también puede ponerte en contacto con las siguientes
   personas para obtener asesoramiento, apoyo o realizar reclamaciones:
     * El Responsable de Protección de Datos externo de Outbrain («RPD»):
       ePrivacy GmbH, representada por D. Christoph Bauer. Se puede
       contactar con ePrivacy GmbH directamente en privacy@eprivacy.eu.
     * El Information Commissioner’s Officer, que es el principal servicio
       de supervisión de Outbrain en Europa.

   Órganos de autorregulación
   Outbrain se adhiere a los principios de autorregulación establecidos
   por la Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) y la European Interactive
   Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Somos miembros activos de la
   Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), una asociación dedicada a la
   recopilación responsable de datos y su uso para la publicidad digital.
   Nos adherimos al Código de conducta de NAI para sitios web y móviles.
   Outbrain también se adhiere a los Principios de autorregulación de la
   Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) para la Publicidad conductual en
   línea y al Marco OBA de IAB de Europa.
   2. Tipos de usuarios de Outbrain (incluyendo la gestión del Opt Out)

                                      +

   Gran parte de esta Política de privacidad está dividida en apartados en
   función de la manera en que puedes interactuar con Outbrain. Por favor,
   determina qué tipo de usuario eres. Para cada tipo de usuario hemos
   explicado qué información recopilamos y por qué, qué cookies y otras
   tecnologías similares utilizamos, cómo compartimos dicha información y
   sus derechos.
   Visitantes del sitio: Eres un Visitante del Sitio cuando visitas e
   interactúas con nuestros sitios, páginas web, funciones interactivas,
   blogs y tus respectivos contenidos en Outbrain.com (o cualquier
   derivación, como Outbrain.co.uk, Outbrain.fr, Outbrain.de, etc.) y
   MyOutbrain.com («Nuestros sitios»). Ver más aquí.
   (a) Qué información recopilamos y por qué
   Queremos entender qué servicios te interesan de Nuestros sitios y
   queremos recordarte los servicios que ofrecemos cuando no estés
   visitando Nuestros sitios. Para ello, recopilamos la siguiente
   información sobre ti: (i) dirección IP, (ii) datos del Agente usuario:
   tipo de dispositivo (por ejemplo, iPhone), tipo de navegador (por
   ejemplo, Chrome), sistema operativo (por ejemplo, iOS), (iii) las
   páginas visitadas en Nuestro sitios (por ejemplo, la página «Acerca de»
   de Outbrain), (iv) la hora de la visita (y la zona horaria
   correspondiente) y (v) las URL de referencia y otra información que
   normalmente se transmite en las solicitudes HTTP (por ejemplo, esta
   información nos dice cómo llegaste a Nuestros sitios).
   (b) Qué cookies y otras tecnologías similares utilizamos
   Consulta esta Tabla de cookies en «Visitantes del sitio» para obtener
   una lista detallada de las cookies (y sus correspondientes períodos de
   retención) que utilizamos cuando visitas Nuestros sitios web.
   (c) Cómo podemos intercambiar información
     * Intercambio de información sobre ti en Nuestros sitios.

   En general, no compartimos tus datos personales con terceros para fines
   de marketing o publicidad. Sin embargo, utilizamos varios terceros
   (cada uno de los cuales aparece en esta Tabla de cookies) para
   ayudarnos a vender o a enviarte publicidad. Por ejemplo, algunas de las
   cookies que utilizamos en Nuestros sitios pertenecen a terceros que
   ayudarán a Outbrain a vender o a enviarte publicidad. Exigimos que
   estos terceros y empresas se comprometan a mantener toda la información
   compartida con ellos de manera confidencial y a utilizar la información
   sólo para cumplir con sus obligaciones para con nosotros. Lo anterior
   se logra mediante acuerdos con todos los terceros que tratan datos
   personales en nuestro nombre para asegurarnos de que tratan tus datos
   personales de conformidad con nuestras estrictas instrucciones y todas
   las leyes de protección de datos aplicables. Si realizas una
   publicación en nuestro blog, tu comentario e información estarán
   disponibles públicamente. Póngate en contacto con support@outbrain.com
   para eliminar tu comentario.
     * Uso de servicios de terceros en Nuestros sitios.

   Nuestros sitios contienen enlaces a otras webs que no operamos ni son
   de nuestra propiedad. No controlamos, recomendamos ni respaldamos el
   contenido, los productos, los servicios, las políticas ni las prácticas
   de privacidad de estas webs de terceros. Por ejemplo, en Nuestros
   sitios encontrará iconos en los que podrá hacer clic y que te llevarán
   a la página de Facebook de Outbrain o a la página de LinkedIn de
   Outbrain. Si decides hacer clic en estos enlaces, debes saber que
   Facebook y LinkedIn podrán enviar sus propias cookies a tu dispositivo
   y que podrán recopilar datos personales de forma independiente. Por lo
   tanto, es importante que leas las políticas de privacidad de Facebook o
   LinkedIn.
     * Consulta también el apartado Intercambio de esta Política de
       privacidad.

   (d) Tus derechos
   Los Términos de uso en Nuestro site rigen el uso de Nuestro site y
   también se aplican a ti. Puedes dejar de usar Nuestro site en cualquier
   momento. Si lo haces, es posible que también desees eliminar las
   cookies que hayamos colocado en cualquier dispositivo utilizado para
   acceder a Nuestro site. Si durante tu uso de Nuestros site proporcionas
   tu dirección de correo electrónico, cualquier correo electrónico que
   recibas de Outbrain incluirá la opción «darse de baja».
   Para los usarios del territorio europeo, Outbrain ha implementado una
   plataforma de administración de consentimiento en nuestro site (con la
   tecnología de One Trust), que brinda al usuario la oportunidad de dar
   su aprobación, o no, a cookies y tecnologías de seguimiento similares
   en nuestros sites. Al acceder a nuestros sites, verás un banner en la
   parte inferior de la página con información sobre las cookies que
   utilizamos. Puedes hacer clic en el banner para rechazar cualquier
   cookie que no sea estrictamente necesaria. Aceptar en el banner o hacer
   scrolling/clic en nuestros sites se interpreta como una indicación de
   aceptación. En consecuencia, la base legal de Outbrain para procesar
   datos personales en nuestros sites es el consentimiento. El usuario
   puede retirar su consentimiento en cualquier momento aquí.
   Usuarios: Eres un Usuario cuando visitas una página de un site o
   aplicación de uno de los socios de Outbrain donde esté instalado el
   complemento (widget) de Outbrain («Sitios asociados»). Por ejemplo, si
   visitas https://news.sky.com/uk o www.elpais.com se implementará el
   complemento Outbrain en esas webs. Sabrás que estás interactuando con
   un complemento de Outbrain cuando veas un texto que haga referencia a
   Outbrain (por ejemplo, «Recomendado por Outbrain», «por Outbrain» cerca
   de las recomendaciones). Si hace clic en la referencia con hipervínculo
   a Outbrain, verás un aviso detallado que te permitirá navegar hasta el
   Perfil de intereses de Outbrain, que proporciona una visualización
   general de los tipos de categorías de datos de Outbrain que se pueden
   utilizar para hacer tus recomendaciones. También te ofrece la
   posibilidad de inhabilitar las recomendaciones personalizadas. Ver más
   aquí.
   Ejemplo de un complemento Outbrain
   [rydw687kQ.png]
   (a) Qué información recopilamos y por qué
   Utilizamos identificadores únicos de usuario (UUID, por sus siglas en
   inglés), direcciones IP y otra información de uso para poder ofrecer
   recomendaciones interesantes. Las recomendaciones de Outbrain podrán
   ser pagadas por un anunciante que las vincule a un nuevo sitio web o
   podrán ser orgánicas de tal manera que el enlace sea a otra página en
   el mismo sitio web del editor.
     * UUID.

   Cuando como Usuario visita por primera vez un Sitio asociado (por
   ejemplo, CNN.com), Outbrain introducirá una cookie en tu dispositivo
   para generar un UUID. Catalogamos y analizamos el contenido que
   consumas en los Sitios asociados. Nuestras recomendaciones se basan en:
   (i) el historial de navegación, (ii) los patrones de navegación
   similares de otros Usuarios, (ii) las recomendaciones que son
   generalmente populares entre la audiencia de Outbrain en ese momento,
   (iv) cierta aleatoriedad y (v) los requisitos de orientación que puedan
   ser proporcionados o solicitados por nuestros clientes de Amplify. Como
   ejemplo, Outbrain puede saber que a UUID 123 (que podrías ser tú en su
   iPhone X en el periódico The Guardian usando Chrome como tu navegador)
   le gusta leer sobre destinos vacacionales lejanos y que a la gente que
   le gusta leer sobre destinos vacacionales lejanos también le gusta leer
   sobre comida exótica.
   El UUID es una secuencia de números o letras. Este UUID se vincula tu
   dispositivo y varía dependiendo del navegador que utilices. En otras
   palabras, Outbrain registra un UUID diferente dependiendo del
   dispositivo o navegador que utilices para acceder a los Sitios
   asociados. Por ejemplo, esto significa que tendrás un UUID cuando
   visites un Sitio asociado desde tu teléfono móvil usando el navegador
   Safari y un UUID diferente cuando visites un Sitio asociado desde tu
   iPad usando el navegador Safari. Outbrain combinará y unificará el UUID
   de un dispositivo móvil (portátil o tableta) y el del navegador que
   acceda posteriormente a una aplicación (o viceversa) desde el mismo
   dispositivo.
   Asignar un UUID permite a Outbrain asociar las páginas visitadas y los
   clics realizados en las recomendaciones de Outbrain desde dicho UUID,
   todo ello con el objetivo de proporcionar recomendaciones interesantes.
     * Dirección IP y otra información de uso.

   Recopilamos UUID como se explicó anteriormente y también recopilamos la
   siguiente información sobre ti: (i) dirección IP (y luego anonimizado
   en base a los estándares de la industria); (ii) datos del Agente
   usuario: tipo de dispositivo (por ejemplo, Iphone), tipo de navegador
   (por ejemplo, Chrome), sistema operativo (por ejemplo, iOS), (iii) las
   páginas visitadas, (iv) el momento de la visita y (v) las URL de
   referencia y otra información que normalmente se transmite en las
   solicitudes HTTP.
   La información estadística anterior nos proporciona información sobre
   cuántos Usuarios visitaron una página específica de nuestros Sitios
   asociados en los que está instalado el complemento de Outbrain, cuánto
   tiempo permaneció cada Usuario en esa página, el tipo de contenido en
   esa página sobre el que hicieron clic y cómo interactuaron en general
   con esa página. Esta información sólo son datos personales cuando están
   asociados a un UUID.
   (b) Qué cookies y otras tecnologías similares utilizamos
   Por favor, consulta esta Tabla de cookies en el apartado «Usuarios»
   para obtener una lista detallada de las primeras cookies que utilizamos
   cuando interactúas con Sitios asociados en los que se implementa la
   tecnología de Outbrain.
   Si haces clic en un enlace a una de nuestras recomendaciones, el
   anunciante de Amplify que patrocina la recomendación puede colocar
   cookies en tu dispositivo a través de redirecciones antes de llegar a
   la página de destino de las recomendaciones o al llegar a la página de
   destino. En tales casos, estarás sujeto a la Política de privacidad de
   ese anunciante.
   Además del complemento visible de Outbrain en los Sitios asociados,
   algunos anunciantes de Outbrain podrán implementar el píxel de Outbrain
   en sus sitios web. El píxel de Outbrain determina si el usuario que
   llega a la página donde está instalado el píxel tiene un UUID de
   Outbrain. Si existe un UUID asociado con dicho usuario final, Outbrain
   permitirá a los anunciantes reorientar esos UUID o proporcionará a los
   anunciantes el número total de UUID que llegaron a dicha página. Si no
   había ningún UUID de Outbrain en la página, el píxel de Outbrain no
   recopilará ninguna información sobre el usuario.
   Animamos a los anunciantes a informar sobre el uso del píxel de
   Outbrain en sus propios sitios web. Outbrain no combina información de
   píxeles con el perfil de un UUID.
   Los puntos de datos como las páginas vistas y los clics están
   conectados a un UUID en particular y se retienen durante 13 meses. Por
   ejemplo, si UUID 123 leyó un artículo el 31 de diciembre de 2017, el 1
   de febrero de 2018 ese artículo ya no formará parte del perfil de UUID
   123.
   (c) Cómo podemos intercambiar información
   Outbrain no comparte perfiles de usuario con terceros. Sin embargo, es
   posible que compartamos el UUID con determinados socios con el fin de
   sincronizar las cookies o en función de los requisitos técnicos.
   Consulta también el apartado «Intercambio» de la presente Política de
   privacidad.
   (d) Tus derechos
     * Inhabilitación voluntaria de Outbrain

   Podrás inhabilitar las recomendaciones personalizadas de Outbrain en
   cualquier momento. Por favor, consulta el Perfil de intereses de
   Outbrain para una visualización general de los datos que Outbrain
   conoce sobre ti y que puede utilizar para hacer sus recomendaciones. El
   Perfil de intereses también te ofrece la posibilidad de inhabilitar las
   recomendaciones personalizadas (puedes también hacer opt-out aquí). Ten
   en cuenta que la inhabilitación de los navegadores se realiza a través
   del Perfil de intereses de Outbrain, pero que la inhabilitación de las
   recomendaciones personalizadas en las aplicaciones se realiza a través
   de la configuración de tu dispositivo (hay ejemplos de los pasos a
   seguir en el Perfil de intereses).
   IMPORTANTE – a pesar de que hayas inhabilitado el seguimiento
   personalizado de Outbrain,
     * seguirás viendo las recomendaciones de Outbrain. Inhabilitar el
       seguimiento personalizado de Outbrain no significa que vayas a
       dejar de recibir recomendaciones de Outbrain. Por el contrario,
       significa que las recomendaciones de Outbrain no serán
       personalizadas. Las recomendaciones seguirán utilizando información
       sobre el documento que estás consultando (es decir, información
       contextual) para proporcionarte recomendaciones en esa página.

     * La inhabilitación voluntaria está basada en las cookies y es
       específica del dispositivo/navegador. Si navegas por la página web
       desde varios dispositivos o navegadores, deberás inhabilitar cada
       dispositivo o navegador para asegurarte de que no realizamos el
       seguimiento personalizado en ninguno ellos. Por la misma razón, si
       compras un dispositivo nuevo, cambias de navegador o borra (o
       limpia) la cookie de inhabilitación tendrás que inhabilitarla de
       nuevo. Inhabilitar el seguimiento personalizado no es lo mismo que
       bloquear las cookies.

     * Para garantizar la eliminación del perfil vinculado a su UUID, no
       habilites Outbrain durante al menos 21 días. Tu inhabilitación de
       las recomendaciones personalizadas de Outbrain será efectiva de
       manera inmediata. Sin embargo, si tu navegador permite el
       almacenamiento local y habilitas las recomendaciones personalizadas
       de Outbrain dentro de los 21 días siguientes a tu inhabilitación,
       es posible que tu perfil anterior se vincule de nuevo a su UUID. Si
       no habilitas Outbrain en un plazo de 21 días, se eliminará tu
       perfil y no podrás recuperarse.

     * Al igual que con la mayoría de los opt-out, también la opción de
       opt-out del navegador de Outbrain se basa en una cookie. La cookie
       de opt-out voluntaria persiste para cumplir con las preferencias
       del usuario. Sin embargo, la función de "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention " en iOS11 puede afectar la persistencia de las cookies
       en los sitios web después de una ventana de 24 horas. Sugerimos
       usar otro navegador o considerar bloquear todas las cookies de
       terceros desde el navegador para que se efectúe el“opt-out" sin
       tener que depender de la metodología de exclusión voluntaria de
       ninguna empresa.

     * Opciones adicionales de inhabilitación voluntaria. También podrás
       inhabilitar los anuncios personalizados que te ofrecemos nosotros u
       otras compañías de publicidad a través de herramientas impulsadas
       por la industria, como la NAI o las diversas páginas basadas en la
       DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices ; o EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
       Visitar las páginas de elección del consumidor de la NAI, DAA, DAAC
       o EDAA te permitirá inhabilitar todos o algunos de los servicios de
       los miembros participantes. Al igual que la inhabilitación de
       Outbrain, estas inhabilitaciones no significan que ya no recibirás
       ninguna publicidad, sino que los anuncios simplemente no serán
       personalizados. Podrás continuar recibiendo anuncios, por ejemplo,
       basados en el sitio web en particular que estás viendo (es decir,
       anuncios basados en el contexto). Además, si tus navegadores están
       configurados para rechazar las cookies cuando visitas las páginas
       de elección del consumidor de la DAA, DAAC o EDAA, es posible que
       no se lleve a cabo la inhabilitación.

     * Base legal. La base legal de Outbrain para el tratamiento de los
       datos personales de un Usuario reside en la base legal determinada
       para cada uno de nuestros Sitios asociados. Cada Sitio asociado se
       basará en el consentimiento o interés legítimo. Consulta la
       Política de privacidad de los Sitios asociados para obtener más
       información sobre su base legal. Si un socio se basa en el
       consentimiento, Outbrain no introducirá ninguna cookie si tu no has
       proporcionado el consentimiento en dicho Sitio asociado.

   Socios comerciales: te conviertes en Socio comercial cuando te
   registras (o envías un correo electrónico a Outbrain) en nombre de la
   compañía para la que trabajas para utilizar los Servicios Outbrain
   Amplify o Outbrain Engage. Ver más aquí.
   (a) Qué información recopilamos y por qué
   Puede que proporciones ciertos datos personales (como la dirección de
   correo electrónico) cuando te suscribas a los servicios de Amplify o
   Engage o alternativamente cuando te pongas en contacto o interactúes
   con nosotros. Si solicitas convertirte en Socio comercial, es posible
   que te solicitemos información adicional a través de formularios de
   solicitud de anunciantes, órdenes de inserción y otros formularios.
   Recopilamos automáticamente información acerca de las acciones de tu
   nombre de usuario en el panel de control de Outbrain. Por ejemplo, como
   un Socio comercial de Amplify, si cambias el coste por clic para una de
   tus campañas, el registro de auditoría de Outbrain tendrá un registro
   de todas esas acciones.
     * Recopilamos y tratamos los datos personales anteriores con el fin
       de cumplir nuestras obligaciones en virtud de nuestro acuerdo como
       Socio comercial (o posible Socio comercial) con usted, incluido
       para:

     * responder a tus preguntas y solicitudes;

     * proporcionarte acceso a ciertas funciones y características de
       nuestros servicios Amplify o Engage (por ejemplo, para proporcionar
       y mantener tu cuenta del panel de control);

     * verificar tu identidad;

     * informarte sobre tu cuenta, nuestros productos y promociones
       disponibles que puedan ser relevantes para tu uso del servicio
       Amplify o Engage.

   (b) Qué cookies y otras tecnologías similares utilizamos
   Consulta esta Tabla de cookies en el apartado «Socios comerciales» para
   obtener una lista detallada de las cookies (y sus correspondientes
   períodos de retención) que empleamos con los Socios comerciales.
   (c) Cómo podemos compartir información con cualquier persona
   Podemos revelar cierta información de los Socios comerciales a
   proveedores, contratistas u otros que ayuden a Outbrain a prestar los
   servicios (por ejemplo, procesamiento de tarjetas de crédito). Consulta
   también el apartado Intercambio de esta Política de privacidad.
   (d) Tus derechos
   Si como Socio comercial deseas verificar, corregir, actualizar o
   solicitar la desactivación de tu información, puedes ir al panel de
   control de Outbrain para editar tus preferencias de perfil o ponerte en
   contacto con nosotros en support@outbrain.com. Si estás recibiendo
   correos electrónicos de Outbrain, puedes «darte de baja» haciendo uso
   del enlace en el correo electrónico. Ten en cuenta que la cancelación
   de la suscripción no inhabilitará las notificaciones que sean críticas
   para proporcionar los servicios de Amplify o Engage (por ejemplo,
   facturas por correo electrónico).
   La base legal de Outbrain para tratar los datos personales de los
   Socios comerciales es el interés legítimo.
   3. Cómo protegemos la información, las transmisiones fuera del EEE, el
   intercambio y la retención

                                      +

   Seguridad
   Outbrain tiene un equipo de seguridad específico. Mantenemos un
   estricto control de los datos que recopilamos y los retenemos en bases
   de datos seguras y protegidas por cortafuegos con derechos de acceso
   estrictamente limitados y controlados, para garantizar su seguridad.
   Consulta nuestras normas de seguridad para obtener más información.
   Los socios comerciales tienen acceso a determinadas funciones
   protegidas por contraseña del servicio Amplify o Engage. Ellos son
   responsables de mantener la confidencialidad de la contraseña. Por
   favor, recuerda que, lamentablemente, la transmisión de información a
   través de Internet no es completamente segura. El «spoofing» o
   «phishing» son algunas de las estafas más comunes en Internet. Esto se
   produce cuando recibes un correo electrónico que parece proceder de una
   fuente legítima que te solicita datos personales. Ten en cuenta que no
   te enviaremos ningún correo electrónico solicitándote que verifiques la
   información de tu tarjeta de crédito, bancaria o cualquier otro dato
   personal. Si alguna vez recibes un correo electrónico que parece ser de
   nuestra parte solicitándote dicha información, no respondas a él y no
   haga clic en ninguno de los enlaces que aparecen en el correo
   electrónico. En su lugar, reenvíenos el correo electrónico a
   legal@outbrain.com, ya que investigaremos casos de posible fraude en
   Internet.
   Transferencias de datos fuera de la UE/EEE
   Cuando transferimos datos personales desde el Espacio Económico Europeo
   a otros países en los que las leyes aplicables no ofrecen el mismo
   nivel de protección de la privacidad de los datos que en el territorio
   europeo, adoptamos medidas para proporcionar un nivel adecuado de
   protección de los datos. En otras palabras, tus derechos y niveles de
   protección se mantienen con tus datos. Por ejemplo, utilizamos
   cláusulas contractuales aprobadas y otras medidas diseñadas para
   asegurar que los destinatarios de tus datos personales los protejan.
   Intercambio
   Además de la descripción de cómo podemos revelar tus datos personales
   en función de cada tipo de usuario, también podemos revelar datos
   personales de la siguiente manera:
     * Dentro de la familia de empresas controladas por Outbrain por
       razones internas, principalmente con fines comerciales y
       operativos.

     * Si pasamos por una transición de negocios, como una fusión,
       adquisición por otra compañía o venta de todos o parte de nuestros
       activos, es probable que tus datos personales se encuentren entre
       los activos transferidos.

     * Cuando la ley así lo requiera (por ejemplo, para cooperar con
       investigaciones de las fuerzas del orden u otros procedimientos
       legales).

     * Para responder a una verdadera emergencia.

   Además, combinamos tus datos personales con los de otros usuarios para
   compartir información de tendencias y agregar estadísticas de usuarios
   con terceros, siempre de forma agregada y anónima.
   Retención de datos
   El período de retención para cada una de las cookies que utiliza
   Outbrain (ya sea por su cuenta o en nuestro nombre por parte de
   terceros) se indica en la Tabla de cookies.
   Outbrain también mantiene una Política de Retención de Datos que
   detalla el período de retención de datos personales sobre la base de
   nuestro análisis sobre cuánto tiempo es necesario retener
   razonablemente los datos específicos para fines legales o comerciales.
   Cuando ya no necesitamos datos personales, los borraremos o
   destruiremos de forma segura. Los datos agregados, que no puedan
   identificar un dispositivo/navegador (o a una persona) y se utilicen
   con fines de información y análisis, se mantendrán durante el tiempo
   que sea necesario desde el punto de vista comercial.
   4. Niños

                                      +

   Ninguno de nuestros servicios está dirigido a niños menores de 16 años.
   No recopilamos de manera consciente datos personales de ninguna persona
   menor de 16 años de edad. Si en el momento de la recopilación
   determinamos que un Visitante del sitio, un Usuario o un Socio
   comercial es menor de 16 años, no utilizaremos ni mantendremos tus
   datos personales. Si tenemos constancia de que sin saberlo hemos
   recopilado datos personales de un menor de 16 años, haremos todos los
   esfuerzos razonables para eliminar dicha información de nuestros
   registros. ¡Si eres un niño, ve a jugar al patio, no uses ni
   interactúes con Outbrain!
   5. Ciudadanos del territorio europeo

                                      +

   En cumplimiento de la legislación europea en materia de privacidad, en
   particular el Reglamento General de Protección de Datos de la Unión
   Europea (RGPD), Outbrain proporciona derechos adicionales específicos a
   los ciudadanos del territorio europeo, tales como el derecho de acceso,
   rectificación, oposición, reclamación, supresión y bloqueo. En
   concreto:
     * El derecho a solicitar información sobre si nosotros tratamos tus
       datos personales y, en caso afirmativo, qué datos personales son
       tratados, y el derecho a exigir que los datos personales sean
       rectificados o modificados.
     * En determinadas circunstancias, el derecho a solicitar la supresión
       de los datos personales.
     * En determinadas circunstancias, el derecho a exigir que se
       restrinja el tratamiento de datos personales.
     * El derecho a retirar tu consentimiento para el tratamiento y uso de
       sus datos total o parcialmente en cualquier momento a través de una
       solicitud en el futuro.
     * El derecho a obtener tus datos personales en un formato común,
       estructurado y legible mecánicamente.
     * El derecho a ponerte en contacto con nuestro responsable de
       protección de datos si tienes alguna pregunta, comentario,
       reclamación o solicitud en relación con nuestra declaración sobre
       la protección de datos y el tratamiento de tus datos personales.
     * El derecho a presentar una reclamación ante la autoridad
       supervisora responsable si crees que el tratamiento de tus datos
       personales infringe la legislación.

   Envía un correo electrónico a privacyquestions@outbrain.com con
   cualquier pregunta sobre el ejercicio de cualquiera de los derechos
   anteriores.
   Además de lo anterior, hacemos referencia a ciertos derechos de los
   ciudadanos del territorio europeo a través de la presente Política de
   Privacidad. De conformidad con el RGPD, por ciudadanos del «territorio
   europeo» se entenderán los ciudadanos del Espacio Económico Europeo
   (EEE) y Suiza. A los efectos de la presente Política de privacidad, el
   término «territorio europeo» seguirá incluyendo al Reino Unido, incluso
   después de que el Reino Unido abandone el Espacio Económico Europeo
   tras el Brexit.
   6. Derechos de Privacidad de California

                                      +

   En virtud de los artículos 1798.83-1798.84 del Código Civil de
   California, los residentes de California tienen derecho a solicitarnos
   un aviso que describa las categorías de información personal que
   compartimos con terceros o filiales corporativas para los propósitos de
   marketing directo de dichos terceros o filiales corporativas. Ese aviso
   identificará las categorías de información compartida e incluirá una
   lista de los terceros y filiales con los que se compartió, junto con
   tus nombres y direcciones. Si eres residente de California y deseas una
   copia de este aviso, por favor envía una solicitud por escrito a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com o envíala a la siguiente dirección:
   Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, Nueva York, NY 10011.
   Por favor, espera 30 días para recibir una respuesta.
   7. Declaración de «no rastreo» (Do Not Track)

                                      +

   Algunos navegadores transmiten señales de «no rastreo» (DNT, por sus
   siglas en inglés) a webs. Debido a que no existe una idea común de cómo
   interpretar la señal DNT, Outbrain no altera, cambia ni responde
   actualmente a las peticiones o señales DNT de estos navegadores.
   Seguiremos supervisando la actividad del sector en esta área y
   volveremos a evaluar nuestras prácticas de DNT según sea necesario.
   Mientras tanto, puedes utilizar el resto de las herramientas que
   ofrecemos para controlar la recopilación y el uso de datos, incluida la
   posibilidad de inhabilitar las recomendaciones personalizadas en el
   apartado «Usuarios».
   8. Cómo puede cambiar esta Política de privacidad

                                      +

   Podemos cambiar esta Política de privacidad cada cierto tiempo.
   Colocaremos un aviso que podrás ver claramente como Visitante del Sitio
   o Socio comercial, pero no disponemos de ningún medio para avisar a los
   Usuarios de las actualizaciones. Deberás comprobar, periódicamente, si
   se ha actualizado la Política de privacidad. Siempre mostraremos la
   fecha de la última modificación de la Política de privacidad en la
   parte superior de la página para que puedas saber cuándo se revisó por
   última vez.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                      Dernière mise à jour : 23 mai 2018

   Outbrain s’engage à protéger vos données personnelles. Cette politique
   de confidentialité (la « Politique de confidentialité ») régit
   l’utilisation des données collectées par Outbrain, notamment les
   données personnelles, quelles qu’elles soient. Par données
   personnelles, nous entendons les informations qui vous concernent et
   permettent éventuellement de vous identifier. Nous utilisons vos
   données personnelles conformément aux lois en vigueur. Afin de garantir
   la conformité et de nous aligner sur les valeurs d’Outbrain en matière
   de confiance et de transparence, nous disposons d’une équipe de «
   privacy champions » chargée de mettre en œuvre en continu notre
   programme mondial de respect de la vie privée.

                                                        + DÉVELOPPER TOUT

   1. Qui sommes-nous, que faisons-nous, comment contacter Outbrain, notre
   DPO ou les autorités compétentes

                                      +

   Qui sommes-nous ?
   Outbrain fait référence à Outbrain Inc., une société du Delaware
   (États-Unis) dont le siège se trouve à New York, et à ses succursales
   affiliées (collectivement désignées par les termes « Outbrain », ou «
   nous », « notre », « nos »). Nous exerçons nos activités à partir de 12
   bureaux internationaux et travaillons en partenariat avec des éditeurs
   et des annonceurs dans le monde entier.
   Que faisons-nous ?
   La mission d’Outbrain est de proposer des recommandations intéressantes
   et pertinentes aux utilisateurs en fonction de leurs centres d’intérêt.
   Pour remplir cette mission, nous concluons des accords avec :
     * des éditeurs en ligne et des partenaires qui souhaitent recommander
       des contenus pertinents à leurs utilisateurs (il s’agit d’Outbrain
       Engage) ; et

     * des annonceurs qui souhaitent que les utilisateurs visualisent
       leurs contenus (il s’agit d’Outbrain Amplify).

   Comment nous contacter ?
   Les questions, commentaires et demandes concernant cette Politique de
   confidentialité sont les bienvenus. Ils doivent être adressés à
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou par courrier à Outbrain Inc., 39 West
   13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, USA, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Si Outbrain ne répond pas de manière satisfaisante à vos questions ou
   inquiétudes, vous pouvez également contacter, pour des conseils, une
   assistance ou des réclamations :
     * le DPO ou délégué à la protection des données externe d’Outbrain :
       ePrivacy GmbH, représenté par Christoph Bauer. ePrivacy GmbH peut
       être contacté directement à l’adresse suivante privacy@eprivacy.eu
       ; et/ou
     * l’Information Commissioner’s Officer, le service de supervision
       principal d’Outbrain pour les pays européens.

   Les organismes d’autorégulation
   Outbrain adhère aux principes d’autorégulation définis par la Digital
   Advertising Alliance (DAA) et l’European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Nous sommes membres de plein droit de la
   Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), une association dédiée à une
   collecte et une utilisation responsable des données à des fins de
   publicité numérique. Nous adhérons au code de bonne conduite de la NAI
   pour le Web et les appareils mobiles. Outbrain adhère également aux
   principes d’autorégulation de l’Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB)
   pour la publicité comportementale en ligne et à l’OBA Framework de
   l’IAB Europe.
   2. Types d’utilisateurs Outbrain (et gestion d'exclusion "opt-out")

                                      +

   La majeure partie de cette Politique de confidentialité est divisée en
   sections basées sur la manière dont vous interagissez avec Outbrain.
   Veuillez déterminer quel type d’utilisateur vous êtes. Pour chaque type
   d’utilisateur, nous détaillons quelles informations nous collectons et
   pourquoi, quels témoins de connexion ou « cookies » et autres
   technologies similaires nous utilisons, comment nous partageons ces
   informations, et vos droits.
   Visiteurs du site: Vous êtes un Visiteur du site quand vous consultez
   et interagissez avec nos sites et pages Web, nos fonctionnalités
   interactives, nos blogs et leurs contenus sur Outbrain.com (ou tout
   autre site dérivé comme Outbrain.co.uk ; Outbrain.fr ; outbrain.de
   etc.) et MyOutbrain.com (« Nos Sites »). Voir plus ici.
   (a) Quelles informations collectons-nous et pourquoi ?
   Nous souhaitons comprendre quels services sur nos Sites vous
   intéressent et vous rappeler les services que nous proposons quand vous
   n’êtes pas sur nos Sites. Pour ce faire, nous collectons auprès de vous
   les informations suivantes : (i) l’adresse IP; (ii) les données agent
   utilisateur : le type d’appareil (ex : iPhone), le type de navigateur
   (ex : Chrome), le système d’exploitation (ex : iOS) ; (iii) les pages
   visitées sur notre Site (ex : la page « À propos » d’Outbrain ») ; (iv)
   l’heure de visite (et le fuseau horaire correspondant) ; et (v) les URL
   correspondantes et autres informations normalement transmises dans les
   requêtes HTTP (par exemple ces informations nous indiquent comment vous
   êtes arrivé sur nos Sites).
   (b) Quels cookies et autres technologies similaires utilisons-nous ?
   Veuillez consulter la Table des cookies sous « Visiteurs du site » pour
   une liste détaillée des cookies (et leurs durées de conservation
   associées) que nous utilisons quand vous visitez nos Sites.
   (c) Comment sommes-nous susceptibles de partager les informations ?
     * Le partage des informations que nous obtenons sur vous sur nos
       Sites.

   De manière générale, nous ne partageons pas les données personnelles
   vous concernant avec des tiers à des fins de marketing ou de publicité.
   Toutefois, nous faisons appel à divers tiers (chacun d’entre eux étant
   listé dans la Table de cookies) pour nous aider dans nos démarches
   commerciales et publicitaires envers vous. Certains des cookies que
   nous utilisons sur nos Sites appartiennent ainsi à des tiers qui
   aideront Outbrain à vous proposer des services ou des publicités. Nous
   demandons à ces tiers et entreprises d’accepter de préserver la
   confidentialité de toutes les informations que nous partageons avec eux
   et de ne les utiliser que pour remplir leurs obligations envers nous.
   Pour ce faire, nous concluons des accords avec tous les tiers qui
   traitent les données personnelles en notre nom afin de garantir qu’ils
   le font en conformité avec nos instructions rigoureuses et toutes les
   lois de protection des données applicables. Si vous publiez un post sur
   notre blog, vos commentaires et informations seront disponibles
   publiquement. Veuillez contacter support@outbrain.com pour supprimer
   vos commentaires.
     * Utilisation de services de tiers sur nos Sites.

   Nos Sites contiennent des liens vers d’autres sites Web dont nous ne
   sommes ni propriétaires, ni opérateurs. Nous ne contrôlons, ne
   recommandons et ne cautionnons pas le contenu, les produits, les
   services, les politiques de confidentialité ou les pratiques de ces
   sites Web tiers. Vous noterez par exemple sur nos Sites la présence
   d’icônes que vous pouvez cliquer pour accéder à la page Facebook ou
   LinkedIn d’Outbrain. Si vous choisissez de cliquer sur ces liens, vous
   devez savoir que Facebook et LinkedIn peuvent déposer leurs propres
   cookies sur votre appareil et collecter indépendamment des données
   personnelles. Il est donc important que vous lisiez les politiques de
   confidentialité de Facebook et/ou de LinkedIn.
     * Veuillez aussi consulter la section Partage de la présente
       Politique de confidentialité.

   (d) Vos droits
   Les Conditions d’utilisation sur notre Site régissent l’utilisation de
   notre Site et s’appliquent également à vous. Vous pouvez cesser
   d’utiliser notre Site à tout moment. Dans ce cas, vous souhaiterez
   peut-être aussi supprimer tout cookie placé sur les appareils, quels
   qu’ils soient, utilisés pour accéder à notre Site. Si, en cours
   d’utilisation de nos Sites vous avez fourni une adresse e-mail, chaque
   e-mail que vous recevez de la part d’Outbrain comporte une option de
   désabonnement (« unsubscribe »).
   Pour les visiteurs provenant des pays Européens, Outbrain a installé
   sur ses sites une CMP - plateforme de gestion du consentement - opérée
   par One Trust, qui donne aux utilisateurs la possibilité de consentir,
   ou non, à la dépose de cookies et autres technologies de ciblage. En
   accédant à nos sites, vous verrez une bannière située en bas de page
   donnant des informations sur les cookies que nous utilisons. Vous
   pouvez cliquer sur cette bannière pour supprimer les cookies, à
   l’exception de ceux strictement nécessaires. Le fait de cliquer sur
   “Accept” dans la bannière, de poursuivre votre navigation ou de cliquer
   dans un lien sur nos sites est une indication de votre consentement.
   Utilisateurs: Vous êtes un Utilisateur si vous visitez la page d’un
   site ou une application d’un des partenaires d’Outbrain sur laquelle
   est installée le widget Outbrain (les « Sites de partenaires »). Si
   vous vous rendez par exemple sur https://news.sky.com/uk,
   www.spiegel.de ou www.cnn.com, le widget Outbrain est installé sur ces
   sites Web. Les mentions référençant Outbrain (ex : « Recommandé par
   Outbrain », « by Outbrain » à côté des recommandations) vous indiquent
   la présence d’un widget Outbrain. Si vous cliquez sur le lien de la
   référence Outbrain, vous visualiserez une notification détaillée qui
   vous permettra de vous rendre sur le Portail des Centres d’Intérêt
   Outbrain, qui vous donne une vision globale des types de catégories de
   données que nous pouvons utiliser pour faire les recommandations. Ce
   portail vous donne également la possibilité d’opter pour une demande
   d’exclusion des recommandations personnalisées (« opt-out »). Voir plus
   ici.
   Exemple de widget Outbrain
   [SJ4v1w7y7.png]
   (a) Quelles informations collectons-nous et pourquoi ?
   Nous utilisons les UUID, l’adresse IP et autres informations d’usage
   afin de proposer des recommandations intéressantes aux utilisateurs.
   Les recommandations d’Outbrain peuvent être payées par un annonceur
   pour vous mettre en relation avec un nouveau site Web. Elles peuvent
   également être organiques avec un lien vers une autre page du site Web
   du même éditeur.
     * UUID.

   Quand vous consultez un Site de Partenaire (ex : CNN.com) en tant
   qu’Utilisateur pour la première fois, Outbrain dépose un cookie sur
   votre appareil afin de générer un UUID (identifiant utilisateur
   unique). Nous cataloguons et analysons le contenu que vous parcourez
   sur les Sites de Partenaires. Nos recommandations se basent sur : (i)
   l’historique de navigation ; (ii) les profils de consommation
   similaires d’autres Utilisateurs ; (ii) les recommandations
   généralement populaires auprès des utilisateurs d’Outbrain ; (iv)
   quelques données aléatoires, et (v) les exigences de ciblage
   éventuellement fournies ou demandées par nos clients Amplify. À titre
   d’exemple, Outbrain peut savoir que l’UUID 123 (cela pourrait être vous
   sur votre iPhone X lisant le Guardian en utilisant Chrome comme
   navigateur) aime lire des articles sur les voyages et que les personnes
   qui aiment lire ce type d’article aiment aussi les contenus sur la
   nourriture exotique.
   L’UUID est une séquence de chiffres et/ou de lettres. Cet UUID est
   associé à votre appareil et varie en fonction du navigateur que vous
   utilisez. Autrement dit, Outbrain enregistre un UUID différent selon le
   navigateur et/ou appareil que vous utilisez pour accéder aux Sites de
   Partenaires. Ceci signifie que vous aurez par exemple un UUID quand
   vous consultez un Site de Partenaire depuis votre téléphone portable
   avec le navigateur Safari et un autre UUID pour la consultation d’un
   Site de Partenaire depuis votre iPad avec le navigateur Safari.
   Outbrain va combiner et consolider l’UUID depuis un appareil mobile
   (portatif ou tablette) et un navigateur qui accède ensuite à
   l’application (ou vice versa) à partir du même appareil.
   L’affectation d’un UUID permet à Outbrain d’associer les pages vues et
   les clics sur les recommandations d’Outbrain à partir de cet UUID, avec
   pour objectif de vous proposer des recommandations intéressantes et
   pertinentes en fonction de vos centres d’intérêt.
     * Adresse IP et autres informations d’usage.

   Nous recueillons l’UUID comme expliqué précédemment, nous collectons
   également les informations suivantes : (i) l’adresse IP (puis rendus
   anonymes selon les normes de l'industrie); ; (ii) les données agent
   utilisateur : le type d’appareil (ex : iPhone) ; le type de navigateur
   (ex : Chrome), le système d’exploitation (ex : iOS) ; (iii) les pages
   visitées ; (iv) l’heure de visite ; et (v) les URL correspondantes et
   autres informations normalement transmises dans les requêtes HTTP.
   Les informations statistiques ci-dessus nous donnent des informations
   sur le nombre d’Utilisateurs consultant une page spécifique sur les
   Sites de Partenaires sur lesquels le widget Outbrain est installé, le
   temps que chaque Utilisateur a passé sur cette page, le type de contenu
   sur lequel ils ont cliqué et la manière générale dont ils ont interagi
   avec cette page. Ces informations ne constituent des informations
   personnelles que quand elles sont associées à un UUID.
   (b) Quels cookies et autres technologies similaires utilisons-nous ?
   Veuillez consulter la Table des cookies sous « Utilisateurs » pour une
   liste détaillée des cookies propriétaires que nous utilisons quand vous
   interagissez avec des Sites de Partenaires où la technologie Outbrain
   est mise en œuvre.
   Si vous cliquez sur le lien d’une de nos recommandations, l’annonceur
   Amplify qui sponsorise la recommandation est susceptible de placer des
   cookies sur votre appareil lors de la redirection avant d’arriver sur
   la page de destination ou en atteignant la page de destination. Dans de
   tels cas, vous serez soumis à la politique de confidentialité de
   l’annonceur.
   En complément du widget visible d’Outbrain sur nos Sites de
   Partenaires, certains annonceurs Outbrain peuvent installer le pixel
   Outbrain sur leurs sites Web. Le pixel Outbrain détermine si
   l’utilisateur qui atteint la page où le pixel est installé a un UUID
   Outbrain. S’il existe un UUID associé avec un utilisateur final,
   Outbrain permet aux annonceurs de recibler ces UUID et/ou leur donne le
   nombre total d’UUID ayant atteint cette page. S’il n’existe pas d’UUID
   Outbrain sur la page, le pixel Outbrain ne collecte aucune information
   sur l’utilisateur.
   Nous encourageons les annonceurs à divulguer l’utilisation du pixel
   Outbrain sur leurs propres sites Web. Outbrain ne combine aucune
   information pixel avec le profil d’un UUID.
   Les indicateurs sur la visualisation des pages ou les clics reliés à un
   UUID en particulier sont conservés pour une durée de 13 mois. Par
   exemple, si l’UUID 123 lit un article le 31 décembre 2017, cet article
   ne fera plus partie du profil de l’UUID 123 le 1 ^er février 2018.
   (c) Comment sommes-nous susceptibles de partager les informations ?
   Outbrain ne partage pas de profils d’Utilisateurs avec des tiers, quels
   qu’ils soient. Cependant, nous sommes susceptibles de partager l’UUID
   avec certains partenaires à des fins de synchronisation des cookies ou
   en raison d’exigences techniques. Veuillez également consulter la
   section Partage de la présente Politique de confidentialité.
   (d) Vos droits
   Demande d’exclusion (« opt-out ») d’Outbrain. Vous pouvez demander
   votre exclusion des recommandations personnalisées à tout moment.
   Veuillez consulter également le Profil d’intérêts d’Outbrain pour une
   vue générale des données qu’Outbrain connaît à votre sujet et peut
   utiliser pour faire ses recommandations. Le Profil d’intérêts vous
   donne également la possibilité d’ opter pour une exclusion des
   recommandations personnalisées (vous pouvez également demander une
   exclusion (“opt-out”) en cliquant ici). Veuillez noter que cette
   demande d’exclusion pour les navigateurs se fait par le Profil
   d’intérêts d’Outbrain, mais qu’elle se fait via les paramètres de votre
   appareil pour les applications (vous trouverez des exemples d’étapes à
   suivre dans le Profil d’intérêts).
   REMARQUE IMPORTANTE – même si vous avez opté pour une exclusion
   d’Outbrain,
     * vous continuerez à voir des recommandations Outbrain. Le fait de
       demander votre exclusion du suivi personnalisé d’Outbrain ne
       signifie pas que vous cesserez de recevoir des recommandations
       d’Outbrain. Cela signifie que les recommandations d’Outbrain ne
       seront pas personnalisées. Les recommandations continueront à
       utiliser les informations sur la page que vous êtes en train de
       parcourir (c.-à-d. les informations contextuelles) pour vous
       proposer des recommandations sur cette page.

     * L’exclusion de recommandations personnalisées est fondée sur les
       cookies et spécifique à un appareil/navigateur. Si vous naviguez
       sur Internet depuis plusieurs appareils et/ou navigateurs, vous
       devrez demander l’exclusion pour chaque appareil et/ou navigateur
       pour garantir que nous empêchons un suivi de personnalisation sur
       tous. Pour la même raison, si vous achetez un nouvel appareil,
       changez de navigateurs ou supprimez (ou effacez) le cookie
       d’exclusion, vous devrez procéder de nouveau à votre demande
       d’exclusion. Demander l’exclusion du suivi de personnalisation
       n’est pas la même chose que bloquer les cookies.

     * Pour garantir la suppression du profil lié à votre UUID, ne
       procédez pas à l’opération inverse (demande d’inclusion ou « opt-in
       » d’Outbrain) pendant au moins 21 jours. Votre demande d’exclusion
       des recommandations personnalisées d’Outbrain prend effet
       immédiatement. Cependant, si votre navigateur autorise un stockage
       local, et si vous demandez votre inclusion des recommandations
       personnalisées dans les 21 jours suivant votre demande d’exclusion,
       il est possible que votre profil antérieur soit reconnecté à votre
       UUID. Si vous ne procédez pas à une nouvelle demande d’inclusion
       dans les 21 jours, votre profil sera supprimé et ne pourra pas être
       récupéré.

     * Comme pour la plupart des cookies opt-out, le processus d’opt-out
       Outbrain sur navigateur s'appuie sur un cookie. Le cookie opt-out
       est destiné à être persistant afin d'honorer les préférences de
       l'utilisateur. Cependant, la fonction "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention" pour IPhone de l'iOS11 peut avoir un impact sur la
       persistance des cookies sur les sites Web qui affichent une fenêtre
       de 24 heures. Nous vous suggérons d'utiliser un autre navigateur ou
       d'envisager de bloquer tous les cookies d'une tierce partie du
       navigateur afin que vous soyez « désactivés » sans avoir besoin de
       vous fier à la méthode d'exclusion d’autres entreprises.

     * Options complémentaires d’exclusion. Vous pouvez également demander
       votre exclusion de la réception de publicités personnalisées de
       notre part ou de celle d’autres sociétés publicitaires à l’aide
       d’outils fournis par l’industrie comme la NAI ou des pages basées
       sur la DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices ; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices, et/ou EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
       En vous rendant sur les pages dédiées à la gestion des préférences
       consommateur de la NAI, la DAA, la DACC (Alliance de la publicité
       numérique du Canada) ou de l’EDAA, vous pourrez refuser tout ou
       partie des services de leurs membres. Comme dans le cas de
       l’exclusion pour Outbrain, ces retraits ne signifient pas que vous
       ne recevrez plus aucune publicité, mais les publicités que vous
       recevrez ne seront plus personnalisées. Vous êtes susceptible de
       continuer à recevoir des publicités, par exemple basées sur le site
       Web en particulier que vous êtes en train de consulter (c.-à-d. des
       publicités liées au contexte). Par ailleurs, si vos navigateurs
       sont configurés pour rejeter les cookies quand vous visitez les
       pages du consommateur de la DAA, de la DAAC ou de l’EDAA, votre
       exclusion (ou retrait) peut ne pas être effective.

     * Base juridique. La base juridique d’Outbrain pour le traitement des
       données personnelles d’un Utilisateur se fonde sur la base
       juridique déterminée par chacun des Sites de Partenaires. Chaque
       Site de Partenaire s’appuiera sur le consentement ou l’intérêt
       légitime. Veuillez consulter la politique de confidentialité
       applicable des Sites de Partenaires pour plus d’informations sur
       leurs bases juridiques. Si un Partenaire s’appuie sur le
       consentement, Outbrain ne déposera pas de cookie sur votre appareil
       si vous n’avez pas donné votre consentement sur le Site de
       Partenaire concerné.

   Partenaires commerciaux: Vous êtes un Partenaire commercial si vous
   vous inscrivez (ou échangez des e-mails avec Outbrain) au nom de la
   société dans laquelle vous travaillez pour l’utilisation des services
   Outbrain Amplify ou Outbrain Engage. Voir plus ici.
   (a) Quelles informations collectons-nous et pourquoi ?
   Vous êtes susceptible de fournir certaines données personnelles (par
   exemple une adresse e-mail) quand vous signez pour des services Amplify
   ou Engage, ou communiquez ou interagissez avec nous d’une autre
   manière. Si vous demandez à devenir Partenaire, nous sommes
   susceptibles de vous demander des informations complémentaires sous
   forme de formulaires de candidature annonceur, d’ordres d’insertion ou
   autres. Nous collectons automatiquement les informations sur vos
   actions liées à votre nom d’utilisateur dans le tableau de bord
   Outbrain. Par exemple, si vous changez, en tant que Partenaire Amplify,
   le coût-par-clic d’une de vos campagnes, la piste d’audit d’Outbrain
   gardera un enregistrement de toutes ces actions.
   Nous collectons et traitons les données personnelles ci-dessus afin de
   remplir nos obligations au titre de notre accord avec un Partenaire (ou
   Partenaire potentiel), notamment pour :
     * Répondre à vos questions et demandes.

     * Donner accès à certaines fonctions et fonctionnalités de nos
       services Amplify et Engage (par exemple pour fournir et tenir à
       jour le compte de votre tableau de bord).

     * Vérifier votre identité.

     * Communiquer avec vous sur votre compte, nos produits et les
       promotions disponibles compte tenu de votre utilisation du service
       Amplify ou Engage.

   (b) Quels cookies et autres technologies similaires utilisons-nous ?
   Veuillez consulter la Table des cookies sous « Partenaires commerciaux
   » pour une liste détaillée des cookies (et de leurs périodes de
   conservation associées) que nous utilisons avec les Partenaires.
   (c) Comment sommes-nous susceptibles de partager les informations ?
   Nous sommes susceptibles de divulguer certaines informations de
   Partenaires aux prestataires, sous-traitants ou autres, contribuant à
   la prestation des services Outbrain (ex : traitement des cartes de
   crédit). Veuillez aussi consulter la section Partage de la présente
   Politique de confidentialité.
   (d) Vos droits
   Si, en tant que Partenaire, vous souhaitez vérifier, corriger, mettre à
   jour ou demander la désactivation de vos informations, rendez-vous sur
   le tableau de bord Outbrain pour modifier vos préférences de profil ou
   contactez-nous à l’adresse support@outbrain.com. Si vous recevez des
   e-mails Outbrain, vous pouvez vous « désabonner » en utilisant le lien
   présent dans chaque e-mail. Veuillez noter que le désabonnement ne vous
   exclura pas de recevoir des notifications considérées comme critiques
   dans la fourniture de services Amplify ou Engage (ex : factures par
   e-mail).
   La base juridique du traitement des données personnelles de nos
   Partenaires commerciaux est l’intérêt légitime.
   3. Comment sécurisons-nous les informations ; les transferts en dehors
   de l’EEE ; le partage et les durées de conservation

                                      +

   Sécurité
   Outbrain dispose d’une équipe de sécurité dédiée. Nous mettons en œuvre
   des contrôles stricts sur les données que nous collectons, en les
   conservant dans des bases de données sécurisées et protégées par des
   pare-feu avec des droits d’accès contrôlés et limités afin de garantir
   leur sécurité. Veuillez consulter nos normes de sécurité pour de plus
   amples informations.
   Les Partenaires commerciaux ont un accès protégé par mot de passe à
   certaines fonctionnalités du service Amplify ou Engage. Ils ont la
   responsabilité de préserver la confidentialité de ce mot de passe. Il
   est néanmoins nécessaire de rappeler que la transmission d’informations
   par Internet n’est malheureusement pas complètement sécurisée. Une des
   fraudes classiques sur Internet est connue sous le nom d’usurpation
   d’identité électronique (« spoofing ») ou hameçonnage (« phishing »).
   Ceci se produit quand vous recevez un e-mail d’une source apparemment
   légitime vous demandant de lui fournir des données personnelles. Sachez
   que nous ne vous enverrons aucun e-mail vous demandant de vérifier un
   numéro de carte de crédit, des informations bancaires ou toutes autres
   données personnelles. S’il vous arrivait de recevoir un e-mail
   apparemment de notre part et vous demandant de nous fournir de telles
   informations, n’y répondez pas et ne cliquez sur aucun lien
   apparaissant dans ce message électronique. Veuillez plutôt nous
   transférer l’e-mail à l’adresse legal@outbrain.com, et nous mènerons
   des enquêtes sur d’éventuelles fraudes sur Internet.
   Transferts des données en dehors de l’UE/EEE
   Lorsque nous transférons des données personnelles de l’Espace
   économique européen vers d’autres pays dans lesquels les lois
   applicables n’offrent pas le même niveau de protection de
   confidentialité des données que les pays européens, nous prenons des
   mesures pour fournir un niveau approprié de protection de la
   confidentialité des données. En d’autres termes, vos droits et
   protections perdurent avec vos données. Nous utilisons par exemple des
   clauses contractuelles approuvées et d’autres mesures conçues pour
   garantir que les destinataires de vos données personnelles les
   protègent.
   Partage
   En complément de la description de la manière dont nous sommes
   susceptibles de divulguer vos données personnelles pour chaque type
   d’utilisateur, nous pouvons également divulguer les données
   personnelles comme suit :
     * Au sein de la famille des sociétés contrôlées par Outbrain pour des
       raisons internes, particulièrement pour des objectifs liés aux
       activités et au fonctionnement de l’entreprise ;

     * Si nous faisons face à une évolution de notre entreprise, comme une
       fusion, l’acquisition d’une autre société, ou la vente de tout ou
       partie de nos actifs, vos données personnelles sont susceptibles de
       faire partie des actifs transférés ;

     * En cas d’exigences légales le demandant (par exemple pour coopérer
       dans le cadre d’investigations sur la mise en application de la
       législation ou autres procédures légales) ; et/ou

     * Pour répondre à une urgence qualifiée.

   Par ailleurs, nous combinons vos données personnelles avec celles
   d’autres utilisateurs afin de partager des informations sur les
   tendances et agréger des statistiques d’utilisation avec des tiers,
   toujours sous forme agrégée et anonyme.
   Conservation des données
   La période de conservation pour chacun des cookies qu’Outbrain utilise
   (les siens propres ou au nom de tiers) est définie dans la Table des
   cookies.
   Outbrain tient également à jour une Politique de conservation des
   données qui détaille la période de conservation pour les données
   personnelles sur la base de notre analyse de la durée raisonnable de
   conservation nécessaire de données particulières pour des raisons
   légales ou opérationnelles. Quand nous n’avons plus besoin des données
   personnelles, nous les effaçons ou les supprimons de manière sécurisée.
   Les données agrégées, qui ne permettent pas d’identifier un
   appareil/navigateur (ou un individu) et sont utilisées pour des
   objectifs de reporting et d’analyse, sont conservées aussi longtemps
   que commercialement nécessaire.
   4. Enfants

                                      +

   Aucun de nos services n’est destiné à des enfants de moins de 16 ans.
   Nous ne recueillons pas sciemment de données personnelles auprès
   d’enfants âgés de moins de 16 ans. Si nous réalisons en cours de
   collecte qu’un Visiteur du site, un Utilisateur ou un Partenaire
   commercial a moins de 16 ans, nous n’utiliserons ni ne conserverons ses
   données personnelles. Si nous réalisons que nous avons involontairement
   collecté des données personnelles auprès d’un enfant de moins de 16
   ans, nous prendrons alors les mesures raisonnables pour supprimer ces
   informations de nos registres.
   5. Citoyens européens

                                      +

   Conformément aux lois européennes sur le respect de la vie privée, en
   particulier le Règlement général sur la protection des données (RGPD),
   Outbrain octroie des droits particuliers complémentaires aux citoyens
   des pays européens, comme le droit d’accès aux données, le droit de
   rectification, le droit d’opposition, le droit de porter réclamation,
   le droit à l’effacement et le droit de blocage. Plus spécifiquement :
     * Le droit de demander des informations sur l’utilisation ou non que
       nous faisons de données personnelles, et si oui, lesquelles, et le
       droit de demander la rectification ou la modification de ces
       données personnelles.
     * Dans certaines conditions, le droit de demander la suppression de
       données personnelles.
     * Dans certaines conditions, le droit de demander la limitation du
       traitement des données personnelles.
     * Le droit de retirer votre consentement à l’utilisation et au
       traitement de vos données, intégralement ou partiellement, à tout
       moment, avec effet futur.
     * Le droit d’obtenir vos données personnelles dans un format
       compréhensible, structuré et lisible.
     * La possibilité de contacter le délégué à la protection des données
       (« DPO ») pour toute question, commentaire, réclamation ou demande
       en lien avec notre déclaration sur la protection des données et le
       traitement de vos données personnelles.
     * Le droit de vous plaindre auprès de l’autorité de contrôle si vous
       êtes persuadé que le traitement de vos données personnelles
       constitue une violation de la législation.

   En complément des droits ci-dessus, nous référençons certains droits
   pour les citoyens des pays européens dans cette Politique de
   confidentialité. Conformément au RGPD, nous entendons par citoyens des
   « pays européens » les citoyens de l’Espace économique européen (EEE)
   et de la Suisse. Aux fins de cette Politique de confidentialité, le
   terme « pays européens » continuera d’inclure le Royaume-Uni, même
   après son départ de l’Espace économique européen suite au Brexit.
   Merci d’envoyer un mail à privacyquestions@outbrain.com pour toutes
   questions relatives à l’exercice des droits mentionnés ci-dessus.
   6. Droits au respect de la vie privée en Californie

                                      +

   Conformément au Code civil de Californie, articles 1798.83-1798.84, les
   résidents californiens ont le droit de nous demander une note décrivant
   les catégories d’informations personnelles que nous partageons avec des
   tiers et sociétés affiliées à des fins de marketing direct desdits
   tiers ou sociétés. Cette note indiquera les catégories d’informations
   partagées et inclura la liste des tiers et sociétés affiliées avec
   lesquels nous les partageons, avec leur nom et adresse. Si vous résidez
   en Californie et souhaitez une copie de cette note, veuillez en faire
   la demande par écrit à PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou l’envoyer à
   l’adresse suivante : Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New
   York, NY 10011, USA. Veuillez nous accorder 30 jours pour vous
   répondre.
   7. Dispositions « Do Not Track » (non-traçage)

                                      +

   Certains navigateurs transmettent des signaux refusant le traçage de
   données (« do not track ») aux sites Web. Outbrain ne procède
   actuellement à aucune altération, modification ou réponse aux demandes
   ou signaux de non-traçage de ces navigateurs car il n’existe pas de
   compréhension commune sur la manière d’interpréter les signaux de
   non-traçage. Nous continuerons de suivre l’activité du secteur dans ce
   domaine et réévaluerons nos pratiques de non-traçage si nécessaire. En
   attendant, vous pouvez utiliser la gamme d’autres outils que nous vous
   proposons pour contrôler la collecte et l’utilisation des données,
   notamment la possibilité de demander l’exclusion de la réception de
   recommandations personnalisées (« opt-out ») dans la section
   Utilisateurs.
   8. Les modifications qui pourraient être apportées à cette Politique de
   confidentialité

                                      +

   Nous sommes susceptibles de modifier cette Politique de confidentialité
   de manière ponctuelle. Nous afficherons clairement une notification que
   vous pourrez voir en tant que Visiteur du site ou Partenaire
   commercial, mais nous n’avons pas de moyen d’informer les Utilisateurs
   d’une mise à jour. Nous vous conseillons de régulièrement vérifier ici
   si la Politique de confidentialité a été mise à jour. Nous indiquerons
   toujours la date de dernière modification de la Politique de
   confidentialité en haut de la page afin que vous puissiez savoir quand
   elle a été révisée pour la dernière fois.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                      Ultimo aggiornamento: 23 maggio 2018

   Outbrain si impegna a proteggere i tuoi dati personali. La presente
   politica sulla privacy (“Politica sulla privacy ”) disciplina
   l'utilizzo da parte di Outbrain dei dati raccolti da noi, ivi inclusi
   tutti i dati personali. I dati personali sono informazioni che si
   riferiscono a te e possono identificarti come individuo. Utilizziamo i
   tuoi dati personali in linea con tutte le leggi applicabili. Al fine di
   garantire il rispetto e l'allineamento con i valori di Outbrain in
   materia di fiducia e trasparenza, disponiamo di team di esperti di
   privacy responsabili dell'implementazione continua del nostro programma
   di privacy globale.

                                                           + ESPANDI TUTTO

   1. Chi siamo, Cosa facciamo, Come contattare Outbrain, il nostro RPD o
   le autorità competenti

                                      +

   Chi siamo:
   Outbrain indica Outbrain Inc., un'azienda del Delaware (USA) con sede a
   New York; e le sue partecipate (collettivamente, “Outbrain,” o "noi",
   "ci", "nostro"). Operiamo da 12 uffici a livello globale e collaboriamo
   con editori e operatori di mercato in tutto il mondo.
   Cosa facciamo:
   La mission di Outbrain consiste nel fornire ai suoi utenti contenuti
   interessanti basati sui loro interessi. Per realizzare la nostra
   mission stipuliamo accordi con:
     * editori e partner online che desiderano raccomandare contenuti
       pertinenti ai loro lettori (si tratta del servizio Outbrain
       Engage); e

     * inserzionisti che desiderano che i lettori visualizzino i loro
       contenuti (si tratta del servizio Outbrain Amplify).

   Come contattarci
   Esaminiamo regolarmente il nostro rispetto della presente politica
   sulla privacy. Domande, commenti e richieste riguardanti la presente
   politica sulla privacy sono apprezzati e vanno indirizzati a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oppure all'indirizzo postale: Outbrain
   Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Qualora Outbrain non risponda in maniera soddisfacente alle tue domande
   o preoccupazioni, puoi altresì contattare i seguenti riferimenti per
   informazioni, supporto o reclami:
     * Responsabile esterno della protezione dei dati di Outbrain ("RPD"):
       ePrivacy GmbH, rappresentata dal Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. È
       possibile contattare direttamente ePrivacy GmbH all'indirizzo:
       privacy@eprivacy.eu; e/o
     * l'Information Commissioner’s Officer, che è la principale autorità
       di controllo su Outbrain all'interno dei Territori europei.

   Organismi di autoregolamentazione
   Outbrain aderisce ai principi di autoregolamentazione stabiliti da
   Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) e da European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Siamo soci in regola della Network
   Advertising Initiative (NAI), un'associazione dedicata alla raccolta
   responsabile di dati e al loro utilizzo per la pubblicità digitale.
   Aderiamo al Codice di condotta NAI per il settore Web e Mobile.
   Outbrain aderisce altresì ai principi di autoregolamentazione
   dell'Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) per la pubblicità
   comportamentale online e al framework di IAB Europa per la pubblicità
   comportamentale online.
   2. Tipi di utente Outbrain (compresa la gestione delle opzioni di Opt
   Out)

                                      +

   Gran parte della presente politica sulla privacy è suddivisa in sezioni
   in base al modo in cui è possibile interagire con Outbrain. Ti
   preghiamo di stabilire quale tipo di utente sei, in quanto, per ogni
   tipo di utente abbiamo spiegato quali informazioni raccogliamo e
   perché, quali cookie e altre tecnologie analoghe utilizziamo, come
   condividiamo tali informazioni e i tuoi diritti.
   Visitatori del sito: Sei un visitatore del sito quando visiti e
   interagisci con i nostri siti web, le nostre pagine web, le funzioni
   interattive, i blog e i loro rispettivi contenuti disponibili
   all'indirizzo Outbrain.com (o qualsiasi sua derivazione, come
   Outbrain.co.uk; Outbrain.fr; outbrain.de, ecc.) e MyOutbrain.com (“I
   nostri siti“). Vedi di più qui.
   (a) Quali informazioni raccogliamo e perché
   Desideriamo capire quali servizi sui nostri siti ti interessino e
   desideriamo ricordarti i servizi che offriamo quando non sei sui nostri
   siti. Per fare questo, raccogliamo le seguenti informazioni su di te:
   (i) indirizzo IP; (ii) dati dell'agente utente: tipo di dispositivo (ad
   es. iPhone), tipo di browser (ad es. Chrome), sistema operativo (ad es.
   iOS); (iii) le pagine visitate sul nostro sito (ad es. la pagina "Chi
   siamo" di Outbrain); (iv) l'orario della visita (e il fuso orario
   corrispondente); nonché (v) le URL di riferimento e altre informazioni
   normalmente trasmesse nelle richieste HTTP (ad esempio, queste
   informazioni ci dicono come sei arrivato sui nostri siti).
   (b) Quali cookie e altre tecnologie simili utilizziamo
   Ti rimandiamo a questa Tabella dei cookie alla sezione "Visitatori del
   sito" per un elenco dettagliato dei cookie (e dei relativi periodi di
   conservazione) che utilizziamo quando visiti i nostri siti.
   (c) Come possiamo condividere le informazioni
     * Condivisione delle informazioni che acquisiamo su di te sui nostri
       siti.

   In generale, non condividiamo i tuoi dati personali con terzi per
   finalità di pubblicità o marketing di terzi. Tuttavia, ricorriamo a
   vari terzi (ciascuno elencato nella Tabella dei cookie) affinché ci
   aiutino a svolgere attività di commercializzazione o pubblicità nei
   tuoi confronti. Ad esempio, alcuni dei cookie che utilizziamo sui
   nostri siti appartengono a terzi che aiuteranno Outbrain a svolgere
   attività di commercializzazione o pubblicità nei tuoi confronti.
   Richiediamo a tali parti e società terze di acconsentire a mantenere
   riservate tutte le informazioni condivise con loro e a utilizzare tali
   informazioni esclusivamente per adempiere ai loro obblighi nei nostri
   confronti. Facciamo ciò stipulando accordi con tutti i terzi che
   trattano dati personali per nostro conto in maniera da garantire che
   trattino i tuoi dati personali in conformità con le nostre severe
   istruzioni e tutte le leggi applicabili in materia di protezione dei
   dati. Se pubblichi un post sul nostro blog, i tuoi commenti e le tue
   informazioni saranno disponibili al pubblico. Contatta
   support@outbrain.com per rimuovere il tuo commento.
     * Utilizzo di servizi di terzi sui nostri siti.

   I nostri siti contengono collegamenti ad altri siti web che non sono di
   nostra proprietà o gestiti da noi. Non controlliamo, raccomandiamo o
   approviamo il contenuto, i prodotti, i servizi, le politiche sulla
   privacy o le pratiche di tali siti web di terzi. Ad esempio, sui nostri
   siti noterai icone cliccabili che ti condurranno alla pagina Facebook
   di Outbrain o alla pagina LinkedIn di Outbrain. Se scegli di fare click
   su tali collegamenti, devi sapere che Facebook e LinkedIn potrebbero
   inviare i propri cookie al tuo dispositivo e potrebbero raccogliere
   dati personali in maniera indipendente. Di conseguenza è importante che
   tu legga le politiche sulla privacy di Facebook e/o LinkedIn.
     * Consulta anche la sezione Condivisione della presente politica
       sulla privacy.

   (d) I tuoi diritti
   Le Condizioni d'uso presenti sul nostro sito disciplinano l'uso del
   nostro sito e si applicano anche a te. Puoi smettere di usare il nostro
   sito in qualsiasi momento. Se lo fai, puoi altresì desiderare rimuovere
   tutti i cookie che abbiamo inserito su qualsiasi dispositivo utilizzato
   per accedere al nostro sito. Se durante l'utilizzo dei nostri siti hai
   fornito il tuo indirizzo e-mail, qualsiasi e-mail che ricevi da
   Outbrain include un'opzione di "annullamento dell'iscrizione"
   (unsubscribe).
   Per gli utenti dei Territori europei, Outbrain ha implementato una
   piattaforma di gestione del consenso (gestita da One Trust ) sui nostri
   siti che offre ai visitatori l'opportunità di acconsentire, o meno, a
   cookie e tecnologie di tracciamento simili sui nostri siti. Accedendo
   ai nostri siti, vedrai un banner nella parte inferiore della pagina con
   informazioni sui cookie che utilizziamo. È possibile fare click sul
   banner per rifiutare tutti i cookie che non sono strettamente
   necessari. Premendo "accetta" sul banner o scorrendo / facendo click
   sui nostri siti è un'indicazione della tua accettazione. Di
   conseguenza, la base legale di Outbrain per il trattamento dei dati
   personali sui nostri siti è il consenso. Puoi ritirare il tuo consenso
   in qualsiasi momento cliccando qui.
   Utenti: Sei un utente se visiti una pagina di un sito web o di
   un'applicazione di uno dei partner di Outbrain nelle quali è installato
   il widget Outbrain (“Siti partner”). Ad esempio, se visiti
   https://news.sky.com/uk, www.corriere.it il widget Outbrain è
   implementato su tali siti web. Sai che stai interagendo con un widget
   Outbrain quando vedi del testo che fa riferimento a Outbrain (ad
   esempio "Recommended by Outbrain", "by Outbrain" accanto ai contenuti).
   Se fai click sul riferimento contenente il collegamento ipertestuale a
   Outbrain, visualizzerai una informativa dettagliata che ti consentirà
   di raggiungere il Profilo di interesse di Outbrain, che fornisce una
   visualizzazione generale dei tipi di categorie di dati di Outbrain che
   quest'ultima può utilizzare per formulare le sue raccomandazioni.
   Inoltre, ti dà la possibilità di rinunciare a ricevere contenuti
   personalizzati. Vedi di più qui.
   Esempio di un widget Outbrain
   [S1q4BIXJQ.png]
   (a) Quali informazioni raccogliamo e perché
   Usiamo UUID, indirizzo IP e altre informazioni di utilizzo in maniera
   da poter offrire contenuti interessanti. Le raccomandazioni di Outbrain
   possono essere pagate da un inserzionista che ti collega a un nuovo
   sito web oppure possono essere organiche, nel qual caso il collegamento
   rinvia a un'altra pagina sullo stesso sito web dell'editore.
     * UUID.

   Quando in veste di Utente visiti per la prima volta un Sito partner (ad
   esempio, CNN.com), Outbrain deposita un cookie sul dispositivo al fine
   di generare un UUID (un identificativo utente univoco). Cataloghiamo e
   analizziamo i contenuti che consumi attraverso i Siti partner. Le
   nostre raccomandazioni si basano su: (i) cronologia di navigazione;
   (ii) modelli di navigazione simili di altri Utenti; (ii)
   raccomandazioni di contenuto che sono in genere popolari presso il
   pubblico di Outbrain in quel dato momento; (iv) un pizzico di casualità
   e (v) requisiti di targeting che possono essere forniti o richiesti dai
   nostri clienti Amplify. Ad esempio, Outbrain potrebbe sapere che l'UUID
   123 (che potresti essere tu che sul tuo iPhone X stai visitando il
   Guardian usando Chrome come browser) ama leggere di destinazioni di
   vacanza lontane e che alle persone che amano leggere delle medesime
   destinazioni di vacanza lontane piace leggere di cibi esotici.
   L'UUID è una sequenza di numeri e/o lettere. L'UUID viene associato al
   tuo dispositivo e varia in base al browser che utilizzi. In altre
   parole, Outbrain registra un UUID diverso a seconda del dispositivo e/o
   del browser che utilizzi per accedere ai Siti partner. Ad esempio, ciò
   significa che avrai un UUID quando visiti un Sito partner dal tuo
   telefono cellulare utilizzando Safari come browser e un UUID diverso
   quando visiti un Sito partner dal tuo iPad utilizzando Safari come
   browser. Outbrain combinerà e consoliderà un UUID da un dispositivo
   mobile (palmare o tablet) da un browser che accede quindi a
   un'applicazione (o viceversa) da quel medesimo dispositivo.
   L'assegnazione di un UUID consente a Outbrain di associare le
   visualizzazioni di pagina visitate e i click sulle raccomandazioni di
   Outbrain provenienti da tale UUID, il tutto con l'obiettivo di fornire
   contenuti interessanti.
     * Indirizzo IP e altre informazioni sull'utilizzo.

   Raccogliamo un UUID come spiegato sopra, inoltre raccogliamo le
   seguenti informazioni da te: (i) indirizzo IP (reso anonimo in base
   agli standard di settore) (ii) dati dell'agente utente: tipo di
   dispositivo (ad es. iPhone), tipo di browser (ad es. Chrome), sistema
   operativo (ad es. iOS); (iii) le pagine visitate; (iv) l'orario della
   visita; e (v) gli URL di riferimento e altre informazioni normalmente
   trasmesse nelle richieste HTTP.
   Le suddette informazioni statistiche ci forniscono informazioni su
   quanti Utenti hanno visitato una pagina specifica sui nostri Siti
   partner sui quali è installato il widget Outbrain, per quanto tempo
   ciascun Utente è rimasto su quella pagina, il tipo di contenuto su
   quella pagina sul quale hanno fatto click e, in generale, come hanno
   interagito con tale pagina. Queste informazioni costituiscono dati
   personali soltanto quando sono associati a un UUID.
   (b) Quali cookie e altre tecnologie simili utilizziamo
   Visita questa Tabella dei cookie nella sezione "Utenti" per un elenco
   dettagliato dei cookie proprietari che utilizziamo quando interagisci
   con i Siti partner nei quali è implementata la tecnologia Outbrain.
   Se fai click su un collegamento verso una delle nostre raccomndazioni,
   l'inserzionista Amplify che sponsorizza tale contenuto può installare
   cookie sul tuo dispositivo tramite reindirizzamenti prima che tu giunga
   alla pagina di destinazione della raccomandazione di contenuto o nel
   momento in cui raggiungi la pagina di destinazione. In tali casi sarai
   soggetto alla politica sulla privacy di tale inserzionista.
   Oltre al widget Outbrain visibile su Siti partner, alcuni inserzionisti
   di Outbrain possono implementare il pixel Outbrain sui loro siti web.
   Il pixel Outbrain determina se l'utente che raggiunge la pagina nella
   quale è installato il pixel dispone di un UUID Outbrain. Se esiste un
   UUID associato a tale utente finale, Outbrain consente agli
   inserzionisti di reindirizzare tali UUID e/o fornisce agli
   inserzionisti il numero totale di UUID che hanno raggiunto tale pagina.
   Se nessun UUID Outbrain ha visitato la pagina, il pixel Outbrain non
   raccoglie alcuna informazione sull'utente.
   Invitiamo gli inserzionisti a divulgare l'uso di pixel Outbrain sui
   propri siti web. Outbrain non combina le informazioni ottenute dal
   pixel con il profilo di un UUID.
   I punti dati come le visualizzazioni delle pagine e i click che sono
   collegati a un UUID specifico sono conservati per 13 mesi. Ad esempio,
   se l'UUID 123 legge un articolo il 31 dicembre 2017, il 1° febbraio
   2018 quell'articolo non farà più parte del profilo dell'UUID 123.
   (c) Come possiamo condividere le informazioni
   Outbrain non condivide i profili Utente con terzi. Tuttavia, potremmo
   condividere l'UUID con taluni partner per fini di sincronizzazione dei
   cookie oppure in base a requisiti tecnici. Consulta anche la sezione
   Condivisione della presente politica sulla privacy.
   (d) I tuoi diritti
     * Opt Out di Outbrain. Puoi rinunciare (opt-out) alle raccomandazioni
       di contenuto personalizzate di Outbrain in qualsiasi momento.
       Consulta il Profilo di interesse di Outbrain per una panoramica
       generale dei dati che Outbrain conosce su di te e può utilizzare
       per formulare le sue raccomandazioni. Il Profilo di interesse ti dà
       altresì la possibilità di decidere di rinunciare alle
       raccomandazioni personalizzate (puoi anche effettuare l’opt-out
       cliccando qui). Tieni presente che l'esclusione dei browser avviene
       tramite il Profilo di interesse di Outbrain, ma la rinuncia ai
       contenuti personalizzati nelle applicazioni avviene attraverso le
       impostazioni presenti sul tuo dispositivo (esempi di passaggi sono
       disponibili nel Profilo di interesse).

   IMPORTANTE – anche se hai rinunciato a usufruire di Outbrain:
     * Continuerai a visualizzare le raccomandazioni di Outbrain. La
       disattivazione del tracking per la personalizzazione di Outbrain
       non significa che non riceverai più raccomandazioni di contenuto da
       Outbrain. Piuttosto significa che non saranno personalizzate. Tali
       raccomandazioni continueranno a utilizzare le informazioni relative
       al documento che stai visualizzando (ad esempio informazioni
       contestuali) per fornirti consigli su quella pagina.

     * La rinuncia (opt-out) è basata su cookie ed è specifica del
       dispositivo/browser. Se navighi sul web da dispositivi e/o browser
       diversi, dovrai esprimere la rinuncia da ciascun dispositivo e/o
       browser per assicurarti di impedire il tracking per la
       personalizzazione su ciascuno di loro. Per lo stesso motivo, se
       acquisti un nuovo dispositivo, cambi browser o cancelli (o annulli)
       il cookie di rinuncia, dovrai esprimere nuovamente tale rinuncia.
       Rinunciare al tracking per la personalizzazione non equivale a
       bloccare i cookie.

     * Per garantire la cancellazione del profilo legato al tuo UUID, non
       attivare Outbrain per almeno 21 giorni. La tua rinuncia alle
       raccomandazioni personalizzate di Outbrain è efficace
       immediatamente. Tuttavia, se il tuo browser consente
       l'archiviazione locale e attivi le raccomandazioni di contenuto
       personalizzate di Outbrain entro 21 giorni dalla rinuncia, è
       possibile che il tuo profilo precedente venga riconnesso al tuo
       UUID. Se non effettui l'attivazione entro 21 giorni, il profilo
       verrà eliminato e non potrà essere ripristinato.

     * Come con la maggior parte dei casi di opt-out, anche l’opzione di
       opt-out del browser Outbrain si basa su un cookie. Il cookie di
       opt-out è inteso come persistente per rispettare le preferenze
       dell'utente. Tuttavia, la funzionalità di "Intelligent Tracking
       Prevention" in iOS11 potrebbe avere un impatto sulla persistenza
       dei cookie nei siti web nelle 24 ore successive. Ti suggeriamo di
       utilizzare un altro browser o di bloccare tutti i cookie di terze
       parti dal browser in modo da essere "disattivato" senza dover
       ricorrere all'effettiva metodologia di opt-out di qualsiasi
       azienda.

     * Ulteriori opzioni di rinuncia (opt-out). Puoi anche esprimere la
       tua rinuncia a ricevere contenuti personalizzati offerti da noi o
       da altre agenzie pubblicitarie attraverso strumenti messi a
       disposizione dal settore come la NAI o le varie pagine basate su
       DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
       www.youradchoices.ca/choices, e/o EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
       Visitare le pagine delle scelte dei consumatori di NAI, DAA, DAAC o
       EDAA ti consente di rinunciare a tutti o parte dei servizi dei
       membri partecipanti. Come la funzione di opt out di Outbrain,
       queste rinunce non fanno sì che non riceverai più alcuna
       pubblicità, semplicemente gli annunci pubblicitari non saranno
       personalizzati per te. Puoi continuare a ricevere annunci
       pubblicitari, ad esempio, in base al sito web specifico che stai
       visualizzando (ossia annunci basati sul contesto). Inoltre, se i
       tuoi browser sono configurati per rifiutare i cookie quando visiti
       le pagine delle scelte dei consumatori DAA, DAAC o EDAA, la tua
       rinuncia potrebbe non essere efficace.

     * Base giuridica. La base giuridica di Outbrain per il trattamento
       dei dati personali dell'Utente si fonda sulla base giuridica
       determinata da ciascuno dei nostri Siti partner. Ciascun Sito
       partner si baserà sul consenso o sul legittimo interesse. Consulta
       la politica sulla privacy dei Siti partner per ulteriori
       informazioni sulla loro base giuridica. Se un Partner fa
       affidamento sul consenso, Outbrain non depositerà un cookie sul tuo
       dispositivo se non hai fornito il consenso su tale Sito partner.

   Partner commerciali: Sei un Partner commerciale quando ti registri (o
   invii un'e-mail a Outbrain) per conto dell'azienda per la quale lavori
   per utilizzare i servizi Outbrain Amplify o Outbrain Engage. Vedi di
   più qui.
   (a) Quali informazioni raccogliamo e perché
   Puoi fornire determinati dati personali (quali ad esempio indirizzo
   e-mail) quando ti registri per i servizi Amplify o Engage o altrimenti
   quando comunichi o interagisci con noi. Se presenti domanda per
   diventare un Partner commerciale, potremmo richiederti ulteriori
   informazioni tramite moduli di domanda dell'inserzionista, ordini di
   inserzione e altri moduli. Raccogliamo automaticamente informazioni in
   merito alle azioni del tuo nome utente nella dashboard di Outbrain. Ad
   esempio, in qualità di Partner commerciale Amplify, se modifichi il
   costo per click per una delle tue campagne, la traccia di controllo di
   Outbrain registrerà tutte queste azioni.
   Raccogliamo e trattiamo i dati personali di cui sopra al fine di
   adempiere ai nostri obblighi ai sensi del nostro accordo come Partner
   commerciale (o potenziale Partner commerciale) stipulato con voi, ivi
   incluso per:
     * rispondere alle tue domande e richieste;

     * fornirti accesso a determinate funzioni e caratteristiche dei
       nostri servizi Amplify o Engage (ad esempio per fornirti e
       mantenere il tuo account dashboard);

     * verificare la tua identità;

     * comunicare con te in merito al tuo account, ai nostri prodotti e
       alle promozioni disponibili pertinenti al tuo utilizzo del servizio
       Amplify o Engage.

   (b) Quali cookie e altre tecnologie simili utilizziamo
   Ti rimandiamo a questa Tabella dei cookie nella sezione "Partner
   commerciali" per un elenco dettagliato dei cookie (e dei relativi
   periodi di conservazione) che utilizziamo con i Partner commerciali.
   (c) Come possiamo condividere le informazioni con chiunque
   Potremmo divulgare determinate informazioni dei Business Partner a
   venditori, contraenti o altri soggetti che assistono Outbrain
   nell'erogazione dei servizi (ad es. trattamento delle carte di
   credito). Consulta anche la sezione Condivisione della presente
   politica sulla privacy.
   (d) I tuoi diritti
   Se in veste di Partner commerciale desideri verificare, correggere,
   aggiornare o richiedere la disattivazione delle tue informazioni, puoi
   accedere alla dashboard di Outbrain e modificare le preferenze del tuo
   profilo oppure contattarci all'indirizzo: support@outbrain.com. Se stai
   ricevendo e-mail di Outbrain, puoi "annullare l'iscrizione" a tale
   invio utilizzando un collegamento presente nell'e-mail. Nota:
   l'annullamento dell'iscrizione non comporta la rinuncia a ricevere
   notifiche critiche all'erogazione dei servizi Amplify o Engage (ad es.
   fatture inviate via e-mail).
   La base giuridica di Outbrain per il trattamento dei dati personali dei
   Partner commerciali è il legittimo interesse.
   3. Come manteniamo le informazioni al sicuro, Trasferimenti al di fuori
   del SEE, Condivisione e conservazione

                                      +

   Sicurezza
   Outbrain dispone di un team dedicato per la sicurezza. Manteniamo
   rigorosi controlli sui dati che raccogliamo, conservandoli in database
   protetti e soggetti a firewall con diritti di accesso rigorosamente
   limitati e controllati, per garantirne la sicurezza. Consulta le nostre
   norme sulla sicurezza per maggiori informazioni.
   I partner commerciali hanno accesso a determinate funzionalità protette
   da password del servizio Amplify o Engage. Loro sono responsabili del
   mantenimento della riservatezza di tale password. Ricorda che,
   sfortunatamente, la trasmissione di informazioni tramite Internet non è
   completamente sicura. Una truffa comune su Internet è nota come
   "spoofing" o "phishing" e si verifica quando ricevi un'email
   proveniente da quella che sembra essere una fonte legittima che
   richiede i tuoi dati personali. Ti preghiamo di osservare che non ti
   invieremo alcuna e-mail che ti chieda di verificare la carta di
   credito, le coordinate bancarie o eventuali altri dati personali.
   Qualora dovessi ricevere un'e-mail che sembra provenire da noi e ti
   chiede tali informazioni ti preghiamo di non rispondere e non fare
   click su nessun link presente nell'e-mail. Al contrario, inoltraci
   l'e-mail all'indirizzo legal@outbrain.com, in quanto esamineremo
   possibili casi di frodi su Internet.
   Trasferimento dei dati al di fuori dell'UE/del SEE
   Quando trasferiamo i dati personali dallo Spazio economico europeo ad
   altri paesi nei quali le leggi applicabili non offrono il medesimo
   livello di protezione della privacy dei dati offerto nei Territori
   europei, adottiamo misure atte a fornire un livello appropriato di
   protezione della privacy dei dati. In altre parole, i tuoi diritti e le
   protezioni che ti spettano rimangono associati ai tuoi dati. Ad
   esempio, utilizziamo clausole contrattuali approvate e altre misure
   studiate per garantire che i destinatari dei tuoi dati personali li
   proteggano.
   Condivisione
   Oltre alla descrizione di come possiamo divulgare i tuoi dati personali
   per ciascun tipo di utente, possiamo altresì divulgare dati personali
   nei seguenti casi:
     * all'interno della famiglia di società controllate da Outbrain per
       ragioni interne, principalmente per scopi aziendali e operativi;

     * qualora dovessimo attraversare una transizione aziendale, quale una
       fusione, un'acquisizione da parte di un'altra società oppure una
       vendita di tutte o di parte delle nostre attività, i tuoi dati
       personali saranno probabilmente inclusi tra le attività trasferite;

     * laddove ciò sia richiesto dalla legge (ad esempio, per collaborare
       con indagini delle forze dell'ordine oppure con altri procedimenti
       giudiziari); e/o

     * per rispondere a un'emergenza effettiva.

   Inoltre, combiniamo i tuoi dati personali con quelli di altri utenti al
   fine di condividere informazioni sulle tendenze e aggregare le
   statistiche degli utenti con terze parti, sempre in forma aggregata e
   anonimizzata.
   Conservazione dei dati
   Il periodo di conservazione per ciascuno dei cookie utilizzati da
   Outbrain (sia per quelli propri sia per quelli usati da terzi per
   nostro conto) è indicato nella Tabella dei cookie.
   Outbrain mantiene altresì una politica di conservazione dei dati che
   dettaglia il periodo di conservazione dei dati personali in base alla
   nostra analisi della durata ragionevolmente necessaria di tale
   conservazione, rispetto a dati specifici, tenuto conto delle finalità
   legali o commerciali. Nel momento in cui non necessitiamo più dei dati
   personali, li cancelliamo o li distruggiamo in maniera sicura. I dati
   aggregati, che non consentono di identificare un dispositivo/browser (o
   una singola persona) e sono utilizzati per finalità di reporting e
   analisi vengono conservati per tutto il tempo necessario dal punto di
   vista commerciale.
   4. Minori

                                      +

   Nessuno dei nostri servizi si rivolge a minori di 16 anni. Non
   raccogliamo consapevolmente dati personali da minori di 16 anni. Se al
   momento della raccolta dovessimo stabilire che un Visitatore del sito,
   un Utente o un Partner commerciale ha meno di 16 anni, non useremo né
   conserveremo i suoi dati personali. Qualora dovessimo venire a
   conoscenza del fatto che abbiamo raccolto inconsapevolmente dati
   personali da un minore di età inferiore ai 16 anni, attueremo ogni
   ragionevole sforzo per eliminare tali informazioni dai nostri archivi.
   Se sei un bambino, vai a giocare in giardino, non usare o interagire
   con Outbrain!
   5. Cittadini dei territori europei

                                      +

   In conformità con le leggi europee in materia di tutela della vita
   privata (privacy), in particolare con il regolamento generale europeo
   sulla protezione dei dati (GDPR), Outbrain riconosce specifici diritti
   aggiuntivi ai cittadini dei Territori europei quali il diritto di
   accesso, di rettifica, di opposizione, di reclamo, di cancellazione e
   di blocco. Più specificamente:
     * il diritto di richiedere informazioni sull'eventualità del
       trattamento in atto e su quali dati personali siano trattati da
       noi, nonché il diritto di richiedere la rettifica o la modifica di
       tali dati personali.
     * in determinate circostanze, il diritto di richiedere che i dati
       personali siano cancellati.
     * in determinate circostanze, il diritto di chiedere che il
       trattamento dei dati personali sia soggetto a limitazioni.
     * il diritto alla revoca del proprio consenso al trattamento e
       all'utilizzo dei propri dati, in tutto o in parte, in qualsiasi
       momento con applicazione per il futuro.
     * il diritto di ottenere i propri dati personali in un formato
       comune, strutturato e leggibile da un dispositivo automatico.
     * il diritto di contattare il nostro responsabile della protezione
       dei dati nel caso in cui vi siano domande, commenti, reclami o
       richieste in relazione alla nostra dichiarazione sulla protezione
       dei dati e sul trattamento dei dati personali.
     * il diritto di sporgere reclamo presso l'autorità di controllo
       responsabile qualora si ritenga che il trattamento dei propri dati
       personali avvenga in violazione della legislazione.

   In aggiunta a quanto sopra, facciamo riferimento a determinati diritti
   per i cittadini dei Territori europei nel corso della presente politica
   sulla privacy. Ai sensi del GDPR, con il termine cittadini dei
   "Territori europei" si intendono i cittadini dello Spazio economico
   europeo (SEE) e della Svizzera. Ai fini della presente Informativa
   sulla privacy, il termine "Territori europei" continuerà a includere il
   Regno Unito, anche dopo che il Regno Unito avrà lasciato lo Spazio
   economico europeo in seguito alla Brexit.
   Nel caso avessi domande su come esercitare qualsiasi dei diritti
   descritti qui sopra, scrivici al seguente indirizzo e-mail:
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com.
   6. Diritti in materia di privacy della California

                                      +

   Ai sensi degli articoli 1798.83-1798.84 del Codice Civile della
   California, i residenti californiani hanno il diritto di richiederci
   un'informativa che descriva le categorie di informazioni personali che
   condividiamo con terzi o società affiliate per finalità di marketing
   diretto di tali terzi o società affiliate. Tale informativa individuerà
   le categorie di informazioni condivise e includerà un elenco dei terzi
   e delle società affiliate con le quali sono state condivise, unitamente
   ai loro nomi e indirizzi. Se sei residente in California e desideri una
   copia di tale informativa, invia una richiesta scritta a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com oppure inviala al seguente indirizzo
   postale: Outbrain Inc., 39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY
   10011. Si prega di consentire 30 giorni per la risposta.
   7. Comunicazione antitracciamento (“Do Not Track”)

                                      +

   Alcuni browser trasmettono segnali antitracciamento, denominati "Do Not
   Track" (DNT), ai siti web. Poiché non esiste una comprensione comune su
   come interpretare il segnale DNT, al momento Outbrain non altera,
   modifica o risponde alle richieste o ai segnali DNT di tali browser.
   Continueremo a monitorare l'attività del settore in questo contesto e
   rivaluteremo le nostre pratiche DNT se necessario. Nel frattempo, puoi
   utilizzare la gamma di altri strumenti che mettiamo a disposizione per
   controllare la raccolta e l'utilizzo dei dati, ivi inclusa la capacità
   di rinunciare a ricevere raccomandazioni personalizzate consultando la
   sezione Utenti.
   8. Come può variare la presente politica sulla privacy

                                      +

   Occasionalmente potremmo modificare la presente politica sulla privacy.
   Inseriremo un avviso in evidenza che ti sarà visibile in qualità di
   Visitatore del sito o Partner commerciale, tuttavia non disponiamo di
   mezzi per avvertire gli Utenti in merito a un aggiornamento. In tal
   caso si raccomanda di verificare periodicamente questa pagina per
   sapere se la politica sulla privacy è stata aggiornata. Visualizzeremo
   sempre la data dell'ultima modifica della politica sulla privacy nella
   parte alta della pagina affinché tu possa sapere quando è stata rivista
   l'ultima volta.

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   2018年5月24日
   アウトブレインはお客様の個人データを大切に保護します。このプライバシー ポリシーは（以下「プライバシー
   ポリシー」といいます。）、アウトブレインが収集する全ての個人データも含めた情報の利用方法を定めるものです。個人データは、お客様に関わる情報であ
   って、個人を特定できる情報です。アウトブレインは、お客様の個人データを利用に際しては、適用されるすべての法令を遵守します。プライバシーチャンピ
   オンチームのもと信頼と透明性というアウトブレインの価値を守ります
   + ＋全てを広げる
   – COLLAPSE ALL
   １．私たちについて、私たちのミッション、及びアウトブレイン・アウトブレインのDPO・又は関係部署へのお問い合わせ方法
   +
   アウトブレインについて
   私たちは、米国のデラウェア州で設立された株式会社及びその関連子会社（以下合わせて「アウトブレイン」又は「私たち」といいます。）であり、本社はニ
   ューヨークにあります。アウトブレインは、12 個のグローバルオフィスを有し、世界中のパブリッシャー及びマーケッターと提携関係を組んでいます。
   アウトブレインのミッション
   アウトブレインのミッションは、ユーザーの関心に基づいて、ユーザーの興味関心に基づいてレコメンデーションを提供することです。そのミッションのため
   、次のようなパートナーと提携しています。
     * 読者に価値があるコンテンツを勧めたいオンラインパブリッシャ及びパートナー（こちらの契約をOutbrain Engageといいます。）

     * コンテンツを読者に配信することを希望するアドバタイザー（こちらの契約を Outbrain Amplifyといいます。）

   アウトブレインへのお問い合わせ
   アウトブレインはプライバシーポリシーを遵守していることを定期的に確認しております。プライバシーポリシーに関するご質問、コメント、又は他のお問い
   合わせは次の連絡先までお願いします。
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com 又は
   Attn: Privacy Questions
   Outbrain Inc.
   39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor
   New York, NY 10011
   また上記のお問い合わせ以外にもご質問がございましたら、次の連絡先までご連絡下さい。
     * 外部のData Protection Officer （以下「DPO」と言う）：ePrivacy GmbH
       担当者：クリストフ・バウワー博士
       ePrivacy GmbHには privacy@eprivacy.eu 宛てご連絡ください。

     * 欧州内のアウトブレインの担当部署である Information Commissioner’s Officer

   自主規制機関
   アウトブレインは、Digital Advertising Alliance （以下「DAA」という）及び European
   Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance（以下「EDAA
   」という）において自主規制の原則を遵守します。アウトブレインは、責任あるデータの収集とデジタル広告におけるデータの使用を定める社団Networ
   k Advertising Initiative
   (NAI)の優良メンバーであり、そのウェブとモバイルのための行動規範を遵守します。アウトブレインは、オンライン行動アドバタイジング(OAB)
   に関するInteractive Advertising Bureau (IAB)の自主規制原則及びIAB の欧州OBA原則を遵守します。
   ２．アウトブレインのユーザータイプ（オプトアウトも含む）)
   +
   このプライバシーポリシーにおいては、様々な場面ごとに、お客さまのユーザータイプに応じて、どの情報を収集し、なぜ収集するのか、なぜ、どのクッキー
   を使うのか、またどのような類似の技術を用いるのか、私たちがどのようにその情報を共有するのか、またお客様にはどのような権利があるのかということを
   ご説明します。
   ウェブサイトの訪問者：お客様はアウトブレインのOutbrain.com （又は国によるアドレス、例えばOutbrain.co.uk、
   Outbrain.fr 、Outbrain.de 、など）及び MyOutbrain.com
   のウェブサイト、ウェブページ、相互作用機能（以下すべて合わせて「アウトブレインのサイト」という）を訪問、及び相互作用する場合、サイトの訪問者に
   なります。 詳しくは こちらへ。
   ア）収集する情報及びその理由
   アウトブレインは、アウトブレインのサイトにおいてお客様がどのコンテンツに興味を持つかを理解し、且つお客様がアウトブレインのサイトを訪問しない時
   にもアウトブレインが提供するサービスを認識していただきたいと考えています。このために、お客様から（１）IP
   アドレス、（２）ユーザーエージェントデータ、あるいはデバイスの種類（例えばiPhone など）、ブラウザの種類（例えばGoogle
   Chromeなど）、オペレーティングシステム（例えばiOS など）、（３）アウトブレインのサイト のどのページを閲覧したか
   （例えば、「アウトブレインについて」のページ）、（４）閲覧した時間（対応する時差）、（５）URL のリファーラル及びHTTP
   リクエストにおいて通常に通信される情報（例えば、この情報でお客様がアウトブレインのサイトにどの経由でいらしたのかを知ることができます）の情報を
   収集します。
   イ）利用するクッキー、又は使用する技術
   お客様がアウトブレインのサイトを訪問する際に使用されるクッキー（及びその有効期間）に関する詳細については、こちらの クッキーテーブル
   のウェッブサイト訪問者の部分をご参照ください。
   ウ）情報の共有
   アウトブレインのサイトにおいて収集したお客様の情報の共有
   原則として、アウトブレインはお客様の個人データを第三者に対しそのマーケティング活動のために共有することはいたしません。しかし、アウトブレインが
   お客様に対してマーケティング及び広告配信ができるように第三者のサービス（こちらの クッキーテーブル
   に表示されます）を利用することがあります。例えば、アウトブレインのサイトにおいて、アウトブレインがお客様にマーケティング及び広告配信を行うため
   に使用するクッキーの一部は、第三者のクッキーです。アウトブレインはこれら第三者に対して、共有された情報を機密情報として取り扱わせるとともに、こ
   れらの情報をアウトブレインに対する義務の履行のためにのみ使用させるものとします。私たちは、私たちのために個人データを処理するあらゆる第三者との
   間で、個人データを私たちの指示及び適用されるデータ保護に関するあらゆる法令を遵守して処理することを義務付ける契約を締結しております。又、お客様
   がアウトブレインのブログにコメントする場合、そのコメント及び情報は開示されます。コメントを削除するためには、
   support@outbrain.comまでご連絡ください。
   アウトブレインのサイトにおける第三者のサービスの利用
   アウトブレインのサイト上には、アウトブレインが所有又は管理しないウェブサイトへのリンクがあります。アウトブレインは、他の第三者のウェブサイトの
   コンテンツ、商品、サービス、プライバシーポリシー、又はデータ処理方法を管理又は保証することができません。例えば、アウトブレインのサイトにおいて
   、アウトブレインのFacebook のページ、又はLinkedin
   のページへのクリックできるアイコンがあります。お客様がこのリンクをクリックする際にFacebook 及びLinkedin
   がお客様のデバイスに自らのクッキーを送信し、個別に個人データを収集する可能性があります。従って、お客様にはFacebook やLinkedin
   のプライバシーポリシーもご確認いただきますようお願いいたします。
   エ）お客様の権利
   アウトブレインのサイトの利用は、アウトブレインのサイトの 利用条件
   にしたがうこととされ、お客様にも適用されます。お客様は、アウトブレインのサイトを利用することをいつでもやめることができます。お客様は利用するこ
   とをやめる場合に、お客様のデバイスに送信されたクッキーを削除することもできます。お客様はアウトブレインのサイトを利用する際にお客様のメールアド
   レスを提供している場合、アウトブレインから送信されるメールの「配信停止」のオプションを利用することもできます。
   アウトブレインは、 欧州
   からのサイト訪問者のために、お客様がアウトブレインのサイトで使用されるクッキー又は他の技術に同意・不同意を表明することを可能にする同意管理プラ
   ットフォーム（「 One
   Trust」を使用する）をアウトブレインのサイトおいて実施します。アウトブレインはお客様が同意しない限りクッキーを送信しません。したがって、ア
   ウトブレインが個人データを処理するための法的根拠は、「同意」となります。お客様はいつでも同意を撤回することができます。
   ユーザー：お客様は
   、アウトブレインのウィジェットがインストールされるアウトブレインのパートナーのウェブサイトのページ（以下「パートナーサイト」といいます。）を訪
   問者をユーザーといいます。例えば、お客様はhttps://news.sky.com/uk 、www.spiegel.de、又は
   www.cnn.com
   を訪問する場合、そのウェブサイトにおいてアウトブレインのウィジェットが表示されます。アウトブレインのウィジェットにおいて、アウトブレインに言及
   するテキスト（例えばレコメンデーションの近くに「アウトブレインのおすすめ」や「アウトブレインからの」といったテキスト）があります。お客様がアウ
   トブレインに言及するリンクをクリックする場合、アウトブレインがレコメンデーションにおいて利用するデータカテゴリーを提供する
   アウトブレインのInterest プロファイルへリンクする通知
   が表示されます。お客様はプロファイルにおいてパーソナルレコメンデーションからオプトアウトすることもできます。詳しくは こちらへ.
   アウトブレインのウィジェットの例
   Outbrain Example Recommendations
   ア）収集する情報及びその理由
   アウトブレインは、価値があるレコメンデーションを提供するために、UUID、IPアドレス、及び他の情報を利用します。アウトブレインのレコメンデー
   ションは、費用を払う広告社から新しいサイトへリンクするもの、又は同じパブリッシャのページへリンクするものです。
     * UUID

   お客様は最初にパートナーサイト（例えば、CNN.com）を訪問する際に、アウトブレインがUUID（一意なユーザー識別子）を割り当てることができ
   るよう、お客様のデバイスにクッキーが送信されます。アウトブレインは、お客様がパートナーサイトにおいて表示又は閲覧するコンテンツをカテゴライズし
   、分析します。アウトブレインのレコメンデーションは、（１）ブラウザの履歴、（２）他のユーザーの類似ブラウジングパータン、（３）アウトブレインの
   ユーザーにおけるその時に人気のコンテンツ、（４）ランダム、及び（５）Amplifyの顧客が提供する又は求めるターゲット条件に基づいて提供されま
   す。例えば、アウトブレインは、UUID123（例えばiPhoneXにおいてChromeのブラウザを使用してガーディアン新聞を訪問するお客様）が
   遠い外国の旅行先について読むことが好きだということ、且つ遠い外国の旅行先について読むことが好きな人は面白い外国の食べ物についても読むことが好き
   だということを知っている可能性があります。
   UUIDは数字又は文字の配列です。UUIDはお客様のデバイスに対応し、ブラウザによって変更されます。言い換えれば、アウトブレインは、お客様がパ
   ートナーサイトを訪問する毎に、お客様のデバイス又はブラウザごとに個別のUUIDを保存します。例えば、お客様がモバイルデバイスにおいてサファリと
   いうブラウザを使用してパートナーサイトを訪問する場合にあるひとつのUUIDが割り当てられ、iPadにおいてサファリというブラウザを使用してパー
   トナーサイトを訪問する場合にまた別のUUIDが割り当てられます。アウトブレインは、モバイルデバイス（携帯端末かタブレット）上のブラウザのUUI
   Dが同じデバイスにおいてアプリにアクセスする（逆も含む）場合、そのUUIDを結合します。
   アウトブレインは、デバイス又はブラウザにUUIDを割り当てることにより、お客様に対してお客様の関心に基づくレコメンデーションを提供することがで
   きるため、そのUUIDと訪問されたページ及びアウトブレインのレコメンデーションのクリックを対応させることができます。
   IPアドレス及び他の使用情報
   アウトブレインは、上記のようにUUIDを収集し、また、（１）IPアドレス、（２）ユーザーエージェントデータ；デバイスの種類（例えば携帯電話）、
   ブラウザの種類（例えばChrome）、オペレーティングシステム（例えばiOS）、（３）訪問したページ、（４）訪問時間、及び（５）リファラURL
   及びHTTP要求において通常に通信される情報を収集します。
   この統計情報は、アウトブレインのウィジェットがインストールされるパートナーサイトのページに何人が訪問しているのかということに関する情報、そのペ
   ージの訪問時間、ユーザーにクリックされたコンテンツ、及び一般的な訪問方法に関する情報をアウトブレインに提供するものです。この情報は、UUIDと
   対応しないため、個人データには該当しません。
   イ）利用するクッキー、又は使用する技術
   アウトブレインの技術が実施されるパートナーサイトを利用する際に使用するクッキーについては、こちらのクッキーテーブルの「ユーザー」の部分をご参照
   くだい。
   お客様がアウトブレインがレコメンドしたコンテンツのリンクをクリックする場合、そのレコメンデーションの遷移先ページが表示される前に、又は遷移先ペ
   ージが表示された際に、レコメンデーションのスポンサーをするAmplifyのアドバタイザーからリダイレクトを使用してお客様のデバイスにクッキーが
   送信される可能性があります。その場合、アドバタイザーのプライバシーポリシーが適用されます。
   アウトブレインのアドバタイザーは 、 表示されるアウトブレインのウィジェットに加えて
   アウトブレインピクセルを使用する可能性があります。アウトブレインピクセルは、ピクセルが実施されるページを訪問するユーザーに対応するアウトブレイ
   ン UUIDが存在するかどうか判断します。アウトブレインはエンドユーザーに対応するアウトブレインUUID が存在する場合、アドバタイザーがその
   UUIDをリターゲットすることができる機能やページを訪問する合計の UUID
   を提供します。アウトブレインピクセルは、ページへの訪問者がアウトブレイン UUID を保持しない場合にはユーザーの情報を収集しません。
   アウトブレインは、アドバタイザーが自らのウェブサイトにおいてアウトブレインピクセルが実施されている旨を開示するよう推奨しています。アウトブレイ
   ンはピクセルから収集した情報とUUIDのプロフィールを結合しません。
   各UUIDに対応するページの閲覧、及びクリック数のようなデータポイントは 13ヶ月間保存されます。例えば、UUID123が 2017年12月
   31日に記事を閲覧したという場合、その記事は2018年 2月1日にその UUIDのプロフィールから削除されます。
   ウ）情報の共有
   アウトブレインはいかなる第三者に対してもユーザーのプロフィールを共有しません。しかし、アウトブレインはクッキーの突合又は技術的に必要となる範囲
   で第三者にUUID を共有する可能性があります。
   詳しくはこのプライバシーポリシーのデータ共有の 部分もご参照ください。
   エ）お客様の権利
     * アウトブレインのオプトアウト

   お客様は、いつでもアウトブレインのパーソナルレコメンデーションからオプトアウトすることができます。お客様の個人データ及びその個人データに基づい
   てお客様にレコメンデーションをすることに関しては、アウトブレインのinterest プロファイル
   をご参照ください。お客様は、興味プロフィールからパーソナルレコメンデーションをオプトアウトすることもできます。ブラウザ上で行うオプトアウトはア
   ウトブレインのinterest プロファイル
   上で行われるものであり、アプリ上でのパーソナルレコメンデーションのオプトアウトはお客様のデバイスの設定を通して行われるものであることにご注意く
   ださい（interest プロファイル にオプトアウトの際のステップの例があります）。
   ご注意ください アウトブレインからオプトアウトしても：
     * お客様に対してまだアウトブレインのレコメンデーションが表示されます。
       アウトブレインのパーソナルトラッキングからオプトアウトをしてもアウトブレインからのレコメンデーションが表示されなくなるわけではありませ
       ん。以降表示されるレコメンデーションはお客様に特化していないだけのものとなります。レコメンデーションは、そのページに関するレコメンデー
       ションを提供するために、お客様が閲覧している文書に関する情報を利用します。
     * オプトアウトはクッキーベースであって、デバイス及びブラウザに特有される
       ものです。お客様が複数のデバイス又はブラウザからウェブサイトを訪問する場合、お客様のすべてのデバイス又はブラウザにおいてパーソナルトラ
       ッキングがなされないようにするため、お客様ご自身ですべてのデバイス又はブラウザにおいてオプトアウトをしていただく必要があります。また、
       お客様は新しいデバイスを買い、ブラウザを変更し、又はオプトアウトのクッキーを削除する場合、再度オプトアウトしなければなりません。また、
       パーソナルトラッキングからオプトアウトすることと、クッキー自体をブロックすることとは異なりますのでご注意ください。
     * お客様は、お客様のUUID
       と対応するプロフィールの削除を保証するために、最低２１日間の間はアウトブレインをオプトインしないようにご注意ください。
       お客様のアウトブレインのパーソナルレコメンデーションからのオプトアウトは直ちに実施されます。しかし、お客様のブラウザがローカル保存をす
       る設定となっており、オプトアウトから２１日以内にアウトブレインのパーソナルレコメンデーションにオプトインする場合、お客様のUUID
       にお客様の従前のプロフィールが再接続される可能性があります。お客様が２１日間以内にオプトインしない場合、お客様のプロフィールは削除され
       、回復することができなくなります。
     * アウトブレインのオプトアウト機能はクッキーに基づくものであり、ユーザーの希望を遵守するように作成されます。しかし、iOS11の
       Intelligent Tracking
       Preventionという機能は、２４時間の範囲を超える場合にウェブサイトのクッキーに影響を与える可能性があります。アウトブレインは、
       お客様が他の会社のオプトアウト方法に依存しなくてもいいように、他のブラウザを使用し、又はブラウザから第三者のクッキーをすべてブロックす
       ることをお勧めします。
     * オプトアウトの追加のオプション

   お客様は、NAI又はDAA のページ（DAA：http://www.aboutads.info/choices 、 DAAC：
   www.youradchoices.ca/choices、及び／又は EDAA
   www.youronlinechoices.eu）のような業界のツールを通してアウトブレイン又は他のアドバタイザーからのパーソナルアドバタイジ
   ングをオプトアウトすることもできます。お客様は、 NAI 、DAA、 DAAC、又は
   EDAAのページを訪問することにより、参加するメンバーのサービスから全体的、又は部分的にオプトアウトすることができます。こちらにもオプトアウト
   することで、アウトブレインのオプトアウトと同じように、お客様に広告が表示されないようになるという意味ではなく、ただお客様にパーソナルな広告が表
   示されないという意味になります。お客様が訪問するウェブサイトに基づく広告（例えば、内容に基づく広告）はまだお客様に対して表示されます。また、お
   客様は、 DAA、DAAC、又は
   EDAAコンスマーチョイスのウェブサイトを訪問する際にブラウザがクッキーを却下するように設定される場合、お客様のオプトアウトが実施されない可能
   性があります。
     * 法的根拠：
       ユーザーの個人データを処理することに関する法的根拠は、アウトブレインの各パートナーサイトの法的根拠に基づくものです。各パートナーサイト
       は、「同意」又は「正当な利益」に基づく法的根拠があります。各パートナーサイトの法的根拠の詳細については、各パートナーサイトのプライバシ
       ーポリシーをご参照ください。アウトブレインは、パートナーが「同意」という法的根拠を採用している場合、パートナーサイトにおいてお客様が同
       意しない限りクッキーを送信しません。

   ビジネスパートナー： お客様は、会社の役割としてアウトブレインの Amplify又はEngage
   のサービスを利用できるようにに登録する（又はアウトブレインとメールのやり取りを行う）場合、ビジネスパートナーとなります。詳しくは こちらへ.
   ア）収集する情報及びその理由
   お客様は、Amplify又はEngage
   のサービスに登録又はアウトブレインとのやり取りを行う際に個人データ（例えばメールアドレスなど）をアウトブレインに提供する可能性があります。お客
   様がビジネスパートナーとなることを希望される際には、アドバタイザーの申込書、広告掲載申込書、又は他の申込書において追加の情報が要求される可能性
   があります。アウトブレインは、アウトブレインダッシュボードにおいて、お客様に対応するユーザーネームの行動に関する情報を自動的に収集します。例え
   ば、お客様がキャンペーンの CPCを変更する場合、アウトブレインの監査証跡に全てのCPCの変更に対応する行動の記録が残ります。
   アウトブレインは、お客様とのビジネスパートナー（又はなり得るビジネスパートナー）としての契約条件を遵守するために例えば下記のような目的のため上
   記のようなデータを収集し、処理します。
     * お客様からのご質問及びお問い合わせに対応すること
     * お客様にAmplify及び
       Engageサービスが提供する機能へのアクセスを提供すること（例えばお客様のダッシュボードアカウントを提供、管理すること）
     * お客様のアイデンティティーを確認すること
     * お客様にお客様のアカウント、アウトブレインのサービス、又はAmplify及び
       Engageのサービスに関するプロモーションについてご連絡すること

   イ）利用するクッキー、又は使用する技術
   アウトブレインがビジネスパートナーに対して使用するクッキー（及びその有効期間）に関する詳細については、こちらのクッキーテーブル
   の「ビジネスパートナー」の部分をご参照ください。
   ウ）情報の共有
   アウトブレインは、ベンダー、コントラクター、又はアウトブレインのサービスをサポートする他の第三者（例えば、クレジットカード処理）にビジネスパー
   トナーの情報を開示する可能性があります。詳しくはこのプライバシーポリシーの データ共有 の部分をご参照ください。
   エ）お客様の権利
   お客様がビジネスパートナーとして、個人データを確認、修正、更新、又は削除を希望する場合、アウトブレインのダッシュボードの「プロフィール設定」か
   ら行っていただくことができます。あるいは、support@outbrain.com
   までご連絡ください。お客様は、お客様にアウトブレインのメールが送信されている場合、そのメールに記載されているリンクを通して配信停止をすることも
   できます。「配信停止」によっても、アウトブレインのサービスを提供するために必要な連絡又は通知にはオプトアウトの効果は生じません（例えば、請求書
   など）。
   アウトブレインがビジネスパートナーの個人データを処理する法的根拠は「正当な利益」です。
   ３．アウトブレインの情報保持、欧州経済領域外への移転、共有及び保存
   +
   セキュリティー
   アウトブレインには専門のセキュリティーチームがあります。アウトブレインは個人データの厳密な管理体制を整備し、その個人データは、ファイアウォール
   が設けられた安全なサーバーに保存され、且つ、アクセス権が限定されます。詳しくはアウトブレインのセキュリティー規定 をご参照ください。
   ビジネスパートナーは、Amply又はEngage
   のサービスにおいてパスワードによって保護される機能に対するアクセス権が有します。ビジネスパートナーはこのパスワードを秘密情報として扱う責任があ
   ります。お客様はインターネットを通じた情報通信は完全に安全ではないということにご注意ください。「スプーフィング」又は「フィッシング」と呼ばれる
   詐欺行為もあります。「スプーフィング」又は「フィッシング」とは、信頼されている主体になりすまして個人データを求める電子メールです。アウトブレイ
   ンが、クレジットカード、銀行情報、又は他の個人データを求めるメールを送信することはありません。もしお客様が、アウトブレインになりすました個人デ
   ータを求めるメールを受信したような場合には、これに対し返事すること、又は表示されたリンクをクリックすることのないようにご注意ください。アウトブ
   レインがそのインターネットを通じた詐欺行為を確認できるように、何かありましたら、 legal@outbrain.comまでにご連絡ください。
   欧州／欧州経済領域外のデータ移転
   アウトブレインは、欧州又は欧州経済領域から、欧州と同等のデータプライバシー保護がなされていない国にデータを移転する場合、適切なデータプライバシ
   ー保護を提供できるような措置を実施します。つまり、お客様のデータはお客様の権利と一緒に移転します。例えば、私たちは承認された契約条項（標準契約
   条項）の使用やその他の個人データの受領者がお客様のデータを保護するための措置を実施します。
   共有
   以上のユーザータイプ別の個人データの開示に加えて、次の方法で個人データが開示される可能性もあります。
     * ビジネス及び業務遂行を目的として、アウトブレインの関連子会社間における開示
     * アウトブレインが合併、買収、又は事業譲渡の対象となることにより、個人データも移転対象となることによる開示
     * 法令、規則、管轄官庁の求めに応じた開示（例えば、法律の執行の又は他の訴訟手続きの協力を目的とする開示）
     * 緊急事態下における開示

   上記に加えて、アウトブレインは、傾向情報及び集合体のユーザー情報を第三者に共有できるようにお客様の個人データと他のユーザー情報を結合します。結
   合される情報は常に集合体及び匿名扱いの状態にあります。
   データ保持
   アウトブレインが使用するクッキー（自らのクッキー及び第三者のも含む）の有効期間はクッキーテーブル に記載されます。
   アウトブレインは、個人データが法律上及び取引上どの程度の期間必要とされるかという分析を踏まえて、データの保存期間を定めるデータ保持ポリシーを整
   備します。
   個人データの必要性がなくなった場合、アウトブレインは確実に個人情報を削除、又は消去します。デバイス、ブラウザ、又は個人を特定しない集合体データ
   は、報告又は分析のため、商業的な必要性がある限り保持されます。
   ４．未成年に対して
   +
   アウトブレインは16歳未満の未成年を対象とするサービスを提供しません。また、アウトブレインは、
   16歳未満の未成年の個人データを意図的に収集することは行いません。データを取集する際にサイト訪問者、ユーザー、又はビジネスパートナーが16
   歳未満の未成年であることが判明した場合、その個人データが利用され、又は保存されることはありません。アウトブレインは、意図せず
   16歳未満の未成年者の個人データを収集したことを知った場合、その個人データを削除するために必要となる合理的な対応を行います。アウトブレインは、
   未成年者はアウトブレインを利用するよりも、外で遊ぶ方が望ましいと考えています。
   ５．欧州市民
   +
   欧州の市民には、欧州のプライバシーに関する法律、特に欧州の個人データ保護規則（General Data Protection
   Regulation）（以下「
   GDPR」という）に基づいた個人データに関するアクセス、訂正、拒否、削除、ブロック、及び苦情申し立ての権利があります。具体的には、
     * お客様の個人データが処理されているか否か、されているとすれば、どの情報についてであるのかについての情報を求める権利及び個人データの修正
       あるいは訂正を求める権利
     * 状況により、自己の個人データの削除を求める権利
     * 状況により、自己の個人データの処理の限定を求める権利
     * お客様の個人データの処理及び利用に対する同意の全部または一部を撤回する権利
     * 一般的に、整理された、機械的に読み取ることができる方法で事故の個人データのコピーを取得する権利
     * アウトブレインのデータ保持及びお客様の個人データの処理に関する質問、コメント、要求、又は苦情がある場合に、アウトブレインのData
       Protection Officerと連絡する権利
     * 規則に違反した個人データの処理が行われていると信じる場合の監督機関に対する苦情申し立ての権利

   上記に加えてこのプライバシーポリシーに欧州市民の権利が参照されます。GDPRに応じて、「欧州市民」とは、欧州経済領域及びスイス連邦を意味します
   。このプライバシーポリシーにおいては、「欧州」とは、ブレグジット以降イギリスが欧州連合から脱退した後でもイギリスを含むものとします。
   上記の権利についてお問い合わせがある場合、PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com までご連絡ください。
   ６．カリフォルニア州のプライバシーポリシー
   +
   カリフォルニア州住民は、カリフォルニア州の民法1798.83
   及び1798.84号により、アウトブレインに、アウトブレインがダイレクトマーケティングできるように第三者又は関連会社と共有する個人データのカテ
   ゴリーが記載された通知書の発行を求める権利があります。その通知書には共有される情報が特定され、また共有する第三者及び関連会社、その第三者及び関
   連会社の住所が含まれます。お客様がカリフォルニア州住民の場合、この通知書を取得するためには
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.comまでご連絡ください。又は次の住所までご連絡ください。
   Outbrain Inc.
   39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor
   New York, NY 10011
   応答のために30日間かかりますのでご了承ください。
   ７．「Do Not Track」の開示
   +
   ブラウザによって「Do Not Track」（以下「DNT
   」という）の信号が通信されます。アウトブレインは、DNT信号に関して一般的な解読がないため、現在ブラウザからの DNT
   信号に対応していません。アウトブレインは、DNT 信号に関する業界活動を監視し、必要性に応じて DNT 活動を更新します。
   お客様は、アウトブレインがユーザーのところにおいて パーソナルレコメンデーションからオプトアウトすること
   も含む他の提供されるツールを利用してデータ収集及び利用を管理することができます。
   ８．プライバシーポリシーの更新
   +
   アウトブレインはこのプライバシーポリシーを随時更新します。アウトブレインはサイト訪問者又はビジネスパートナーがこれを明確に知ることができるよう
   変更のお知らせをサイト上で表示しますが、ユーザーに対し個別に通知をする方法を有していません。アウトブレインは、お客様ご自身でプライバシーポリシ
   ーの更新を確認するため、このページを定期的に閲覧されるようお願いいたします。プライバシーポリシーの更新日付は、お客様にこのプライバシーポリシー
   がいつ更新されたのかをご確認いただけるように、常にこのページの上において表示されます。

Effective July 29, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

                                 Última atualização: 23 de maio de 2018

   A Outbrain tem o compromisso de proteger seus dados pessoais. Esta
   política de privacidade (“Política de Privacidade”) rege o uso pela
   Outbrain dos dados coletados por nós, incluindo todos e quaisquer dados
   pessoais. Dados pessoais são informações relacionadas a você e que
   podem identificá-lo como indivíduo. Usamos seus dados pessoais
   cumprindo todas as leis aplicáveis. Para garantir a conformidade e o
   alinhamento aos valores da Outbrain de confiança e transparência, temos
   uma equipe de especialistas responsável por implementar continuamente o
   nosso programa global de privacidade.

                                                              + EXPAND ALL

   1. Quem somos, o que fazemos, como contatar a Outbrain, nosso DPO ou as
   autoridades competentes

                                      +

   Quem somos:
   Outbrain representa a Outbrain Inc., empresa de Delaware, EUA com sede
   em Nova York; e suas subsidiárias afiliadas (coletivamente denominadas
   “Outbrain” ou “nós”, “nos”, “nosso(as)”). Operamos a partir de 12
   escritórios globalmente e trabalhamos em parceria com editores de
   conteúdo e marketing do mundo todo.
   O que fazemos:
   A missão da Outbrain é oferecer recomendações interessantes aos seus
   Usuários com base nos seus interesses. Para cumprir nossa missão,
   firmamos acordos com:
     * Produtores e editores de conteúdo on-line e parceiros que desejam
       recomendar conteúdo relevante aos seus leitores (no Outbrain
       Engage); e
     * anunciantes que desejam que leitores visualizem seu conteúdo (no
       Outbrain Amplify).

   Como nos contatar:
   Fazemos verificações regulares de conformidade com base nesta Política
   de Privacidade. Perguntas, comentários e solicitações relacionados a
   esta Política de Privacidade são bem-vindos e devem ser encaminhados a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou via correio a Outbrain Inc., 39 West
   13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, USA, Attn: Privacy
   Questions.
   Caso a Outbrain não forneça resposta satisfatória para suas perguntas
   ou preocupações, também é possível contatar o seguinte departamento
   para orientações, suporte ou reclamações:
     * responsável externa Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) da Outbrain:
       ePrivacy GmbH, representada pelo Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. A
       ePrivacy GmbH pode ser contatada diretamente via
       privacy@eprivacy.eu; e/ou
     * o órgão público britânico Information Commissioner’s Officer, que é
       o principal serviço supervisor da Outbrain nos Territórios
       Europeus.

   Órgãos de autorregulação
   A Outbrain segue os Princípios de Autorregulação definidos pela Digital
   Advertising Alliance (DAA) e pela European Interactive Digital
   Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Somos membros conceituados da Network
   Advertising Initiative (NAI), associação dedicada à coleta responsável
   de dados e ao seu uso para publicidade digital. Seguimos o Code of
   Conduct for Web and Mobile (Código de Conduta para Web e Internet
   Móvel) da NAI. A Outbrain também segue os Self-Regulatory Principles
   for Online Behavioral Advertising (Princípios de Autorregulação para
   Publicidade Comportamental On-line) e o Europe OBA Framework do
   Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB).
   2. Tipos de usuários da Outbrain

                                      +

   Parte desta Política de Privacidade está dividida em seções baseadas no
   seu modo de interagir com a Outbrain portanto é necessário definir em
   qual tipo de usuário você se encaixa. Para cada tipo de usuário,
   explicamos que tipo de informação coletamos e por que, quais cookies e
   outras tecnologias similares usamos, como compartilhamos essas
   informações e quais são os seus direitos.
   Visitantes do Site: Você é um “Visitante do Site” ao visitar e
   interagir com nossos websites, páginas na web, recursos interativos,
   blogs e seus respectivos conteúdos no Outbrain.com (ou qualquer página
   derivada, como Outbrain.co.uk; Outbrain.fr; Outbrain.de, etc.) e no
   MyOutbrain.com (“Nossos Sites“). Veja mais aqui.
   (a)&Tab;Quais informações coletamos e por quê
   Queremos entender quais serviços nos Nossos Sites interessam a você e
   lembrá-lo dos serviços que oferecemos quando você não está nos Nossos
   Sites. Para fazê-lo, coletamos as seguintes informações suas: (i)
   endereço IP; (ii) dados do Agente do Usuário: tipo de dispositivo (ex.:
   iPhone), tipo de navegador (ex.: Chrome), sistema operacional (ex.:
   iOS); (iii) páginas visitadas no Nosso Site (ex.: página “Sobre nós” da
   Outbrain); (iv) horário da visita (e respectivo fuso horário); e (v)
   URLs de encaminhamento e outras informações normalmente transmitidas em
   solicitações HTTP (ex.: essas informações nos dizem como você chegou
   aos Nossos Sites).
   (b)&Tab;Quais cookies e outras tecnologias similares utilizamos
   Consulte esta Tabela de Cookies em “Visitantes do Site” para uma lista
   detalhada dos cookies (e os respectivos períodos de retenção) que
   usamos quando você visita os Nossos Sites.
   (c)&Tab;Como podemos compartilhar informações
     * Compartilhamento de informações que coletamos sobre você nos Nossos
       Sites.

   De maneira geral, não compartilhamos dados pessoais seus com terceiros
   para fins de marketing ou publicidade de terceiros. No entanto,
   recorremos a vários terceiros (todos listados nesta Tabela de Cookies)
   para nos ajudar a vender ou fazer publicidade para você. Por exemplo:
   alguns dos cookies que usamos nos Nossos Sites pertencem a terceiros
   que ajudarão a Outbrain a vender ou fazer publicidade para você.
   Exigimos que esses terceiros e empresas se comprometam a manter
   confidenciais todas as informações compartilhadas com eles e a usar as
   informações somente para cumprir suas obrigações conosco. Fazemos isso
   firmando acordos com todos os terceiros que processam dados pessoais em
   nosso nome para garantir que eles processem seus dados pessoais em
   conformidade com nossas instruções exatas e com todas as leis de
   proteção de dados aplicáveis. Se você publicar em nosso blog, seu
   comentário e suas informações ficarão visíveis publicamente. Entre em
   contato com support@outbrain.com para solicitar a remoção do seu
   comentário.
     * Usando serviços de terceiros nos Nossos Sites.

   Nossos Sites contêm links para outros websites que não operamos nem são
   de nossa propriedade. Não controlamos, recomendamos ou endossamos o
   conteúdo, os produtos, serviços, políticas de privacidade ou práticas
   desses websites de terceiros. Por exemplo: nos Nossos Sites, você
   notará ícones clicáveis que o levam à página da Outbrain no Facebook ou
   no LinkedIn. Ao escolher clicar nesses links, você deve estar ciente de
   que Facebook e LinkedIn podem enviar seus próprios cookies ao seu
   aparelho, que podem coletar dados pessoais de maneira independente. Por
   isso, é importante que você leia as políticas de privacidade do
   Facebook e/ou LinkedIn.
     * Consulte também a seção de Compartilhamento desta Política de
       Privacidade.

   (d)&Tab;Seus direitos
   Os Termos de Uso no Nosso Site regem o uso do Nosso Site e também se
   aplicam a você. Você pode interromper o uso do Nosso Site a qualquer
   momento. Ao fazê-lo, também tem a opção de remover quaisquer cookies
   que tenhamos colocado em qualquer dispositivo usado para acessar o
   Nosso Site. Se você forneceu seu endereço de e-mail durante o uso dos
   Nossos Sites, todos os e-mails que você receber da Outbrain incluirão a
   opção de se “descadastrar”.
   Para Visitantes no Território Europeu, a Outbrain implementou uma
   plataforma de gestão de consentimento (operada pela One Trust) nos
   Nossos Sites que dá aos visitantes a oportunidade de autorizar ou não
   cookies e tecnologias similares de rastreamento nos Nossos Sites. Se
   você não deu seu consentimento (especificamente em “aceitar”), a
   Outbrain não permitirá que Nosso Site instale cookies. A base legal da
   Outbrain para processar dados pessoais em Nossos Sites é o
   consentimento. Você pode retirar seu consentimento a qualquer momento
   aqui.
   Usuários: Você é um “Usuário” ao visitar uma página de um website ou
   aplicativo de um dos parceiros da Outbrain onde o widget da Outbrain
   esteja instalado (“Sites Parceiros”). Por exemplo, ao visitar
   https://news.sky.com/uk, www.spiegel.de ou www.cnn.com, o widget
   Outbrain está implementado nesses sites. Ao interagir com um widget da
   Outbrain, você é informado por um texto que faz referência à Outbrain
   (ex.: “Recomendado pela Outbrain” ou “by Outbrain” ao lado das
   recomendações). Ao clicar no link que faz referência à Outbrain, você
   verá um aviso detalhado que permite acessar o Perfil de Interesse da
   Outbrain, que fornece uma visualização geral dos tipos de categorias de
   dados da Outbrain que podem ser usados para fazer suas recomendações.
   Ele também permite optar por recusar recomendações personalizadas. Veja
   mais aqui.
   Exemplo de widget da Outbrain
   [S1q4BIXJQ.png]
   (a) Quais informações coletamos e por quê
   Usamos UUIDs, endereço IP e outras Informações de Uso para poder lhe
   oferecer recomendações interessantes. As recomendações da Outbrain
   podem ser pagas por um anunciante que redireciona você para um novo
   website ou podem ser orgânicas, com link para outra página no site do
   mesmo anunciante.
     * UUID.

   Quando, como usuário, você visita pela primeira vez um Site Parceiro
   (ex.: CNN.com), a Outbrain instala um cookie no seu dispositivo para
   gerar um UUID (identificador único de usuário). Nós catalogamos e
   analisamos o conteúdo que você consome nos Sites Parceiros. Nossas
   recomendações baseiam-se em: (i) histórico de navegação; (ii) padrões
   de navegação similares de outros Usuários; (ii) recomendações
   geralmente populares entre o público da Outbrain atualmente; (iv) um
   certo grau de aleatoriedade; e (v) requisitos de público-alvo que podem
   ser fornecidos ou solicitados por nossos clientes Amplify. Por exemplo,
   a Outbrain pode saber que o UUID 123 (que poderia ser você no seu
   iPhone X acessando o jornal Guardian usando o Chrome como navegador)
   gosta de ler sobre destinos de férias remotos e que pessoas que gostam
   de ler sobre destinos de férias remotos também gostam de ler sobre
   comida exótica.
   O UUID é uma sequência de números e/ou letras. Esse UUID vincula-se ao
   seu dispositivo e varia conforme o navegador que você usa. Em outras
   palavras, a Outbrain registra um UUID diferente dependendo do aparelho
   e/ou navegador que você está usando ao acessar os Sites Parceiros. Por
   exemplo, isso significa que você terá um UUID quando visitar um Site
   Parceiro a partir do seu celular usando o navegador Safari e outro UUID
   ao visitar um Site Parceiro do seu iPad usando o navegador Safari. A
   Outbrain combinará e consolidará o UUID de um aparelho móvel (celular
   ou tablet) por um navegador que depois acessa um aplicativo (ou
   vice-versa) a partir do mesmo dispositivo.
   Atribuir um UUID permite à Outbrain associar as visualizações das
   páginas visitadas e cliques nas recomendações da Outbrain desse UUID –
   tudo com o objetivo de fornecer recomendações interessantes.
     * Endereço IP e outras Informações de Uso.

   Coletamos um UUID conforme explicado acima e ainda as seguintes
   informações: (i) endereço IP (depois anonimizado com base nos padrões
   do setor); (ii) dados do Agente do Usuário: tipo de dispositivo (ex.:
   iPhone), tipo de navegador (ex.: Chrome), sistema operacional (ex.:
   iOS); (iii) páginas visitadas; (iv) horário da visita; e (v) URLs de
   encaminhamento e outras informações normalmente transmitidas em
   solicitações HTTP.
   As informações estatísticas acima nos fornecem dados de como muitos
   Usuários visitaram determinada página dos nossos Sites Parceiros que
   tem o widget da Outbrain instalado, quanto tempo cada Usuário ficou
   nessa página, o tipo de conteúdo na página em que clicou e como foi seu
   engajamento geral com a página em questão. Essas informações só são
   dados pessoais quando associadas a um UUID.
   (b) Quais cookies e outras tecnologias similares utilizamos
   Consulte esta Tabela de Cookies em “Usuários” para uma lista detalhada
   dos cookies internos que usamos quando você interage com Sites
   Parceiros que tenham a tecnologia Outbrain implementada.
   Ao clicar no link para uma das nossas recomendações, o anunciante
   Amplify que patrocina a recomendação pode instalar cookies no seu
   aparelho via redirecionamentos antes da chegada à página de destino das
   recomendações ou ao chegar à página de destino. Nesses casos, você
   estará sujeito à política de privacidade desse anunciante.
   Além do widget visível em Sites Parceiros da Outbrain, determinados
   anunciantes Outbrain podem implementar o pixel Outbrain nos seus
   websites. O pixel Outbrain determina se o usuário que acessa a página
   na qual o pixel está instalado possui um UUID Outbrain. Se houver um
   UUID associado a esse usuário final, a Outbrain permitirá que
   anunciantes redirecionem sua publicidade a esses UUIDs e/ou fornecerá
   aos anunciantes o número total de UUIDs que acessaram a página em
   questão. Se não houver UUID Outbrain associado ao usuário que visitou a
   página, o pixel Outbrain não coletará nenhuma informação sobre o
   usuário. Encorajamos anunciantes a comunicar o uso do pixel Outbrain
   nos seus próprios websites. A Outbrain não combina informações do pixel
   a perfis UUID.
   Pontos de dados como visualizações de páginas e cliques são vinculados
   a um UUID particular e mantidos por 13 meses. Por exemplo: se o UUID
   123 leu um artigo em 31 de dezembro de 2017, em 1º de fevereiro de 2018
   esse artigo deixará de fazer parte do perfil UUID 123.
   (c) Como podemos compartilhar informações
   A Outbrain não compartilha perfis de Usuário com nenhum terceiro.
   Contudo, podemos compartilhar o UUID com determinados parceiros para
   fins de sincronização de cookies ou com base em requisitos técnicos.
   Consulte também a seção de Compartilhamento desta Política de
   Privacidade.
   (d) Seus direitos
     * Recusa à Outbrain.

   Você pode optar por recusar as recomendações personalizadas da Outbrain
   a qualquer momento. Consulte o Perfil de Interesse da Outbrain para uma
   visualização geral dos dados que a Outbrain conhece a seu respeito e
   pode usar para fazer suas recomendações. O Perfil de Interesse também
   permite optar por recusar recomendações personalizadas (você também
   pode fazer a recusa simplesmente clicando aqui). Note que a recusa nos
   navegadores é feita pelo Perfil de Interesse da Outbrain, mas que a
   recusa de recomendações personalizadas em aplicativos é feita pelas
   configurações do seu dispositivo (veja exemplos de passo a passo no
   Perfil de Interesse).
   IMPORTANTE – mesmo fazendo a recusa à Outbrain:
     * Você ainda verá recomendações da Outbrain. Recusar o rastreamento
       para personalização da Outbrain não significa que você deixará de
       receber recomendações da Outbrain. Em vez disso, significa que as
       recomendações da Outbrain não serão personalizadas. As
       recomendações ainda usarão informações sobre o documento que você
       está visualizando (ou seja, informações contextuais) para lhe
       fornecer recomendações na página em questão.
     * A recusa baseia-se em cookies e é específica para cada
       dispositivo/navegador. Se você navegar na internet em diferentes
       dispositivos e/ou navegadores, você precisará fazer a recusa em
       cada aparelho e/ou navegador para que possamos impedir o
       rastreamento para personalização em todos eles. Pela mesma razão,
       se você comprar um novo dispositivo, mudar de navegador ou excluir
       (ou limpar) o cookie de recusa, será necessário fazer a recusa
       novamente. Recusar o rastreamento para personalização não significa
       bloquear cookies.
     * Para garantir a exclusão do perfil vinculado ao seu UUID, não
       exclua seu cookie de recusa da Outbrain por ao menos 21 dias. Sua
       recusa às recomendações personalizadas da Outbrain entra em vigor
       imediatamente. No entanto, se o seu navegador permite armazenamento
       local e você aceitar novamente as recomendações personalizadas da
       Outbrain dentro de 21 dias após sua recusa, é possível que seu
       perfil anterior seja revinculado ao seu UUID. Se você não fizer
       nova aceitação dentro de 21 dias, seu perfil será excluído e não
       poderá ser recuperado.
     * Como acontece na maioria das recusas, a recusa à Outbrain no
       navegador é feita usando um cookie. O cookie de recusa é feito para
       ser mantido, a fim de cumprir as preferências do usuário. No
       entanto, o recurso de “Prevenção de Rastreamento Inteligente” do
       Safari no iOS 11 pode impactar na persistência dos cookies entre
       websites após uma janela de 24 horas. Sugerimos usar outro
       navegador ou bloquear todos os cookies de terceiros do navegador
       para que você faça a recusa sem precisar depender de nenhuma
       metodologia de recusa de nenhuma empresa.
     * Opções adicionais de recusa.

   Você também pode optar por recusar receber anúncios personalizados
   oferecidos por nós ou outras empresas de publicidade usando ferramentas
   de entidades do setor, como as páginas da NAI ou as diversas páginas
   baseadas na DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC,
   www.youradchoices.ca/choices e/ou EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu).
   Visitando as páginas da NAI, DAA, DAAC ou EDAA pró-escolha do
   consumidor permite recusar todos ou alguns dos serviços dos membros
   participantes. Como ocorre na recusa junto à Outbrain, essas recusas
   não significam que você deixará de receber todos os anúncios: eles só
   deixarão de ser sob medida para você. Você pode continuar a receber
   anúncios; por exemplo, com base no website específico que você está
   visualizando (ou seja, anúncios baseados no contexto). E se os seus
   navegadores estiverem configurados para rejeitar cookies quando você
   visitar as páginas pró-escolha do consumidor da DAA, DAAC ou EDAA, a
   recusa também pode não funcionar corretamente.
     * Bases legais.

   Os fundamentos legais da Outbrain para processar dados pessoais de
   Usuários apoiam-se nas bases legais determinadas por cada um dos nossos
   Sites Parceiros. Cada Site Parceiro baseia-se em consentimento ou
   interesse legítimo. Consulte a política de privacidade aplicável dos
   Sites Parceiros para mais informações sobre as bases legais utilizadas.
   Se um Parceiro se basear no seu consentimento, a Outbrain não instalará
   um cookie nos seus aparelhos sem que você tenha dado seu consentimento
   no respectivo Site Parceiro.
   Parceiros Comerciais: Você é um “Parceiro Comercial” ao se cadastrar
   (ou trocar e-mails com a Outbrain) em nome da empresa para a qual
   trabalha para utilizar os serviços Outbrain Amplify ou Outbrain Engage.
   Veja mais aqui.
   (a) Quais informações coletamos e por quê
   Você pode fornecer determinados dados pessoais (como endereço de
   e-mail) ao se inscrever para os serviços Amplify ou Engage ou se
   comunicar ou interagir conosco por outros meios. Se você se inscrever
   para se tornar Parceiro Comercial, podemos solicitar informações
   adicionais suas via formulários de inscrição para anunciante, pedidos
   de inserção e outros meios. Coletamos informações automaticamente sobre
   as ações do seu nome de usuário no painel da Outbrain. Por exemplo, se
   como Parceiro Comercial Amplify você alterar o custo por clique de uma
   de suas campanhas, o registro de auditoria da Outbrain terá o histórico
   de todas essas ações.
   Coletamos e processamos os dados pessoais acima para cumprir nossas
   obrigações nos termos do nosso acordo como Parceiro Comercial (ou
   potencial Parceiro Comercial) seu, inclusive para:
   responder às suas perguntas e solicitações;
   fornecer acesso a determinadas funções e recursos dos nossos serviços
   Amplify ou Engage (ex.: para fornecimento e manutenção da sua conta no
   painel);
   verificar sua identidade;
   nos comunicar com você sobre sua conta, nossos produtos e promoções
   disponíveis relevantes para o seu uso do serviço Amplify ou Engage.
   (b) Quais cookies e outras tecnologias similares utilizamos
   Consulte esta Tabela de Cookies em “Parceiros Comerciais” para uma
   lista detalhada dos cookies (e os respectivos períodos de retenção) que
   usamos com Parceiros Comerciais.
   (c) Como podemos compartilhar informações
   Podemos revelar determinadas informações de Parceiros Comerciais a
   fornecedores, prestadores de serviços ou outros que auxiliem a Outbrain
   na prestação dos seus serviços (ex.: processamento de cartões de
   crédito). Consulte também a seção de Compartilhamento desta Política de
   Privacidade.
   (d) Seus direitos
   Se, como Parceiro Comercial, você deseja verificar, corrigir, atualizar
   ou solicitar desativação das suas informações, você pode acessar o
   painel da Outbrain para editar suas preferências de perfil ou nos
   contatar em support@outbrain.com. Se você está recebendo e-mails da
   Outbrain, você pode se “descadastrar” acessando o link nos e-mails.
   Observe que o descadastramento pode não desativar o recebimento de
   notificações importantes para o fornecimento dos serviços Amplify ou
   Engage (ex.: faturas por e-mail).
   A base legal da Outbrain para processar dados pessoais dos Parceiros
   Comerciais é o seu interesse legítimo.
   3. Como mantemos a segurança das informações, transferências fora do
   EEE, compartilhamento e períodos de retenção

                                      +

   Segurança
   A Outbrain possui uma equipe de segurança dedicada. Mantemos rigorosos
   controles sobre os dados que coletamos, mantendo-os em bancos de dados
   protegidos com firewall e permissões de acesso estritamente limitadas e
   controladas, para garantir sua segurança. Verifique nossos padrões de
   segurança para mais informações.
   Parceiros Comerciais têm acesso a certos recursos protegidos por senha
   dos serviços Amplify ou Engage. Eles são responsáveis por manter sua
   senha confidencial. Lembre-se que, infelizmente, a transmissão de
   informações via internet não é totalmente segura. Um tipo de fraude
   comum na internet é conhecido como spoofing ou phishing. Ele ocorre
   quando você recebe um e-mail de uma fonte que parece legítima
   solicitando dados pessoais seus. Tenha em mente que não lhe mandaremos
   nenhum e-mail solicitando a verificação de cartão de crédito,
   informações bancárias ou quaisquer outros dados pessoais. Se você vier
   a receber um e-mail que pareça ser nosso solicitando essas informações
   suas, não responda e não clique em nenhum link constante no e-mail. Em
   vez disso, pedimos que nos encaminhe o e-mail para legal@outbrain.com
   para que possamos investigar possíveis casos de fraude pela internet.
   Transferências de dados fora da UE/do EEE
   Quando transferimos dados pessoais do Espaço Econômico Europeu a outros
   países nos quais as leis aplicáveis não oferecem o mesmo nível de
   proteção à privacidade dos dados que nos Territórios Europeus, tomamos
   medidas para fornecer um nível adequado de proteção à privacidade dos
   dados. Em outras palavras, seus direitos e proteções são conservados
   com seus dados. Por exemplo: usamos cláusulas contratuais aprovadas e
   outras medidas criadas para garantir que os receptores dos seus dados
   pessoais os protejam.
   Compartilhamento
   Adicionalmente à descrição de como podemos revelar seus dados pessoais
   para cada tipo de usuário, também podemos divulgar dados pessoais nos
   seguintes casos:
     * Dentro do grupo de empresas controladas pela Outbrain, por razões
       internas, principalmente para fins comerciais e operacionais;
     * Se passarmos por uma transição comercial, como uma fusão, aquisição
       por outra empresa ou venda total ou parcial dos nossos ativos, seus
       dados pessoais provavelmente estarão entre os ativos transferidos;
     * Quando legalmente exigido (ex.: para cooperar com investigações
       para aplicação da lei ou outros procedimentos legais); e/ou
     * Para reagir a emergências reais.

   Adicionalmente, combinamos seus dados pessoais aos dos outros usuários
   para compartilhar informações sobre tendências e reunir estatísticas de
   usuários com terceiros, sempre de forma agregada e anonimizada.
   Retenção de dados
   O período de retenção para cada um dos cookies usados pela Outbrain
   (seja por ela mesma ou em nosso nome por terceiros) está descrito na
   Tabela de Cookies.
   A Outbrain também mantém uma Política de Retenção de Dados que detalha
   o período de retenção de dados pessoais com base em nossa análise do
   prazo razoável em que é necessário manter cada dado específico para
   fins legais ou comerciais. Quando não precisamos mais dos dados
   pessoais, os excluímos ou destruímos com segurança. Dados agregados,
   que não são capazes de identificar um dispositivo/navegador (ou
   indivíduo) e são usados para fins de relatórios e análise, são mantidos
   enquanto comercialmente necessários.
   4. Crianças

                                      +

   Nenhum dos nossos serviços é destinado a crianças menores de 16 anos.
   Não coletamos deliberadamente dados pessoais de menores de 16 anos de
   idade. Se durante a coleta constatarmos que um Visitante do Site,
   Usuário ou Parceiro Comercial é menor de 16 anos, não usaremos ou
   manteremos seus dados pessoais. Se tomarmos ciência de que
   involuntariamente coletamos dados pessoais de uma criança menor de 16
   anos, tomaremos medidas razoáveis para excluir tais informações dos
   nossos registros. Se você é criança, pedimos que vá brincar no quintal
   em vez de usar ou interagir com a Outbrain!
   5. Cidadãos do Território Europeu

                                      +

   Em conformidade com as leis de privacidade europeias, especialmente com
   o Regulamento Geral de Proteção de Dados da União Europeia (RGPD), a
   Outbrain fornece direitos adicionais específicos a cidadãos dos
   Territórios Europeus, como o direito de acesso, retificação,
   contestação, reclamação, exclusão e bloqueio. Mais especificamente:
     * o direito de perguntar se ou quais dados pessoais estão sendo
       processados por nós e o direito de solicitar que os dados pessoais
       sejam corrigidos ou alterados;
     * em determinadas circunstâncias, o direito de solicitar a exclusão
       de dados pessoais;
     * em determinadas circunstâncias, o direito de exigir restrições no
       processamento de dados pessoais;
     * o direito de cancelar seu consentimento para processamento e uso
       dos seus dados, total ou parcialmente e a qualquer momento, com
       validade para o futuro;
     * o direito de receber seus dados pessoais em formato comum,
       estruturado e mecanicamente legível;
     * o direito de contatar nosso responsável pela proteção dos dados se
       tiver perguntas, comentários, reclamações ou solicitações
       relacionadas à nossa declaração sobre proteção de dados e o
       processamento dos seus dados pessoais;
     * o direito de reclamar à autoridade supervisora responsável caso
       acredite que o processamento dos seus dados pessoais está violando
       a legislação.

   Além dos itens acima, relacionamos determinados direitos para cdadãos
   do Território Europeu ao longo desta Política de Privacidade. Nos
   termos do RGPD, são considerados “Territórios Europeus” o Espaço
   Econômico Europeu (EEE) e a Suíça. Para os fins desta Política de
   Privacidade, o termo “Territórios Europeus” deve continuar a incluir o
   Reino Unido mesmo após sua retirada do Espaço Econômico Europeu em
   decorrência do Brexit.
   Em caso de perguntas sobre o exercício de quaisquer dos direitos acima,
   envie um e-mail a privacyquestions@outbrain.com.
   6. Direitos de privacidade da Califórnia

                                      +

   Conforme o Código Civil da Califórnia, EUA, nos termos das seções
   1798.83–1798.84, os residentes da Califórnia têm direito de nos
   solicitar uma notificação que descreva quais categorias de informações
   pessoais compartilhamos com terceiros ou afiliados corporativos para os
   fins de marketing direto desses terceiros ou afiliados corporativos.
   Essa notificação identificará as categorias de informações
   compartilhadas e incluirá uma lista dos terceiros e afiliados com os
   quais foram compartilhadas, junto com os respectivos nomes e endereços.
   Se você é residente da Califórnia e gostaria de receber uma cópia dessa
   notificação, envie sua solicitação por escrito a
   PrivacyQuestions@outbrain.com ou ao seguinte endereço: Outbrain Inc.,
   39 West 13th Street, 3rd floor, New York, NY 10011, USA. Pedimos que
   aguarde 30 dias para a resposta.
   7. Comunicazione antitracciamento (“Do Not Track”)

                                      +

   Alguns navegadores transmitem sinais Do Not Track (DNT), ou Não
   Rastrear, aos websites. Como não há consenso sobre como interpretar o
   sinal DNT, a Outbrain atualmente não altera, modifica ou responde a
   solicitações ou sinais DNT desses navegadores. Continuaremos a
   monitorar a atuação do setor nesse âmbito e reavaliaremos nossas
   práticas relacionadas a DNT se necessário. Enquanto isso, você pode
   utilizar as várias outras ferramentas que fornecemos para controlar a
   coleta e o uso de dados, incluindo a possibilidade de optar por recusar
   o recebimento de recomendações personalizadas na seção Usuários.
   8. Como esta Política de Privacidade pode mudar

                                      +

   De tempos em tempos, podemos fazer alterações nesta Política de
   Privacidade. Nesse caso, colocaremos um aviso em destaque, visível para
   você como Visitante do Site ou Parceiro Comercial. Contudo, não temos
   meios para alertar Usuários sobre atualizações. Recomendamos que você
   verifique aqui periodicamente se a Política de Privacidade foi
   atualizada. Sempre exibiremos a data da última alteração da Política de
   Privacidade no topo da página, para que você saiba a última vez em que
   foi revisada.

Cookies

Version 4.4

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________

Table of Contents
     __________________________________________________________________

   OUTBRAIN'S COOKIE TABLE
   This Cookie Table provides you with information about the cookies and
   other similar technologies Outbrain and/or its partners may use, their
   purpose and the retention period associated with such cookie. Where a
   third party partner drops a cookie, they determine the purpose for
   which that cookie is dropped and the relevant retention period.
   We may place cookies or similar files such as pixel tags and web
   beacons on the devices you use to engage with Outbrain for security
   purposes, to facilitate site navigation and to personalize your
   experience when you engage with Outbrain as a Site Vistior, a User or a
   Business Partner. Cookies allow us to collect technical and
   navigational information, such as browser type, time spent by you
   engaging with Outbrain and pages visited. Please read the Privacy
   Policy to further understand how we use data collected by these
   cookies.
   For even more information about cookies, we recommend visiting:
   https://cookies.insites.com/about-cookies/
   Users
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same page
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Site Visitors
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Unbounce

     Ubvt

     Ubvs

     ubpv
   These cookies are associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.

     3 days

     3 days

     5 months
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It is variation of the _gat cookie
   which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by Google on high
   traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Google Univesral Analytics
     * _ga
     * _gid

     This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports.

     This cookie is associated with Google Universal Analytics. No
   information is available from Google however, it appears to store and
   update a unique value for each page visited.
     * 2 years
     * a day

   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar. It uniquely identifies a visitor during a single browser
   session and indicates they are included in an audience sample.
   Session
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Piwik
     * _pk_id*
     * _pk_ses*

   These cookies are set by Piwiki and are used to help website owners
   track visitor behaviour and measure site performance. They are a
   pattern type cookie, where the prefix is followed by a short series of
   numbers and letters, which is believed to be a reference code for the
   domain setting the cookie.
     * 1 year
     * 24 minutes

   Kissmetrics

     km_lv

     km_uq

     km_ai
   These cookies are set by Kissmetrics analytics service. They are used
   to provide site owners with information about how visitors use the
   site.
   5 years
   Bing
     * MUIDB
     * MUID

   This domain is owned by Mircosoft - it is the site for the search
   engine Bing.
   a year
   JSESSIONID
   This domain is controlled by New Relic, which provides a platform for
   monitoring the performance of web and mobile applications.
   Session
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   obuid
   This cookie is used to hold an anonymous user's ID. IT is used for
   tracking user actions.
   3 months
   c
   This domain is owned by IPONWEB and is used to provide a real time
   bidding platform for online advertising.
   1 year
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   1 year
   TheTradeDesk
     * TDID
     * TDCPM

   This domain is owned by TheTradeDesk. The main business activity is: Ad
   Serving Platform
   1 year
   _uv_id
   This domain is owned by LinkedIn. It is used to provide services for
   embedding slide presentations into websites. Information collected via
   cookies on this domain can also be used for targeted advertising
   purposes.
   2 years
   YouTube
     * HSID
     * Demographics
     * VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
     * PREF
     * LOGIN_INFO
     * GPS
     * YSC

   YouTube collects user data through videos embedded in websites, which
   is aggregated with profile data from other Google services in order to
   display targeted advertising to web visitors. These cookies are:
     * Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user
       account and most recent login time
     * Used for demographic profiling and targeting for advertising
     * This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of
       videos
     * Stores user preference, can be used to personalise ads on google
       searches
     * Used for targeted advertising to web visitors across a broad range
       of their own and other websites.

     1 year

     1 year

     1 month

     5 years

     2 years

     a month

     Session
   Linkedin
     * BizoID
     * Lidc
     * __utmv
     * __utmz
     * __utmb
     * __utmt
     * Bcookie
     * Lang
     * __utma
     * SERVERID
     * language
     * bscookie__qca
     * __qca
     * __utmc
     * UserMatchHistory
     * visit

   These cookies are associated with Linkedin It typically acts as a third
   party host where website owners have placed one of its content sharing
   buttons in their pages, although its content and services can be
   embedded in other ways. Although such buttons add functionality to the
   website they are on, cookies are set regardless of whether or not the
   visitor has an active Linkedin profile, or agreed to their terms and
   conditions. For this reason it is classified as a primarily
   tracking/targeting domain.

     30 days

     1 month

     8 months

     6 months

     21 minutes

     a few seconds

     8 months

     Session

     2 years

     Session

     Session

     8 months

     2 months

     Session

     2 days

     8 months

   Facebook

     datr

     fr

     lu
   These cookies are owned by Facebook:

     It is not directly tied to individual Facebook the user. It is used
   to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially around
   detection of bots trying to access the service. This cookie is also
   read via Like and other Facebook buttons and tags placed on many
   different websites.

     This is used to serve targeted advertising to its users when logged
   into its services. In 2014 it also started serving up behaviourally
   targeted advertising on other websites, similar to most dedicated
   online marketing companies. Contains browser and user unique ID
   combination, used for targeted advertising.

     This is used to serve targeted advertising to its users when logged
   into its services. In 2014 it also started serving up behaviourally
   targeted advertising on other websites, similar to most dedicated
   online marketing companies. Contains browser and user unique ID
   combination, used for targeted advertising

     1 year

     3 months

     1 year
   Twitter
     * auth_token
     * twll
     * secure_session
     * guest_id
     * personalization_id
     * remember_checked
     * remember_checked_on
     * lang

   This domain is owned by Twitter. The main business activity is: Social
   Networking Services. Where twitter acts as a third party host, it
   collects data through a range of plug-ins and integrations, that is
   primarily used for tracking and targeting.

     15 years

     5 years

     15 years

     a year

     2 years

     5 years

     4 years

     session
   Google
     * APISID
     * SSID
     * NID
     * SAPISID

   This cookies are owned by Google Inc. It uses the data gathered from
   most of these services to profile the interests of web users and sell
   advertising space to organisations based on such interest profiles as
   well as aligning adverts to the content on the pages where its
   customer's adverts appear.

     2 years

     8 months

     5 months

     2 years
   AA003
   This domain is owned by Atlas Solutions which is in turn owned by
   Facebook. Atlas is an online advertising business, targeting users
   through tracking their web activity. From September 2014 the company
   re-launched under the ownership of Facebook, promising the ability to
   reach known users and target adverts based on profiles generated using
   Facebook's user data.
   2 months
   u
   This domain is owned by Aggregate Knowledge, which has been acquired by
   Neustar Inc. Aggregate Knowledge provides a data management platform
   which enables real time targeting and consumer profiling functionality.
   a month
   __cfduid
   This domain is owned by AddToAny. The main business activity is: Social
   Sharing Services and Tracking
   1 year
   rlas3
   This domain is owned by Live Ramp Inc, providers of a platform for
   targeted marketing and profiling.
   1 year
   Bluekai
     * bku
     * bkdc
     * bkpa

   This domain is owned by Blue Kai. The main business activity is:
   Advertising/Audience Targeting
   5 months
   d
   This domain is owned by Quantcast. The main business activity is:
   Market and Audience Segmentation, Targeted advertising services
   2 months
   Adobe Audience Manager
     * demdex
     * dpm

   This domain is owned by Adobe - Audience Manager.
   The main business activity is: Online profiling for targeted marketing
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
     * 6 months
     * 5 months

   tuuid_lu
   This domain is owned by IPONWEB and is used to provide a real time
   bidding platform for online advertising.
   1 year
   Amazon
     * ad-id
     * ad-privacy

   This domain is owned by online retailer Amazon and is used as part of
   its affiliate marketing programme.
     * 8 months
     * 8 months

   Doubleclick
     * id
     * IDE

   This domain is owned by Doubleclick (Google). The main business
   activity is: Doubleclick is Googles real time bidding advertising
   exchange
     * 8 months
     * 2 years

   OnAudience
     * cookie
     * done_redirects161

   This domain is owned by OnAudience. The company provides a range of
   marketing and advertising services.
     * a year
     * a month

   uuid2
   This domain is owned by AppNexus Inc. The company provides a range of
   online advertising technology and services.
   2 months
   pxcr
   This domain is owned by Live Ramp Inc, providers of a platform for
   targeted marketing and profiling.
   a month
   MediaMath
     * uuidc
     * uuid

   This domain is owned by MediaMath Inc. a US based digital advertising
   business.
   a year
   comScore
     * UID
     * UIDR

   This domain is owned by ScorecardResearch (comScore). The main business
   activity is: Advertising. The cookies in this domain have lifespans of
   2 years.
     * a month
     * 2 years

   ruds
   This domain is owned by Rocketfuel. The main business activity is:
   Advertising
   Session
   ab
   This domain is owned by Aggregate Knowledge, which has been acquired by
   Neustar Inc. Aggregate Knowledge provides a data management platform
   which enables real time targeting and consumer profiling functionality.
   Session
   ATN
   This domain is owned by Atlas Solutions which is in turn owned by
   Facebook. Atlas is an online advertising business, targeting users
   through tracking their web activity. From September 2014 the company
   re-launched under the ownership of Facebook, promising the ability to
   reach known users and target adverts based on profiles generated using
   Facebook's user data.
   2 years
   uvc
   This domain is owned by AddToAny. The main business activity is: Social
   Sharing Services and Tracking
   a month
   custom_data
   This domain is owned by BidSwitch. The company provides a range of
   marketing and advertising services.
   10+ years
   eud
   This domain is owned by Rocketfuel. The main business activity is:
   Advertising
   a year
   EE
   This domain is owned by Exelate. The main business activity is:
   Advertising Data Aggregation
   3 months
   _kuid_
   This domain is owned by Krux Digital, a US company providing a data
   management platform which enables real time profiling of visitor
   interests.
   5 months
   pi
   This domain appears to be connected to a company called Bombora, a USA
   based audience targeting and intelligence business.
   a year
   uid
   This domain is owned by Adform. The main business activity is: Real
   time bidding for display advertising to targeted audiences.
   a month
   ud
   This domain is owned by Exelate. The main business activity is:
   Advertising Data Aggregation
   3 months
   tuuid
   This domain is owned by IPONWEB and is used to provide a real time
   bidding platform for online advertising.
   a year
   Quantcast
     * mc
     * d

   This domain is owned by Quantcast. The main business activity is:
   Market and Audience Segmentation, Targeted advertising services
   2 months
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   recs_xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
   This is a pattern type cookie with the root being recs_ and the rest of
   the name being a unique, 32-length alphanumeric string. This cookie is
   used to store recommended documents so that the same document isn't
   recommended twice.
   1 minute or refresh
   ___distillery
   This cookie may be set by the website itself, or by Wistia, to support
   video functionality that may be found throughot the website. In
   addition to keeping track of the website visitor's position in a video
   should playback be interrupted, this cookie also notes user behavior
   regarding the video itself.
   1 year
   Vimeo
     * player
     * vuid

   This domain is owned by Vimeo. The main business activity is: Video
   Hosting/Sharing
     * 1 year
     * 2 years

   Business Partners
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Outbrains Cookie-Tabelle
   In dieser Cookie-Tabelle erhalten Sie verständliche und umfassende
   Informationen über die Cookies und ähnliche Technologien, die wir
   verwenden.
   Gegebenenfalls setzen wir auf den Geräten, die Sie zur Interaktion mit
   Outbrain verwenden, Cookies oder ähnliche Dateien wie Pixel-Tags und
   Web-Beacons, und zwar aus Sicherheitsgründen, zur leichteren
   Website-Navigation und zur Personalisierung Ihrer Erfahrung bei der
   Interaktion mit Outbrain als Websitebesucher, Nutzer oder
   Geschäftspartner. Cookies ermöglichen uns, technische oder für die
   Navigation erforderliche Informationen zu erfassen, beispielsweise
   Browsertyp, die Zeit, die Sie mit der Interaktion mit Outbrain
   verbracht haben, oder die besuchten Seiten. Bitte lesen Sie die
   Datenschutzbestimmungen, damit Sie genauer verstehen, wie wir Daten
   verwenden.
   Nutzer
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Websitebesucher
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Geschäftspartner
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Tabla de cookies de Outbrain
   La presente Tabla de cookies te facilita información clara y completa
   sobre las cookies y otras tecnologías similares que utilizamos.
   Es posible que introduzcamos cookies o archivos similares, como
   etiquetas de píxel y balizas web (web beacons), en los dispositivos que
   utilices para interactuar con Outbrain por motivos de seguridad, para
   facilitar la navegación por el sitio y para personalizar tu experiencia
   cuando interactúes con Outbrain como Visitante del Sitio, Usuario o
   Socio comercial. Las cookies nos permiten recopilar información técnica
   y de navegación, como el tipo de navegador, el tiempo que interactúas
   con Outbrain y las páginas visitadas. Por favor, lee la Política de
   privacidad para entender mejor cómo utilizamos los datos.
   Utenti
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visitantes del sitio
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Socios comerciales
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Table des cookies d’Outbrain
   Cette Table des cookies vous donne des informations claires et
   détaillées sur les cookies et autres technologies similaires que nous
   utilisons.
   Nous sommes susceptibles de déposer des cookies ou autres fichiers
   similaires comme des balises pixel ou des balises Web sur les appareils
   que vous utilisez en lien avec Outbrain pour des raisons de sécurité,
   pour faciliter la navigation dans le site, ou personnaliser votre
   expérience quand vous interagissez avec Outbrain en tant que Visiteur
   du Site, Utilisateur ou Partenaire commercial. Les cookies nous
   permettent de collecter des données techniques et de navigation, comme
   le type de navigateur, le temps passé à interagir avec Outbrain et les
   pages visitées. Veuillez lire la Politique de confidentialité pour
   mieux comprendre comment nous utilisons les cookies suivants.
   Utilisateurs
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visiteurs du site
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Partenaires commerciaux
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   Tabella dei cookie di Outbrain
   La presente tabella dei cookie fornisce informazioni chiare complete
   sui cookie e su altre tecnologie simili che utilizziamo.
   Possiamo installare cookie o file analoghi quali pixel tag e web beacon
   sui dispositivi che utilizzi per interagire con Outbrain per finalità
   di sicurezza, per facilitare la navigazione sul sito e per
   personalizzare la tua esperienza quando interagisci con Outbrain in
   veste di Visitatore del sito, Utente o Partner commerciale. I cookie ci
   consentono di raccogliere informazioni tecniche e sulla navigazione,
   quali il tipo di browser, il tempo che hai trascorso interagendo con
   Outbrain e le pagine visitate. Si raccomanda di leggere la politica
   sulla privacy per capire meglio come utilizziamo i dati.
   Utenti
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visitatori del sito
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Partner commerciali
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

Effective March 13, 2019

   Download
     __________________________________________________________________
     __________________________________________________________________

   TABELA DE COOKIES DA OUTBRAIN
   Esta tabela de cookies fornece informações claras e completas sobre os
   cookies e outras tecnologias similares usadas por nós.
   Podemos instalar cookies ou arquivos similares como pixel tags ou web
   beacons nos aparelhos que você usa para interagir com a Outbrain, por
   fins de segurança, para facilitar a navegação no site e para
   personalizar sua experiência ao interagir com a Outbrain como Visitante
   do Site, Usuário ou Parceiro Comercial. Cookies nos permitem coletar
   informações técnicas e relacionadas à navegação, como tipo de
   navegador, tempo gasto por você na interação com a Outbrain e páginas
   visitadas. Leia a Política de Privacidade para compreender melhor como
   usamos os dados.
   Usuários
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   obuid
   Holds the anonymous user's ID. Used for tracking user actions, such as
   clicks on the recommendations
   3 months
   auid
   Holds the advertising ID of the user in mobile devices. Used for
   tracking user actions, such as clicks on the recommendations
   90 days
   _ofcap_DOC1
   Used for Frequency capping
   7 days
   recs-{}
   Stores the documents we're recommending so that we won't show you the
   same recommendation on the same
   1 minute or refresh
   ref-{}
   Stores refering doc info - written by redirect on click
   1 minute
   spuid
   Stores the logged in uuid - for logged in users only
   12 months
   spv
   Signals that this user has visited Sphere before (and is considered a
   sphere user) - For anonymous users
   12 months
   sprm
   Sphere's "remember-me" cookie - for logged in users only
   12 months
   SPHERE_JSESSIONID
   Session identifier
   Session
   Visitantes do Site
   +
   Strictly Necessary Cookies
   These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be
   switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to
   actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as
   setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You
   can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but
   some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store
   any personally identifiable information.
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   Group
   onetrust.com
     * OptanonAlertBoxClosed
     * OptanonConsent

   Consent and privacy platform
   1 year
   Strictly Necessary
   googletagmanager.com
     * _dc_gtm_UA-68780923-1
     * _dc_gtm_UA-71823982-1

   These cookie's use Google tag manager to execute scripts
   < 1 days
   Strictly Necessary
   outbrain.com - JSESSIONID
   default session cookie that allows login and account functionality
   Session
   Strictly Necessary
   gdpr_europe
   This cookie stores if the user is browsing the site with a European IP
   address.
   1 hour
   Strictly Necessary
   Performance Cookies
   These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can
   measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know
   which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move
   around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated
   and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not
   know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor
   its performance.
   obca_vid
   stores a uuid for the visitor
   13 Months
   Performance
   obca_sid
   stores a uuid for the session
   30 minutes
   Performance
   obca_data
   stores the visitors source based on referral data and UTMs
   13 Months
   Performance
   _vwo_uuid_v2
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie ensures a
   visitor always sees the same version of a page and is used to track
   behaviour to measure the performance of different page versions.
   a year
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _gat_UA-71823982-1
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _ga
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics - which
   is a significant update to Google's more commonly used analytics
   service. This cookie is used to distinguish unique users by assigning a
   randomly generated number as a client identifier. It is included in
   each page request in a site and used to calculate visitor, session and
   campaign data for the sites analytics reports. By default it is set to
   expire after 2 years, although this is customisable by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   _gid
   This cookie name is associated with Google Universal Analytics. This
   appears to be a new cookie and as of Spring 2017 no information is
   available from Google. It appears to store and update a unique value
   for each page visited.
   a day
   Performance
   ubvt
   This cookie name is associated with software from Canadian company
   Unbounce. The service allows site owners to test the effectiveness of
   different versions of web pages, and ensure that visitors consistently
   see the expected version of a page.
   3 days
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_s
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie
   distinguishes between new and returning visitors.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   Performance
   _gat_UA-294746-7
   This is a pattern type cookie set by Google Analytics, where the
   pattern element on the name contains the unique identity number of the
   account or website it relates to. It appears to be a variation of the
   _gat cookie which is used to limit the amount of data recorded by
   Google on high traffic volume websites.
   a few seconds
   Performance
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   Performance
   __utmb
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie determines new sessions and
   visits and expires after 30 minutes. The cookie is updated every time
   data is sent to Google Analytics. Any activity by a user within the 30
   minute life span will count as a single visit, even if the user leaves
   and then returns to the site. A return after 30 minutes will count as a
   new visit, but a returning visitor.
   21 minutes
   Performance
   _ceg.s
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   __utma
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. This cookie lasts for 2 years by default and
   distinguishes between users and sessions. It it used to calculate new
   and returning visitor statistics. The cookie is updated every time data
   is sent to Google Analytics. The lifespan of the cookie can be
   customised by website owners.
   2 years
   Performance
   km_lv
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   km_uq
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   _pk_ses*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_ses is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   24 minutes
   Performance
   _pk_id*
   This cookie name is associated with the Piwik open source web analytics
   platform. It is used to help website owners track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is a pattern type cookie, where the prefix
   _pk_id is followed by a short series of numbers and letters, which is
   believed to be a reference code for the domain setting the cookie.
   a year
   Performance
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   Performance
   __utmc
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour and
   measure site performance. It is not used in most sites but is set to
   enable interoperability with the older version of Google Analytics code
   known as Urchin. In this older versions this was used in combination
   with the __utmb cookie to identify new sessions/visits for returning
   visitors.
   When used by Google Analytics this is always a Session cookie which is
   destroyed when the user closes their browser. Where it is seen as a
   Persistent cookie it is therefore likely to be a different technology
   setting the cookie.
   Session
   Performance
   _ceg.u
   This cookie name is associated with software provided by Crazy Egg
   Inc., a USA based company providing web analytics that tracks how
   visitors interact with pages on a site.
   3 months
   Performance
   _vis_opt_test_cookie
   This cookie name is associated with the product Visual Website
   Optimiser, by USA based Wingify. The tool helps site owners measure the
   performance of different versions of web pages. This cookie tests if
   the browser is set to allow cookies.
   Session
   Performance
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Performance
   kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Performance
   VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
   This cookie is used as a unique identifier to track viewing of videos
   a month
   Performance
   Targeting Cookies
   These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners.
   They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your
   interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not
   store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely
   identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these
   cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   Targeting
   auth_token
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year
   Targeting
   lu
   Used to manage the login process, remembers user on return visit if
   they choose to stay logged in.
   a year
   Targeting
   demdex
   This cookie helps Adobe Audience Manger perform basic functions such as
   visitor identification, ID synchronization, segmentation, modeling,
   reporting, etc.
   6 months
   Targeting
   PREF
   This is a common Google cookie, used across several of their services.
   Stores user preference and can be used to personalise ads on google
   searches
   5 years
   Targeting
   twll
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   secure_session
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   15 years
   Targeting
   guest_id
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   a year
   Targeting
   SID
   This cookie is used by Google in combination with HSID to verify a
   Google user account and most recent login time.
   a year
   Targeting
   remember_checked
   Twitter does not currently provide information on the use of specific
   cookies.
   5 years
   Targeting
   HSID
   Used by Google in combination with SID to verify Google user account
   and most recent login time
   a year
   Targeting
   datr
   This cookie identifies the browser connecting to Facebook. It is not
   directly tied to individual Facebook the user. Facebook reports that it
   is used to help with security and suspicious login activity, especially
   around detection of bots trying to access the service. Facebook also
   say the behavioural profile associated with each datr cookie is deleted
   after 10 days. This cookie is also read via Like and other Facebook
   buttons and tags placed on many different websites.
   a year
   Targeting
   Functional Cookies
   These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and
   personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers
   whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these
   cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
   __smScrollBoxShown
   Sumome
   30 years
   Functional
   __smToken
   Sumome
   a year
   Functional
   __smVID
   Sumome
   a month
   Functional
   _hjIncludedInSample
   This cookie is associated with web analytics functionality and services
   from Hot Jar, a Malta based company. It uniquely identifies a visitor
   during a single browser session and indicates they are included in an
   audience sample.
   Session
   Functional
   Parceiros Comercials
   +
   Name
   Purpose
   Expiration
   __utmt
   This cookie is set by Google Analytics. According to their
   documentation it is used to throttle the request rate for the service -
   limiting the collection of data on high traffic sites. It expires after
   10 minutes
   a few seconds
   __utmz
   This is one of the four main cookies set by the Google Analytics
   service which enables website owners to track visitor behaviour measure
   of site performance. This cookie identifies the source of traffic to
   the site - so Google Analytics can tell site owners where visitors came
   from when arriving on the site. The cookie has a life span of 6 months
   and is updated every time data is sent to Google Analytics.
   6 months
   km_ai
   Cookie set by Kissmetrics analytics service. Used to provide site
   owners with information about how visitors use the site.
   5 years
   _uetsid
   Microsoft Bing Ads Universal Event Tracking
   24 minutes
   km_vs
   Kissmetrics
   24 minutes
   Kvcd
   Kissmetrics
   Session
   Fr
   Contains browser and user unique ID combinaton, used for targeted
   advertising.
   3 months
   demographics
   Most likely used for demographic profiling and targeting for
   advertising
   a year

   Interest-Based Ads (and Opt-Out Preferences)Advertising
   GuidelinesPrivacy PolicySecurityPatentsTerms of Use

   Copyright © 2019 Outbrain Inc. All rights reserved.
   Outbrain is a trademark of Outbrain Inc. - IMPRESSUM
     __________________________________________________________________

   Legal Center powered by PactSafe

   Copyright © 2019, Outbrain Inc.
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MNMBTC

     * Advertising Overview
     * Publishers Overview
     * Contact Us
     * Resources
          + Case Studies
          + Trust & Transparency
          + Native Advertising
          + Content Marketing
          + Blog
          + Tech Blog
     * About Us
     * Careers
     * Help Center

     * Advertisers
     * Publishers
     * About Us
     * |
     * Help Center
     * Blog
     * Careers
     * Contact Us

   RegisterLogin

The Open Web's

Discovery & Native Advertising Feed

   Advertise with UsPublishers, Let's Talk

   Outbrain helps over 1 billion people discover content, products and
   services that may be of interest to them.

290B

   Monthly Discoveries

55+

   Countries in the Network

The World's Top Media Companies & Brands Trust Outbrain

   See all
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *

   [ld+json]

Outbrain for Advertisers

   Connect with consumers engaging with content on the open web.
   Learn more

Outbrain for Media Companies

   Our technology powers the core tech stack of publishers who want to
   better manage, control and monetize their content by personalizing
   their editorial experience for consumers.
   Learn more

Outbrain Smartfeedfeed

   See how the open web's preferred discovery feed is turning visitors
   into engaged audiences.
   Learn more

Outbrain Company News

   Recommended Content
   [ld+json]
   Outbrain's Reach Surpasses Facebook, Google & Others in Key Global
   MarketsOutbrain NewsOutbrain Acquires Ligatus, the Leading Native
   Advertising Platform in EuropeOutbrain News
   Performance Hacks, Part I: Take Control of Your Ad PlacementsOutbrain
   Blog
   Top WordPress Plugins You Should Be TestingOutbrain Blog[Quiz] How Much
   Do You Really Know About Programmatic Advertising?Outbrain Blog
   Visit Our Press Center

     * Advertisers
     * Advertising Overview
     * Advertisers Solutions
     * Advertiser Guidelines
     * Case Studies
     * Launch A Campaign
     * Advertising FAQ

     * Publishers
     * Publisher Overview
     * Publishers Solutions
     * Request a Demo
     * Publishers FAQ

     * About Us
     * Company Overview
     * Leadership
     * News
     * Careers
     * Offices
     * Contact

     * Resources
     * Trust & Transparency
     * Help Center
     * Blog
     * Tech Blog
     * Native Advertising Overview
     * Content Marketing Overview

   RegisterLogin

   English (US)GermanFrenchSpanishPortugueseJapaneseItalian
   Copyright © 2019 Outbrain Inc. All rights reserved. Outbrain is a
   trademark of Outbrain Inc.
     * Interest-Based Ads
     * Advertiser Guidelines
     * Privacy Policy
     * Security
     * Patents
     * Terms of Use
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MNMBTC

     * Outbrain für Werbetreibende
     * Publishers Overview
     * Kontaktieren Sie uns
     * Weitere Informationen
          + Case Studies
          + Vertrauen & Transparenz
          + Programmatisches Native Advertising
          + Content-Marketing
          + Blog
          + Tech-Blog
     * Über uns
     * Karriere
     * Hilfe

     * Werbetreibende
     * Publisher
     * Über uns
     * |
     * Hilfe
     * Blog
     * Karriere
     * Kontaktieren Sie uns

   RegistrierenEinloggen

Der Discovery & Native Advertising Feed im Open Web

   Werben Sie mit unsOutbrain für Publisher

   Mit Outbrain entdecken über eine Milliarde Menschen Inhalte, Produkte
   und Dienste, die sie wirklich interessieren.

290 Mrd.

   Monatliche Entdeckungen

55+

   Länder im Netzwerk

Die weltweit führenden Medienunternehmen & Marken vertrauen Outbrain

   Alle sehen
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *

   [ld+json]

Outbrain für Werbetreibende

   Verbinden Sie sich mit Verbrauchern, die sich mit Inhalten im Open web.
   Mehr erfahren

Outbrain für Medienunternehmen

   Mit unserer Technologie managen, steuern und monetarisieren Publisher
   ihre Inhalte besser und personalisieren das Erlebnis ihrer Leser.
   Mehr erfahren

Outbrain Smartfeedfeed

   Sehen Sie, wie der führende Discovery Feed im Open Web das Engagement
   Ihrer Besucher erhöht.
   Mehr erfahren

     * Werbetreibende
     * Outbrain für Werbetreibende
     * Lösungen
     * Richtlinien
     * Case Studies
     * Kampagne starten
     * FAQ

     * Publisher
     * Outbrain für Publisher
     * Lösungen für Publisher
     * Demo anfordern
     * FAQ

     * Über uns
     * Unser Unternehmen
     * Management
     * Neuigkeiten
     * Karriere
     * Standorte
     * Kontakt

     * Weitere Informationen
     * Vertrauen & Transparenz
     * Hilfe
     * Blog
     * Tech-Blog
     * Native Advertising
     * Content Marketing

   RegistrierenEinloggen

   English (US)GermanFrenchSpanishPortugueseJapaneseItalian
   Copyright © 2019 Outbrain Inc. All rights reserved. Outbrain is a
   trademark of Outbrain Inc.
     * Interessenbezogene Anzeigen
     * Richtlinien
     * Datenschutzrichtlinie
     * Sicherheit
     * Patents
     * Nutzungsbedingungen
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MNMBTC

     * Aperçu Annonceurs
     * Publishers Overview
     * Contactez-nous
     * Ressources
          + Études de cas
          + Trust & Transparency
          + Native advertising
          + La stratégie de contenu marketing
          + Blog
          + Blog technique
     * À propos d'Outbrain
     * Emplois
     * Aide

     * Annonceurs
     * Éditeurs
     * À propos d'Outbrain
     * |
     * Aide
     * Blog
     * Emplois
     * Contactez-nous

   S'inscrireSe connecter

Discovery & Native feed de l'Open Web

   Créez votre campagnePublishers, contactez-nous

   Outbrain aide plus d'un milliard d'internautes à découvrir des
   contenus, produits et services personnalisés selon leurs centres
   d’intérêt.

290 Mrd.

   Découvertes mensuelles

+55

   Pays couverts

Les plus grands sites médias et les plus grandes marques font confiance à
Outbrain

   En savoir plus
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *

   [ld+json]

Outbrain pour les Annonceurs

   Connectez-vous avec les consommateurs qui s'engagent avec du contenu
   sur le Web ouvert.
   En savoir plus

Outbrain pour les Éditeurs

   Notre technologie alimente le noyau technologique des éditeurs qui
   souhaitent mieux gérer, contrôler et monétiser leur contenu en
   personnalisant leur expérience éditoriale pour les consommateurs.
   En savoir plus

Outbrain Smartfeedfeed

   Un nouveau contrat de lecture pour les éditeurs et leurs visiteurs, qui
   transforme chaque page de contenu en un flux de découvertes
   personnalisées.
   En savoir plus

     * Annonceurs
     * Aperçu Annonceurs
     * Solutions Annonceurs
     * Guidelines Annonceurs
     * Études de cas
     * Lancer une Campagne
     * FAQ Annonceurs

     * Éditeurs
     * Aperçu Éditeurs
     * Solutions Éditeurs
     * Demander une démo
     * FAQ Éditeurs

     * À propos d'Outbrain
     * Notre Société
     * Équipe de Direction
     * Actualité
     * Emplois
     * Bureaux
     * Contact

     * Ressources
     * Trust & Transparency
     * Aide
     * Blog
     * Blog technique
     * La Publicité Native
     * Le Marketing de Contenu

   S'inscrireSe connecter

   English (US)GermanFrenchSpanishPortugueseJapaneseItalian
   Copyright © 2019 Outbrain Inc. All rights reserved. Outbrain is a
   trademark of Outbrain Inc.
     * Publicité basée sur les intérêts
     * Guidelines Annonceurs
     * Politique de confidentialité
     * Security
     * Brevets
     * Conditions d'utilisation
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MNMBTC

     * Resumen publicitario
     * Publishers Overview
     * Contáctanos
     * Recursos
          + Casos de éxito
          + Confianza y Transparencia
          + Publicidad nativa
          + Marketing de contenidos
          + Blog
          + Blog de tecnología
     * Quiénes somos
     * Empleos
     * Centro de ayuda

     * Anunciantes
     * Editores
     * Quiénes somos
     * |
     * Centro de ayuda
     * Blog
     * Empleos
     * Contáctanos

   RegisterLogin

Discovery & Feed publicitario nativo del Open Web

   Anúnciate con nosotrosPublishers, Hablemos

   Outbrain es el feed nativo basado en intereses que guía las
   experiencias de descubrimiento y exploración de un tercio de la
   población del mundo conectada a Internet.

290B

   de descubrimientos de contenido al mes

55+

   Países en la red

Las principales marcas y publishers del mundo confían en Outbrain

   Mira más
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *

   [ld+json]

Outbrain para Anunciantes

   Conéctese con los consumidores que interactúan con el contenido en la
   web abierta.
   Descubre más

Outbrain para Publishers

   Nuestra tecnología impulsa el núcleo tecnológico principal de los
   editores que desean administrar, controlar y monetizar mejor su
   contenido personalizando su experiencia editorial para los consumidores
   Descubre más

Outbrain Smartfeedfeed

   Descubre cómo el discovery feed preferido de la “open web” está
   incrementando el engagement de los usuarios.
   Descubre más

     * Anunciantes
     * Resumen publicitario
     * Soluciones de anunciantes
     * Pautas del anunciante
     * Casos de éxito
     * Lanzar una campaña
     * Preguntas frecuentes sobre publicidad

     * Editores
     * Descripción general del editor
     * Soluciones para editores
     * Solicite una demo
     * Preguntas frecuentes de editores

     * Quiénes somos
     * Descripción de la empresa
     * Liderazgo
     * Noticias
     * Empleos
     * Oficinas
     * Contacto

     * Recursos
     * Confianza y Transparencia
     * Centro de ayuda
     * Blog
     * Blog de tecnología
     * Descripción general de publicidad nativa
     * Descripción general del marketing de contenidos

   RegisterLogin

   English (US)GermanFrenchSpanishPortugueseJapaneseItalian
   Copyright © 2019 Outbrain Inc. All rights reserved. Outbrain is a
   trademark of Outbrain Inc.
     * Anuncios basados en intereses
     * Pautas del anunciante
     * Política de privacidad
     * Seguridad
     * Patentes
     * Términos de Uso
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MNMBTC

     * Visão geral de publicidade
     * Publishers Overview
     * Fale conosco
     * Recursos
          + Estudos de caso
          + Confiança e Transparência
          + Publicidade nativa
          + Content marketing
          + Blog
          + Blog de tecnologia
     * Sobre nós
     * Carreiras
     * Centro de ajuda

     * Anunciantes
     * Publishers
     * Sobre nós
     * |
     * Centro de ajuda
     * Blog
     * Carreiras
     * Fale conosco

   RegisterLogin

Discovery & Native feed da Open Web

   Anuncie ConoscoPublishers, vamos conversar?

   Outbrain é o feed nativo baseado em interesses reais que guia a
   exploração e a descoberta de um terço da população mundial conectada à
   Internet.

290 Bilhões

   de recomendações mensais

55+

   Países na nossa rede

Os maiores publishers e anunciantes confiam na Outbrain

   Veja mais
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *

   [ld+json]

Outbrain para Anunciantes

   Conecte-se com os consumidores envolvidos com conteúdo na Web aberta.
   Saiba mais

Outbrain para Veículos

   Nossa tecnologia capacita o grupo central de editores que desejam
   gerenciar, controlar e rentabilizar melhor seu conteúdo, personalizando
   sua experiência editorial para os consumidores.
   Saiba mais

Outbrain Smartfeedfeed

   Veja como o feed de descoberta preferido da web aberta está
   transformando os visitantes em audiências engajadas.
   Saiba mais

     * Anunciantes
     * Visão geral de publicidade
     * Soluções para anunciantes
     * Diretrizes para anunciantes
     * Estudos de caso
     * Lançar uma campanha
     * Perguntas frequentes sobre publicidade

     * Publishers
     * Visão geral sobre Publishers
     * Soluções para Publishers
     * Solicite uma demonstração
     * Perguntas frequentes dos Publishers

     * Sobre nós
     * A empresa
     * Liderança
     * Notícia
     * Carreiras
     * Escritórios
     * Contato

     * Recursos
     * Confiança e Transparência
     * Centro de ajuda
     * Blog
     * Blog de tecnologia
     * Visão geral de publicidade nativa
     * Visão geral de marketing de conteúdo

   RegisterLogin

   English (US)GermanFrenchSpanishPortugueseJapaneseItalian
   Copyright © 2019 Outbrain Inc. All rights reserved. Outbrain is a
   trademark of Outbrain Inc.
     * Anúncios com base em interesses
     * Diretrizes para anunciantes
     * Política de Privacidade
     * Segurança
     * Patentes
     * Termos de uso
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MNMBTC

     * 広告主向け概要
     * Publishers Overview
     * お問い合わせ
     * 資料
          + 事例
          + 信頼と透明性
          + ネイティブ広告
          + コンテンツマーケティング
          + ブログ
          + 技術ブログ
     * 企業情報
     * キャリア
     * ヘルプセンター

     * 広告主
     * パブリッシャー
     * 企業情報
     * |
     * ヘルプセンター
     * ブログ
     * キャリア
     * お問い合わせ

   RegisterLogin

オープンウェブで好まれるネイティブディスカバリー、ネイティブ広告フィード

   是非広告を弊社で出稿を媒体者の皆様、是非ご相談ください

   アウトブレインはインタレストベースのネイティブフィードとして世界のインターネット人口の実に1/3に対して発見とディスカバリー体験を提供している

月間2.9

   億ディスカバリー

55

   か国以上のネットワーク

世界トップのメディア企業とブランドはOutbrainを信頼

   下記参照ください。
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *

   [ld+json]

Outbrain for Advertisers

   オープンWeb上のコンテンツを利用する消費者とつながります。
   詳しく知る

Outbrain for Media Companies

   当社の技術は、消費者向けに編集体験をパーソナライズすることで、コンテンツの管理、制御、収益化を改善したい出版社のコア技術スタックを強化します。
   詳しく知る

Outbrain Smartfeedfeed

   是非、オープンウェブの好まれるディスカバリーフィードがユーザーをエンゲージされている実態を体験してください。
   詳しく知る

     * 広告主
     * 広告主向け概要
     * 広告主向けソリューション
     * 広告主向けガイドライン
     * 事例
     * キャンペーンを開始
     * マーケター向けFAQ

     * パブリッシャー
     * パブリッシャー向け概要
     * パブリッシャー向けソリューション
     * デモをリクエスト
     * パブリッシャー向けFAQ

     * 企業情報
     * 会社概要
     * 経営陣
     * ニュース
     * キャリア
     * オフィス
     * お問い合わせ

     * 資料
     * 信頼と透明性
     * ヘルプセンター
     * ブログ
     * 技術ブログ
     * ネイティブ広告の概要
     * コンテンツマーケティングの概要

   RegisterLogin

   English (US)GermanFrenchSpanishPortugueseJapaneseItalian
   Copyright © 2019 Outbrain Inc. All rights reserved. Outbrain is a
   trademark of Outbrain Inc.
     * インタレストベース広告
     * 広告主向けガイドライン
     * プライバシーポリシー
     * セキュリティ
     * 特許
     * 利用規約
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MNMBTC

     * Panoramica sulla pubblicità
     * Publishers Overview
     * Contattaci
     * Risorse
          + Casi di studio
          + Fiducia e trasparenza
          + Native Advertising
          + Content Marketing
          + Blog
          + Blog tecnico
     * Chi Siamo
     * Carriere
     * Centro assistenza

     * Inserzionisti
     * Editori
     * Chi Siamo
     * |
     * Centro assistenza
     * Blog
     * Carriere
     * Contattaci

   RegistrazioneLogin

Discovery & Feed pubblicitario native dell’open web

   Promuovi i tuoi contenuti Editori, Parliamone

   Outbrain è il feed nativo basato sugli interessi che guida le
   esperienze di esplorazione e scoperta dei contenuti di un terzo della
   popolazione mondiale connessa a Internet.

290 Miliardi

   di scoperte di contenuti al mese

Oltre 55

   Paesi nel network

I principali editori e brand del mondo credono in Outbrain

   Guarda tutti
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *

   [ld+json]

Outbrain per gli inserzionisti

   Connettiti con i consumatori che interagiscono con i contenuti sul Web
   aperto.
   Scopri di più

Outbrain per gli editori

   La nostra tecnologia alimenta lo stack tecnologico principale degli
   editori che vogliono gestire, controllare e monetizzare meglio i loro
   contenuti personalizzando la loro esperienza editoriale per i
   consumatori
   Scopri di più

Outbrain Smartfeedfeed

   Scopri come il feed di discovery preferito dell’open web sta
   trasformando i visitatori in utenti con un engagement più alto.
   Scopri di più

     * Inserzionisti
     * Panoramica sulla pubblicità
     * Soluzioni per gli inserzionisti
     * Linee guida per gli inserzionisti
     * Casi di studio
     * Lancia una campagna
     * Domande frequenti sulla pubblicità

     * Editori
     * Panoramica del publisher
     * Soluzioni per editori
     * Richiedi una demo
     * Domande frequenti sugli editori

     * Chi Siamo
     * Panoramica dell'azienda
     * Comando
     * Notizia
     * Carriere
     * Offici
     * Contatto

     * Risorse
     * Fiducia e trasparenza
     * Centro assistenza
     * Blog
     * Blog tecnico
     * Panoramica sulla pubblicità nativa
     * Panoramica di Content Marketing

   RegistrazioneLogin

   English (US)GermanFrenchSpanishPortugueseJapaneseItalian
   Copyright © 2019 Outbrain Inc. All rights reserved. Outbrain is a
   trademark of Outbrain Inc.
     * Annunci basati sugli interessi
     * Linee guida per gli inserzionisti
     * Informativa sulla privacy
     * Sicurezza
     * Brevetti
     * Condizioni d'uso
